Fredda;-;This game taught me about the diversity of cultures that our small little corner of the universe offers. Then it taught me to hate them all.
Chrome;-;Side effects include: -Hatred of other humans -Lack of trust in others -Carpal Tunnel -Improved hand eye coordination -A large ego -Weight gain -Weight loss -Confidence -Despression -Extreme Racism -EXTREME RACISM -Increased strategic thinking capabilities -Mushy-brain syndrome -Subconsciously learning a new language -Subconsciously learning to hate the culture of said language -Literally every ailment that is not a transmitable disease 9/10 Doctors accepted this game on their recommendation list, but the tenth was afk
Grizzt;-;It's like roulette; fun until it turns into Russian.
psych0tic;-;Causes anxiety problems, low self esteem, Tourette's syndrome, mood swings, Bipolar disorder, breakdown of relationships, raging erections, racism. Would definitely recommend.
Sentimental Oriental;-;In Dota 2, Not many people speak your language. Not many people play well. Not many people talk nicely. Not many people work as a team. But if you find people that do... You'll have the most fun you've ever had.
Kyubashi;-;And you thought real life was a struggle.
ephir;-;I only played a little but it was fun.
Captain Obvious;-;Things I gave to DotA: 1. Money 2. Time 3. Love Things DotA gave me: 1. Arthritis 2. Carpal tunnel syndrome 3, Hatred of Russians, Mexicans, Spanish, Finnish, and Russians 4. Broken keyboard 5. Broken mouse 6. 9/10 ready 7. Server crashes 8. 4 stacks of Russians in EUW servers on English prefrence settings 9. Ranked matches 10. Free to play but Pay to win games (I.E. - Foreseer's contract, New Bloom 2015) 11. "It's in the bag" spam (especially Skywrath) 12. Multilingual cursing - I guess this is a good thing? 13. Split second math - Reliable/Unreliable gold and gold loss on death vs. Buyback availability - This is good too Essentially - DotA is a greedy woman, but I love her all the same. 11 / 10 would play again
HekaDooM;-;"THE PUB SUPPORT" "Where are wards?" The pub Carry demanded. "I placed them and they were countered" the Support began, "I am trying to juggle giving you complete lane farm, protecting you and harrassing the enemy while saving to buy more, also possibly sentries to remove their-" "UP COUR PLS" the mid hero politely added. "Give Savle" The Carry demanded. "Certainly." replies the support, using the salve on the Carry who subsequently ran headlong into an enemy creepwave. "So where is mek?" the Carry said, after he was ganked due to overextending. The Support died saving him and was treated to a rather enthusiastic series of map pings on his corpse. "Again, having not even enough to buy boots as well as wards, I don't think a 7 minute Mek is viable." The Support replies. "Haha look your level, so low, noob" the Carry retorted. "U have no item xaxa". "Well, jungle gold and experience through stacking and pulling with blocked camps is nowhere near as much as on lane which I attempted to give you, the carry, the priority over." The Carry is subsequently ganked again at the enemy tower, oblivious to the enemy tp that the Support moved away from. "Report Support, usless" The carry cried in allchat, in between mentioning various aspects of the Support's Mother's anatomy. "Instead of reporting and acting like that, why don't you try supporting for randoms sometime instead of instapicking a carry?" the Support asked, as he watched the Carry return to afk-lasthitting lane creeps. "HAH, support is for noskill noobs like you!"
flanadlivv;-;One day, a wise man intoduce me into this game. "it shall protect your virginity, my lad" he said.
Mafiso;-;Hours of fun, all you have to do is select in which Russia you want to play today!
Sonuvabitch;-;In this game you can: 1- Murderer trees 2- Kill an ancient creature chilling in his cave without mercy and and steal his cheese 3- Learn at least 9 different languages in every single match 4- Kill others players for no apparent reason 5- Can develop erectile dysfunction due to extended seated hours
Pseudo-ku;-;Dota 2 is like a black hole. It sucks in your time, energy and chance of getting laid. But it's fun to spin around in.
Drako9;-;9/10 i am still waiting for the tenth player confirm
Verailiz;-;Dota 2, where do I start. This game has ruined my social life, I spend every day on this game, training, waiting, and drinking through my mountain dew, to one day become the greatest. My father said to me, "Son, you will never be dondo." I said to my father, "Dad, I mid, or I feed." My dad dropped to the ground in tears, screaming at the all mighty gabe newell, begging for his son back, but it was too late, I was already back on dota, at mid, blaming my team for sucking This game is why I wake up, Why I masturbate, why I decide that masturbating while playing is a good idea. Thank you for such an amazing game, without this game I would have nothing to get mad at when I am rock solid.
Falco;-;still cant figure out how to jump
I barely knew her;-;Before playing this game I thought Brazillians were only bad at soccer.
Pvt. Parrot;-;1) set server region to Europe West 2) language preference - English only 3) find a match 4) realise that 5 people in your match are russians 5) get reported by them for PICKING riki 6) quit Rating: ca/10
GrateFruit;-;This game has made me racist towards those who speak any language other than english. Would buy again.
KC;-;When I first started DOTA2 I was a little overwhelmed, as my first ARTS/MOBA game it was pretty complicated. I soon started to pick up the mechanics like last hitting and denying. Before I knew it, I was performing  and better. I stopped making silly  and  got vastly better at not  the enemy . For the  part, everyone I've met was very helpful and , there  the   however. As  - play DOTA2    ,  ,     .      !
Mystre;-;This game is really great. Bots perform extremely realistic, almost eliminating the point in playing vs real humans. -Bots will ignore you when you ping a hero. Just like humans. -Bots will steal your farm. Just like humans. -Bots will 1v5 the enemy. Just like humans. -Bots will ignore enemies taking Roshan. Just like humans. -Bots will not ward. Just like humans. 11/10 Additions by others: Depy the Pie-Ro - Bots will ignore when you get ganked, just like humans. Enlightened one - Bots will also go into rosh alone and sit there until they die not even hitting him (just like humans). DrewTylerJ - Bots will miss skillshots. Just like humans. MasterJonah - Bots will forget that runes exist. Just like humans. ivanleow2000 - Bots can't speak russian or indonesian and don't need to be muted (Possibly a pro) low. Top Hat - Bots will always pick the same heroes. Just like humans.  - Bots will always troll. Just like humans. Stinkyboy - Bots will buy divine and throw game. Just like humans. Kotaro Minami - Bots only pick carries. Just like humans. Dingbat - Bots use healing items on themselves when you're nearby at 5 health. Just like humans. SYN | Chaotic - Bots will never say anything helpful. Just like humans.
Jewellery #inactive til 19thJuly;-;ruined my life! 10 /10 best game DOTA2
Frolo;-;This game sucks, you can't even jump.
KingCharlie;-;i had a life before i played dota, it ruined my college life after i played dota, i lost my girlfriend bcoz of dota, i gained weight bcoz of dota, i lost my job bcoz of dota, now i am selling my stuff on market bcoz i know i play dota, i want to leave dota but i cant escape playing dota, 6000 hours on my account and i still want to play dota, my beard is big as hell bcoz i play dota, i want to quit,but i cant quit dota, its all true, bcoz it ruined my life bcoz i play dota, SO IF U WANT A LIFE,JUST STOP PLAYING DOTA!!
BonoBono;-;while the rest of you picked carry my eyes became teary i bought that donkey i bought those wards 4 tangos and 3 branches are all i got i did those pull i did those deny but wth you just died the mid pudge wants me to ward the runes but the donkey is still crawling they call me noob for not buying wards but a gold per second is all i get and i dont even have my boots yet
Zexhall;-;DotA 2 Will drain you of your will to keep playing, and yet you will always return. DotA 2 Will make you regret ever playing it, and yet you will always think "Just one more game" DotA 2 Will take away all your free time, and yet you'll almost feel proud of how many hours you have in DotA 2. With the time you spend on this game, you could do all sorts. Study on learning a new set of skills to further your career. You could raise money for charity. You could be an aid worker for a foreign country and help improve the lives of others. You could even just play other games, you know, those ones sitting in your backlog, pushed aside by DotA 2. But you won't. You will always return to this game. The maximum you will learn from playing this game is how to insult others in various languages (mostly these languages will consist of Russian and Peruvian.). This game will become as much a part of your life as eating or blinking. Half the time you will not even remember having played DotA 2 on a certain day. It just becomes natural to you. If you start playing this game, you will become addicted. You will also spend obscene amounts of money on cosmetics. A quick chest purchase here, a few random items on the market there, and boom. Like me you'll have spent far too much on a game which needs no money spent on it. If you start DotA 2, not only will you be subjecting yourself to a motivation-destroying hobby, but also subjecting yourself to a wallet emptying one too. tl;dr This game will take away your time, money and patience for others. You will become an angry person. Basically 10/10 GOTY All years
JACKYMAO CROCS ENTHUSIAST;-;When Bloodseeker gets above a certain move speed he should make Race Car noises.
Dr Batman PhD;-;The Real Dota 2 Dota is a competitive game of action and strategy, played both professionally and casually incompetently by millions of enslaved passionate fans Russians worldwide. Players pick from a pool of over a hundred heroes carries, forming two teams of five players five feeders. Radiant heroes then battle their Dire counterparts to control a gorgeous fantasy landscape, waging campaigns of cunning, stealth, and outright warfare raging in an unknown language and teamfighting with one RAMPAGE victor. Irresistibly colorful on the surface addictive, Dota is a game of infinite depth and complexity which requires, no, infact takes an infinite amount of your life away. Every hero has an array of skills and abilities that combine with the skills of their allies in unexpected ways, to ensure that no game is ever remotely alike that allow players to screw with their allies and get their teams killed. This is one of the reasons that the Dota phenomenon has continued to grow Dota will have more rage quitting and all chat abuse than any other game. Originating as a fan-made Warcraft 3 modification, Dota was an instant underground hit. After coming to Valve, the original community developers have bridged the gap to a more inclusive audience Russia, so that the rest of the world can experience the same core gameplay, but with the level of polish that only Valve can provide learn from these ingenious people and become inspired to spread their knowledge with the rest of the world. Get a taste of the game that has enthralled millions will happily teach you fluent russian all for the sweet price of $0. Just choose your server. [imgur.com] <- Link NOTE: Original description by Valve, edited by myself.
Lucy;-;Most fun way to commit social suicide and learn Russian. 10/10.
Queen Battletits;-;Thank goodness I wasn't a virgin before I started playing this otherwise I still would be.
enrir;-;Dota 2, where teamwork is laughable and everyone is Russian. 10/10
Dodge Viper;-;Game is okay but I still haven't done all the quests!
sock;-;This game is such a ripoff of Mario Party 8.
Detpack;-;1,000 hours played: "OMG you have 1,000 hours played go outside and get a life you virgin" 100 hours played: "OMG you only have 100 hrs played you idiot noob delete Dota" 10/10 Dota community logic
Bryan;-;When Putin invades the Ukraine and World War 3 starts, this game will be the reason why so many people from all around the world will gladly pick up arms against the Russians.
willy;-;bobos cykas noobs what more could you want?
nazzzzzzzzzzzzzzzzzzzzzzzzzzzzzz;-;>Open DotA2 >Start finding a match on US East >Finally, after 10 mins of searching a match i get the chance to play >Players starts readying >Wait around a minute for the last guy to ready up >Nope.jpg >"Returning to MM with high priority" >What the *** is this bs? >It took around 2 mins to find a server now >Good, everyone's ready, now let's hop onto the game >2 Peruvians and a russian on my team, the other last guy at least speaks english >One of the peruvians failed to load, thank god >I got lucky and it didn't took long to get another match >Everything went fine, except for something >Got 3 peruvians yelling over at mic on your team >They decide to pick Pudge, Death Prophet and Invoker >The game starts and they're fighting for the mid lane >"guys pls stop y u do dis ;_;" >Death prophet took over mid >20 mins later into the game, we're losing >They took all of our tier 2 towers and the game score is 15-50 >Peruvians are yelling at me over mic telling me i fed the enemy team >"B-but i'm the one that has less deaths ;_;" >Death Prophet went ape sh*t and bought a Shadow Blade >Pudge can't even hook >Invoker is just killstealing with sunstrikes >They start flaming me and asking the enemy team to report me >"OE REPORT A ESE NUB LA FEDEO NOS ARRUINO LA DOTA" >We get teamwiped, then they destroyed our Tier 3 and Tier 4 towers >Our ancient is being attacked, we lost boys. >"gg guys. Please report this 3 peruvian guys for intentionally throwing the game." >"BG JJAJAJJAJAJAJ REPORT NOOB FIDER" >Ended being reported by 3 peruvians and get a 3 day communication DotA2 ban >volvo pls fix peruvians
KVirus;-;Support died because trying to save carry. Carry: "Please no feed, support." Carry: "0/7 lol, noob" Neither they know, support stunned the enemies for their kill, slow them, silence them. All for them. Support is the guy who is behind the carry, doing stuffs. Without a support, where will the courrier and the wards be? Support is love, support is life.
Sex Machine Mk. V;-;Ruined my life, and made me fail school. 11/10
Syabab /;-;Ruined my life. Told my friends. It ruined their life too. 5 stars. **update : 1. Learnt how to swear in russian and philippines, 5/5 2. Report Simulator 2014, 5/5 3. Commend beggars everywhere, 5/5 4. 5/5
Eredin Bracc Glas;-;Soviet Simulator 2014. According to this game, Russians live everywhere except for Russia itself. Makes you racist towards Russians and if it doesn't do that then you're probably Russian yourself. Gives you an innate aggression towards anyone who doesn't know how to play. Did I mention Russians?  Awkward when you realise that Roshan sounds like Russian... GG WP Valve 10/10 Would abandon again.
Julian;-;It's ok i guess.
Sumsar;-;I was gonna clean my room until I played Dota I gonna get up and find the broom but then I played Dota my room is still messed up and I know why - cause I played Dota [repeat 3X] I was gonna go to class before I played Dota I coulda cheated and I coulda passed but I played Dota I am taking it next semester and I know why - cause I played Dota [repeat 3X] I was gonna go to work but then I I played Dota I just got a new promotion but I played Dota now I'm selling courier skins and I know why - cause I played Dota [repeat 3X] I was gonna go to court before I played Dota I was gonna pay my child support but then I played Dota they took my whole paycheck and I know why - cause I played Dota [repeat 3X] I wasnt gonna run from the cops but I played Dota I was gonna pull right over and stop but I played Dota Now I am a paraplegic - because I got fed [repeat 3X] I was gonna pay my car note until I played Dota I was gonna gamble on the boat but then I played Dota now the tow truck is pulling away and I know why - because I played Dota [repeat 3X] I was gonna make love to you but then I played Dota I was gonna eat yo  too but then I played Dota now I'm playing Dota and I know why - cause I played Dota [repeat 3X] I messed up my entire life because I played Dota I lost my kids and wife because I played Dota now I'm sleeping on the sidewalk and I know why - cause I played Dota [repeat 3X] I'm gonna stop singing this song because I am playing Dota I'm singing this whole thing wrong because I'm playing Dota and if I dont sell one copy I know why - I'm playing Dota [repeat 3X]
Wild Hunt 1.06;-;This game ruined my life I recommend everyone to play Dota 2 and not LoL nor HoN . Don't get me wrong, I am not hating or anything. I was from HoN for like 2-3 years before Dota 2 was released and tried LoL and actually enjoyed it for a bit but then went back to HoN. Dota 2 is a great game, an awesome game. I really should have thought about spending money on a free game but to hell with it I say. Mechanics are well designed, what makes a hero OP is the player behind it and the team that surrounds it. This is a team game people, so team work is a must (unless you are solo queuing, then you have to carry your garbage of a team but it can be the other way around). Monster gamers are real. Dota 2 has taught me a lot of things, you can only be good at something if you focus on it, learn from mistakes, be aware of your surroundings, trust your instinct, use common sense, trusting on your team to always have your back, believing in your capabilities, always try to be better than you were yesterday, and that.. THE COMEBACKS ARE REAL!!! This game bought me and my friends together for lan parties and strengthen our bonds. A mere game that brings people together, not just friends but complete strangers too. Dota 2 is a game that will never be forgotten. All in all, I recommend this game to everyone who wants to experience pain, suffering, and torment because at the end, you will come to a sudden realization that things are always bound to get better. P.S. Calm down, it's just a game.
The Plague Doctor;-;Roses are Red Violets are blue Riki is invisible What the  should i do? EDIT:I guess you guys.....didn't saw that one coming. 2nd EDIT:MY PEOPLE....i know i need sentries/dust to counter him....no need to say that in the comments...but its always good to know that you people know ^ O ^
(    )*:copius pasta;-;Made me learn russian to better communicate with my fellow russian comrades. > Well Played! 10/10
YOUR AIM SO SAD;-;Report Player Simulator 2014
Cuban Pete;-;My captain picked me meepo against earthshaker, lich and ember spirit 10/10 would play again
86MhzPentium;-;Free russian dictionary!
Big Smoke;-;In this game you can: 1- Murderer trees 2- Kill a ancient creature chilling in his cave without mercy and and steal his cheese 3- Learn at most 9 different languages in every single match 4- Kill others players for no apparent reason 5- Can develop erectile dysfunction due to extended seated hours
skybalr;-;Really great game. If you love racing games that focus on realism and physics, this is the game for you. Has over 100+ cars to race with. Usually a 10 man race to the finish. Alot better then Forza.
Clash of Rivia;-;Alright, listen up. Instead of being sarcastic and writing a funny review that jabs at russians, I'm going to tell you how Dota 2 really is at it's core. In a nutshell Dota 2 is a great game, but a terrible experience at the same time. You want to keep going back to it, but you also hate to go back. Why? One word: community. Dota 2's community is for the most part rude and hateful (and undeniably filled with russians who refuse to speak any other language than that of their own), sapping the joy out of this otherwise polished and addicting MOBA. It's unfriendly to beginners and the basic mindset is to belittle anyone who makes a mistake. Make one wrong move and you are called a noob right away... at the best of times. Often it's much worse and I would prefer not to go into the details. Sometimes you get a crapstorm of hate and blame even if you haven't actually done anything wrong. Occasionally, though, you come across friendly players, and when that happens, the game is a pure joy to play. However, since the game is 5v5, coming across four nice players at the same time (if you're solo queueing) is a rarity. Why then have I played the game for over 2000 hours? The sensation of winning. Your determination to keep playing, despite of the discouraging community, is fueled by the fantastic sensation of a glorious victory. That sweet moment when you see the enemy Ancient blow up and look back on the match, remembering all the plays and teamwork that lead you to victory is ever so gratifying. But even a victory can come with a grain of salt. Many times you have rude teammates that rage in the chat even when your team is winning. There is a mute option, but that doesn't stop the bad manners that extend outside the chat. People can intentionally feed the enemy team, ignore their own team, teamkill with some abilities and just generally be a bad player. It's really frustrating and the worst part is it happens all the time. Going ranked doesn't really solve the problem either, at least not completely. Ranked matchmaking is a more serious type of mode in Dota 2 that ranks you based on how well you do and finds opponents of equal skill. It feels much more professional and "tryhardish." Although you meet nice players more often, nothing stops the rude players from jumping over the fence and playing ranked aswell. Having played some matches in ranked, I can say the mode isn't "hate free." I had some of the worst matches in regards to teammates in that mode. Another problem with ranked is that, like I said, it's more "tryhard." Many just want to play the game casually and not have to worry about ranks and the "this is ranked, you better be a damn good player" mentality. But don't get me wrong, Dota 2 is a great game in itself and that's why I keep going back to it. The core mechanics are spot on and gameplay flows well. No technical issues to speak of (not counting the occasional missing texture bug or so, of which I have had none myself). Graphics are great and have a subtle water painting type feel to them. All the various spells and abilites look great. The game is very deep and complex with tons of items, skill and item builds and strategies to learn. It can be a bit terrifying to beginners, but once you get the hang of things, it's engaging. All the playable heroes are well balanced (although there is always some debate on a couple specific heroes being "OP") and free to play from the start. That's another thing the game does right. All the heroes are free and playable from the start, unlike Dota 2's undeniably very successful competitor, League of Legends. Dota 2's microtransactions focus on purely cosmetic stuff, which means there are zero "pay to win" elements in the game. It really falls unto you to decide whether if you want to suffer the rude community for the sake of playing this brilliant game. If you're one of those people who can just calmly ignore everything rude being said at you, you have a better chance of not finding Dota 2 so terrible. To put it roughly in perspective: Playing Dota 2 is like playing Skyrim, but having someone stand next to you the whole time yelling at you for every mistake you make, calling you a "fooping idiot" every time you miss an arrow or fail a quest objective. Failed to kill Alduin? "Uninstall Skyrim, noob." Don't know how to make dragonbone armor? "Learn to play, tard." It would just completely sap the fun out of your epic adventures, would it not? Sadly that's how Dota 2's community is. Having played the game as long as I have, I would say that you are better off not playing Dota 2. The game is fun when you're winning (because people tend to rage less when your team is doing fine), which is 50% of the time (and sometimes not even when you're winning). It isn't the losses that make the game unpleasant, it's the unfriendly people. Often your day will just be worse after playing Dota 2, instead of it cheering you up as games do. People will tell you that Dota 2 is great, but that greatness comes with a price. Do take in notice that this is all coming from a solo player point of view. This review is meant mainly to those who are likely to play the game alone most of the time and want to know what it's really like, not just the great things. If you have four friends who you can play with on a regular basis, then you're good to go. The game is at it's best when you play with friends and don't have to worry about getting "a stick in the mud" player on your team. Great game with bad community.
Amon;-;The reason I hate russia now. 10/10
Not Moose;-;The people who thumbed up this comment are frequent browsers of /r/dota2smut
V.T.;-;It took me awhile to realize how much time I have wasted. 10/10 would recommend
Daycare owner;-;My parents got me this game because I'm not allowed to have sex.
catcopter;-;Its the best.. if you have too much friends, and you whant to loose some.
Tisroc of the Komniscient Faith;-;Simply the most realistic international relations simulator on the market
Nikout;-;i waste my life and money on one map please help me
Homura did nothing wrong;-;This Game taught me so much. How to Curse in Russian. How to Curse in Spanish. How to  in Russian. How to Curse in French. How to Curse in Dutch.   in Russian How to Curse in Chinese. How to Curse in Portuguese.     . This game has truly enlightened me.
Mendozacheers;-;Dota 2 is the official sequel to the highly popular mod for Blizzard's Warcraft III, Defense of the Ancients. A mod that has been worked on by many, and therefore it was hard to determind where the rights belong. A lot of legal hocus pocus were going on between Blizzard and Valve last year, and it ended to valve's favor. The Dota name and franchise is now legally a part of Valve, probably thanks to the sneaky acquisition of IceFrog the year before. Dota 2 is a real-time strategy game in the sub-genre called MOBA (multiplayer online battle arena). A genre that has grown rapidly the past few years, with different type of alterations in favor of success. Dota 2 is a close second to being the most popular MOBA, right behind the giant League of Legends. Just like LoL, Dota 2 is gaining success throughout it's competetive e-sport scene, and it's clear that valve is highly pushing it towards the first position. The latest and biggest tournament was The International 2013, which included a total prize pool of over 2.8 million US dollars, which was the biggest prize pool in e-sport history. Gameplay is easy to understand but very hard to master. The map consists of 3 lanes that are constantly being pushed by NPC creeps. You are controlling a hero amongst 4 other in your team, and are fighting against 5 in the opposing team. The goal is to push your heroes and NPC creeps to the enemy base, where you have to destroy the ancient. It sounds pretty easy, but it requires hours upon hours to get a hold of the base mechanics, the more advanced mechanics and the professional mechanics. Plus the over 100 heroes you get to play and face. After 300 hours I have only touched what I call the more advanced mechanics, and I am not even close to professional level. The most experienced players have around 5000 hours of playtime and have spend the majority of their past 3 years to Dota 2. Since the game is Extremely competetive there will be a lot of curse words flying around while you play. These type of games are known for very hostile encounters with other players. There is an optional tutorial that you can take before going out there, beware though - the tutorial does not cover any Russian. Dota 2 might be competetive, extremely enraging and the learning curve is steep as crap, but it is still the game that I have spend the most time playing on Steam (mostly because my collegues and bosses were playing it). Somehow I keep returning to it, so I suppose I am enjoying it. You better have people to play with though, and you better not be good friends - because this game will take your beloved friendship and wipe it's  with it until you hate each other. Only play this if you plan on getting some mental disorder. Time will fly, and you will realize you still suck and people hate you no matter what. It's free so why do you need a review anyway? Translations: German
Bert Macklin;-;This game helps you realize the stuggles that were present during the Cold War, and reinforces your fear of Russians, or at least playing with them. Team up with South Americans to battle the Russians and receive more negative feedback from your teammates than your ex girlfriend gave you about your small . Once you realize that the South Americans are also your enemies, you can play on their servers to escape them because everyone knows that they only play on the U.S. Servers to slowly damage our mental stability to aid them in their everlasting mission to feel like they don't live in a third world country. 10/10
Darkanthrax;-;I originally played Dota when it was merely a UMS on WC3, so take this review for what it's worth. Dota 2 is an addictive experience; however, this game also draws a player base from the bottom of society. If that statement is an insufficient description of the game, continue reading. This game is not for the casual gamer, this game is for those who have the capability to log in hundreds of hours into a game. If you play this game, I can attest that there will be times you love it and times you just want to break your monitor with your keyboard. I have a few hundred hours into the game and no matter how long you play, no matter what you do, you will encounter someone who will complain about something you're doing poorly or not doing correctly and it may ruin the gameplay for you. I can only recommend this game if you have thick skin or you have friends to play with. So here are what I consider the pros and cons of the game: Pros -This is a very intricate strategy based game that relies heavily on teamwork and timing. -Free to play with optional cosmetic costs. -Gameplay always varies due to each individual hero selection. This, in effect, increases replayability tremendously. -Wonderful voice actors with interesting dialogue choices by the developer. -Winning matches in this game often triggers the release of dopamine in the reward center in your brain creating the desire to play more. This in effect causes players to really want to win and may be the trigger of many cons of the game. Cons -This game has a steep learning curve, believe me, there is way more to this game than you might think at first glance. Unlike hero customization in League of legends, not all heroes are created equal and not all ward placements are either. It can be a little intimidating to think that your team is already at a disadvantage from the hero selection, but thus is DOTA. -Secondary to the steep learning curve, games tend to be won or lost by the actions of an individual on either team. This can be ameliorated by steam implementing some sort of "fundamentals of gameplay" video instead of the current lackadaisical tutorial they have. Suffice to say, many new players do not understand that every time their hero is killed by the opposing team, the player loses gold and the other team gains gold. This doubles the impact that each individual has for gameplay. -Unlike other video game developers, Steam does not region lock. This brings about an unforeseen consequence where individuals from any country can join any server despite having a language preference. You can imagine how difficult it is to create a coordinated cohesive team push when there's a Russian only speaker, Spanish only speaker and a Portuguese only speaker on the US WEST server. -Blame is a word that is thrown around in this game like the word inequality is thrown around in America. Unfortunately, this is by far the worst aspect of the game. The game community has very little to no interaction prior to gameplay or thereafter and there is no review conversation on what an individual can do to improve in the future. More often than not, an individual will oversimplify the ongoing team loss to 1 action by 1 individual because of time constraints and heated emotions. -There is no team forfeit vote option in game and often you are sitting there for 10-20 minutes as the other team wastes your time despite securing a victory much earlier. This review is from personal experience and your gameplay may vary. Of course, if you do meet someone ingame who is a decent person, be sure to commend them at the end of the match for their ingame courtesy. Final Rating: -Game 9/10 -Game community 3/10
LOLBAD;-;ARE YOU LOOKING TO RUIN YOUR MOOD? MAYBE, YOU HAVE SOME FAITH IN PEOPLE? OR MAYBE YOU ARE JUST A MASOCHIST? NO MATTER WHAT YOUR REASON, I HAVE THE GAME FOR YOU! IT HAS BEEN RATED "THE BEST LANGUAGE LEARNING TOOL ON THE INTERNET." LEARN TO SPEAK SPANISH, RUSSIAN, AND PORTUGUESE. ALL FOR THE LOW LOW PRICE OF YOUR SELF-ESTEEM AND FAITH IN HUMANITY! AND NOW FOR A LIMITED TIME. LEARN HOW TO BECOME A RACIST IN YOUR FIRST 10 GAMES, GUARANTEED! NOT INTERESTED YET? HAVE A LOOK AT OUR CUSTOMER TESTIMONIALS: " THIS WONDERFUL GAME" -SOME INTERNET GUY "WHY DOES IT HURT SO GOOD?" -QUEEN OF PAIN "    ..   .     .    ." -P "por qu eres tan tonto? I Informe de novato ti." -Taco IF THAT ISN'T ENOUGH TO GET YOU INTERESTED, FEEL FREE TO TRY IT FOR AS LONG AS YOU CAN HANDLE IT! IF YOU ARE NOT SATISFIED, YOU CAN JUST KEEP TRYING UNTIL YOU ARE. BECAUSE ONCE YOU START, YOU CAN'T STOP! somebody please save me..
pawz;-;i've only played this game for 2 hours and the friendly community has already begun to teach me russian greetings such as "c" and "blyat"
Vermilion Wlad;-;You should buy some hats.
Ezraeil;-;Made my family think i got some kind of mental illness.... 10/10
The Alliterator;-;So, here are some limericks about Dota 2 that may help you decide whether to play or not... Sorry in advance There once was a man named zeus His team put him mid on the loose He could totally  But had no escape and so he got ganked like a moose One time Pugna I tried to play But forgot that there is no way To get more than five health Without massive wealth And bounty hunter stuck his peepee in my bum over and over and over and I cried Sometimes if there is a dragon You need to purchase a dagon And then you go ZAP And all 'cross the map People made the excuse they were laggin' Nyx nyxnyx nyx nyxnyx nyx Nyxnyx nyx nyxnyx nyx nyx nyx Nyx nyx nyx nyx Nyx nyx nyx nyx nyx Nyxnyx nyx nyxnyx nyx nyx nyx There once was a brave little feller Who wanted to be the best speller But he was russian And people are 's So now he lives in a cellar There once was a brave little a bear Who smoked into Roshan's lair So hard he tried But he got bashed and died And now his team is giving him the glare If you play dota beware Because it's sometimes a pit of dispair Advice you will heed But your teem will still feed And then you will switch to solitair So I just wasted a solid 25 minutes making jenky limericks about dota... Just play the game, it's awesome
Hiroshima Sex Bomb;-;I got addicted to this game very easily! How can you not with such great features like: -Get abused by friends -Learn to abuse your friends -No matter what language setting you provide you still will be a '' -Feel slightly racist towards Russains -A loving comunity that just thinks you need to practice more so therefor 'uninstal dota u noob', 'play botz ' or 'report invoqerr he feed' -If it was a 60 minute close game always remember to write 'EZ GAME GG NOOBS' -You instantly get a few cool nicknames when you play dota, 'feeder, noob, '' and lots more -Learn how to get self esteem issues, anxiety and if you're lucky even deppression This game is great, and with such a fantastic comunity you know you're going to enjoy every moment of it.
h8m3;-;Ruins my life 10/10
Ze Spy;-;This game ruined my life. I have failed my academic career. I have no ing social life anymore, or any self esteem. All i do is play this game and get depressed. 9/10 Just a note: Yes this a joke, Jeez.
TKP;-;It's like hardcore drug use and it destroys lives. Give it a go, what's the worst that could happen? Well, you could be here 1000 game hours later hating yourself as you queue for another all pick. Send help. As in TP bottom because they're five manning.
Potassium Cage;-;Best Play Games with Russians simulator I've ever played.
aglowa;-;you get to play as a blue knight, a silly version of frankenstein, an icicle, a guy who hates skyrim, a red mongol, your nightmares, a  on a bat, a redneck, a freaky skin exploder, an invisible gerbil, a drunk squirrel, a porcupine, a spider, a centaur, a knight with a gambling problem, whatever chen is, a skeleton, a robot wannabe, an eskimo, a purple conehead, a purple skeleton thing, a ghost, lightning riding a dinosaur, the concept of doom, a skyrim lover, blue woman group, a rock, a fat dog, an old titan, fire, bambi, gravity, time, a steampunk moustache, a  troll, eminem, everything and nothing, siamese dragons, a  knife wielder, an old guy, a pirate, a black angel, whatever leshrac and lich are, a zombie, a cosplayer, something that is totally not a lion, an old canadian, the scottish moon, a werewolf, a magnoceros, medusa, the pikachu of dota, a tiger woman, a tsunami, a siren, a PLAYAAAAA, asparagus, a , a scorpion, your neighbor, a magical human, the guy who gives hitmen their targets, the void, an assassin, cancer, a bird, a 13-year old, your friendly butcher, the prophecy, another cosplayer, a stove, the existence of invisibility, a sock, a sand castle, two shadows, a simpsons outcasts, a quiet guy, an angel, two fishes, a sniper, a female ghost, a fast rhino, a mexican lightning bolt, a rock, a shopping cart, a purple girl, terror, a fish, a guy who hates trees, a sniper with rockets, a rock going throught the stages of life, a tree, a troll, a snowball, a zombie, a bear, a vengeful person, a snake, a flying snake, a dragon, your weirdest teacher, a spider, the wind, a generic african, a hindu, and a god. 10/10
Shy*chi;-;Causes anxiety problems, low self esteem, Tourette's syndrome, mood swings, Bipolar disorder, breakdown of relationships, raging erections, racism. Would definetely recommend. Now take my ramen you .
Moursi <|8O);-;I've always wanted to go to Russia. To learn the culture, eat and drink and see the sights. But I cannot do that, as it is expensive and I'm busy doing my uni work. But then I found Dota 2. This free learning course teaches you all about Russians and their culture. I can even speak decent Russian! However, these Russian people can get quite angry and annoying. They often shout the phrase "" and bring you to the depths of insanity. I got forced to drink my sorrows away during the beginning of the course, but it was worth it in the end. If you don't have the time and money to travel to Russia, I'd suggest you pick up Dota 2. A fantastic learning resource. 8/10
relentlessly gay;-;You awaken in a cold room. You are naked, and shivering. Looking up from your bed of damp straw, you can just make out what seems to be the Peruvian flag hung from the celing. There is a pistol on a small table near by. For some reason, you are drawn to it. It calls to you like a siren's song. You put it in your mouth, the gunmetal tastes so sweet. The last words you hear, echoing through the chamber: "REPORT NOOB MID HIJO DE  NO GANK"
wakey;-;I played this game a little and found it decent. 10/10
veda;-;I speak Fillipino fluently after 2 weeks of playing it. 20/10.
spooky spears;-;One of the worst games ever. I respect it a lot. I hate this game. I play it every day.
Dennis;-;Opened Game. Found Match. Picked Sniper. Was told to uninstall. Uninstalled. 2/10 Would not pick Sniper again.
Kloud;-;Doto 2 should be used in schools to teach the student russian, portugese and spanish.
Studiosus;-;If you're in EU zone - prepare for wild russians. If you're in NA zone - prepare for wild brazilians. Oh, and russians. With over 9000 ping
Grauno;-;This game will make you racist. It's impossible to play it and not start developing a deep hatred for every spanish speaking country under the sun. That aside; It's a great domestic violence simulator; I really think I'm getting the full "Wife who gets beaten by her husband every day but keeps coming back to him" experience.
Zombie Bunny;-;Game full of bitter hateful people that can't work together as a team. Will make you unavoidably racist against the following countries: Brazil, Peru, Russia, anywhere that speaks Spanish, anyone that doesn't speak English. Also, possibly more addicting than crack cocaine, and will destroy your life.
ceubie;-;doto is gaem aboot 5 guis fiting som udder 5 guis to kill big magic rok thingu acros a reevir. Fore sum reeson, boff sides arr semmetrickle. de too sieds send little beetches in groops of fore at da saem tiem in neever end straggle. somhou big heero maek dis not happen tho. dere arr many hets in dis gaem, its liek pokomon, grotto katch them all! except no one kan katch dem all bcuz deres too maney hets in da gaem. da gaem is whey whey whey bettur dan LeL, or Leeg em Leggings. Leeg em Leggings has big  everwhere, peeple maek gud rool therdy faur tho. I geiv doto a 2/1 becuz it maeks mai lade bonur go stiffy sooka bluat. go hear for moor revew: http://steamcommunity.com/groups/ceubiesreviews
Astro;-;Very fun game! Highly recommended. Pros: -Very Fun -Makes Friends -Learn Foreign Languages Cons: -Makes you Racist -Sucks up your Time -Makes you angry -Get High Blood Pressure -Infinite Toilet you Throw Monies in -Makes you a Hateful Person -Possibility of Carpal Tunnel 10/10 Highly Recommended
Patar;-;You can eat a tree to gain health. It's basically the best thing ever. 10/10
!C3D T3A;-;This game cost me my job, my girlfriend and brung out a horrible side of me I never knew existed. Good job Valve :D
Mr. Hankey, the Christmas Poo;-;This game will truly test the bonds between you and your friends. I'm looking at you, Tony.
CS- sama;-;ruined my life! 10 /10 best game
the man;-;I usually play this game to relax and wind down because of it's super nice community. It calms my spirit to be told to "get rekt " and "neck yourself you feeder nub". I especially enjoy it when super awesome pro players stream the games to twitch and say that their 5 viewers are laughing at me. Classic banter. Every now and then I'll give back some playful jabs but I'm not very imaginative. My favourite lines are "i'll wear your skin kunt" and "your whorsish mother will taste your  blood tonight stain" Classic banter
Trinobkiller;-;I fail my exams, I almost lost communication with my family and friends..became lifeless and reached 1k+ hours on Dota 2 and still have no regrets. 11/10 would die playing for this game. FYI this game is worst than drugs. Once you get in, your never coming back...
VZ;-;Homemade Tortilla (for 8 servings) Prep : 30 mins Cook : 25 mins Ingredients : - 1 3/4 cups all-purpose flour - 3/4 teaspoon salt - 1/4 teaspoon baking powder - 1/4 cup vegetable shortening - 1/2 cup hot water Directions : 1. Whisk flour, salt, and baking powder together in a large bowl. Add vegetable shortening and work into flour mixture using a pastry cutter until it resembles coarse crumbs. 2. Form a well in the middle of flour mixture and mix in hot water. Work flour and water mixture together with a fork and transfer to a cutting board. 3. Knead until a smooth, soft dough is formed, about 3 minutes. Add more flour if dough is too sticky. 4. Place more flour on cutting board, cover dough with bowl, and let rest for 15 minutes. 5. Cut ball of dough into eight equal parts and cover until needed. 6. Roll out balls of dough either by hand or with a tortilla press. 7. Heat a large skillet over medium-high heat. Place flattened tortilla in skillet and cook until it begins to bubble, about 1 minute. Flip tortilla over and cook for an additional minute. Flip again and cook for 1 more minute. Repeat with remaining dough.
Sgt Snuggles;-;This game made me think one thing. If you don't speak English you don't deserve a computer. 10/10
Chicken Hunter;-;Got A+ on my Russian exam.
Cruithe;-;>do presentation in school >topic is "what inspires you most" >pick memes >do a passionate speech about how memes inspire my dota play >my voice is shaking >nobody says a word when i finish >feel extremely awkward >nobody really talks to me after class, some girls giggle >when i leave teacher holds me back and just quickly whispers "i love memes too" >we just smile at each other for some seconds before i leave i feel so alive right now
chains;-;There is fine line between bravery and stupidity - Juggernaut. Going into DotA 2 is crossing this line. You've got to be brave to even consider playing it in the first place. If you stay here longer than 2 hours, then I'm sorry but you're stupid. So am I. Because this game, as enraging it can be, is also really enjoyable experience. If you want to be constantly surprised by game, developers and other players, and there is inner drive of self-improvement in you it's game for you. Even if, at the end of the day, you suspect yourself of masochistic tendencies, just try it.
Dramamine;-;Dota 2 is sequel to critically acclaimed hat trading sim, Team Fortress 2. What Valve has managed to do with hats is astounding. They've improved upon everything that the original had to offer, and then they kicked it up a notch. Imagine a world where everyone and every thing has a hat. Now imagine that you can become THAT hat. You are the weapon, you are the bullet, you are the sword edge. That's immersion on a new level. Never before has an experience been this good. I recommend this to anyone who has ever, or will ever dream of hat, hats, or hat accesories. If you haven't yet, you need to experience this. Go do it. Now. 11/10 Hats, it's alright.
SiNEX;-;best way to learn russian.
destroyer0117;-;I lost my life. I lost my friends. I lost my girlfriend. I lost my personality. I forgot my hobbies. I forgot my studies. I forgot my manners. And finally, when I thought life would get better, I lost my family. GGWP 11/10 Would Play Again.
ShroomyA;-;This game taught me that friends are very important, because I'm not gonna play on a team with four random , that's for sure.
Verwoester;-;After wasting my +1500 hours on it, i think i can say something about this game. First of all, this review is not a humorous one. I'm writing it seriously to give information about this game. Because it is so popular and too many people want to learn something about it including who has never played it and starters. I think this review will be informative for these people, gamers who has spent couple of hours like me, knows everything i am going to try to tell. After this short introduction, we can start: -Russians' problem is not about being Russian. Due to the game's popularity among Russian players, there are too many bad (always swears, doesnt play as its a team game, doesnt speak english in eu servers etc.) Russian players. But there are also too many nice Russian players. Briefly, the problem is not about being Russian, if there are 10 gamers in dota, 4 of them will be bad players, if there are 1000, 400 of them. Thats the point. -If you want to play this game to get relaxed, dont do it. After few matches you will find yourself more depressed, angry or sick instead of relaxed or enjoyed. The bad players are the reason for it. As an illustriation; you started a game to get enjoyed, looked the picks, someone rushed carry heroes without saying anything and suddenly said "me mid" or "me solo" etc., ok thats right you are still relax, you picked a support for your team, they somehow fed the enemies, ok still you are relaxed, they started to argue with each other, they started to swear and fed the enemy team on purpose just because of their arguement, ok you are still trying to convince them to stop it but you feel angry, and then you will lose the game. This type of games are not so rare in dota. 3 over 10 games are being played according to this nutshell. Therefore, it is highly possible that you will find yourself in a very bad mood instead of enjoyed after playing dota. -Then, why people still playing it too much? Why there is not just bad players in the community now? Because it is addictive. You can not get rid of it. If someone trolls your game, you want to play again and wish to play with better players, if you win the game, you want to win again and increase your mmr, if you lose the game you want to play again to get your mmr back. Shortly, you will want to play again after every game. However, if you are sure that you can stop playing whenever you want, this reason is pointless for you. -Meaningless mmr system. When i first heard about mmr system i was quite excited. Because it ideally provides an environment that includes less trolls and bad players. However, the system is completely meaningless. Player profile and skills are same at 1k,2k and 3k mmr. Once you get your mmr, it is very hard to increase it too much since every win increase it 25, every lose decrease it 25 and as i said before, player profile is same at 1k 2k and 3k, when you have a bad player in your team it is nearly impossible to win that game etc. It is completely up to your team. So, how people get too high mmr's? They have this mmr at the begining. And how they did it? There is no clear information about it. Valve does not announce how it is being calculated. For example, i played 10 first ranked games with 8 wins, i played support and carries, buy wards and couriers when i was support, i carried the game almost on my own when i was carry, but my mmr was 2200 when some people get 4k starting mmr. This system also a fact about this game's addiction but doesn't help kind players about creating a better environment. -All in all, i dont recommend this game just because of its community. The game is a master piece, master of MOBAs, it is a great thing that only you can spend your money on cosmetic items in the game, it has great graphics etc. However, it has a really bad community and you will find yourself as one of those bad players when you play more and more and it becomes impossible to get rid of it. On the other hand, if you have a great mental power and patience, play it, i completely recommend it. This review was written for normal patience leveled people. I dont say "Dont waste your time, go and do some social activities", if u want to play video games, dont play it go and play more enjoying games. -Lastly, i have an advice for valve, it would be better if there will be an administrator system in dota. People who works professionally and for money for this administrator job would examine players' matches who get reports too much and if they see that they are bad players (as defined at the beginning) they should be banned from game for few days or their mmrs should be decreased. Now, it is done completely automatic and so after some low priority matches bad players can continue trolling. I hope it would be helpful for people who hasnt spent too much time on dota and it would be read by people except from my friends :D ************************Some Suggestions************************ I wrote this review when this game made me feel so bad and desperate. I lost my will to play dota. However then, thanks to some sensitive comments, I started to play dota only with my friends. Now I have some suggestions for people who have similar feelings about dota as I mentioned in my review months ago. -As some people say in comments of this review, play this game with your friends. After writing this review I have rarely played solo games and it feels better. -Participate in some tournaments. After lots of bad pub match experiences, that tournament atmosphere offers a great dota experience. You can participate in ESL's or other platforms' open tournaments for free. -Finally,never give up! You can encounter very kind players as well. After a bad pub game performance, your teammates maybe say "uninstall dota" etc. but after then you can participate in tournaments with your friends. Just do not give any importance what they say. You can see similar things in this review's comments section. There are very kind, sensitive and suggestive comments which try to help me and lots of depressing, offensive comments. Same is true for the player profile in dota, just dont give any importance what the haters say! ***Final Note*** For the guys who say "why don't u recommend the game while playing it too much", please read the review again, this review is a complete answer to your question. GOOD LUCK & HAVE FUN :D UNFORTUNATELY, IO LOST THE ARCANA SHOWDOWN :( Edited: Game hours are updated and some grammar mistakes are corrected. "Some Suggestions" section added. Thank you all for suggestions, comments and rate ups. Final Note section added.
ThatHentaiLord_/ ~;-;Choose in what russia you want to play and you're good to go.
ZJ;-;The best program for learning the Russian language.
DokiDirty;-;When I started playing Dota 2, I didn't know any Russian, now I'm Vladimir Putin. A better language learning software than Rosetta Stone. 69/10, would recommend.
Judas=Priest;-;really easy game, all you have to do is to select the Russia you wanna play in and BOOM! you can enjoy this fantastic ''Play Games with aggressive Russian Children'' Simulator for FREE! also, causes axiety, low self esteem, bipolar disorder, tourettes syndrome, racism, mood swings and raging erections. may also ruin your life! 10/10 would gank!
Loadout;-;- Too much water 7.8/10
Zarilenth;-;Dota 2 is quickly becoming the most played game on Steam, and for good reason. The blend of well-balanced multiplayer, infinite replayability, gorgeous aesthetics, and the time and care Valve has put in to support the community is a recipe for perfection. I simply cannot reccomend Dota 2 enough. The game boasts a roster of over a hundred heroes, and each one feels unique and well-designed. In any given match, you take control of a singular hero, and victory or defeat hinges not only on how well you play that hero, but how also on how well you synergize with your five person team. Unfortunately, the barrier of entry is high. Quite a lot of research, preparation, and knowledge is required to be sucessful, and it can be frustrating losing repeatedly. However, tutorials are available to guide new players, and the time spent learning only adds to the satisfaction of landing a five-man Black Hole or pulling off that perfect Blink-Poof combo. Spectacularly enough, the battlefield is not the only area where the game shines. Dota TV is an in-game spectator mode that allows the option to watch professional teams play in tournaments, including the multi-million dollar International that Valve hosts on a yearly basis. And all of this for free. There are cosmetic items that can be used to customize your favorite hero, however nothing availble changes gameplay in any way. They are mostly designed by members of the community and can be purchased or recieved randomly while playing. Content patches and new heroes are being added all the time. Dota 2 will continue to grow for years, hopefully continuing to find new players interested in a fast-paced online multiplayer experience that is equal parts exhilirating and engaging.
doge;-;The game teaches you how to destroy your life in less than a week.
Borka;-;Too many Russians. Russians everywhere. Do. Not. Want.
Crosslight;-;Are you having a great day? Dota can fix that! Do you enjoy playing games with your friends? Dota can fix that too!
BakachiBlue~;-;10x better graphics than League of Legends 4x friendlier community than League of Legends 20x faster servers than League of Legends 2x lower ping than League of Legends 3x faster install time than League of Legends 2x faster updates than League of Legends 3x more tournament prize money than League of Legends 5x higher skill requirements than League of Legends 15x better hero customisations than League of Legends 12x cheaper microtransaction costs than League of Legends 3x easier user interface than League of Legends 900x more LOTR than League of Legends 8x less noobs than League of Legends 12x less leavers than League of Legends 60x more original than League of Legends 1.5x more players than League of Legends 5x less ragers than League of Legends 2x more mature players than League of Legends 20x more hero diversity than League of Legends 5x more similar to Heroes of Newerth than League of Legends 10x better Hater:Liker ratio than League of Legends 999999999x cheaper server transfers than League of Legends 5x better leavers system than League of Legends 6x better chat system than League of Legends 15x less server maintenance than League of Legends 50x faster server maintenance than League of Legends 999999999999999x cheaper name changes than League of Legends LoL Players can hate, although this review may be EXAGGERATION COMPLAIN AS MUCH AS YOU WANT, THESE VALUES NEVER GO BELOW 1x Until RIOT stops being a TRASH COMPANY and manages to make LoL beat Dota2 in HALF of these REASONS, arguing which game is better is a complete waste of time, the answer is a bit too OBVIOUS? LoL has childish names like Blue Team, Red Team, Minions, Turrets and Inhibitors. Not to mention all the champion names are like that too. Its targeted at 4-9 year olds that recently quit runescape and want a DirectX9 game because their computer is too wooden. These days, easy games attracts NOOBS. Many LoL players used to play Dota but they got wrecked too hard, so they just play LoL, therefore the all the worlds worst gamers are addicted to this no brainer game. Same reason goes why Dota TI players OWN in ranked LoL, but LoL Worlds players cannot even survive in unranked Dota. The gap for the skill requirements for these 2 games is simply uncomparable. Simply amazing how Riot earns millions of $$$$$$$ yet still can't keep their servers functioning. The time it takes to download and install Dota2 is about the same as the time to update LoL. Its true that its a selfish company created for REVENUE ONLY. WTF is $10 for a NAME CHANGE? WTF is $20 for a server transfer? I ALMOST FEEL SORRY FOR LOL PLAYERS GETTING THEIR HARD EARNED MONEY STOLEN BY A TRASH COMPANY THAT EMPLOYS STAFF THAT USES THEIR SERVERS TO TOAST MARSHMELLOWS
Graddus YB;-;Dota 2 is a Multiplayer Online Battle Arena, MOBA for short. In Dota 2 is a pure free-to-play game, which means that you don't have to unlock heroes, maps or other stuff. The only way to be good at Dota 2 is to know the game. You need to know every single item and hero to become a really good player. And that's the reason i like this game so much. However, this can be a problem for new players. You don't know anything about the game when you spawn in your base with 4 teammates. So, what is this game all about? Well, you play as one of the 105 available heroes and you have to destroy the enemy base. Sounds easy right? Well, to do that you have to fight your way through towers, creeps and of course the other team. At the start of the game you just stay in your 'lane' and farm and harass enemies by attacking or even ganking them. After this 'laning stage' is completed, your team and the enemy team will face eachother in so called 'teamfights'. After a while, one team will have a large gold and experience advantage, and they will push to the other teams base. And then of course destroy it. Verdict --------- I really enjoyed and still enjoy this game. Dota 2 isn't a pay-to-win game, which makes this game much more enjoyable. Dota 2 also has the best eSports support, you can easily watch a match and select one of the several Broadcasters to make watching eSport matches more enjoyable. The only downside of Dota 2 is the fact that you'll need a lot of knowledge to be good at this game. If you manage to survive all the mean teammates and learn everything about the game, you'll easily spend 200 hours on Dota 2. If not, you'll quit within 20 hours. Score: 91/100
Kawto;-;"Welcome to the Salty Spittoon. How tough are you ?" "How tough am I ? I play Doto Yesterday." "Yeah, so ?" "With Russian, and manage to won the game." "Right this way sir, sorry to keep you waiting"
Dredmor;-;I used to play LoL, and sunk more money into that game than I care to admit. The great thing about DotA, is EVERY hero is unlocked from the start. LoL has a limited selection of free champions every week, which is fine, but your options are limited during drafting. I found myself buying champs that were popular in the current meta just to compete. I haven't played LoL in months since getting into DotA, how can I? This game is so much more complex (which is daunting at first), but the more you learn and play the better it gets. Every day I learn something new, I try a new hero or two, and it's awesome. Highly recommend checking out http://www.reddit.com/r/learndota2 as well as http://dota2.gamepedia.com/Dota_2_Wiki . http://www.devilesk.com/dota2/apps/interactivemap2/ is a great map. I may have spent more time watching gameplay vids/strats and tournaments than actually playing the game! The in game spectating client is very well done, it even has casters! LoL is just... lol! It doesn't compare...
Dattrackpad;-;BEST GAME FOR MY ANGER MANAGEMENT Wow is this game relaxing! It is a team game, 5v5. Every teammate I've ever had has been great, nice, and friendly! Everyone chooses the correct classes based on previous selections. Everyone know English. Everyone has a microphone and helps out! I would reccomend this game to anyone and everyone that has massive anger issues because WOW is this game fun and NEVER gets me angery EVER. EVERYONE is GREAT. I ING LOVE THIS GAME. I ING THIS GAME, ING CALL YOUR MISSINGS YOU  PEICE OF TRASH WOW DID YOU JUST ULT THAT CREEP WHY ARE YOU GOING MIDDLE AS AXE
S> A 84 CS:GO SKIN;-;I learnt how to insult people in russian. 11/10
red;-;this game is awful and filled with awful people. 0/10. would not play another 2k hours again.
`DasTeRRo`;-;I love this game. No, seriously. Guys which were playing with me opened my eyes to life. After several matches it turned out that: My mom is a cheap  who works 24/7  I am an autist  I have cancer  I have pincers instead of arms  I have cerebral palsy  My favorite food is sh~  My family and relatives are dying over9000 times daily Also I have sold a kidney to buy several in-game items, I have learned a lot of new set phrases (including obscene language and all of the above), I have ruined my personal life, I have no friends now, this joke is overused but there are actually 50 shades of blue under my eyes, I can't fit in a doorway and etc. The list of precious things this game has done for me is endless. For real. In conclusion I just want to say: I love you, Dota 2 P.S. Love hurts
Fyrus;-;i have become one with the feeding
3k riki abusing scrublord;-;When I was young, I started to suffer from a major crack addiction. This was becoming a real problem. after telling a friend about my struggle with narcotics, he suggested I played this crazy game called DOTA 2. I spent some of my crack money on a new computer so I could play this game. The more I played, the more it started to attract me. In the end, I realised that this game was a much healthier substitute to crack cocaine. I gave up crack last year, never looked back. Now I waste my life away playing DOTA 2 instead. 10/10 Saved my life
[GPF] Bjelor;-;If I spent those 700 hours learning knitting, I guess I'd be pretty good at knitting by now. Instead I spent 700 hours doing this coprophilia and I still can't last hit. https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=f7UnKVLL8Ms
JasonGotHoes / Sector;-;You: STUN NOW!!!! Teammates:        ,                ,       .      ,    .                      .
aRTau'ri;-;9/10. Would wait for another player again.
Dougernaught;-;Comrades, it is time to rejoice. The cult classic Communist adventure saga continues with the newest installment of the series, Downfall of the Americans 2: Stalin's Revemge. Featuring the original cast of Stalin and all of his closest friends, including Russian Bear, Dr. Vodka, and Krokodealer, this game is a must have for the whole village. Destroy filthy American Strongholds to spread wealth to all of your comrades, use teamwork to crush the American scum, and lead your comrades to victory. Feel as though you are on a whole different level than your peers? Play ranked matches to realize that you suck just as much as they do. Looking for an easy game to boost morale? Enter a bot match to fight Americans as they should be percieved: easy to find and easy to kill. The game even features collectable hats to help your characters survive the harsh winter. Karl Marx/10
Key;-;+ New friends, interesting events, amazing heroes/voice actors, beautiful items, will help you learn a foreign language, good practice for trading activity. -  lot of stress and negative emotions. Horrible matchmaking system, very often aggressive noob teammates, time killer. And as said a random lol player "...we all want to win, but having fun should be the priority." I shall remember this.
Gil-kun the Pranker;-;Imagine, for a moment, that it is Christmas morning. Your home is abuzz with laughter, and the smell of fresh baked goods drifts up from downstairs. You race to the tree, and begin to open a beautiful present, adorned with festive colors and a wrapping scheme that is both dauntingly complex yet also simple in its execution. You turn to your mother, father, and two siblings and smile; for you know that your adventure into opening your gift is about to begin. You go to open your unwrapped box, and BWONG.. A horn bellows, deafening you. Out of the box pops a small, dwarf-like figure, wielding a multicultural bat festooned with Ecuadorian and Peruvian patterns, and of Russian construction. "THANKS FOR STANDING STILL, GANKER," he shrieks, as he wallops young brother Timmy in the teeth. Your mother tuts and scolds him, for being out of position. The dwarf darts under the tree, looking for a hole in the wall to continue his pursuit of rat-DOTA. "Gank him,  blyat!" your father roars, as he sits on the couch lazily and watches. You crawl, desperate for your gift of victory over the rat, under the tree, and he continues to elude you. Suddenly, with a flourish, he produces a lighter, and proceeds to methodically burn down your house while muttering "GG 2 EZ", and your family sits in the living room muttering "garbage team" and "reported". Your family home burns down around them, and only you escape the engulfing flames, accompanied by the chortles of the dwarf. Downtrodden but not easily bested, you begin your walk down the street to your friend's house, in the hopes that by having Christmas at their house, you might be able to somehow catch the multicultural dwarf on the second try. 10/10 Best fun and Peruvian simulator.
Mindfields;-;Dota 2 ranks among few titles that can be classified as truly free-to-play. While many other titles label themselves with this distinction, there are often convenience purchases or some form of power available for real money transactions. While Dota 2 has an extensive cash shop, all offerings are completely cosmetic. HUD options, voice packs and character costumes form the basis of a store lacking even an iota of power or convenience for purchase. All gameplay elements are absolutely free and do not require collection or usage of any kind of in-game currency. Once a player has determined that theyre ready to commit to a steep learning curve and potential negative interactions with teammates (Again, learn with friends to reduce this aspect), Dota 2 is incredibly enjoyable and possibly one of the best multiplayer games ever made. Every match is different, and watching perfect team fight execution is gaming art. Players have access to a huge range of hero styles and the interactions between teammates and foes are incredibly diverse. Its twenty to forty-five minutes of gladiatorial bliss, the end result carefully orchestrated from the first enemy tap to the final crushing blow. Dota 2 can be experienced and enjoyed at multiple levels of engagement, and its a title that rewards users for a deep dive. Heavy investment, heavy reward. The barrier to entry isnt quite as bad as it was years ago, but it would be disingenuous to say that the game doesnt have a colossal learning curve. As a free-to-play title readily available on Steam, it offers players a frictionless doorway  but the challenge may be keeping new players interested and willing to commit to the epic journey that is learning, playing, and enjoying Dota 2. The game is in a strong place right now. Its rewarding and sociable like few other games, and despite its vast popularity it still feels like a secret waiting to be discovered. The next few months will be crucial: its currently the best expression of Valves progressive attitude towards players, and if it can continue on that track it describes a future for online gaming that is far more hopeful than the one were used to. Just remember to spend your starting cash, and make sure someone buys the courier. Oh, and when Riki starts showing up in your games, just get some Sentry Wards down and don't run away. Also, you always want a Bottle when in mid-lane, and runes spawn at 0:00 and again every two minutes. Practice last-hitting before you go online. And if you're jungling, memorise where the low-level Creeps are. Actually, you know what? Forget all that. Just have fun. 4 out of 5
garry :D;-;Hard to get into, and elves and fire rock men and magic axes aren't my thing. But there's something about it I can't stop playing.
[F4LL] 41 Y3554;-;DOTA helps you realize the uselessness of the real world. I now know how futile it is to have a girlfriend, a college degree, a job etc.. All you need is a bunch of tangoes, some branches and clarity, and the world is all yours.
Solomonella;-;If you're looking for a League of Legends clone, look elsewhere; if you're looking for a MOBA that you can play for a couple weeks or even months and become good at, look elsewhere. I've been playing Dota 2 for around 10 years since it was DotA, the Warcraft III custom map and I'll tell you right now there's still a lot of room for personal improvement. This game boils down to far more than individual skill, tactics, and teamwork/cooperation. The author of "Three Lane Highway" (see pcgamer.com) has called Dota an "isometric wizard-em up" game, and I think it's fitting. There are so many aspects to this game, so many factors that control the outcome that if you try and sit down and list them all it'll take you a couple hours. And you'll still miss some. I have played pretty much every single "Multi-player Online Battle Arena" on the market, and no matter how interesting they are or what different elements they try to bring to the gameplay, I always end up coming back to Dota. If you want to seriously challenge yourself, and you have the will and motivation to work towards a lofty goal that many are unable to reach, this is the game for you.
Pokmon Trainer;-;I can be a tree. Highly recommend.
MightyHonk;-;In-depth, competitive, scientifically proven, approved by Church of England and American Monster Truck foundation, true MLG review on award-winning game: Heroes of League Of Autists 2. Alright, guys, listen. My name is [IG] D[andi] SingSing aka WildDigger1998UA and i will throw some of my wild gameplay suggestions in a game that is totally not corrupted by trends, pro leagues where people play like lobsters on acid (denying your own aegis because you click like a frenzied ape when nothing around is happening) and totally not toxic community where every Ivan, George and PingPongClingClong is a distinguished pro gamer with 200 years of training at Icefrog's monastery of enlightement somewhere inbetween Tibet's asscheeks. Okay, let's go: This riding on cat Mirana chick with face that looks like she just seen a dolphin putting on a condom. Her ultimate allows teammates to get invisibility for given time. Which can, for instance, save your carry+ support who is getting dived by frenzied Bristleback and enemy mid hero with 2 runes up his butt. So just press r - and since they didnt have any dusts - your carry is safe. Haha, no! We can't have any of that! I need more damage on my arrow that i will miss anyway. Plus if my allies are dying, i can just blame them instead of doing anything. If they are russians - just double your blame output. Okay, so we have that hero, Spector, but it doesnt look like this gay guy from Bioware game. So she has ability to move through obstacles and units, has free tons of pure damage (can't be reduced by armor) on every illusion, and map presense with her ultimate that allows her to fight at any given time without leaving her farming spots until necessary, and with high enough agility her illusions can just inflict enough damage so your team can fight freely while you patiently taking your farm. SO WHAT DO WE DO? OF COURSE WE AINT GONNA DO ANY OF THAT: we will get her phase boots because spectral dagger is clearly not enough, we will never ever get free damage on carry, and we get a bloody skill that blocks and returns damage instead (when enemy team has like. ugh, same damage output as yours?and you have no hp yet anyway?). Get vanguard that just doesn't work because of dota 2's RNG programming and then will farm radiance till 50' timemark because expensive aura with item's green damage that doesnt work on illusions (even though aura does work and can do a lot of good things, like blocking enemy's blink dagger that will be blocked by your ult in a second anyway) is clearly better than stat-gain or mana-burn. Okay, so we have that orange bird guy, that can hold solo lane against 2 or 3 people with minimum deaths (except some specific combos that just screw up his escape) and set of abilities that allows to eviscerate enemy team if your allies have at least ANYTHING to hold them in place. What are we gonna do with this hero, you may ask. Of course we will put him on a support role and make him buy mekansm, so he would never have any mana for his high damage dots that also have ridicilous slow debuff and ult that is easily countered only like by ten heroes out of 150. We have Mirana without ultimate to go get all this exp, remember? Alright, these situations are obviously too situative, so we will talk about global scale meta: Let's get to most obvious question: what hero should we pick? The answer is - PUDGE. You need mid - you pick PUDGE. You need support - you pick PUDGE. You need offlane, jungler, roamer, carry, social worker, girlfriend, president of the united states of 'Murrica? - Just pick Pudge. Why? Because someone did that on twitch.tv, you silly noob cheekyscrublord. You, of course, have same skill as pro players so you can just mimic them and game will be magically won! You don't need to think about anything, just buy recommended items and blame your teammates if something is wrong. You got a motherflipping DRAGONCLAW HOOK afterall. If you bought an item that is worth of 3 years of your school lunchboxes - nobody will have enough guts to argue with your divine skill in pressing q button at cursor location to lasthit a creep (mute everyone at the start of the game just in case tho). Next important issue is map presense, lane control, creep control, ability to analyze situation, counter-warding and all that important elements of this pseudo-strategical map game. For all of that just remember these two lines: "BUY WARDS" "WHERE THE GANG" (it is important that you will never type "gank" properly). This is basically all you need to know about this game. Remember: its not important to win! It's the whole competetive spirit and sportsmanship that matters! Everyone has around 50% winrate anyway because of matchmaking, and ELO system in rankeds is based on wizard-science and tarot-fortunetelling (it's supposed to work only in chess anyway). Yeah, developers may tell you their rating system is not based on elo, but can Volvo really pull off their own mathematic rating model for the game that after all these years still lags when someone is picking a hero, armor rating still doesnt work properly, and hero with 320 movespeed can chase down and kill hero with 350 because of model animation? Oooh i think not. Anyway i give this game 100 dirty apes out of 100 and encourage you to start playing as fast as possible, to join in most viral addiction the world ever saw since taking heroin rectally, poping polyethylene packages or throwing water filled condoms out of the window became a thing.
Spoose;-;It's like having cancer.
Snow;-;I wanna be a pro-player so ing bad Buy all of the games I never had I wanna be on the cover of Dota Magazine Smiling next to Sing and Kuroky But everytime I close my eyes I see Bloodseeker in his tights, uhuu yeheehe A different hero every night, alright, I swear, there goes my MMR When I'll be a pro-player...
Maxmilian;-;Worst coop game ever. You play support? Your carries feed. You play carry? You don't have any support. You play ganker/initiatior? Your whole team ignores you. Wanna get your blood boiling? This is the game for you. And the MMR sucks.
Pfff!;-;Causes anxiety problems, low self esteem, Tourette's syndrome, mood swings, Bipolar disorder, breakdown of relationships, raging erections, racism. Would definitely recommend.
Pantheo;-;Ah, my DotA. You are my bliss and you are my sorrow. Sometimes I wonder how I would feel if I had not met you on that day all those years ago. Would I be a happier or a sadder man than I am now? What is certain is that of all the games I have played, I have spent more time with none other than you. For those of you who have no idea what I'm talking about, let me introduce you to Dota 2, Valve's faithful sequel to a game that can most easily be described to the uninitiated as a mix between the RTS and RPG genres. The game consists of two 5-man teams with each player choosing a unique hero and fighting to destroy the opposing team's throne. It sounds simple enough, but once you mix in the seemingly myriad number of heroes to choose from, the race to level up faster than your opponents, and the vast array of items to buy, you have one of the deepest and most competitive games on the planet.
loneliness;-;Opened Game. Found Match. Picked Sniper. Was told to uninstall. Uninstalled. 2/10 Would not pick Sniper again.
Cheeki Breeki;-;It's like crack. When it's good it's good, and when it's bad it's still pretty good.
Sir saac;-;If your looking for a review on this game you've come to the wrong place, but if your looking for an outstanding pie recipe you've come to the right place. Ingredients: 1. 6 tablespoons unsalted butter 2. 1/2 cup white sugar 3. 1/2 cup brown sugar 4. 1/4 cup water 5. 1/4 teaspoon cinnamon 6. 1 pinch salt 7. 5 apples - peeled, cored and sliced 8. 1 pastry for double-crust pie Directions: 1. Preheat oven to 425 degrees F (220 degrees C). 2. Combine butter, white sugar, brown sugar, water, cinnamon, and salt in a saucepan over medium heat. Bring to a boil, remove from heat and set aside. 3. Roll out half the pastry to fit a 9-inch pie plate. Place bottom crust in pie plate; pour in apple slices. 4. Roll out top crust into a 10-inch circle. Cut into 8 (1-inch) wide strips with a sharp paring knife or pastry wheel. Weave the pastry strips, one at a time, into a lattice pattern. Fold the ends of the lattice strips under the edge of the bottom crust and crimp to seal. 5. Pour butter-sugar mixture over top of pie, coating the lattice, and allowing any remaining sauce to drizzle through the crust. 6. Bake in the preheated oven for 15 minutes. Reduce heat to 350 degrees F (175 degrees C), and bake until the crust is golden brown, the caramel on the top crust is set, and the apple filling is bubbling, 35 to 40 more minutes. Allow to cool completely before slicing. Eat.
Pallervant #dagsfrsoloQ;-;I think many good game. My favorite is d2tidehunter, he is p cool. He can spit water and summon tentacle army. And enemy so afraid they jump into the air while you kill them all. But teammatees always steal kills and do nothing. Never give donkey wings or buy vision sticks. And Joffy always scream I noob, but otherwise p nice game of nice. 4/5 meatballs.
intensity^ Yellow Dog;-;If you're masochistic and enjoy listening to people cuss you out in Portuguese, Spanish, and Russian, you should play. Make sure to set your server settings to US West, US East, and preferred language to English to get the best Portuguese/Spanish/Russian experience.
Waspyy Divine;-;All heroes are balanced, some heroes are just more balanced than others.
Rossco;-;great game if you hate having fun. the anti-fun levels of this game are the highest i've ever seen. if you like having fun or being happy, stay well away. this is a game made for people who like having their bum smacked by a girl and being told to enjoy it. the voice acting is pretty good as well. -- EDIT: by special request, i'm going to tell you how to find little nuggets of fun in this game that will improve your gameplay experience if you decide to try this game. -ignore your grumpy teammates and use your abilities and items when you want to. -stay away from tryhard meganerd modes like captains* and play fun gamemodes like diretide. -if you see any weird letters like  or that one that looks like a 6, MUTE everybody on both teams and stay on the lookout for opportunities to have fun. -never queue for matchmaking without a good friend. things that are NOT fun and you SHOULD NOT do if you like fun -buy wards when you have no spare money -pick dumb heroes with lots of buttons like chen -listen to grumpy teammates i hope this has helped you to get more fun out of valve's Dota 2. please mark this review as helpful if it has helped.
gendervoid foxkin demiqueer;-;Hello am 48 year man from somalia. Sorry for my bad englando. I selled my wife for internet connection for play "dota 2" and i want to become the goodest player like DONDI I play with 400 ping on brazil server and i am challenger 2. pls no copy pasterino, this is mi story.
Dtective Swiftnote;-;Much worse than any drug out there and it ruined my life. 11/10
Pinta;-;Learn russian fast and for free, with native speakers I learned something like " ...." and "" and "  " and more things And forget what real life is :)
Patrick #MFF2K15;-;This game is like injecting a rusty needle of heroin directly into your eyeballs it hurts so bad but you just cant stop
SlyGoat;-;I guess I have to review this game because I've banked so many hours into it. I'll keep it brief. Dota 2 is probably the most frustrating game ever created. Your team will let you down constantly, the enemy team will consistently pick the heroes you hate playing against the most, you will never get the hat drops you want, and your own mind and body will frequently betray you and make you contend with the fact that you are not nearly as good as you think you are (or, more likely, force you to live in a fantasy dream world where you are as good as you think you are and just blame your teammates some more). It'll turn you into a monster and destroy your life. It'll murder your loved ones and feed them to you. But you'll play it anyway. You'll ragequit and uninstall and stare at your library of games as the creeping realization sweeps over you that you not playing Dota 2 will not effect the universe in even the smallest way, will have no conceivable effect on anything. You will be filled with a sudden dread that nothing you do matters and life has no meaning. Basically the same feeling you get when you play Dota 2. And Dota 2 will be your only distraction from this dessicated husk of a life. So the next day you'll find yourself drawn back into it like a moth to a flame, staving off the moment when you'll have to face your demons for as long as you can. You will probably die alone some day and nobody will remember how high your MMR was or your sunstrike accuracy. So what are you waiting for, you worthless peons?! Get out there and dance! DANCE FOR THE PUPPETMASTER GABE! GO EARN YOUR HATS, YOU CRAVEN MONGRELS! 0/10 would not recommend to anyone but can't stop playing and won't be able to stop you either.
Bronc;-;Rosetta Stone Simulator. I am now fluent in Russian, Chinese, and Spanish. 10 / 10
Armada;-;Don't get me wrong i've always wanted to learn a new language and thx to dota now i speak fluent  bliyat 10/10
Hackerman;-;how many russians can fit into a single game is the real question here
Nunnally;-;Dota 2 Passive : Lifesteal -- Steals 100% life. Active : Hyperactivity -- Become hyperactive for the rest of the game due to increased anger, rage, wrath, hatred, indignation, ire and hate. Affects the next match. ~ You cannot die from the health loss. Bonuses : +7 HP degeneration +9 Damage, to self +5 Armor -- Resistance from physical abuse +15 Attack speed -- Become a keyboard warrior. +1 Racism per second 10/10.
ryxxed;-;this game ruined my life
Skyer;-;Causes sleep deprivation and total mental breakdown. 10/10.
Bubi;-;An accurate simulation of a Spanish and Russian invasion of the United States.
Phantom Testicles;-;It's like masturbating you get addicted to it
Izzy [Good Future];-;I played this game for a little. It was okay.
Cyborgmatt;-;Game of the Year, All Years.
Om3nGFX;-;Learn any language spoken in South America in less than a month, guaranteed! 21/10 Better than Rosetta Stone
dick sponge;-;Best Soviet Union Simulator out there
beardATTACK STAFF @ fren;-;Just like real-time chess, but everyone is a queen. Some queens shoot lasers, some summon huge Golems and some sing so hard your eardrums burst. Dota 2 is definitely one of the best games of this generation, and I'm certain it will remain as popular and as influnencal for many years to come. Graphics: 8.5/10 Very pretty, the art direction in DotA 2 is one of the best. The source engine ensures you can run it on anything more powerful than a toaster, and have it look great too. Cosmetics look great, and fit perfectly, with some exceptions,(I'm looking at you Alpine Ursa) but many stay true to the heros artstyle. Sound: 9.5/10 All heros have a multitude of voice lines,and some even respond to one another (e.g Tidehunters hatred for Kunnka). If you find the default anouncer not too flash, theres a huge variety of optional packs, from the smoth talking Narrator from bastion, to the harsh condescending tone of Pyrion Flax. Gameplay: 10/10 The big one. Theres a reason DotA Allstars got so popular, not just from the incredible passsion from the community, or the dedication of IceFrog and co., but from the incredible gameplay that spawned one of gamings most popular genres. From perfectly co-ordinating a fountain hook, to getting stuck on top of a cliff accidentally as Storm Spirit, no other genre rivals DotA 2 outstanding strategic gameplay and near-vertical learning curve. At the time of writing, I have 7,469 hours played and I've only just scratched the surface in the combos, stratagy and 107 availble heros to use, it takes year of hard work, dedication and passion to become truly great at the strategical masterpeice that is Dota 2. - beardATTACK @ fren
Dodgy Haircunt;-;I hope the russians get nuked and never play dota again
Shun;-;Dota 2 So over the years you teamed up with your friends or the people you dunno to fight to destroy enemy crystals over and over again. It's the very moba game we ever want. Gameplay-9/10 As any starters in Dota, it's hard for them to find their way into the core of the game. They're cruelly mocked, personally screwed, mentally devastated yes that's it begins. But they can never get rid of it once they're in. Hundred of heros for you to choose from and numerous skill/strategy/item combinations make the game always be different and fascinating. Graphics-8.9/10 Source engine works perfectly well in this game and you can see more specs that can not be shown in warcraft. And you can run it smoothly in any digs at hand. Story..-?/10 Well I got no idea how to put a score here since pages of story and hero backgrounds have been totally ingored. But you can still take a look at it when you're horribly killed.haha Online system-8.6/10 There's the problem. Matching system can be better than what it is now. Overall-9.5/10 Dota 2 is a competitive game of action and strategy played by tons of passionated fans of dota and the moba games. You can't act alone but be a part of the team to reach victory.
Mizi;-;ruined my life 11/10
L Fresh;-;I feel myself becoming more Russian every time i play this game... 10/10
AndreyKva the Pirate Mateys Arr!;-;At first I thought this game was pretty good, but that was until the first time I was called a "feeder". Dota 2 is basically a game based around teamwork, except the community only does three things. 1. Call each other f*gs and berate one another for slightly foolish decisions. 2. Do solo farm and try to win the match by themselves (which never works, ESPECIALLY if they are playing against a team of 5 players in a party, also known as a five stack.) 3. Make fun of, and ruin everything for, new players. If you want to learn how to play Dota 2, you either need a really good guide, or a good friend who has more than 500 hours into the game. The tutorial just teaches you the basics. No, you can't learn by yourself by playing matchmaking with random people. All you'll learn from the other players is that you suck because you're new and don't understand any of the tactics, and that the best course of action would be to uninstall. There's also the fact that some people create new Steam accounts so they can be matched up against newbies and annihilate everyone. Also, this game stole all my friends. We used to play other games, now they play nothing other than Dota 2 and one of them has spent $40 in the game... ON SKINS! COSMETIC ITEMS THAT ADD NOTHING TO THE GAMEPLAY! YOU CAN BUY SOME OF THE BEST GAMES ON STEAM FOR LESS, I REPEAT, LESS THAN $40! AND THEN HE TOLD ME HE ONLY PLAYS DOTA BECAUSE HE CAN'T AFFORD ANY GAMES ON STEAM!!! So there. Terrible community, steals your friends, incredibly addictive for some people. Don't touch this game. I spent way too much time hating myself while playing this. Never again. EDIT: 172 people read this review. Wow. Also, I have to say, I think the in-game tutorials are better than the actual game, because the actual game has only one map, unlike the tutorials. I know this is pretty standard for MOBA games, but for me this contributes greatly to actually ruining variety and fun in the gameplay. It's just all the same tactics over and over on the same map. This doesn't only mean less variety, but it also means that veterans will know the game just that much better. On another note, this game is like the opposite of everything I like about TF2. Unbalanced classes (According to Google, every Dota hero/champion/class/whatever the hell is overpowered), only A SINGLE MAP, relies too much on teamwork when it's hard to find online (whereas TF2 benefits from teamwork, but still, it's not the key to winning a game, and it's much easier to achieve teamwork, because TF2 doesn't rely NEARLY as hard on your early-game. The early-game in Dota literally either makes or breaks the whole game for you, setting the outcome of the match in stone almost literally during the first ten minutes of the game.), and also, a horrible community. Not saying TF2's community is good, but hell, it's miles above Dota. Don't really know why I am comparing this game to TF2, maybe because Valve made both games, but still, just wanted to throw out there some actual criticisms about the game itself and not the community. Now, some people have been telling me "Pfft, just block the trash talkers". That doesn't change anything. They're still horrible at teamwork, which, like I said, is the entire point of the game. And if you block them, you can't coordinate with them. Basically, it's not only a bad game for new players because you suck, it's also a bad game for new players because everyone else sucks. Except for Koreans, whenever you see one in a game, bam, you already know his team has won. Overall, I think Dota, nay, the whole MOBA genre, has great potential, but it's just too bad I've yet to see any game in the genre actually achieve to fulfill it. EDIT 2: I just came back to this game and tried it out again the hopes that maybe it has gotten better. No. There's still absolutely no communication between the players except for casual pings here and there. Seriously. There are tonnes of balancing issues in the game, and the one character that stands out the most is Sniper. He has good abilities and does real good damage at a real fast rate if you play the game right. He can easily annihilate two to three heroes by himself later on in the game. Frankly, he is cheap, and it is incredibly easy to kill steal with him. Valve is a company structured in a way that, if you're employed there, you don't really NEED to do these things. You don't NEED to patch bugs from a game. You don't NEED to fix balancing issues. At Valve, the employees' primary concern is getting recognition. If you add something that looks cool, you're gonna get recognition. If you're going to fix something, you're not, because you're not showing off your creativity or imagination. You're doing an important job to ensure that the product works as intended. No-one cares for that, give me more cosmetics. There's also the kill stealing. Now, you get much more experience and gold, as well as the kill credit, if you actually deliver the killing blow. Yep, just the last hit, no questions asked. It doesn't matter if you've reduced someone from full to 1% health and someone from your team pops out of nowhere to take the kill credit and leave you with a measly amount of gold and little experience. A lot of players hate these kill thieves, but you know what? That's exactly what this game encourages. To screw other players over. Couldn't, say, the gold and experience be divided equally between the two players based on the damage they did? Nope. Instead the players are forced to hate each other and if you are an actually fair player who doesn't want to rely on these cheap tactics, you'll be behind in the game. What is this, Defense of the Capitalists? I mentioned that one friend spent $40 on items in DOTA 2. I actually played this game with him again, and he has spent about, well... $300 on the game. That's enough to buy 4 copies of GTA V here in Australia. He was also recently hacked and had $200 worth of items stolen from him. That's what you get when you blatantly overprice some items and drive the game's economy into the ground. Refer to the previous joke on capitalism. Now, the worst part of this game, in my opinion, is the long matches. Matches usually take anywhere between 30 to 50 minutes. The longest I've seen is 70 minutes. You're not going to have time to go to the toilet (people with indigestion beware, I bet Valve is in on a conspiracy to make profit from increased adult diaper sales), you're not going to have time to eat, you're not going to have time to speak to people while playing the game or do little chores around the house that you're parents need you to do because you're impatient), and if you're gonna get addicted to the game, like a lot of people are, you're not gonna have time to have a life. See: my Russian cousin. It also really sucks that when your early game sucks, you're going to be stuck in a losing match where you know you've lost and all your team is doing is delaying the inevitable. It's not enjoying to lose, and if you quit at that point,THE CONSEQUENCES WILL NEVER BE THE SAME!!! LITERALLY!!! The more you abandon games (doesn't matter if the game crashes on you or if you have a slow internet connection and the entire thing stopped working or if you have a really slow connection and it messes up and boots you out of the game or if you have a slow computer, like my $300 friend, and your entire computer crashes and you can't get back in the game), the more you will be punished. So, on your first few abandons, you will get low priority matchmaking games (low priority games are pretty much like the normal priority games ON STEROIDS! So, more insults, less teamwork, more s, more kill steals). Then, as you keep abandoning games, the punishment gets more severe each time. The amount of low prio games you get for abandoning never goes down. This game would be much better if it was made by communists
Swordz;-;Butthurt Simulator 2014! Includes: -Raging kids! -Raging Russians! -And finally, RAGING RUSSIAN KIDS (Oh god!) P.S: And no, i do not hate Russians in any way. They are actually awesome!
| Leeluhm;-;Dota 2 is a very highly skilled game, don't expect to walk in and expect you being very good. You are going to die alot and probably yell at your team mates but that's just the nature of this game. Dota 2 takes place in an arena where you will fight to destory the enemies Anicent if you destory it; you win. The Ancient is protected by 11 stuctures called towers that protect it. Each of these towers are found in each of the three lanes bottom, middle and top. You take control of a unit that is a hero, many of them are diverse and have a lot of pros and cons such as Crystal Maiden who is really good at locking down heros early game with her stun but she is also the slowest hero in the game. You are accompanied by 4 other players including yourself to fight against another 5 players. You need to push lanes to be able to destory the enemy towers in each lane but the catch is the enemy team is doing the same thing, so you need to not only push to your victory but to stop the enemy team from pushing aswell. There is 107 heros in Dota 2 out of the 112 heroes that are in the Warcraft III. They are categorised into 3 groups. Strenght, which are usually the tanky guys. Agility, most carries are found in this category and Intelligence which most of the supports are usually found. All these heroes have different skill levels, such as Invoker who is an intelligence hero with 14 spells. He is able to create spells with 4 of his spells, creating the other 10. He is able to create tornados which disable enemies, meteors which looks epic and burns enemies that stand in front of it. Just an all round crazy hero. Viper is arguably the easiest hero which as 2 passive spells (Passive spells are spells that work all the time, you don't need to activate them) and 2 other spells which are targetable. You can customise your Dota experience with annoucer packs which change the voice of the annoucer which include Glados and the narrator from the Stanley Parable. You can change your HUD to different themes. The game allows you to buy tickets where you can support tournments, some of these tournments allowing you to directly contribute to the prize pool. Most of the time it is 25%. In 2014, The International is a annual tournment created by Valve for Dota 2. In 2014, the prize pool for this tournment became 10.9M dollars. First place got 5M dollars! If you are into ESports then this game will be up your ally. Dota 2 is a hard game, but if you look in the right places you are able to learn a lot, if you aren't sure you want to play this game, you can PM me and I can teach you how to play. I honestly don't mind.
Cannibal Corpse616;-;They told me to get a life, so I took theirs... I'm sorry, Master, it won't happen again.
PANIC;-;Human misery in video game format.
Ryza;-;This is yet another new release by the company "MOBA" (you may know this company from their popular games such as League of Legends, Dead island Epidemic and Dawngate). This is a very slow paced first person shooter set in the age after the 3rd great war in which humanity has been set back in the ages where magic was still okay to use, in this game you play as an ex soldier trying to defeat the main communist overlord "sniper" who threatens america as we know it. The single player aspect of this game is probably the best experience you'll have in this game as the online is currently dead, the developers stopped updating this game after league of legends was confirmed to be more balanced and a hell of a lot better. They did however unlock a new game mode called "Compendium" in which you simulate reading a book and collect trading cards. I'll give this game 3 meepos out of 5, it's okay but the fact that you're required to be able to speak russian to get this game really lets it down.
Stanley Ipkiss;-;[9.1/10] uh, what ? i'm sorry, what was that ? League... waht ? League of Legends ? hmmm....... never heard of it. dafuq is that ? alright, cut the crap ! let's play DOTA 2.
s;-;I'm only talking from my experience in pubs. It feels gratifying when you win. It feels frustrating when you lose. In DotA 2, you will lose alot whether you want it or not. What matters in this game isn't your hero or this pointless 'counter picking'. Your performance is solely dependant on skill, experience and reaction time. However, no matter how good you are, defeat is inevitable with a bad team. At the beginning when you're matched with new players such as yourself, this can be quite infuriating and almost made me stop playing after approximately 10 hours. That's why I strongly advise you to play with friends, so you actually have a coordinated team. About the game itself: It's a solid MOBA [en.wikipedia.org] with a big diversity of unique heroes. The majority of the community is quite unpleasant at times and isn't very beginner-friendly which can be really off-putting. If you ignore these people (a.k.a. muting) and just keep doing your thing, you will find yourself genuinely having fun after ~50 hours. 50 hours sounds kinda extreme but it really isn't. This is the kind of game you can spend thousands of hours on and you still won't be able to fully master it. If you're ready to go through all this hardship and frustration, go for it, I highly recommend DotA 2. If you're looking for a casual multiplayer game that you can get into quickly, stay away from this.
Torte 'Birthday' Lini;-;This game allows you to exert your knowledge and understanding of layered mechanics (and exceptions of those game mechanisms) onto randomly-selected regional people without their permission or interest. Heated debates can lead to forged alliances to achieve that common goal or end into displaced frustration projected onto others to substitute one's own failures and inabilities to execute one's characters' (heroes') qualities. On the other hand, this game allows one to create 'hero build' guides as a pretense to be productive with his/her vexation as well as to fruitlessly raise the standard of expected knowledge of the game through item and ability walkthroughs in hopes that those one encounters in the future, rely on these indirect, serviced suggestion(s).
Shan'do;-;I wanted to quit smoking so I started playing Dota (again) , but thanks to awesome community I'm smoking even more 10/10 would never play ranked again
Donald Trump;-;Worst community ever.
Skeith;-;Multi-culturalism siumlator. Learn Spanish, Russian, and Chinese all from the comfort from your home!
Kaznae;-;The first time you play you will have a very unpleasant experience and most likely uninstall the game. Within a few days, however, you'll feel an urge to play it. You're going to watch videos of pro people teaching you how to play, and you're going to think that now you're really good. You're wrong. Over time, however, things will get better, and you'll actually start winning. Then, you start losing again, but this time it's not your fault; it's your teams fault. Always remember that NOTHING is EVER your fault. Your dumbass anti-mage was complaining that you were stealing his farm, but it's your farm dammit! Then pudge is getting butthurt about losing lane because he never had a flying courier, when the real reason he lost is because he didn't give you unit control when you are clearly a better pudge! Meanwhile the enemy team is getting fed because your teamates never backed you up when you blitzkrieged in 1v5, and they even have the nerve to question your methods! Then you notice that your dumbass anti-mage is in the jungle farming because "he couldn't farm in lane." You know, however, that he is just a noob. Eventually the enemy is pushing your tier 3s, and the game is obviously over. This is the time when you give up and sit in base. Ignore the fact that your team has won the last two teamfights and you are starting to catch up, it's better if you just quit now. While you're waiting in base, make sure that the enemy team knows that you are not at fault in your loss. Make sure you type in all-chat "team noob" followed up by "report anti-mage." If they ask why you want them to report him, ignore them, if your team has the bodacity to try and defend themseves, repeatedly say phrases such as "lol ur so bad" and "ur just mad cuz you cant play." You could also take the alternative route and say things like "  " and "   ." Yea, the game and communtiy can be a  sometimes, but it's also a super fun game that requires fast paced decision making as well as strategical analysis. Plus, it unifies gamers and conservatives by creating one common hatred: Russians. All in all, this game is 90% getting , and 10% feeling like you're on top of the world, but that 10% makes you feel sooooo good that it keeps pulling you back.
Hurgleblurg;-;IF YOU WANT TO LIVE A TORTURED EXISTENCE, LOOK NO FURTHER THAN DOTA 2 SOLO ALL PICK PUBLIC MATCHMAKING.
Autism Theme;-;PERFECT WAY TO LEARN RUSSIAN! 11/10
David;-;This is the best MOBA game ever made, simply a masterpiece, but has the worst community you will ever find. I sometimes end up frustrated, tired and in a bad mood when i can't win a single game in 6 hours of straight gameplay just because of bad players who get in your games to ruin them. Theyre're not just noobs, they just love trolling and ****ing up others people fun. If you're noob and wish to play Dota, make sure you have patience and time. Becoming good in this game is really hard, takes years to master and you'll never get to call yourself a pro. If you decided to start Dota, DO NOT play online. Practice with bots first, read guides, read items and abilities descriptions first, you got to study before playing in a real game with humans. It can be very frustrating for old players to deal with people that simple come to ''try out'' a new game into their matches and ruin them. Please. Someday you will realize what i mean with this. I play DotA since 2007 (Dota 1) and I have hit my keyboard, laughed, yell'd to my father for no reason and confesing my frustration to people because of a bad streak in DotA, let my bad mood affect my scores in school and made me lose friends. Lost many good stuff I could have done out-game because i said ''One more match...'' which became 10 more matches... and ended up totally frustrated without winning one of them, unable to sleep at all those nights. Due to this, to the careless community and the fact that your entire life can be affected by DotA and how it makes you feel, i can't recommend this game. Dota is not a simple game. You have to be very careful at the moment you decide to play this.
cC Chen, Honkifex Maximus;-;Reposting since under the old review system I would be forced to "recommend" that people play this. This game is like a shower fight between you and another naked man. You're both in a small shower tub trying desperately to shove each other over while at the same time trying not to accidentally touch peens and catch the gay. When you slip over and land painfully on your  the other guy, completely by accident, gets his soap-stained foot into your mouth just as you both realize somebody downstairs is hogging all the hot water. Then one of the guys from downstairs who should be helping you get back up on your feet instead comes into the room and yells at you for stealing all the hot water even though it's the other way around. You're the noob who can't get better at naked shower fights no matter how hard you try, the other guy in the tub is the  from the enemy team who mains bounty hunter, anti-mage, puck, ursa, or some other broken class, and the people downstairs who made you run out of hot water are your teammates getting last hits on what would be your kills and turning them into assists on your end. The guy who comes in from downstairs to yell at you is the teammate who, even though you're farming plenty of creeps and earning plenty of gold and experience from them, insists you're killing them "the wrong way" and are therefore an idiot noob. The naked shower fight is also a one-way road: once you jump in, there is virtually no returning. You become enslaved and before long all you'll ever want to do for the rest of your life is play dota. You won't even want to talk to or interact with anyone from the outside world unless they are similarly enslaved, by dota (or LoL). The video game world then slowly proceeds to divide and coalesce into two and only two distinct spheres of existence and reality: people who play mobas, and people who don't. Neither side ever so much as glimpses at the other for the remainder of each of its constituents' entire lives because its masochistic addiction level is insane enough to leave Starcraft and WoW in the dust. If you complain about how slippery the surface of the showertub is, people will just yell at you because you're terrible at the game and don't consult the online guidebook and metagame like they do for every minute, individual step taken throughout the game. If you want to get "good", you are unequivocally required to follow the instruction book down to the exact letter even if it hardly makes a difference in-game, if at all. If you do otherwise, you will get yelled at. Every single time without exception. To not get yelled at, you have to assimilate into the formless mass. This is all a part of the self-enslavement process: you won't come back, ever. And within a month you'll find yourself just parrotting the same  people were yelling at you for earlier, because you'll be one of them by that point. And you literally will not return. You'll be doing this for the entire rest of your life and will be speaking it like a language.
TurtlePowah;-;Playing about 2 years, learnt fluent russian, portuguese and several spanish dialects. Got A+'s in my exams.
Sir Hailin' Kevlar;-;You just get yelled at by Peruvians and Russians all day. Why is this game so popular again? EDIT: Worst community I've seen in a game. Seriously. Don't play this game.
veryrarefrnd;-;Hourly reminder to stay hydrated, bros
[TAG]^-^$33K3R;-;I want to stop, but I can't. Started playing and couldnt stop for weeks, girlfriend broke up with me and dog got ran over, was to busy screaming at peruvians to notice. I also like playing with 4 stack russians as they 4 man the jungle and ancients. 12/10 Would Dota again
Reapr56;-;First twenty hours playing this game, got called NOOB for so many times that i went down to my basement and cried daily Second twenty hours playing this game, joined others and called the new guy 'NOOB' to avoid being called 'NOOB' Third twenty hours playing this, I finally got the courage to call others 'NOOB' all by myself Fourth twenty hours playing this game, I finally became mature enough to stop with all the NOOB bs and started to give advice to the other players from atop my mighty throne Overall, DOTA 2 is an addictive, competitive MMO whose community precedes its reputation, almost everyone is downright selfish, everyone only wants more kills to sate their hunger for commendations, which they even beg for. The trick to enjoying it though ? start playing with friends or people you know, make a plan, help your teammates, and CHOOSE A SUPPORT IF YOU SEE THERE ARE NONE ! and reach level 13 and you can play ranked matches, where the people are not much friendlier but will at least help you out. EDIT: oh and always remember to uncheck 'Russia' when selecting servers why ? no reason, just thought i should say that ^^ GODLIKE GAME ! someone kill it (you will get this reference after playing the game)
ZephLotus;-;Dota and I have this love/hate relationship.
NONTwtW;-;I uninstall this game. got my life back.
pitchwife;-;Dota is less of a game, more of a tool of self discovery. In fact, thinking of dota as a game at all is a mistake; games are designed to be enjoyable and fun . Enjoying yourself and having fun is the the lowest priority for those who play dota, (especially for those in low priority.) they prefer instead to stubbornly not enjoy themselves while simultaneously making sure nobody else is having any fun either. Every facet of the game has been finely tuned to reflect the players personality to the point that each decision they make in game is synonymous with how russian they are they conduct themselves in their day to day lives, what kind of attributes they hold in high esteem and strive to emulate in pursuit of bettering themselves becoming the transcendent doto master they know they're destined to be. Although it seems at first to be a team game of 5v5, this is a very shallow perspective which will correct itself after around fifteen minutes of your first game. Same goes for the goal of destroying the other teams towers, barracks and ancient. These objectives are simply filler while you forcibly and decisively assert your rightful dominance over your team via your mic or hastily written yet crushingly witty remarks in the chat. (don't worry about the other team, they're fighting amongst themselves and don't matter anyway  remember: you're better than your team-mates and it's inconceivable that there's any possibility you did or will ever do anything wrong, regardless of what may be transpiring before your very eyes.) The interface and mini-map should be largely ignored in favour of committing your attention wholly to the chat box, here you can see the current state of the game clearer than anywhere else, it may take a while to understand some of the games many colloquialisms such as ' ' and 'no courier gg my team are  ff', but don't worry if you can't understand, it's not so much about comprehension as asserting your right to say things that don't need to be said and are generally trivial and unhelpful. If you find yourself doing poorly and being shouted at by your team for feeding, don't fret. They are likely jealous of your superior skills and can't understand that they are actually the ones letting you down. Just remind yourself of that one game you had that went freakishly well and make fun of someones build. 10/10 worst game ever.
Young Money;-;The day I became a man was the day I started playing Dota.
fucktard;-;NEVER TRY THIS GAME. IT WILL RUIN YOUR WHOLE LIFE. R.I.P. ME
Wizard of Chaos;-;Hats. Russians. Peruvians. Racism. Screaming. Teamwork. Friends. Lost friends. Strategy. F2P. Contests. Victory. Loss. Addictive. Yeah, I think I'll reccomend this game. 12/10
[F2B] Jesperagathor;-;Will make you hate everyone who doesn't speak english. 5/5
Shh von Schweetz;-;Finally reviewing this game Best MOBA imo. If you think you are a kind or calm person. Try this game out. You will discover one of the dark sides of you. 99% guaranteed. Playing this game, you would rage. Blame. Be a racist person. Which is typical. You would not be kind to a newcomer.  them for ruining the game, right? Also, you will be proven that hell is real in this game. Noob hell that is. It's a high learning curve game. If you are a newbie to this kind of genre or this game in particular, think carefully about getting into it. Not just because it's very hard to get the basic right, but also it will slowly consume your life. Look at the average player spending their time in this game. Look at my record. GG. No refund on your life spent. Legal addiction. Despite all this, you should enjoy the game once everything's in place. This game, hands down, gives the best feeling of victory ever. As well as the worst feeling ever if you get to play with stupid people in your team. This game requires skill and teamwork. The more you play the better you are. It would be ideal to play with your friends. So it's easier to work together as a team. Solo is a bit of a gamble. The community is toxic. If you can't deal with something like this, you should avoid it. This is quite normal in competitive games. Victory matters, you know? There is a mute option too. On the racist part, some people are branded as noobs depending on the region. Russian on EU. Pinoy on SEA. You will encounter different kinds of bad words, again, depending on the region. Some examples are , tangina, pota, bobo, gago, lanjiao, sohai etc. I know all of them including the meaning. See? Play dota 2 for free language course. Being russian or pinoy doesn't mean you are a noob. You should see this more as a joke. There are pro russian and pinoy players. Some rank really high. No need for it to be high bracket, some can play well. So it doesn't mean that it's untrue. It's just true to some extent. The game is free-to-play. But you would eventually buy cosmetic items for your heroes anyway. Similar to CS:GO, for some items, the price can be ridiculous. GL HF. Don't forget to blame people unreasonably if your team starts losing. Especially the mid.
Duskspark;-;Dota 2: where Russians live every-f*cking-where and cursing & reporting is key... 10/10.
Mr Potato Head;-;the game itself is good, had a lot of fun. But the problem with this game is that u are too much dependable on the people u get with you in matchmaking. Apparantly you have too much people who want to play carry, and then fail at it, what results in a waste of time. It usually starts already a hero selection. People don't communicate, only play what they want to play and usually lacks of teamplay when the game is busy. Too bad, because the game itself is good, the community is for 80% flamers, egotrippers, wannabe carry players, very rude
Vic;-;Dota 2 is the semi-sequel/remake/re-release/evolution of the long-running WarCraft 3 mod Defense of the Ancients, which in itself was based on a custom map for StarCraft called Aeons of Strife. After the release of the original Dota map in 2003, the WarCraft 3 community began producing a long line of Dota spin-offs, sequels and mods (just as Eul, Dota's creator, had used AoS as inspiration for Dota itself), which culminated in the release of DotA: Allstars by Steve "Guinsoo" Feak. Allstars would become the most dominant and consistently updated version of all the Dota maps and mods. In 2005, Guinsoo passed the torch to the enigmatic IceFrog, who has been supporting, updating, and shaping Dota ever since. His changes have been the most significant, the most popular (the mod grew more during his time than ever before), and arguably have benefited and enriched Dota as a whole. By 2010, DotA: Allstars became simply DotA, and IceFrog was showing no signs of stopping. Later that year, Dota 2 was formally announced (with its development spear-headed by both IceFrog and Eul, both of its most important "authors"; its past and present, alike), entered a semi-closed beta in late 2011, and was finally officially released in mid-2013... and the rest is history. History lessons aside, Dota 2 is a game of uncompromising depth and complexity. Though its gameplay intricacies can appear opaque, arbitrary and incomprehensible at first sight, the way these expansive game mechanics interact with one another when exposed to the element of player imperfection is truly remarkable: over a hundred heroes, each with at least four spell-based abilities and all capable of using up to six magical items, from a massive arsenal of over a hundred. Games can last anywhere from 25 to 55 minutes, and possibly far more! Dota's metagame is constantly shifting, and as of writing the game and mod are at total parity through version 6.80, released earlier this year. On top of that, it is completely free to play, with no features locked out to any players whatsoever. Not even cosmetic items, which form the backbone of the game's vast micro-transaction-based economy: these items are freely distributed by Valve to all players through level-based gift drops and random-chance item drops. Free game updates alter the game balance significantly, while introducing new seasonal game modes, and far more. And that's not even scratching the surface of the game's competitive scene, with its many tournaments, its constantly evolving teams and its own storylines, all leading up to the annual Valve-organized grand championship: The International. It may be incredibly difficult and frustrating at first, but given time, patience, simple memory and a keen mind, anyone can ultimately come to see Dota as perhaps the most enjoyable, enthralling and captivating game experience ever conceived. Oh, and it's sort of fun[/b] .
woonkill;-;this game is awful i have no idea why i play it
I like Crayons;-;Ingredients Original recipe makes 1 8x8-inch panChange Servings For the shortbread crust: 1 cup all-purpose flour 1/2 cup unsalted butter at room temperature 1/4 cup confectioners' sugar 1/4 teaspoon vanilla extract 1/4 teaspoon salt For the lemon layer: 2 large eggs 1 large egg yolk 1 cup white sugar 2 tablespoons all-purpose flour 1/4 cup freshly squeezed lemon juice 1 tablespoon freshly grated lemon zest 1 teaspoon confectioners' sugar, or to taste Directions 1. Place an oven rack into middle position in oven and preheat oven to 350 degrees F (175 degrees C). Lightly oil an 8x8-inch baking dish. 2. Place 1 cup flour and butter in a mixing bowl and mash with the back of a spatula or wooden spoon until thoroughly combined. Mix in 1/4 cup confectioners' sugar, vanilla extract, and salt; mash mixture together until mixture looks like a slightly crumbly cookie dough. 3. Moisten your fingers with a little water and press dough into bottom of prepared baking dish. Use a fork to prick holes all over the crust. 4. Bake crust on center rack in the preheated oven until crust edges are barely golden brown, 22 minutes. 5. Beat eggs and egg yolks together in a bowl; whisk in white sugar and 2 tablespoons flour until smooth. Add lemon juice and lemon zest; whisk for 2 minutes. Pour lemon custard over crust. 6. Bake on center rack until custard is set and top has a thin white sugary crust, 25 minutes. Let cool completely before cutting into bars. Dip knife into very hot water, run around the edge, and cut into 16 squares. Dust cookies with 1 teaspoon confectioners' sugar. Russian edit*
Wrayne;-;Switched to Dota 2 after 3 years of League of Legends. Best decision in my life. P.S.: Riki is a .
Eilrymist;-;Learn Russian for free. 10/10. Better than Rosetta Stone.
It's all good man!;-;this game is full of russians, dont play it
#init berserk;-;If you want to waste your whole life - this game is just what you need. Feel yourself great conqueror killing creeps in the forest while your team is dying in the fights trying to win 4vs5 game, or try killing other players and die because you can't do s@#t all alone. So play with your friends, invent new strategies and destroy your enemy's ancient!
Howar31;-;Best MOBA game ever. Although it's not easy to learn at first, DOTA2 has various elements which a MOBA game should have. Totally outstanding and addictive. MOBADOTA2MOBA
master splinter;-;this game is made for children
Lionel Bot;-;I learned how to swear in: Russian, Spanish, Portugese. I learned a lot of Russian language because of this game, so if you're studying Russian language, quit your college/course and start playing dota because why not. Also the pro scene is good. Lots of drama and stuff.
Cozmo;-;I could've become fluent in another language.
/the boy/;-;I really like this game. It was the first MOBA i've ever played, and I love it. It was hard at first, but the more I played it i got  and better. I think what really helped  people that helped me along . Sure,   fair share of bad apples,   . I would      ,    played it.  ,     ,       .   10
NotMeAnymore;-;1.5 hours in dota and already know what  means.....
im a pig that cheats;-;First time playing a moba, guys told me I had downsydnrome and autism. this game is op
Nikenemesis;-;Dota II is a fun free to play game, I have been playing its precursor since it was released as a mod for warcraft III years ago. I have sunk more than a 1000 hours as it never gets boring. It's a incredibly deep game which intergrates complex gameplay and mechanics, its a very popular game when you notice the international competitive scene. however be warned that this game has a steep learning curve and I still consider myself a casual gamer type for this game and as most multiplayer game, you will encounter abrasive players in the community which could ruin the experience, though that can bes fixed by muting or reporting the player(s).
RP.Kreator;-;Russian learning simulator 2014
I just want a cute dota boy ;);-;Dota 2 is one of if not the most frustrating and aggravating game ever created. Your teammates will cater the enemy team, not back you up, and refuse to call missings or place wards. The enemy team will always pick combos or  heroes that will make you want to immediately leave the game while your teammates pick 4 carrys after you randomed Phantom Assassin and tell you to buy the wards. Every other game you will get a Russian Pudge picker that feeds 3 kills mid in 5 minutes and immediately ruins all the work you've done last hitting every creep and harassing the enemy out of lane. You'll rage and call "GG" early and trash talk your teammates but you'll still keep playing in hope that the game will turn around. As things start to finally look good, you get bashed 5 times in a row by a faceless void or the Ogre Magi will get a 4x multi-cast on you 2 times in a row while the Nature's prophet is pushing your top barracks. But after all the rage inducing pain, you keep playing. You suffer through it for the chance of that amazing, satisfying comeback even though you're 20,000 gold behind the enemy team. Only to have your dreams crushed when the enemy team finally kills your ancient. But you still keep playing due to the feeling you get when you get that rampage that allows you to push to victory. Even so, after the game you'll still rage because of the common chest you get as a reward for your 60 minutes of pain and suffering. When you finally get that mythical you've always wanted, valve will come out with an event that lowers the price and makes it almost worthless. It's a drug that once hooked to, is almost impossible to break. You almost don't even realize you're raging and forget that you're telling your best friend how much of a feeding  he is and how this lost game is because of him when you're the one who has 1 kill and 13 deaths. You keep playing in hope that you'll get good enough where you'll be able to play with Dendi or the other pros and you know that'll most likely never happen but you keep playing in hope of it happening one day. I would not wish this addiction on my worst enemy. But I can't stop you, nor can I stop playing myself.
Yashka Sheriff;-;Valve is afraid some fat kid might commit suicide for being called a noob. And with this horribly broken matchmaking I see no sane reason to play this game anytime soon. And because Icefrog and the his devs ignorance about the EU servers turning to s'hit because of russians, who select english on purpose because their own servers on East is unbrearable with the horrible people who mostly feed and rage in their games, talking smack all the time. Now don't misunderstand, this is a great game with huge potential. But the truth of it is it's rotten from the bad matchmaking and somewhat horrid and lack of brain community. Main reasons not to play this game goes undisputed as follows: 1# Russians ruining games, talking russian when they clearly selected english as the preferred language. In case anyone hasn't noticed dota is a team game. 2# Solo queue has been removed(this means that you can be matched against an enemy 5 stack when you are playing alone) 3# No real community Q&A support from developers, and complete ignorance on the game dev forum, mods deleting posts that's not deemed "worthy" even though there is issues surrounding the topics. 4# Ranked is viritually a joke in comparison to normal MM, the only difference is a number for self gratification purposes, It viritually means nothing when most MMR's you are still playing with complete '. 5# Broken Solo-Queue. At times, matches you whether you are alone or 2 players playing together, you will often or not(depending on your luck) you will be matched with an enemy full 5 man team communicating in game, while your team is just 2+2+1 or just all solo players. This creates a huge disadvantage at the start of the match. Now Valve, has it ever occured to you in the small strains left of what corporate moral fiber you have that you should fix Dota 2's blatant community issues? Is this really how you get out of your responsibilities by ignoring and deleting users expressing concern in a non-inflammatory way? It's shameful considering how much of a profit you're making on it. At least you'd have the dignity to give us something back no? I've personally almost quit this game two times because I can't handle the community and players I am matched with constantly, they don't speak my language, share my mindset or my skill level the least, except an actual good match on some occations. Which leaves me with a horrible experience most of the time.
VeryMuchAlive;-;I hate this game so much. It hurts so much. I cry every time I see a . I am pretty sure after almost 800 hours of Dota 2 I have developed a deep understanding of the Russian language. I even grew wings and taped almost 300 popsicle sticks together and super-glued a flashlight to the end of it and starting yelling gibberish with a thick accent.
Dr.Clever;-;My Grandfather smoked his whole life. I was about 9 years old when my Grandmother said to him, 'If you ever want to see your grandchildren graduate, you have to stop immediately.'. He realized what exactly was at stake. He gave it up immediately. Three years later he died of lung cancer. It was really sad and destroyed my family. My Grandmother said to me- 'Don't ever smoke. Please don't put your family through what your Grandfather put us through." I agreed. At 26, I have never touched a cigarette. I must say, I regret for never done it, because this game gave me cancer anyway.
Whales Just Gotta Have Fun;-;Imbalance games in matchmaking and toxic community stain this otherwise beautifully crafted MOBA and thus i sadly would not recommend this game in its current state.
BigDongSmallThong;-;I was a Jamaican guy and when I healed people I swear he used a lil bit of ganja! Great!
vagabonds;-;game but its alright 10/10 get it again
Filthy Casual;-;They took my favorite game and gave it hats. 10/10
Mom's Spaghetti;-;I have been a gamer for my whole life, but I never really put a ton of time into any one game. In the early 2000s, when I had a lot of free time, Quake 3, Elite Force, Jedi Knight 2, et cetra all took up a ton of my time; but as my age progressed, I had less time to dedicate to gaming. Mass Effect 1 and 2 both took about 100 hours away from me; but that was probably the most I'd invested in many years. I currently have around 500 hours of Dota 2, and don't plan on stopping anytime soon. The gameplay is spectacular, the community is great (I have made more Steam friends on this game than any other), the meta is interesting, the professional scene is a blast to watch, and the game is extremely well supported - especially with the recent Wraith Night/Legion Commander content update. The thing is that I'm not great at Dota 2. I've put almost 500 hours in, and there's still more for me to learn - there are still some heroes I have yet to play! It is a lot of investment, but once you 'get' it, you will have an absolute blast. EDIT: Just updating this now that I've put around 1600 hours in. I still completely stand by everything that I said previously. The game is super fun, and I'm really enjoying playing with all of the friends I've made in it. I've also experienced some of the negative parts of the community, and they're unfortunate; but I must say that they are far and few between. The community is largely welcoming, and I've made some fantastic friends through it - ones I hang out with in real life now. Definitely play the game, the learning curve is steep but entirely worth it.
ToRawr4You;-;A good game to play when you're alone in your room in the dark thinking about shooting kids
Manbearpig;-;The game itself isn't bad. Nice depth, decent character selections. The community is garbage. Pure filth, the likes of which you won't find anywhere else that is not a MOBA(you'll find it in other MOBA's, apparently the hellbound enjoy this type of product). The game keeps wanting me to try it. The playerbase keeps wanting me to abandon all hope in humanity. So.......If you REALLY don't care about other people, this may be for you. If other players can ruin team based experiences for you, keep looking.
Delly;-;Imagine you're playing a game with a few friends and you're having fun. You exchange jokes and high fives all around after every epic moment. Your bro turns to you and says, "I love this game, and I definitely do not want to kill myself!" You all laugh. You are having a good time. You are not playing Dota 2.
Turtle Sandwich;-;Better than League of Legends! XD
Arkham Knight;-;Things I gave to DotA: 1. Money 2. Time 3. Love Things DotA gave me: 1. Arthritis 2. Carpal tunnel syndrome 3, Hatred of Russians, Mexicans, Spanish, Peruvians, and Pinoys. 4. Broken keyboard 5. Broken mouse 6. 9/10 ready 7. Server crashes 8. 4 stacks of Russians in EUW servers on English preference settings 9. Ranked matches 10. Free to play but Pay to win games (I.E. - Foreseer's contract, New Bloom 2015) 11. "It's in the bag" spam (especially Skywrath) 12. Multilingual cursing - I guess this is a good thing? 13. Split second math - Reliable/Unreliable gold and gold loss on death vs. Buyback availability - This is good too Essentially - DotA is a greedy woman, but I love her all the time. 11 / 10 would play again
MegaShadower;-;Ruined my life and made me a racist.  this game,srsly. You'd better play bad rats than this sack o .
Sixteen;-;Never before has being maced across the cranium by a greasy, oiled up purple powerlifter with no visible face while being a golden tooth gerbil with a magic shovel who can mass-replicate whilst inside a large, purple time-stopping bubble looked so good. >We Need Wards
shuz;-;The most annoying, frustrating, ADDICTIVE game that i've ever played. This game will make you smash your keyboard, throw your mouse agains the walls, scream like a child in front of the computer and most important RAGE like your life depends on that game. But the next day you will still play it with a new keyboard and mouse like nothing happened. I don't know if i should recommend this game or not :)...hmm i think i should.
Dan [greuceanu];-;Best MOBA game (.) PERIOD Lol better than lol ... lol. 10/10 Still can't find my friends...
Kuroko;-;When you are done eating Thanksgiving dinner at the kid's table (League of Legends), DOTA 2 welcomes you to the grown-up table. Dota 2 has a level of depth and polish that the other Moba games out there just hasn't seem to have reached yet. What is remarkable is, Dota 2 has reached this level of depth and polish in a remarkably short amount of time. What started as a relatively rough beta has blossomed into a competitive game that entertains, captivates and truly engrosses people who are into competitive gaming. Valve has done a bang up job making this game free, and having all of the "buy" stuff totally optional to those who are interested in it. I think the method of giving people drops that they can decide to equip or unlock via unlocking chests is genius. I hope they get all of the money.
ShadowRL;-;Let's be honest this game is like cancer, even though you keep losing you can't stop playing it. Also this game offers the fastest and cheapest way of learning languages such as Russian, Spanish and such. Game itself isn't bad, people who plays it to ruin the game are.
Drak Black;-;One of the most addicting games I've ever played, paired along with one of the worst online communities I've ever seen.
Bog Boss;-;An amazing competitive game that has been ruined by the playerbase. Unless you have four other friends to play with, you don't wanna try it. After 1000 hours of gameplay with random people (mostly) I can honstly say - don't play it. Don't play it unless it's with friends. If you do, however, decide to give it a shot, you're in for a lot of alking and griefing. People will also abuse report tool a lot, and refuse to speak english on english servers. Have fun!
'Kish;-;Supporting in dota 2 is like chemistry If it's easy you're doing it wrong
Paleknight;-;Its fun till you realize you get reported for no reason and have no way of countering the report or explainning yourself. The issue is if you get reported you can not get items in the games till you play a number of matches which takes about 30 to 60 minutes to play. This is a problem cause anyone can report you for the three following which is not your fault or a way to avoid them. Its ridiculous they don't even tell you why and you can end up either playing those matches without any rewards or forced to not to play ever again. This is a major problem who the hell thought this was a good idea?
rtgamer;-;Dota 2 is the most enjoyable MOBA i ever played. The Updates getting good every day, tournaments and other shows are worth to watch. It's good only if you know how to use character you playing with. + Graphics + Many Tactics and strategies (Only for smart peoples. :P ) + Detailed Heroes + Great Community. + Fun to play with Party of friends + Very good hero balance (you will know if you play) + Diverse hero sounds + Easy to learn, Difficult to master. + Increase in servers letting you play in good ping. - Very hard for beginners - You will face opponents who have played game over 1k Hours. - Takes time to learn each hero and ability and find your preferred hero among them. still cant figure out how to jump. :P
Skoomers;-;It's like Chess, but it's not. 10/10
FearSpear;-;Welcome to a game a false promises, now leave, before you get addicted. This game will ruin your personality, cause you to drift into a limbo state between insanity and reality, and make you lose all hope in the nature of the human race. No matter how good you will ever be, you are always trash. Think otherwise? Something that a trash player would say. The learning curve is infinite, nobody has ever completely mastered the game. Your individual skill is ranked and measured in a system that only counts your win/loss in a game where 5 players must work together to win. Don't bother narrowing your search results, all the Rusperu's are pretty much the same. Welcome to Dota, you're trash, now unistall you  bylat  ing . 0/10
Mega Evil Goo;-;They can make great money if they did a deal with Luna's Mayonaise Business For Selling Mayonaise
Ibitsu;-;Dota stands for "Defense of the Ancients", or as I like to call it, Dota. The two is not to refer to the game being a sequel, which it is, but rather to specify the number of ancients in a game. The objective is to turn it into Dota 1. In Dota, you need to defend an ancient, which is either a tree or a rock depending on your religious affiliation. Since I'm one and two-thirds Bhuddist, I usually end up defending one of them at random, much like all the other players. Dota is a very unique game, in that includes both offense and defense. There are lots of characters, and all of them are mostly good at different things. In my opinion, the best part of Dota is playing it. This is because Dota is an extremely unique combining many difficult strategies, such as attacking the enemy team's Ancient or defending your own Ancient. The goal of Dota, much like other games, is to win. If you become proficient at this skill, you will win very often, leading to more victories. Scientists show that six out of every three Dota players that win matches tend to be on the winning team when the game is over. This is because winning substantially increases your chances of not losing. Dota takes a while to learn though, and that is because it is an extremely offensive, yet defensive, game with many complicated nuances, like being a farmer or trying to help your teammates do good. One interesting feature of Dota is that dying is really bad, in the sense that you lose money and time because respawns are really long, like when Halo 3 would just beep at you instead of spawning you and you'd get really angry, except this is an intentional feature intended to spice up the classic innovation of offfense vs. defense vs. offense. Why did I write a third position in that last sentence? Excellent question. There are neutral enemies in the game, and they usually don't do a whole lot except sit there and be neutral. If you don't respect their space, however, you may find that they beging to fight back, much like an offensive form of self-defense. Early in a match of Dota, you find yourself buying useful items like tp scrolls, also called Town Portal Scrolls, or Town Portal Scrolls for short. Why did I mention Town Portal Scrolls multiple times? Good question! That is because there are multiple teams. Once you've bought items, you go kill enemy creeps, and they aren't people so it's ethically sound and completely morally fine to do. :) Once you've spilt some blood, or watched as they comically struggle to kill each other for your favor, you may realize that you have more money and have leveled up. That is because creeps are made of gold stitched together by experience and points, and that usually transfers to you after they die. Think of it like inheritance or maybe a n involuntary tribute system. Once you've levelled up and gotten rich, you can buy better items that make you stronger, and then get new abilities like skills, active abilities, passive abilities, or passive-aggressive abilities. These abilities let you hurt creeps and other palyers more effectively, which may or may not be socially acceptable in your region of birth. Please refer to local ethic codes and statutes to determine whether victory is a viable gameplay style for you in your chosen country of choice. Once you've become the best all-around person you can be, or at least made some incremental progress down that road that usually takes about an hour on average, (resets between games, so you never get bored) it's time to go tear down the other team's towers (those, like many buildings in the united states, canada, or certain US territories, will fight back and damage you) and then eventually go and destroy their Ancient, which is what the A stands for in Dota. That makes your team the winner, and implies that you are better people in a metaphorical sense than your enemy team counterparts.
Drugs;-;As this was my first MOBA game, my first few hours were spent hearing people calling me bad, insulting my mom, and questioning my sexuality. Now after 1000+ hours, I can safely tell others they are bad, tell them to uninstall, and call them ugly. 10/10 game is satisfying after learning.
DIABLO 3 ANYONE?;-;this game gets my  so hard
Alleria WindRunner.;-;i killed a flying donkey as a talking scoripion 10/10
Kaneki Ken;-;Much of what you have heard of DOTA 2 is probably true. It is an often cruel, tricky to approach and that requires huge amounts of time to master. It is these characteristics, however, to make it a game unique depth and the potential rewards that can give a feeling of "conquest", actually earned a high price, and therefore real, tangible. All this long to find, in a relatively short time, a team more or less sets of people with whom it is possible to cooperate and communicate effectively, since the nature of the deep tactical gameplay makes it almost impossible to be accompanied by casual players and hope to derive mutual benefit and fun, especially in the long term. Now that DOTA 2 is available for all, the challenge of numbers with the main competitor League of Legends can begin. In the face of a rock starting even steeper, Valve from its experience exceptionally balanced and truly free from the need to open your wallet, not counting infrastructure for the live broadcast of the games can be the envy of every Another developer MOBA. If the work on accessibility will continue in the right direction, this could make the confrontation one of the most exciting and interesting in recent years.
Tyrion Lannister;-;Going on a trip to Russia or Mexico? It's percect! Learn Russian or Spanish in just days with this handy-dandy language guide!
Oh snap its Rarras;-;Made me lose my friends, lose my social life and lose my mind 10/10
Nani Sore;-;After $200+ dollars, 1700 hours, some boyfriends, and some keyboards I'll tell you something. Run, run and don't install this. 10/10 would give my soul again.
Wil;-;I played this game because friends asked me to. With 20 hours under my belt, I can safely say I still have absolutely no idea what the  I'm doing. This game is NOT beginner-friendly. If this is your first MOBA, you need to start with something lighter, because DOTA 2 will completely overwhelm you. There's very little balance, players will treat you like trash (because most of the community is built of DOTA 1 players who already know the ins-and-outs) and you will struggle to find the right guides that will show you what you're doing wrong. If you're playing with friends who are much better than you, you'll only be holding them back. If you're playing with friends who are much worse than you, you'll grow tired of playing with them. DOTA 2 is like a fine wine -- a lot of fun for somebody experienced. Tastes like pee for a newbie.
Enigma;-;League of Legends has the spanish, this has the russians. These two games have brought out a racist side in me that I never thought existed. While having 1000+ hours played in LoL, and developing a strong hatred for the spanish and any other culture that speaks something close to spanish, this game has also made me develop a hatred for the russian community. As you can see, I've only played 50 odd hours of this game at the time this review was made, but if I had to add at least ONE positive note to this review, its this. I've mananged to learn russian in only a few hours, grasping the most important phrase, " blyat". This phrase runs through my mind, every day of every minute. I sometimes even say it to myself in my head IRL when I see someone doing something moronic. This game is a russian weapon developed by Putin himself to enslave the world, along with the help of whatever leader Brazil has right now. While most of the friends I play with play LoL, I quit that in order to seek refuge from the spanish epidemic there is over there, but instead, have been sucked into this South America/Russian racism simulator wasting most of the extra money I have on steam to buy cosmetic items for heroes I've just played. I never liked history when in school, I hated it, with a passion, just like the Americans with their hatred for the Russians. This game has taught me everything I need to know on why to hate russia, how to hate russia and question the very existance of that country based on the ape like intelligence that I've seen coming from the country. In short, if you've always been a saint in your life, never swore, never hated another culture, never thought of abusing everyone you know that doesn't speak english that well, then I'd suggest not playing MOBA's entirely, all jokes aside. If cancer had to be a game, this would be it. Without a thought. What valve has done, is develop a way of making World War 3 possible. Along with the help of Putin, and his various ape test subjects that I've encountered in the game. 11/10 would keep playing.
Anth0nyyy;-;Do you like good games? Sorry, then this game just isn't for you then. This game is really bad, don't play it.
Goodbye World, I Hate You;-;Dota 2, the game for all cultures of the world, and a game that teaches you about those cultures, and hopefully teaches them about yours. If only those cultures could learn to stay on their own servers. No offense intended. Edit 5/6/2015 I have now used $90 total dollars on this game to updgrade the International Compendium 2015. Next year I will not make the same mistake that I have made this year. :( I don goofed.
Eldwyn The Enlightened;-;Well if you broke up with your girlfriend and having pain, start playing this game. You will face with drunks and russians and that makes you cancer. So that cancer will make your pains end shortly.
Baguette.J/\Z;-;my favourite game of all time, ruined my life but INTERESTING , lol.
Kero;-;Three things are infinite: the universe, Russians on west Europe servers and human stupidity; and I'm not sure about the universe.  Albert ''CY-KA'' Einstein
default;-;Although I'm not a MOBA type of guy I can easily say that the only thing LoL does better than Dota is it's rule 34.
Omnicolour;-;If you have any ambition in life: 'DO NOT PLAY THIS GAME!' If you do... YOU MAY NEVER STOP... Turn around. Run. You Have Been Warned.
ZSESVJP;-;This game really sucks. I regret for downloading 6 gigabytes of hooks and hats. Game has no plot. Community consists of angry guys which wear addidas and smoke in porches. They told bad things about my mom. I dont like it.
Scocci;-;Russian rage simulator 0/10
Drow;-;Do you like to be insulted about your mothers sexuality? Like to have your intelligence questioned ? Like the sound of pinging ? Do you like to wait ?!? Then maybe Dota 2 is the game for you ! Enjoy all this and so much more ! 10/10 would be a feeding noob again
*N;-;bussines :3
Violent Banana;-;IT WILL EAT YOUR SOUL IT WILL EAT YOUR SOUL IT WILL EAT YOUR SOUL IT WILL EAT YOUR SOUL IT WILL EAT YOUR SOUL IT WILL EAT YOUR SOUL IT WILL EAT YOUR SOUL IT WILL EAT YOUR SOUL IT WILL EAT YOUR SOUL IT WILL EAT YOUR SOUL IT WILL EAT YOUR SOUL IT WILL EAT YOUR SOUL IT WILL EAT YOUR SOUL IT WILL EAT YOUR SOUL IT WILL EAT YOUR SOUL IT WILL EAT YOUR SOUL IT WILL EAT YOUR SOUL IT WILL EAT YOUR SOUL IT WILL EAT YOUR SOUL IT WILL EAT YOUR SOUL IT WILL EAT YOUR SOUL IT WILL EAT YOUR SOUL IT WILL EAT YOUR SOUL IT WILL EAT YOUR SOUL IT WILL EAT YOUR SOUL IT WILL EAT YOUR SOUL IT WILL EAT YOUR SOUL IT WILL EAT YOUR SOUL IT WILL EAT YOUR SOUL IT WILL EAT YOUR SOUL IT WILL EAT YOUR SOUL IT WILL EAT YOUR SOUL IT WILL EAT YOUR SOUL IT WILL EAT YOUR SOUL IT WILL EAT YOUR SOUL IT WILL EAT YOUR SOUL IT WILL EAT YOUR SOUL IT WILL EAT YOUR SOUL IT WILL EAT YOUR SOUL IT WILL EAT YOUR SOUL IT WILL EAT YOUR SOUL IT WILL EAT YOUR SOUL
WickedWaldo'sWombatWarehouse;-;> Game is hard...
laga;-;its ok for a few hours i guess.
ayto;-;It's a good game, a bit overated in my opinion. But defenitely okay to be in a top list! To say that it is one of the best ARTS/MOBA etc is really exageration, it's only like 3 years in existence, you need way more to compare it to HON, LOL or Smite.
Handsome;-;I was never racist until I played dota2.
mister cow;-;This game made me xenophobic 10/10
Matt;-;This game isn't like Call of Duty at ALL. 0/5 stars, not worth the money.
TheFlyingFishy, esquire;-;You ever wanted to instantly become racist? Cuz I didn't but its a bit late now. An uncontrollable rage towards minorities / 10
porCo~;-;DOTO IS THE BEST MMORPG CREATED BY BLIZZARD.
clownjob;-;i don't think humans play this game i think it's a zoo test for chimpansees
KingHorseFondler69;-;DOTA 2 is my favorite way. The program lets me assume the role of another creature, helping me experience our oneness with the universe. I like to assume the position of the dinosaur-riding, lightning-wielding, half-lizard half-man. I like to join servers with up to nine other disciples, be Disruptor (as he is called), and go to the jungle, closing my eyes; there I concentrate on my breathing. The other disciples (woefully) always curse at me. I usually have to mute them. I do so to concentrate on being one with the virtual nature. (I cant afford to go to national parks, so this is the best thing). Sometimes I see lots of colorful exclamations points and these PING PING PING PING PING sounds occur around my character. They are beautiful. One time someone said, THE ?! LEVEL 1 DISRUPTOR, BUY COURIER YOU ING ! And the truth is there are many players like him. They arent at peace with themselves. Perhaps if he came into the forest and hummed koans with me, and he had done so as the giant, walking tree, then he would see his greater consciousness. All the negative energy would leave his body, and wed share a moment of experiencing our Buddha nature. In my experience, sessions last about 10-20 minutes. And initially it did not take long to find a server; apparently Ive been moved to low-priority matchmaking. But thats okay. I just assume the lotus position in my chair and wait patiently. The only downside to this is that sometimes I forget to click the "accept" button.
Beam;-;Dota, A game where every character is op in their own unique way, fun to play with friends, requires team work, and communication. game is lots of fun. 10/10 recommend, GG commend me, report team. And remember to get up and stretch after everygame, or even go outside and take a walk.
Death&Healing;-;After playing 1.500 hours (like there is 200 on the 2nd one) I have finally quit this game. Here is the reasons. 1)Broken stupid  meta , icefrog's nerfs and buffs. First of all the guy who makes all the balancing things doesn't even play the game itself. IF a hero gets picked too much in the pro scene , icefrog will nerf the  out of that hero and make it unplayable (Exp:Ember Spirit). Or he just buffs a hero like Riki since the day he came in Dota 2 (Riki is generally easy to counter in high skill pubs but he wrecks the  out of new players) and nerf a hero like Crystal Maiden both nerfing her damage movespeed etc. 2)THE ING COMMUNITY+MATCHMAKING (+Russians on English Lang.) AND RANKED Aaand here we are at the best part of Dota , the community... It is filled with immature kids who will rage at you and say stupid  like ''omfg u so noob'' ''learn2play feggit'' ''y u use midas on big creep'' , it's literally cancer for someone sensitive aganist stupidity . Believe me after spending hours and hours inside those people you will slowly become one of them or atleast it will cause depression + anger issues. Ranked system of Dota is just simply broken. There is no difference between a 3.5k player and a 1k player , it is all the same. The points are just there so some  can brag about his non existent 6k mmr lie.(Hell i typed a comment under a vid related to Dota some guy just came in and said he had 6k and you are a ing noob you should kill myself omfg) And the public matchmaking, slightly better than ranked a little bit because 1 out of a KAJILLION BILLION CHANCE you can actually meet with people who are funny and nice to play with (i made a lot of friends like this) but believe me most of the time you pick EU server with ENG language you will get Russians who farm Dagon on CM in hardlane and never communicate with you. You will slightly learn Russian because these guys never speak English even if they know it and since they love to scream in mic (like idi nahuy pidor suka blyat padaroshnik pizdec bla bla bla...) you will instantly learn MOTTHEEERR RRRRUSSIA ACCENT.+Either you will get (Not being racist here , but Dota really does make you racist) Esta muerto mexican fellas , Spanish people on American server (or Russians with 9000 ping). Btw don't ever write guides like I did. I innocently wanted to help the other new players with a few guides about the heroes I know really well. Some Armenian kid called me a  with his poor English. (For telling people to use Midas on the big creep in jungle camps to get a level advantage) 3)Lastly (Because i dont need to say anything more why this game is so piece of ) the ing effects on you... Why do you even want to play this game , it is like eating an apple with 4000 worms inside. Anyways arguing with a Dota player made me realise that this game completely destroys your social life and your ability to think, go try it yourself try to say something opposite to these s... (There is a big ''real life'' world for you to discover out here. Get a hobby instead of playing this.) So im done please never ever ever start playing this game.
Mav;-;Best rts original DotA strategy game ever
MasterJonah;-;Called me , reported. Quit the game, reported. Asked to be commended, reported. Told me to stop pinging, reported. Prevented me from killstealing, reported. Played as a hero I think is OP, reported. Stole my last hit on a creep, reported. You will not be allowed to use the courier if I have items in stash. You will not be allowed to call me a noob when I get 10 deaths and 0 kills. You will not be allowed to pick MY hero unless I say so. I will ping you to death the moment I have a reason to. I will play IO as a hard carry. I will take the invis rune as riki. Good Luck and Have Fun
[SwUn] Heisenpug;-;Step 1. Install Step 2. Search for match. Step 3. Go lion. Step 4. Tell your mother you fingered a dude. 10/10
hardeh;-;Totally unfriendly game for a new players plus extremely toxic community
Scribby;-;It's bassicly meth, ruined my life, lost all my friends, gpa took a nose dive, parents have no more faith in me, no longer have hopes and dreams, and its the only thing left I know how to do. But the high I get while playing has yet to be matched. 10 out of 10 would recommend to anyone.
Pootis;-;Dota 2 is a bad game for multiple reasons. It has some nice, rewarding moments during gameplay, but most of the time you will find yourself screaming at your teamates, pulling your hair our, throwing the computer across the room, and cursing Russians, Brazilians, and pracitacally any other ethnicty that does not speak English. Never have I played a game that has made experience such pure rage towards other players and towards myself. PROS -Team based mechanics that require cooperation -Punishment systems for people who grief or abandon -Good art, lore, and character design -Large, free roster of playable characters -A Valve spin off of the orignial DotA, a Warcraft III mod -Cosmetics CONS -Crappy, boring tutorial and does not prepare new players -Terrible match making system -Broken  gameplay -No true skillshots (With the exception of Meat Hook, Hookshot, and Sacred Arrow) -Support heroes are generally unattractive and no one wants to buy wards or courier -Exessive intentional counter picking which ruins your game from the very beginning -Filled with people from different nationalities who do not speak English (usually Russains) which means communication -Lots of griefers and trolls who threaten to feed, abandon, or simply say "mid or feed" and claim the middle lane by their divine right, usually resulting in them feeding the enemy team and never ganking if they are arrogant -Pubs are awful and unless you queue with a friend you will most likely suffer by yourself -100% team game meaning it requires synergy and cooperations (which most pub teams don't possess) -The game is super addictive and you wont want to shut down the game and do something else unless you are pretty much forced to (You wont even want to get up to eat or ) -Harsh, cruel community in-game and out of game (Even towards the game's devs: "Diretide 2013" incident, "Lucky Alpine Stalker Set" controversy, etc.) -Cosmetics (Yes it's a con aswell due to the fact that it ushers in a wave of casual players who don't really care about actually gameplay) This game has some good points but the cons clearly outweigh the pros. Despite the hours I have clocked on this game, most of my experiences have been terrible and it has negatively impacted my social life and made me a hateful person at times. Don't even bother with this game.
Fapplet;-;Whenever you search for a Dota game a plane flys over Russia and picks 9 random civilians.
~Soumo;-;DOTA 2 is a Multiplayer Online Battle Arena, that adopted most of its mechanics from the original DOTA Mod of Warcraft 3. Now, let's come to some of its features: - --> Once you understand the basics, and become good at the game (oh wait, everyone of us is a noob) , you will soon have a huge backlog of other games. :P --> Basically hat simulator. --> Can cause rage, anxiety and affect your mental state. (too many , griefers) --> You make 1000 good moves in a game, and you won't be recognized. Go feed once and get reported. --> You will start putting aside other priorities. Ty Dota2. --> To sum it up, it has a  community like most other MOBAs, unless you are insanely good at the game. 10/10 Recommended! Best game ever played!
Agent Dale;-;Good Game, Bad Teammates
Philosleon;-;This game is total garbage, with the worst community I've ever seen in any multiplayer game. The game will lower your IQ if you indulge in it over extended periods of time and will also ruin your mental state. Caution, it causes depression and explicit anger. MMR is broken, and every server you play on is Russian. The only good thing is that you'll acquire some knowledge about the Russian language aswell as some of their mental capabilities (if they even exist).
Chamst;-;Fastest way to learn russian, 10/10
Stevie;-;Oh, you're new to this game and you want to play with something other than mindless bots? Well you're ed because people think it's funny to smurf and not give new players a chance. gg But it's so good. Game = 10/10 Community = -10/10
Kuwaii;-;10/10 more addictive than crack cocaine
-AoG-SHARKE BYTE [FYG];-;I think this game gave me cancer from all the russian s who scream 10/10
Righteous itch;-;If you like to watch the hours of your youth drip away like sand through an hour glass, then this is the game for you. If you like watching snotty know it all's get crushed in all too ironic ways by the enemy, then this is the game for you. If you like the sweet sting of success being ruthlessly snatched away from you as the enemy ploughs through your advance on their base like a warm knife through butter, then this game is for you. If you like low level intensity games, where even if you lose, your pride stays intact, or games that don't have you swearing like a Tarantino film at the screen over the smallest thing....then this game is not for you. Dota2 is like cyber cocaine.
pd0';-;Hi. I only recommend you this game if you love MOBAs, but I didn't like MOBAs and now I have 1200 hours in it. I was a COD player, an MW2 player. Of course you will not be ''pro'' in your first matches. To be good you need a lot of training. If you played LoL and you have 30 lvl its sure you know the "basics". In this game the most important thing is the "Last Hitting" at the start, because if you have more gold and XP than your enemy, you own the game. The game may be boring, but if you have friends it won't be. I think the boring part is the first 13 lvl because you can't play some gamemodes before that. If you are new here you need to complete the training! If you are totally new here completing the training will get you a Sniper set. No the setts doesn't give you any bonus, just the enemy can see how rich you are. These decorative items have degree: Common, Uncommon, Rare, Mythical, Immortal, Old and Arcane. This items can be Normal, Auspicious, Heroic, Cursed and Unusual. So these were the decorative items lets talk about the in-game items! You start with 625 gold each hero have their own item build. I recommend you the Healing Slave, Tango and clarity items, this items will fill your HP or your mana. If you are new or never played that hero before i recommend you the guides (Up left the book icon). I recommend you the GreyShark(RU/UA) builds or Purge(ENG) builds. Thank you for reading this review. #P3D0'#Hungarian#DotA2fan
goet;-;An easy to learn, lighthearted, forgiving, casual multiplayer FRTS (fun real time strategy!!) with a friendly, diverse and helpful community. It's excellent for busy, older, slow people, I changed Bejeweled's icon to this game and my mom still haven't noticed it!
Murtle;-;Most toxic community in gaming. The end.
katiekat;-;Dota or Defense of the Ancients, was the first of its kind, and originally started off as a Warcraft 3 custom map but it quickly grew to become one of the most popular games in the world as well as spawning a whole new genre which we know today as MOBAs. The game is simple, 5v5, 3 lanes and both teams' objective is to destroy the other teams' Ancient. There are over 100 heroes in the game each with their own unique skills and attributes and forming a well rounded team with synergy is key to victory. Closing notes - The community can be awful. You will get yelled at, flamed and even reported for making mistakes. If you can overcome this, the game is amazing.
[Lemons] loopuleasa;-;Massive learning curve. I am at the bottom of it, but here is my fresh perspective on this game. Don't get into this game if you're not willing to learn a lot or sacrifice plenty of your time. Once you reach a high skill level, you understand the game at its core and you also find the right people to play with this game is the most enjoyable game you can possibly play. That is if you have the patience to get there. The community is great overall, the game is flawless. Valve is doing a great job with this one. Competitive scene is the healthiest I've seen, and I've watched countless competitive matches. So damn entertaining. Just look at this! http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=-8HBr1EGX1I Better than LoL by a long mile.
Zealandic;-;Sht community, sht balance, more money for cosmetics and TI, no surrender button.  this game, even Defenders of Middle Earth is better.
Apache;-;An accurate representation of pubbing in this game would be to imagine yourself trapped in a sewer swimming around eating nothing but turds your entire life, each turd represents an average public game. Now imagine after all of those turds you go to eat the another one and to your surpise it is a chocolate bar, it is the best feeling in the world. That chocolate bar represents those occasional games where everyone is evenly skilled and tastes so good that you continue eating turds just hoping for that next chocolate bar.
oip;-;i played this game for a lil bit and suddenly i became communist putin/1945
beachy;-;10/10 Best Point and click adventure I've played in a while unfortuanly there is only one level.
Boo Ya;-;someday, i'll stop playing dota and get a life !!
SneakyBastard;-;I really can't say anything other then this game is ing amazing. Look at all the hours I've spent in the game. You all are probably like "well, there are these people who have spent thousands of hours in the game, so that's not many." But do take into account that my total time owning this game hasn't even exceeded a year yet. There is not a day I remember since I got this game that I haven't at least opened DOTA 2. Usually to play a public game, sometimes to play a bot game, and sometimes to brush up on hero knowledge and look at guides. This game will ruin your life and obliterate all your free time. My only warning to new players is that the community it pretty toxic to new players, and not everyone speaks english. Just mute anyone calling you a noob, flaming you, etc. But never do so to the people that legitimately want to help you. Overall Rating: 11.6/10.
The Phenomenon;-;HOLY  WHY DO I PLAY THIS I WISH I HAD MY LIFE BACK 12/5
Richard Swagner #ThugLeitmotif;-;The most comprehensive Russian language course currently available online.
Kelso;-;You want me to say some words about Dota 2? Here it goes: Cyk@ and axaxaxaxa are the only phrases you'll only ever have to use to communicate.  Don't be decieved by the server names, as every server is a Russian server.  I'd recommend never to play this game with friends, as your friendship will be destroyed into tiny pieces.  Phantom Assassin is the source of all depression.  Going into the depths of low priority is like taking a trip to hell with no way back.  You better be lucky if you random otherwise you'll probably get Earth Spirit.  If you're afraid of rats don't play this game as there's a gigantic one named Nature's Prophet.  Pray to the Lord that you'll never be against Spirit Breaker because his name doesn't lie. But somehow I keep coming back to the game. gg wp Valve 10/10
Brbol;-;Best URSS simulator,when you play this game you feel you are a proletarian worker in the early XX century who has to insult his comrades to get to Berlin to burn some nazis. 11/10
Daetton;-;Hello everybody. First I would like to introduce myself :) . OK my name is etro, who has a hobby of playing a lot of games like skyrim, minecraft,pokemon, and etc. OK here's the point when I played dota 1, the first try of the game was hard and I really can't understand it very much. The moment I played dota 2 , that's how I realize and understands the game so the thing that I'am saying dota2 or valve can explain better than dota 1 (no offense , ice frog) so I would gladly recommend playing dota2 than dota 1 for the first try of the game :). Others say that dota 2 is not a good game or a bad game (well we all have our opinions :) ). For me it's the best game of all the time :D. I respect the Lol (league of legends) players. Even though they are saying that dota 2 sucks. Here in my country (philippines) many Filipinos say that they like Lol better. But I really don't get their point I mean (no offense to the Lol makers and producers) but Lol kinda copied dota 1 ( I don't even know if Lol have their permissions or paid icefrog for copying the main idea of dota) but valve paid icefrog for dota 2 so it means valve have their license while Lol doesn't have. I don't really know guys if Lol really have their permissions or paid icefrog. But I think they didn't ask for permissions or paid ( if im mistaken please correct me or you can just tell me to remove this review. And im sorry if im mistaken that Lol really have their permissions or paid icefrog.but i really think they didnt. Well the real point in this paragraph is I will play or follow the one who have permmisions or paid and that is dota 2 or (valve). If your noob or getting annoyed it's OK cause we all started like noobs :) and just ignore the people who are saying that you're noob,stupid,idiot, they will just annoy you and they have no hearts (they are monsters). Anyway for them to easily ignored just press the heroes panel at the upper left of the screen. In there you can see a speaker's icon then press it and wahhla you muted the player you chossed. I hope this really helped you guys :) OK thank you guys for reading my review with this game. I hope you recommend this :) bye.
Kimchi;-;Sugar cookies. Sugar is really cocaine. Cookie is also cocaine. I ing hate this game.
Bunny_Ch0w;-;Have played game for 1800 hours and still have not found a single way to reach the ending. 8/10 for gameplay. 4/10 for direction.
MonsterTurtle;-;10/10 would rage again
Darkness;-;Great Game for whos wanna to play Multi-player game but have some big problems first : You cant leave this game forever. second : most of people trade like a robber. third : some people only come in game for F**king your game and not more. Fourth : most people come in game only for curse to you and your family and not more. Sixth : all people ever fight with russian , some of russian really good play and some of them really bad play but this right to whole of people not only russian. and finally : if i tell you dont play you motivated to play, then when you start to playing dota : after 3 month play you only play for having more rank and not fun after 5 month you only play for trade not game after 6 month you come as a pro robber in trade and curse to russian for no reasons and only play to tell other people your so pro players. :) really if you want to play , play this game as a game not more 3 hrs in week so enough. Dont west your time on internet gaming, pay your times on your job :) and for understanding who you are. Good Luck in Your Real life, sorry because my bad en language.
Lagostim;-;I WANT MY LIFE BACK!!!!!!!!!!!!!
Petunia;-;blame simulator rage simulator angry simulator blood boiling simulator if you have a bad day and want to blame someone , play this game if you have a good day and want to ruin it , play this game
Blade;-;I'll never truly forget the pain.
Merzenarie.lv;-;Some guys was talking russian I wrote  They started laughing 10/10
Ryuko Matoi;-;"If I got penny for everytime I heard the word sooka in game, I would have enough monies for 2 potato" - Lativian
Sharp;-;It's a game about reporting everyone you hate 10/10
Jazzy Muffins;-;10/10 Got swore at in Russian and Portugese within the first 5 minutes, then decided this game was too hardcore for me. I would easily recommend this game to anybody that wants to feel like a worthless, bad video game player in 6 languages from Sunday!
Zilsta Midsta;-;I am quite sure that sums up everything.
RobotDevil;-;0/10 Did not catch 'em all
Nargacuga;-;A fun, friendly and educational game for the entire family! Learn Russian and Spanish while you're at it and meet dozens of world renowned scientists who claim to be smarter in every single subject you can bring up! Meet the friendliest players who will reply with "" when you say "Good luck, have fun!", meet players who will tell you that the real world is hard and you're not prepared for it, even if you have a wife and children or are a war veteran! Meet players than cite Thesaurus perfectly to crush you in a friendly verbal debate about the very on-topic subjects of the game like Electromagnetics and economics! A fun game for the entire family, try it out now and let it consume your soul! !
Filthy Dave;-;By playing DotA 2 you are signing a contract. The contract states that you will forfeit your life and nationality, becoming a soulless russian who plays this game non-stop.
ZoomyRamen;-;I have an good laf with my fave buds wen playin dots 2. we do well we kill the rosan. gg. wr.
[HL2:CP] Pyroland is fun!;-;Having a wonderful time, browsing for games? Well then, look no further and behold! The most russian-infested game you will ever find! For my first, what? 40 Games maybe? I never once found an english person, even when I put the language and location to ENGLISH SPEAKING COUNTRIES. If you think you are pure of heart, try Dota 2! It will turn you extremely racist and ruin your friendships! Got a black friend? Gone. Got a white friend? Gone. Got an asian friend? Gone. Any other sort of friend? Gone. ? Oh yes please!
Alex;-;Its a really fun game. It can be hard at the beginning but is super fun!!!!
Ocram37;-;Made me lose my gf for a hyperstone. 11/10
Gruagach of Lough Leane;-;I once played with a german kid. He played as a warlock, got fb and then proceeded to make an art installation with wards on our base.Was a sight to behold
Sephia Valenclaire;-;+ Free-to-play, and not Pay-to-win! + Great Graphics + Addictive Gameplay + Has 100+ heroes that can be played + Supported & Featured by eSports + Can actually grant you big money if played Competitively - The community sucks real bad - Hard to learn, Hard to master (At least for me anyways)
TheBashLord;-;The most fun and rewarding game i have ever played while there are many gripes i still have about the game its mostly about the community.
Eli;-;Love it! So entertaining, one of those easy to learn, hard to master games that I think is perfect!
Bless Secret Brony Agent Fikus;3;-;Game where everyone is a lobster
Adequate Meatshield;-;This game is great! - It ruined my social life. - I now abuse Russians I've known for years IRL. - Anybody who's better than you is a basement dweller. - Anybody worse than you is from South America. - Possibly the worst community in gaming after LoL. - Bad graphics and controls, 10/10 - IGN I have spent too long on this game, and I'm by no means the worst offender. I wish I could get those hours and money back. Overall, this game is the cancer of Steam. 10/10.
MPixel;-;Wanna learn the beautiful language that Russian is? Wanna brag to your friends how you've been picked up as the next BF/CoD villain voice actor? Wanna talk back to that part of the community we're ashamed of? Free russian lessons! Learn fast in only 100 matches! xaxaxaxa rr  blyat medved repawt sniperrrh! Your teammates and opponents are willing to teach you, you'll recognize them: Riki, Drow, Sniper, Viper, Weaver, Techies and Pudge... i mean TET CHEESE and POODJE
Nexiu;-;Dota 2 is an easy way to save money, which were to be issued on a Russian dictionary.
HopsfyTheVelociraptor;-;Still waiting for Volvo to giff Diretide. Fun game, better played with friends however becuse the main problem is the community. Most players you encounter will not speak english, so it may benefit you to have a russian, portugese, and spanish dictionary at your side. If you are new to the game DO NOT USE THE BUILDS YOU SEE PROS USE. They build SITUATIONALLY. The builds they use are not good for every situation. At all. Also if you do not take criticism well, Dota2 is not for you. The worst player on your team will blame you for everything that goes wrong. Like seriously if you can't handle an insult play something else. These people are . Regardless of the community and the lack of Diretide, overall Volvo did a good job on Dota. Graphics are great, mechanics are great, and it is a fun time overall besides the general rudeness of other. There generally are very few bugs with the game and it generally runs very smoothly. If you are new I strongly recommend doing training before anything else, and playing against bots until you are fairly confident in yourself. It takes time for you to fully understand Dota, and no, you can not jump. Hopefully next update you'll be able to (wink wink Volvo). Unlike other  MOBAs *cough cough* League *cough cough* you do not have to spend ANY money on Dota. The only things there is to buy is cosmetic items, which you will be able to get for free as soon as Volvo fixes the drop system. I strongly recommend Dota if you don't have friends, a life, or any desire to find love. As Dota will slowly consume your life. And always remember... " magic" - Anti-Mage
Auroth;-;Liked: + Graphic + Gameplay Disliked: - People who ruin the game on purpose (feeding, abandoning games, etc.) - People who think he/she is the best and talk bad things to his/her fellow players Conclusion: I recommend this game as everything came from the game is good enough, only the community of players that need to behave properly.
Mat13;-;Dota 2 promises to take the unique blend of online RTS and RPG action that has made Dota popular with tens of millions of gamers and expand upon it in every way. This is a competitive MOBA game of action and strategy, played both professionally and casually by millions of passionate fans worldwide. Players pick from a pool of over a hundred heroes, forming two teams of five characters. Radiant heroes then battle their Dire counterparts to control a fantasy landscape, waging campaigns of cunning, stealth, and outright warfare. Release Date: July 9. 2013 Genre: RPG Publisher: Valve Developer: Valve
Delicious Cake;-;One of my favorite games in my library. My play time reflects how much time I have spent appreciating the team work and competitive spirit of the game. Supports who actually support the team, carries who can carry the team to victory, and players who can execute a base push as timely as the New York Sunway. By the way, I love subway sandwiches. I eat a BLT without the T almost every week. Bacon is the most delicious meat. Lettuce is like the cup to the tea party. You can't have tea without water, and you can't hold water without cups. Unless of course you use your hands. Or your mouth. But lettuce cups are pretty delicious. So imagine the bacon and the lettuce together but without the disgusting creatures known as tomatoes. Which while they rhyme with potato, don't taste anything similar. If potatoes tasted like french fries, tomatoes would taste like awful fried wet vegetables. Speaking of wet tables, If you put water on tables, it gets wet. Not stuff like multiplication tables that are way too complicated. What is 6X6? Its like 64 or something. Which is like 10 if you add them all together. What does that mean? I am not sure. Math is hard. Unlike DOTA2. Which is a great game. Especially as a carry. Actually I never played carry before. It seems like a pretty easy job though.Just kill things until you win the game. That is a pretty simple job description. Unlike support or mid or offlane or jungle. I mean jungle is a location, how is it a job? It is more like a forest than a jungle. I mean jungles have lions and stuff right? Forests have angry bears. I am not sure where man-birds and horse-men are from though. Horses aren't jungle creatures I think. They sound more like mountain creatures to be honest. I haven't seen a troll before or a gnoll, but I bet they are forest creatures as well too. So jungle should really be called forest. Mid is a pretty self explanatory position. Its the middle of the map lane. Like if you had 3 lanes, he would take the second one. Or she. There are female heroes as well. Are they called heroines? Well I wouldn't want to call anyone a dangerously addicting drug. That would be sexist. I mean playing Lina is pretty addicting though. Fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire . Its like if you had a charmander and combined it with a jynx. Thats what lina is. Which reminds me that pokemon recently came out. X and Y are pretty popular with my friends, so I wamt a 3DS. Those things cost money though, but I head I can trade my items for cash. That sounds pretty amazing. Earning money while palying games, its like the American dream for people who don't want actual jobs. Not that I have a job yet. All I do is stay home and read manga. Which is pronounced mane gah, Like mango but with an a. I sometimes forget myself and add a false accent though and pronounce it mahn gaaaa. So offlane is the lane opposite of the safe lane. So the dangerous lane as they would call it. It isn't very safe cause you cross the mystical safety river to fight bad guys. Its like chinese vampires and running water. I don't think they can cross running water. Many they would have a hard time with modern day plumbing. One flush of the toilet and the go poof. Or do they? I actually know nothing about chinese vampires. I only know vampires from the books my friends lent me. It was the Twilight saga. I really preferred the Jacob to the other guy though. I was pretty upset when Bella made the wrong choice. I mean who wouldnt want a guy you could play fetch whenever you wanted. Plus the other guy was like 439434 years old. Yuck! So Support is the last job you can play. Not only do you provide moral support because most teams don't ever have asupport, but you also help buy buying items no one else in their right minds would buy. Like a slave donkey to carry your items for you. He can even be given magical wings for more than his actual buying price. Why wouldn't I want another donkey instead of one flying one? I am pretty sure two donkeys are cooler than one flying one. I mean how would you even catch a flying donkey? It could poop from like 60 feet and it would be awful. Like a divebombing terrible smelling equine terror. But donkeys are pretty cute. So keep them on the ground. If donkeys were meant to fly, god would have evolved them wings instead of using magic. So that is Dota. Its a pretty good game. But it has some problems too. After all, even BLT's have T's. Here are the digusting parts of the BLT. Games take a while to finish. So if you tend to have sudden gas attacks like me, you might have an accident while you are playing a particular game. A game of Dota can last from as long as 30 seconds to 50 hours. Like I am not even joking how troublesome it is to stay on the toiler for over an house to finish my game of Dota. I mean look at my avatar. That is my face for like the first 5 minutes of Dota before my legs fall asleep and I start getting cramps. It also has too many different heroes. I think the game could cut its hero count down to about 7. It would also encourage faster hero picking if the last 3 players couldn't choose any hero. It is a definitely annoying to choose the tree hero and the enemy hero picks an all fire team and the lumberjack hero. You are literally counterpicked because you chose too early. It would be better to give some kind of gold option or a repick option. Some game modes take forever. Like captains draft can be much shorter if they removed all the bans. Sometimes I want to make team electric, but then a ban comes up and I accidentally ban Mr. Thunder or the masked electric emo. Then Team thunder is ruined. I can understand why bans could be good though. Cause everyone chooses fat butcher guy. He uses his hook to hug you then you smell him to death. Sometimes he tickles you for extra damage. What is worse is that he eats you, he gets fatter and stronger. The biggest tomato of the problem is the fact that the game has too much action, but not enough story. Its like worse than Dynasty Warriors when it comes to story. I could use a few cutscenes telling me why I am teaming up with a giant spider, a porcupine, a baby rock, and a angel man. At least there was a reason in Dynasty Warriors 7 about why I am fighting Guan Yu with my hated enemies the filthy Wu. Were those filthy Wu actually even men? The way they fought with their cowardly fire arrows and powerful navy instead of facing the numerically and superiorly led enemy army head on just screams uncultured barbarians. So I think I will give the game a 1/10/14. Its a pretty good game, but the lack of story gives it only a 1 in that category. I understand that every hero has its own lore, but the bigger connection is quite lost when I team up with my biggest rival against my best friend. A 10 grade for the excellent team spirit of the game. People play like men instead of filthy Wu women. But Ali, why the 14 and not a 17? Because the game has that huge tomato. And I hate Tomatoes. I love BLT's without the T. BL is the greatest invention of man, till someone introduced the uncessary T. I would have BL everyday if I could afford it, but I have no job and spend all my time reading manga.
TheChickenSalad;-;new language ,new way of speaking ,drop out of uni, lose all of your real friends, watch your loved ones fade away. GREAT game if you ask me
RailValco;-;In this game, you will always get  of monkeys as your teammates so it doesnt matter if you play good or bad, you will always ing lose unless you play with your friends. In case you like a feeder yelling at you "why did you block me" " why did you steal my kill" "why arent you winning the game by yourself" go on and play it, otherwise dont even bother.
Mikan;-;So addictive, My life has been messed up because of this game. An absolute must play. It made me very racist and hate well Russians.. There is nothing left to say. 1 couple of games its like noob ish and you will get  on a lot, thats why there are bot matches.. take a risk in this game if its for your liking. Dont take to heart all of the rubbish people say. They can get quite intense when they rage. I mean, like really
iGhost4U;-;best league of legends ever
Yukino;-;LITERALLY 10x better graphics than League of Legends 4x friendlier community than League of Legends 20x faster servers than League of Legends 2x lower ping than League of Legends 11x faster install time than League of Legends 15x faster updates than League of Legends 10x more tournament prize money than League of Legends 5x higher skill than League of Legends 20x better hero appearance customization than League of Legends 12x cheaper appearance custiomizations than League of Legends 3x better user interface than League of Legends 8x less noobs than League of Legends 12x less leavers than League of Legends 999999x more original than League of Legends 1.5x more players than League of Legends 25x less toxic players than League of Legends 8x more mature than League of Legends 20x more hero diversity than League of Legends 10x better Liker:Hater ratio than League of Legends 999999999x cheaper server transfers than League of Legends 5x better leavers system than League of Legends 6x easier to use chat system than League of Legends 15x less server maintenance than League of Legends 50x faster server maintenance than League of Legends 999999999999999x cheaper name changes than League of Legends 420x more attractive female players than League of Legends Ability to trade items unlike League of Legends Has a trading market unlike League of Legends Ability to make money through playing unlike League of Legends Not a wallet emptier unlike League of Legends
rip in peri peri;-;this game destroyed my life and i lost all of my friends and family by playing it 10/10 would reccomend
Giant Dad;-;Have you ever wondered what it feels like to play a game with a full team of strangers who don't speak english and insult you in spanish/brazlian portuguese? Well here's your chance now with South America Simulator 2014. It's easy, all you have to do is que in your North American region, and BAM your whole team will be foreigners speaking a completely different language and insulting you. But wait, there's more! I'll throw in some Eastern Europeans who will que in every region but their own. And for this limited time offer, we got you a tower defense like strategy game in the back ground. Pre order South America Simulator 2014: Because the third world, is just right around the corner. :)
Xeno;-;My Grandfather smoked his whole life. I was about 10 years old when my mother said to him, 'If you ever want to see your grandchildren graduate, you have to stop immediately.'. Tears welled up in his eyes when he realized what exactly was at stake. He gave it up immediately. Three years later he died of lung cancer. It was really sad and destroyed me. My mother said to me- 'Don't ever smoke. Please don't put your family through what your Grandfather put us through." I agreed. At 24, I have never touched a cigarette. I must say, I feel a very slight sense of regret for never having done it, because this game gave me CANCER anyway.
Hisui;-;Best language learning software ever. Learn to read and speak Russian, Portuguese and Spanish in no time, at no additional costs! Mind the side effects: may cause severe irritations, sudden friend loss, sunlight deficiency, broken keyboards followed by internal/external bleedings and/or in some extreme cases, substantial brain damage.
Antero;-;My Grandfather smoked hes whole life. I was about 10 years old when my mother said to him . 'If you ever want to see your grandchildren graduate, you have to stop immediately.'. Tears welled up in hes eyes when he realized what exactly was at stake. He gave it up immediately. Three years later he died of lung cancer. It was really sad and destroyed me . My mother said to me -'Don`t ever smoke. Please don`t put your family through what your Grandfather put us through."I agreed. At 20, I started smokin , because this game already gave me cancer anyway. Totaly recommend for smokers
Mitsuji M.;-;Brain enhancing game but we all know it destroyed our lives.
Give everyone smiles :^);-;This game sucks. If you want to remain a happy individual and keep your friends, heed this warning.
PFS Venom;-;Can't move character with WASD what the hell is this?
Anzu;-;A game that can bring fun or agony it would be nice if most of people are nicer
Roshuran;-;A flying donkey gives you your items. 10/10 would MOBA again.
SlowWolf;-;If you can get past the initial learning curve and burden of knowledge the game puts on you, then DOTA2 can be extremely rewarding. As far as most MOBAs are concerned, this one has a good blend of strategy and relfexes that rewards those who can use both to their advantage. The gameplay is, as a result, solid, and every sessions provides new opportunities for fun and strategy. The UI is a little underpopulated, however, and doesn't explain much. learning how to do some of the functional things, like leaving a game that's safe to leave, or muting people, or reporting people, are not super intuitive: you have to dig. Furthermore, the options available, though very powerful and plentiful, are not explained super well. As a result, it's important to toy around with your settings a bit, which can be a hassle. As far as the F2P model goes, it's pretty fair: you can play the whole game without needing any of the micro transactions. The only thing they do is customize your aethetics, and happily not to an extreme extent. Because of this, the game has a really unified look despite all the different items your characters can wear. This might dissuade people from buying them, because some of the items are barely even visible. Overall, I would recommend this game to anyone with a hankering for a challenge. The game is NOT easy, but it is worthwhile and a lot of fun once you get a hang of things. Veterans of the genre will find a lot to like.
Conzo;-;This Game has ruined my life and caused me to hate a great number of people. 11/10
@TobiWanDOTA;-;The dawn of a new era
I_Am_Steve;-;This is a game that will quene you with people that have 40% of your Hours played. This game will show you the worst scum of the worst and will favor them in a Trial. This  game will show you that in this Cyber world, there is a hell, and you are in it once you start palying rankeds. This game will take away your will to get better at it by throwing hords of Russians, Peruvians, s and whatnot who speak only their Native language, but start playing a Ranked in which team Coordination and Communication are a MUST. This game will take away your hopes of a normal Match and it will leave you with a bad taste in your mounth once you lose a game by being the only one that did his job right and is not feeding. Overall i give this  game a 4/10, the game itself is worth at least a 9, but when you put Russians and  of the entire world together without putting them in their own servers or restricting them by their gameplay, this is what you get, people that cannot communicate and play together to win. I promise you, this games community will make you loose all hope in Humanity and in everything that is good, if youre unlucky, you will end up as one of them. I, for this matter, am abandoning this ship, after 1,3k hours played i finally figured, this game is being ed by its own community because it fails to set up people who can communicate, i might come back and play it once valve makes people stay in their respective regions by creating dedicated servers ( Like LoL ) but untill then, i will no longer participate in this . Thank you and good luck trying to make something out of this game, you will need it. (FYI, im pretty sure there are some typos and grammatical errors but i dont really bother checking them right now) Regards, Steve, a once diehard Fan of this game who was hoping Valve would do something about the Community but was dissapointed over and over again.
theanti EZEZ;-;Anything great this game could provide you gets completely driven off by the so real RRP (Russian Retardation Phenomena) which will put and keep you off from any sort of enjoyment you could ever witness playing it. If you happen to be an easily losing temper person or you just cannot bear dealing with down syndromed people most of the most of the time, do NOT play this game.
Chuuuuuuuuuuuu <3;-;I liked the concept of the game, I'm playing it since 2007 :)
StarFoxStatic;-;Best stress inducing simulator 10/10
dekodE_;-;A few things that stand out over my 4500+ games Ive played are the following: 1) Regardless of how supportive and accommodating you are, you will always be stuck with one cancerous player that will just ruin the game. 2) Your opponents will always play like a well formed professional team. Your team on the other hand will fight over the mid position, pick 5 cores, purchase no wards ,fail to rotate on ganks and you wont have a courier till the 35 minute mark. 3) If you play with your friends they will slowly break all ties from you. This is because of the constant aggressive verbal directions and abuse you will hurdle at them over the course. 4) Dota2 is like a drug addiction. You will be always chasing that first high. In reality its a flaming piece of . You end up depressed, jobless and friendless. 5) Now that I reflect on the total hours Ive spent on this game, I could have done something useful in my life  Like get a University degree, or learn a new skillset.
BNJ JUSTICE;-;THIS GAME  PEOPLE FEEDING ALL OVER. RUINED MY ING LIFE NOW BECAUSE OF THIS  I DONT HAVE ABS
Neochrome;-;Most ed up game ever, took me almost 1k hours to find out how ed up the community, matchmaking and everything around that game is. Sad, and I'm the only one to blame for flushing my time down the drain. On the contrary, PRO community is one of the best communities out there, always fun to watch and follow, from players to casters, everyone is cool. I just can't play this  anymore, it's a pain, mental and physical pain...
NeVeRMinD;-;This game turned me into a racist  10/10
Ayuri;-;Recommended, because this is THE game where you can eat trees.
allumuel;-;The only scenario you'd want to play this game is if you are suicidal and want a stroke. 0/10.
Stig;-;this is your purpose in life
Thunderbug 0;-;~[Today in International DOTA News]~ -More Peruvians are setting their preferred language to English without knowing a single word of it, despair is on the rise. -Filipinos are committing mass suicide in ranked matches, shouting what frightened onlookers describe as a "wew". -Russians agree that the only heroes worth playing in the game are Pudge, Invoker, and Sniper. However Russians themselves have no idea how to play these heroes, and continue to yell incomprehensible profanities in the chats. -In other news it seems that Mexicans are causing world-wide panic as they do nothing of value, refuse to support/initiate/carry, steal vital last hits/kills, and feed on teams everywhere. The Mexicans strangely enough, cannot see that what they are doing is not only wrong, but is also making them look worse as a race. -And finally the number of English players is decreasing substantially, as many take their own lives after losing match after match while on 4 stack teams of foreigners. This however will hopefully force the now homeless Peruvians and Mexicans into joining the Russian and Filipino servers, so they may kill eachother off at last. Bringing about the death of DOTA 2, and the start of world peace. ~This has been Russell Stover with your International DOTA News, and may god have mercy on us all.
Fray;-;this game is the straight up in for real you know what im sayin like holy  this game is like seriously in wit my mind like holy jesus thuggest game on the planet you know what im sayin should be rename to dotain coz of how in it is like holy  sctually jesus
*=AHZ=* | Justice;-;what should I say? I'm addicted and love it!
Quinterfell;-;This is obviously an exceptionally well made game, and it does make every effort to teach you and integrate you. But I can't recommend it unless you want to really learn how to play, which is a long and slow process. I didn't find it to be all that fun.
THE | GAMMER;-;I cant bealive that i reached 1000h in this game, OMGWTFBBQ. My first game on steam with 1k hours :( . Morbid mask has 15% lifesteal, but I feel that dota 2 has 80% lifesteal ! Never start to play it.
oz;-;I thank this game for allowing me to learn fluent Russian in a matter of hours!
XxX_(911)J0hN-420-c3N4(911)_XxX;-;Without a doubt the best language learning software out there. Learn to speak Spanish, Russian, Portugese and sometimes even English! And all for the low, low price of your self-esteem and faith in other human beings.
Mr. Fuck & Watch;-;Never download this game.
Haruhi;-;Join the FREE classes for Russian, Turkish, Italian, Greek and Portuguese.
II Matthewiga II;-;Dota 2 is a great game to play if you like other MOBAs. I have played a lot of League of Legends but after playing this game I can say I like the about the same. It's a free to play game so people should give this game a good try and see for yourself.
TheFuriousFaceOfBenjaminCotton;-;Best game ever. Never bores you out.
Haziq_As'ari;-;When I typed lol in LoL (League Of Legends) my character doesn't say anything, when i typed lol in DoTA 2, my character laughs :D
Baka;-;Do you like to not have fun with brazilians that feel the need to go on your server when they have their own? With them belittling you every waking moment as you're TRYING YOUR ING BEST AS SHADOWFIEND JESUS GOD. Solid 9.7/10 would Brazil again.
Leumas;-;Great game! Tons of fun to burn time and fantastic at forging friendships. 12/10 would play
Leumas;-;Great game! Tons of fun to burn time and fantastic at forging friendships. 12/10 would play
doc slumbermancer;-;nearly 100 hours of play time and i still haven't played a single match PROS: -it's free -Tusk has a big fist and likes to drink and punch and i can relate to this CONS: -Dota 2 -one time i ate some weird chicken and had the runs for a week i give it a large package of AA batteries out of five
a fucking shitter;-;never again
The Tsundertaker;-;imagine a 15 year old russian calling you a  er forever. that is dota.
Quizzical Android;-;Deep original tasting apple
Canadian Muffin;-;Great moba game. If your deciding to start on a Moba game your probably going to choose between League of Legends and Dota 2. Both are great games and I think Dota 2 is a better expireance in my opinion, here is why. Dota 2 all characters are free so you dont have to waste your time trying to unlock them, the game takes more skill (IMO), characters have a bigger learning curve, the community is not toxic, game allows you to use your mic (You can turn off mic volume in less than a minute), no micro transactions, you can trade item sets (A.K.A Skins), you can combine item sets, you can buy item sets on the Steam market, you can parts of item sets for money. This list can go on for another 2000 words. The game only has one map so the game probably sounds repititive but its not, there is many ways to play the game, such as carry, support, tank, jungler, etc. When you check out this game it probably is going to look boring but definitly check this game out, one of my favorite games.
Ryu^;-;8/10 If this game would be a coffee, it would be a decent coffee.
Dirty Harry;-;If you ever wanted to learn russian, then this game is totally the best one to learn basic russian and insults at one place. Forget about school, get Dota and play with cold-blooded russians, which doesn't shrink back to insult you because you're not playing good with a hero, which is in their opinion, the easiest hero in the whole game. Well, the only thing is that you cannot understand them while they're talking ingame, because they're mainly talking russian. Get yourself a dictionary and start learning russian there! It's the best thing you can do. 10/10 would play it again.
Kazumi;-;- Met some stupid teammates and we almost messed up the game - Some Asians talked really mean of me and warned they'll report me if I ever get out of base again - I preceed anyway and they continue to talk dirty - Finally they four reached an agreement to report me - Expecting to be in LP tomorrow but still said "thank you" - Woke up tomorrow and I'm still good! GG Valve - SS/10
VII;-;Dota 2 is a dead game, League of legends all the way.
Captain Luigi;-;If you like having people yell at you in different languages then this is the game for you
Goodwell;-;Do you hate life? Existence? Everyone around you? Do you just want to make everyone else suffer just because you're in a rough spot that clearly isn't your own fault despite mistakes being made? Or are you just looking for a good language teaching program for Portuguese, Spanish and Russian? Then look no further, DOTA 2 has you covered.
Sir Castic;-;Really, Truly an amazing game. After putting so much time in this game I have realised that I finally had lost faith in the human race and decided to rip my balls off. Its a great game to learn foreign languages and such but not much else. Unless you are a tryhard I would not suggest this game as the community is rude as hell. Its pretty addictive as any other MOBA but by far not the best ive played. Even if the community is less racist then HON and more mature then the community of LOL, its pretty bad. The only way i am ever playing this game is with a group of friends.
Treantwuver;-;Just like its previous installment when it all started back in Warcraft 3 as a custom map, Dota 2 is pretty much the whole same thing with several new additions added to which couldn't happen before. As someone who's been playing Dota since its beginnings, the first thing you may recognize and notice is that many of the games features such as map layout, heroes, and gameplay is almost, exactly the same but with a better and more refined look with updated graphics, making the entire map feel more lively and a refresh of old. Of course, that's all good but at the heart of Dota as many may know is its gameplay and replayability. The amount of hours I've pumped back in the first Dota was unforgettable, clocking more than +2500 hours of time played. Just like Dota 1, Dota 2 shares the exact same formula, pick a hero, last hit creeps/farm up gold, and win team fights to gain victory. Simple and straight forward, right? Wrong. If you played back in Dota 1, you'd come to realize the more you played it, the game had a fairly, high skill requirement in order to do well, especially if you're pushing to be top in a region or tournament. The amount of time and practice makes perfect as you will want to eventually learn every hero, how they synergize and working together with your teammates. It gets rough but extremely fun and satisfying, especially if you're on high level play. Unfortunately though, most people tend to ignore these kinds of games since difficulty is fairly high or they just can't stand to put the effort to actually play the game well and properly, otherwise various issues can occur, such as getting hate from other players and getting reported for not being able to play well. It's an immediate turn off and can easily have people packing their bags and finding another game. Unfortunately, again, this is thanks to the toxic communities that have spawned across all MOBA genre games. You will always have to deal with these kinds of people who will give you  and you have to bare with it as those kinds of players won't be going away anytime soon. I strongly believe competitive games have the highest chance to have ragers compared to other types of games out there and it's tough to avoid the negativity that comes with it. Now with some additions, they've added a store where you can purchase from hero skins, UI skins, to different voices for the default announcer, different couriers and selling/buying through the steam market. The thing that seperates skins here compared to others is that skins come in seperate, armor pieces you can equip on a hero, meaning you can say, keep a helmet and sell the other parts, like gloves to someone else on the steam market. It goes to show how much control the players have and what they have in their hands. The best part of all this, is that all heroes are free right off the bat to everyone, so no need to spend money and unlock the heroes you want to play. It allows us, as the players to explore and see what heroes we enjoy playing the most and if you're into cosmetics, you also have the option to buy a skin. The business model for me personally, is fair and likeable as I've had no issues with it whatsoever, it's equal for both the customer and developer. Now, while the gameplay is still the same and fun at its core, what else has been added by Valve? Well, we now have various events that take from time to time, usually worldwide holidays such as Christmas or Halloween are some examples. These events bring in replay value to want and play the game more such as getting limited skins for heroes, UI skins, couriers or just straight up rare items that can be sold across the entire steam market so you can get some funds put into your wallet for perhaps other items/skins on the market or even just saving up to buy another game entirely from either the steam store or in-game store. They've also made several changes to the UI compared to back in Warcraft 3. The UI is bigger and straight forward, and buying items through the shop are easily seen as everything is now categorized properly, and accessing them with a simple click. It's easily noticeable but just in case, you may have noticed, some heroes have not been put into the game yet and are missing. It's mainly due to copyright issues with Blizzard, seeing as how Brewmaster was a Pandaren from Warcraft and now Valve has changed him to a Koala beast of some sort? In fact, every champion for the most part, have been changed in their appearance because Dota started off by using Blizzard races and even some famous lore characters such as Thrall (Disruptor) or Rexxar (Beastmaster). It's certainly slowed down some heroes from being brought back, the recent being Legion Commander (male to female) and Terrorblade (no longer the demon hunter/Illidan). Valve still has a few more heroes to change and get out, such as Techies, so if you're a big Techies fan and/or mainer, you're going to have to wait a while longer until Valve finally pushes him out. Alright, and now my few personal grips about this game other than having a toxic community as I mentioned earlier throughout these types of games. I just do not appreciate or enjoy the art style that Valve has brought into this game. NOT in terms of quality but art style. The quality is fine for some but most heroes I feel, lost their identity and instead of something different, or unique, Valve just made most of the heroes look ugly and feel uninspired in my honest opinion. I mean now Earthshaker now looks like a mutated version of Beast from X-Men with a mix of a Koala (similar to the new Brewmaster). Hell, I still appreciate Blizzards art style so much more in Warcraft 3 than this new look, look at Pudge and Slardar, they had the look, voice and feel back in Warcraft 3 but now it's just not as strong anymore here. Even the almighty and fearful Zeus doesn't look like an intimidating god anymore, but a scientist. Another thing that I do not find a lot of fun a whole lot anymore is the gameplay itself, yes, the core gameplay. It's literally been the same thing over and over, nothing new or innovative, just a rinse and repeat of picking a hero, farming up gold for items, and winning team fights. Maybe it's just me after playing thousands of hours in this genre or perhaps if you take a look past the gameplay and look at what it really offers, there's really nothing going for it. Last hitting isn't fun anymore, as that's all you're doing most of the time early on, with team fights mid to late game (unless you personally find it fun). The worst part, is you will fall behind if you say die a few times to an opponent carry, it pigeon holds you because now your team has little to no retaliation or chance of hoping to win since that carry will just roll face your entire team and there's a decent chance someone on your team will call you out, meaning more anger and frustration can occur. I can safely say as a long time Dota 1 player/fan, Dota is still fun but it's not fun if you want to play decently at the average level because the amount of mechanics people know in that level will put you in a disadvantage if you just learn a few because most just don't have time to do it. So what can I say, I mean in the end, this is basically Dota 2.0 with better graphics, same gameplay like the original, a few added features like events, and the in-game store associated with the steam market. Everything looks great except the art style for most heroes (personal opinion) and of course, the ease of access to newcomers while it may seem straight forward, it gets more complicated in-depth, meaning there's a harder learning curve and barrier to pass through to fully enjoy the game at its fullest, meaning you'll need to spend some time and practice.
EH_killer603;-;The amount of russians in this game,is too damn high... 10/10 would learn russian again.
<Vanessa Ives>;-;dont play this game if you have a life. DON'T
Xenopuff;-;This game is toxic and a waste of time. In its current meta, good luck trying to have fun even when winning. Ice frog please stop doing cocaine your family is concerned.
Ruri;-;Buy wards Gives ward to mid Mid put wards at wrong place Being call a noob after giving wards 10/10 would love to buy wards
Floofys;-;Judging by the fact that I managed to play 14 hours and not realize I spent that much time, and many of my friends have 1000-2000 hours of play, all I can say... is RUN! Run before it consumes you too!
Groden;-;the game's plot isn't really clear, but the way i see it is that it is obviously a game about the problem with rapid assimilation of cultures and how conservativism leads to massive xenophobia, causing a war between what i think is the texas-mexico border on the rio grande though for some reason its russians and peruvians instead overall it really is a great free singleplayer title that experiments with how much you did or did not slack off in foreign language courses in high school while testing how racist you are capable of being
Citizenfunk;-;Dota 2 has got to be the best thing I've played since I was born. Not only are the movement and combat more stable than bruce lee glued to a weeble wobble, but I've accumilated over 30 hours and have not seen a single hacker. If I could sum it up I would say it's like chess, rock paper scisors, and torchlight 2 thrown into a blender to make the perfect MOBA. Playing this game lost me hours of my life that I'll never get back, and I don't want them back. Gold medals and cigars to valve once again.
Capp;-;Dota 2. One of the best Moba's to date. I'm very fond of this team-building, strategy and interactive game. Dota is what started it all, League of Legends. Based off original Dota, this game is what started the Moba hype. Though the game does have it's faults, the tutorial is a little rocky. Not being anything like the actual game, and learning little to nothing through it. The game is a great F2P title, there are no microtransactions that will change the game, besides your character's appearance. Though the Dota servers are rough in some regions around the world, forcing players from those regions to play on other servers. Based for other regions, causing many problems. Such as language barriers, lag, and overall less team cooperation. If Valve improved some of the servers, instead of focusing mainly on N/A servers, this would most likely improve game quality for everyine around the world. Overall I would give a positive rating of: 8/10
Henri;-;My Russian and Spanish improved alot after playing this game, THANKS VALVE ULTRA EPIC REGION LOCK PLS
Okihara Jones;-;I've had this game in my Steam Library since beta, and occasionally I'd give it a try to see if I could tap into some of the excitement that continued to elude me, for some reason. 62 hours later, on May 12, 2014 (today), after reading the first 10 headlines in the Dota 2 Steam "forums", I promptly uninstalled the game. I'm not one of those dudes who mistakes his opinion for fact, so I'll just say this game isn't for me. Rude, unfriendly community coupled with an overtly pretentious, self-important theme and arbitrary, unnecessarily difficult online play ("laning"? "ganking"? "last-hitting?" REALLY?) are unappealing to me. I suppose the kids prefer the game this way because they feel like they've "accomplished something" when they win (as opposed to the rest of us who simply "play video games"). As an over-30-year-old gamer with kids of my own, perhaps I'm just too old for this. Anyway, thumbs down. NEXT. EDIT: my 9-year-old just found out "Dota 2" is a thing (thanks, loud-mouthed fourth graders.) So +1 for "Dota 2" because it's one pc game my kids and I can play together and not worry about off-color game content (as long as we play with bots and not foul-mouthed angry nerds.) Looks like I *might* be re-installing....... SIGH.... As they say in Vegas, the House always wins. Well played, Valve, well played.
Galen Marek;-;Dota 2 = Russians Dota 2 = Rage/Salty Dota 2 = An intense feeling of murder for teammates Dota 2 = Life wasted but still plays it anyway Dota 2 = Riki = rage Dota 2 = 10/10 would waste my life again
Rufi;-;How to describe this game... This is the first Valve game where I haven't had fun at playing it and made me question their work. After a year of gameplay I can easily say that if you don't play it with friends you can end up with a brain tumor or end up in a nuthouse. You need to play it with friends because it's the only way to enjoy the suffering. The artstyle and voices are great, but the gameplay can be a little tricky and it can go unbalanced very easily. The only time where I found the gameplay balanced was in the Greeviling because everyone was in the same level. But the gameplay it's not the biggest issue with this game. The community it's REALLY toxic and Valve itself suffered this recently. They are equal or worse than the CoD community. The only good thing about this game is the business model. The big difference between Dota 2 with TF2 and CS:GO it's that those games gives you fun and money. This game only gives you money. No matter if you win or you lose a match, you will always end up with the same bitter taste. I only recommend this game for those who lost their minds or just want to make a couple of bucks to buy another game. If you are sane, please make a restriction order to anyone who invite you to play it.
Renegade;-;Dota 2 was what i thought would be fun it is but if your looking to play people are real jerks who think just because they played longer they have the right to cyber bully and if u wanna leave you get demerit points and it will take you a longer time to find a macth valve should really regulate the chat and allow people to defend why they abandoned a game so for right now Dota 2 is run by jerks and  holes
SK[G] Osiris;-;Great game for stress relief and teambuilding exercises. 20 / 10 IGN game ratings.
DecsterB;-;Get out while you still can.
Osamu;-;this game is horrible, but at the same time good, it takes a tonne of time to get the hang of the game, and it's normally only fun when you win (differs from persons) i love it, but at the same time hate it, you really need a party of friends, or good players to win, in this game you loose if you have one bad player on you're team, and if you don't have the right balance of supports and carries/ semis then you loose :L some hero's are overpowered and yet some underpowered. and for some reason people in low priority are better than in a normal match one of the first mobas ever made, when it was made is was very popular on warcraft3 and of course its free, most rage enducing game since call of duty you need to play it to understand so enjoy!
Swedish Chef;-;Not played much, but from what I have played it appears to be a good game.
_/| 1k ping gg of Cykaland;-;Better than league of legends and HON and smite because all those games has coppied dota then copied the sequel dota 2. DOTA 2 takes more skill then league of legends and dota 2 is much more complex and has many mechanics. no hero is op there is a counter to everything. 11/10 Ruined my life 11/10 would ruin again 11/10 Would review this again to say its better than league of legends anyday
Jihadi "Scatman" John;-;haha "DONDO" HAHHAH!!!!!!!!!! rekt..........LOL!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!! mounten dow and dorit 2ez4rtz? S SA A DB OY stay away from these people and mute the enemy team in chat before game starts and you will have a great time
Els;-;Ruined my life 10/10 , who needs a russian langauge teacher when u can learn all the russian in dota
Kianos;-;Game was good, got terribly broken... I quit, that's the long story short. Wan't a long story long? Well... read ahead then my dear no-lifer (says the one that spends time writing game reviews in Steam)! So... where should I start? Of course... from the start! A friend of mine invited me to play this "Super badass game" with him and after days and weeks of pleads I finally bent to his will. Entered the game, all felt fine. He was a pro player and guided me through it. I am also a sharp person that never does anything if he's unprepared so I read a few tons of guides from DotA legends and watched plenty of tournament videos before my first game. I started high above all the newbies and my lerning curve was quite fluent. This means I rarely got to deal with raging idiots, though rarely is not the same as never. Even I that played at a higher level than my matches got raged at from time to time. Imagine how a normal player felt... brainless, super confident brats keep yelling at everyone they don't like (even if he is playing well) that he is terrible and should uninstall the game. Heck, the best guide ever writen for the game starts with a description on how to mute players and how to shield your psych... So yeah, nail number one in DotAs coffin: The terrible playerbase. Yeah, there are some nice guys that survived but their numbers are rapidly dwindling and honestly... even the kids at LoL are nicer these days! Well... DotA could have still sprung out of it's coffin if that was all... but it isn't. Things like the terribly broken matchamking system count as well. Even if you rock you can hardly progress through the ranks and as gamers say "Leave the trench". Since all depends on your partners and you mostly get raging kids and game-abandonig russians (no racism, simply plain facts and statistics, hell I'm a fan of Putin!), you will never be able to roll up enough wins to play with skilled people. Yeah... Valve says it's fair and it doesn't rank your wins/losses but your overall performance in the game... but... yeah, you guessed it, that's pure ! The heroes... See, the game has this goat fella named Riky that is wrecking public games because of his easy-to playiness and he is overpowered as hell to any unexperienced player (yeah, good ones can counter the  out of him with plenty of heroes). So... instead of getting this guy nerfed (reduce his stats) he is getting boosted with every update. Same goes for plenty of heroes which ruins the game. The balancing of heroes and skills is being lost gradually over time and lately, if you see a certain hero in a team on a pub game you know he will win (and yeah, only jerks pick such... but that's almost all the players you'll meet!). Other heroes that are so fragile and weak like the poor crystal maiden which gets killed 50 times per game are getting nerfed instead... And another nail goes in. I can keep this up for quite a bit but I realise readers are dropping off from the review like mosquitoes near "Raid" with every line I add so lets cut it here and shoot the word: The game is duying and unless it gets a restart it will keep degrading. Don't bother... you lose a lot of time playing it, matches take ages at times, no one pauses for you if your mom gets a blackout next to you... well either help her or lose the game... you see? It's not a good game to play, you won't learn russian (apart from swears)... you wont get smarter (quite the opposite)... you wont make cash unless you sacrifice your whole life to play professionally. You pour so much nerves, time and effort in this game and you get nothing apart from a few and far between games where you actually match with good guys who pick normal heroes and don't spam the mic with swears. Well the game isn't a  as someone who is on a rage spree might claim... it's a decent one but it's not worth it: I would mark it as a 4.65/10 (yeah, indeed: 4.65... what a nice number) and advice you against playing it. That's all really, excuse my lenghtiness and if you actually read that... well, go reward yourself with a treat from the fridge!
Hart;-;my first moba game fell in love with it on second play after my friends thought me to play it meet a lot new friends here friendly community and the best Russian,pinoy language learning tools
Master Uzi;-;This game is filled with the biggest  in the world. Enjoy every second of it :D
TinyFalcon;-;If you want to learn how to blame everyone else for being terrible at a game, while having a blast with your closest nerdmates. DOTA 2!
peremptor;-;This is basically dota 1 with an upgraded user interface and graphics. Its still a work in progress but all in all this is what the original dota style gameplay needs if its going to increase its declining marketshare in the moba genre it itself once pioneered. The spectator interface for viewing live games is impressive and though it seems the matchmaking algorithm is not really active at the moment for a beta the parts that work do so rather well. The attack and spell animations are all reworked and changed in this version so even for old dota 1 vets there is much to learn that only comes with the experience of engaging in the matches themselves. If you can get an invite and you like the MOBA genre you will find far more to like than not. But as usual in these types of games it all comes down to how evenly paired both teams are in skill for a game to truly fire on all cylinders.
DOGE;-;Alright, listen up. Instead of being sarcastic and writing a funny review that jabs at russians, I'm going to tell you how Dota 2 really is at it's core. In a nutshell Dota 2 is a great game, but a terrible experience at the same time. You want to keep going back to it, but you also hate to go back. Why? One word: community. Dota 2's community is for the most part rude and hateful (and undeniably filled with russians who refuse to speak any other language than that of their own), sapping the joy out of this otherwise polished and addicting MOBA. It's unfriendly to beginners and the basic mindset is to belittle anyone who makes a mistake. Make one wrong move and you are called a noob right away... at the best of times. Often it's much worse and I would prefer not to go into the details. Sometimes you get a crapstorm of hate and blame even if you haven't actually done anything wrong. Occasionally though you come across friendly players, and when that happens, the game is a pure joy to play. However, since the game is 5v5, coming across four nice players at the same time (if you're solo queueing) is a rarity. Why then have I played the game for over 2000 hours? The sensation of winning. Your determination to keep playing, despite of the discouraging community, is fueled by the fantastic sensation of winning. That sweet moment when you see the enemy Ancient blow up and look back on the match, remembering all the plays and teamwork that lead you to victory is ever so gratifying. But even a victory can come with a grain of salt. Many times you have rude teammates that rage in the chat even when your team is winning. There is a mute option, but that doesn't stop the bad manners that extend outside the chat. People can intentionally feed the enemy team, ignore their own team, teamkill with some abilities and just generally be a bad player. It's really frustrating and the worst part is it happens all the time. Going ranked doesn't really solve the problem either, at least not completely. Ranked matchmaking is a more serious type of mode in Dota 2 that ranks you based on how well you do and finds opponents of equal skill. It feels much more professional and "tryhardish". Although you meet nice players more often, nothing stops the rude players from jumping over the fence and playing ranked aswell. Having played some matches in ranked, I can say the mode isn't "hate free". I had some of the worst matches in regards to teammates in that mode. Another problem with ranked is that, like I said, it's more "tryhard". Many just want to play the game casually and not have to worry about ranks and such. But don't get me wrong, Dota 2 is a great game in itself. The core mechanics are spot on and gameplay flows well. No technical issues to speak of (not counting the occasional missing texture bug or so, of which I have had none myself). Graphics are great and have a very subtle water painting type feel to them. All the various spells and abilites look great. The game is very deep and complex with tons of items, skill and item builds and strategies to learn. It can be a bit terrifying to beginners, but once you get the hang of things it's engaging. All the playable heroes are well balanced (although there is always some debate on a couple specific heroes being "OP") and free to play from the start. That's another thing the game does right. All the heroes are free and playable from the start, unlike Dota 2's undeniably very successful competitor, League of Legends. Dota 2's microtransactions focus on purely cosmetic stuff, which means there are zero "pay to win" elements in the game. It really falls unto you to decide whether if you want to suffer the rude community for the sake of playing this great game. To put it roughly in perspective, it's like playing Skyrim, but having someone stand next to you the whole time yelling at you for every mistake you make, calling you a "fooping idiot" every time you miss an arrow or fail a quest objective. Failed to kill Alduin? "Uninstall Skyrim, noob." Don't know how to make dragonbone armor? "Learn to play, tard." It's like that. Having played the game as long as I have, I would say that you are better off not playing Dota 2. The game is fun when you're winning (because people tend to rage less when your team is doing fine)... which is 50% of the time. Sometimes not even when you're winning. It isn't the losses that make the game unpleasant, it's the unfriendly people. If you're one of those people who can just calmly ignore everything rude being said at you, you have a better chance of not finding Dota 2 so terrible. But realistically, why should you even have to? Videogames are supposed to be a form of entertainment and when you can't have fun half of the time, the game isn't worth it. People will tell you that Dota 2 is great, but that greatness comes with a price. Do take in notice that this is all coming from a solo player point of view. This review is meant mainly to those who are likely to play the game alone most of the time and want to know what it's really like, not just the great things. If you have four friends who you can play with on a regular basis, then you're golden. The game is at it's best when you play with friends and don't have to worry about getting "a stick in the mud" player on your team. Great game with a bad community.
A WINDSHIELD WIPER;-;do you like clicking shit? does the thought of clicking shit with a bunch of slobbering hysterical morons armed with report buttons and stubborn retard belligerency appeal to you? do you like pressing buttons on your keyboard? do you like the thought of being unable to click shit or push buttons because a slobbering hysterical moron reported you for politely suggesting that they should stop auto-attacking creeps or aren't equipped to handle mid or shouldn't be building Battle Fury on Drow? do you like getting frustrated and abandoning all pretense of polite suggestions? do you want to register parachute steam accounts so you can pop off at retards and not give a shit if they report you? do you like dota? then you'll love this
Duk;-;Advantages: 1. The old game in a new package. 2. Interesting and beautiful system skins heroes. 3. Availability of the ladder. 4. Convenient search game. 5. process of the game interesting and not boring Disadvantages: 1. High prices in the game store. 2. Sometimes you have to wait long for matchmaking. 3. Sometimes disappears player models.
FIRE_KEEPER;-;10 years dota 1 380 hours dota 2. it will just ruin your life you better play something else
Salty;-;Ruined my life 10/10 would play without friends..... send help 9/10
OctanePunk *Trading*;-;Stop what your doing right now! Dont buy that expesnive language class, you can learn all the Portuguese you need on DotA 2! The premier language teacher 10/10 must buy.
azaez;-;Got 99 problems, micro-ing is one. There are very few games that allow me to hold my weinar while playing , dota is one of em . The innovative playstyle that i have been made new to allows for me to have free hand to generally cup my bawlz or hold my weinar, this breathtaking romance between my left hand and genitalia is phenominal towards the performance of my skills in dota , as well as this masterful technique i would reccomend this game. But you may ask yourself why isnt your left hand on the keyboard, as a connoisseur of stolen pc equipment i do not have the latest in razor technology or advanced moba gaming equipment therefore waisting a second hand on Dota
Taigastyle;-;This game is an abusive relationship; it shows you glimmers of hope that your love will bear fruit and you'll have an enjoyable time, only to crush you and destroy you the other 50% of the time.
Mex;-;11/10. Ruined my life
SirJolt;-;I don't really enjoy competitive games, as a rule. I like the idea of them, but I don't play them. I have been playing a lot of Dota 2 though, because I don't think that Dota 2 is really a "game." I sometimes lose a game so badly that I wake, days later, in a cold sweat. At first, all I can think is that I am happy to have woken from the nightmare. Later, in a moment of creeping fear, I will realise that the real nightmare is how bad I am at Dota... and yet I cannot stop myself from playing it. Dota 2 is an endless nightmare from which I cannot wake. To install it is to introduce into your life a hellish netherworld, one in which close friends are so disappointed in one another that they cannot even express it. One in which improvement means only that you will be matched against better opposition... All of this horror floats on the constant threat of the "low priority queue," a stygian hellscape that this review could never hope to describe. Summary: 10/10, would play again (until my sightless eyes drop from their sunken sockets and the cold grip of death frees my mortal husk from its trap).
Jackets;-;I hate this game, it's poison.
Silver;-;My favourite game of all time, amazingly deep pvp experience that has me still feeling like every game is something new and different after about 2-3000 hours given between dota 1 and 2. First off a warning. This is game is hard to get into. It has an insanely large learning curve, (and a community who (mostly) don't deal well with learners or anyone not at the top of their game.) If you push through this, which isn't so bad if you have some friends to show you the ropes and get you into it, you will have access to a high action strategy game with so many variables to each game that you can always be suprised no matter how long you've played.
rocz;-;I guess I have to review this game because I've wasted so many hours playing it. Basically, Dota 2 has made me racist towards anyone who speaks any other language than english. If you're having a good day, don't play this game.
ric;-;this videogame about spiders who like to kill towers very good in serbia very famous i play with family every day i skill and 20/0/30 sniper mid short game win fast i used to play on teams like liquid, alliance and navi but now i family and work no time game is about towers and russians and you have to kill towers and russians with spiders and trees very good there also roshan roshan is russian (say roshan out loud!!!! omg!!!!!!!!!!) there are also bonus levels special like wrathnight which is like pokemons attacking lich king another bonus level diretide is about candy it's gay bullets in turks are my candy  turks  bosnia serbia 4evr nuke us every day serbia strong wisdom of the FALCON fast like TIGER strong like LION grafix: amazing like battolfild 5 in showcase mode you can see lina's  very nice sound: very nice dubstep arabic kebab soundtrack like my country music very good gameplay: very good gameplay very sports i own u with riki every match very fed story: very touching story of russians being russians it lasts only 20-40 min and then you can play again overall: 10
5k MMR then arrow to the knee :(;-;Makes you sympathize with Napoleon, Hitler, and anyone else who tried but failed to set the Russians straight.
-Dinginnnn- Nampung SF;-;The hours I have clocked in explain everything.
no;-;There are many important aspects to a proper Dota 2 game. Without them, you will never have the full Dota Experience. 1. Peruvian Hero Pool: -Huskar -Spirit Breaker -Brewmaster -Bristleback -Drow Ranger -Bloodseeker -Phantom Lancer -Phantom Assassin -Razor -Viper -Riki -Sniper -Troll Warlord 2. Random pauses for extra time and throughout the game coupled with incoherent Spanish excuses. 3. Full team in bot lane tower diving within five minutes. 4. Proper language, below I have inserted a few commonly used phrases: -"NOOB" -"report weiver for feding" -"Tu madre es una  fea" -"jajajajjaaaajjjajajaajajaja" -"recomend me pls xd" -"ez sex" 5. Losing to people with no steam profile and 18 hours in Dota. There are three ways to counter these savages: 1. Stay in a five-man at all times and have a good team composition. 2. Lose 15 gold and counterpick the five broken heroes they choose. 3. Ban them from US Servers. #3 is inarguably the best solution. Join my group to fight for the cause. This game has a lot of potential. Help Valve help us. Good luck to all.
Tequila Sunrise;-;Dota 2 - it's a kind of game which can easily become a part of your life. Once you get really interested in it, you'll never be able to get it out of your head. I've never thought that I would be into a game like this. It's just amazing cuz of many different characters, team roles and skills - it gives you a freedom to choose between lots of strategies. This game can teach how to play in a team efficiently, how to help each other in order to win, how to organise your small group if there's nobody to lead it... It isn't always easy to manage with all this stuff, but it makes the process even more challenging, more catching, you know. Dota 2 is so popular and loved game cuz it makes ppl think, realize themselves as a part of a team, choose the best strategy to achieve their aim. + a lot of characters + oceans of items + various game modes + great events + lots of strategies + improvement of your reaction and co-operative skills + an ability to create your own team - random teammates can be absolutely dumb and wry-handed
Dante;-;The definiton of MOBA
jasperrr;-;This is the worst game i have ever played in my entire life, the most depressing and anxiety inducing game ever. Its an addiction you can't stop, a drug you cant refuse. Every thought you have is about the game...the lanes, the heroes, the creeps, the items. If you play this game, you fall into a deep dark pit you will never climb out of.
Donquixote Doflamingo;-;1st most played game on Steam, 2nd most played game in the world.
Jonny;-;It is one of the most interesting games I have ever played. Go DOTA !!!
sWING;-;This game is a ing joke. You get  random teammates, and your friend teammates will suck as well. The community is cancerous. You could play a match with total perfection and still lose. It's ludicrous. 10/10, would totally play another 1200 hours of dota.
Jonny;-;It is one of the most interesting games I have ever played. Go DOTA !!!
SLIM SHADY;-;dota is like a big black hole,the more u move on,the more it sucks u in it. by the way...... full of russains -_________-
Cody Izzo;-;Of the majority of games that feature animal people, I don't think any other game of our generation can shout BLATANT FURRY CULTURE FORCING more than Dota 2. Ranging from the down and dirty Gondar lines like "for the right price, anything" to the drunk, pitiful Mangix; and you thought Disney was bad. On top of that they even added a character called "Troll Warlord" which is obviously a Homestuck reference. These guys are really milking the fandom department. Why can't a game just be about boobs like the old day- I mean what ever happened to good old Christian family values like Monopoly and Scrabble. Now we've gotta fill our games with fanservice and sell out to an audience that is somehow greater than ours? I don't think so. And there's even a character that's a flamboyant homosexual. I had to bring my children to therapy after they heard the words "puddin pop" from one such "Storm Spirit". On the topic of inappropriate directive, I can't believe a Greek Gorgon such as Medusa would go so far as to talk about her 'gays'. This is simply not alright. This "game" is nothing but a manifestation of what our society is becoming, and we can only petition to have Valve remove funding for this project to save our youth.
QUUM;-;Best international diplomacy simulator of all time! 10/10
PersonA;-;Wanna ruin your life ? Play this and your wish'll be granted :)))))) Your enemies are russains Your friends ....dont trust anyone And dont forget to use the word "" against the russains :))))))) Mother russia will be Our  forever
King Black Dragon;-;Do not play this game. I REPEAT DO NOT PLAY THIS ING GAME. Where do I start, I have so many hours because of what I call the brutal process. This process is that you think this game is great because "oh its a moba game", "oh lots of heros to play" "oh it's a professional game, with mature players".  YOU THIS GAME WILL DRIVE YOU TO INSANITY! YOU WILL MEET THE MOST STUPID PEOPLE ON THE PLANET IN THIS GAME (LITERALLY) EVER SINGLE ING PERSON NOT FROM THE USA BUT IS CLOSE ENOUGH TO CONNECT TO IT PLAYS ON IT! SO YOU HAVE ING PERUVIANS, MEXICANS, AND ALL THE LATIN COUNTRIES PLAYING ON THIS  USA SERVER! EVERY TIME YOU PLAY THIS GAME YOU 1. LEARN ANOTHER LANGUAGE 2 BECOME SO PUT DOWN YOU WANT TO KILL YOURSELF 3. PLAY ON A BROKEN  MMR SYSTEM THAT JUDGES YOUR SKILL BY WINNING OR NOT, LIKE WTF ITS A 5 TEAM GAME IS MY PERSONAL SKILL EVEN NOTED IN THE RANK SYSTEM ! RUN WHILE YOU ING CAN DON'T PLAY THIS GAME.  YOU GABE  ICEFROG  VALVE  DENDIMEN
Haha, I'm just kiddin' man.;-;amazing game it gave me ptsd towards peruvians 10/10
Kamerad Skarr;-;Better than League Of Legends. 420/10.
Smak64;-;Apparentally, being a human being whom is requiring of material sustenance and thus needing to leave when called on short notice so you may obtain such sustenance is frowned upon by the community. And by their standards, worthy of reports and being called a .
General Sam123;-;What is even going on in this ing game.
psyno;-;Nothing but a ing hat simulator. Feeling like getting told by a group of 12 year old russian how they all  your mother and lose because they ruin the game on purpose and stack report you resulting in a ban on your account? Feeling like spending hundreds of euros on hats? Do you sweat waiting for the weekly hat update(yeah valve doesnt fix mmr or game bugs at all its just hats) if so yes this game is for u
MichealDaNoob;-;it sucks
Majestic Casual;-;Okay. After 2,000 hours of you I can't stand you. At the same time I can't get enough of you. Dota is Love, Dota is Life. Dota.... Will you marry me?
whatgoat;-;do not play this video game unless you want to become racist
Xextreem;-;just a pile of  game. QQ people only
RGM;-;When I first started DOTA2 I was a little overwhelmed, as my first ARTS / MOBA game it was pretty complicated. I soon started to pick up the mechanics like last hitting and denying. Before I knew it, I was performing better and better. I stopped making silly mistakes and I got vastly better at not feeding the enemy team. For the most part, everyone I've met was very helpful and nice, there have sometimes the jerk however. As I continue to play DOTA2 more and more, I'm sure I'll continue to improve. I recommend this game for all :) Yes i used Google Translate, you can kill me now.
RGM;-;When I first started DOTA2 I was a little overwhelmed, as my first ARTS / MOBA game it was pretty complicated. I soon started to pick up the mechanics like last hitting and denying. Before I knew it, I was performing better and better. I stopped making silly mistakes and I got vastly better at not feeding the enemy team. For the most part, everyone I've met was very helpful and nice, there have sometimes the jerk however. As I continue to play DOTA2 more and more, I'm sure I'll continue to improve. I recommend this game for all :) Yes i used Google Translate, you can kill me now.
Gatronix;-;Bad Rats does everything this does, and more. Don't be lured in by the F2P. It's out classed by classics like [John Romero's] Daikatana and Day One: Garry's Incident. These, Bad Rats, and more will offer you a far better experience than Dota. Even if you're a filthy casual I wouldn't recommend this game, you should go for Snuggle Truck if you are not up to date with the competitive scene for the aforementioned trio of games.
Mr Money Makin';-;Game had no warnings of super spookies, even though it has skeletons and . 0/10 - Not bad.
"Amazing" Minty;-;A very beginner friendly, user-friendly videogame with deep, insightful characters that have amazing character development, which will lead you to tears in some cases. Like the poor blind guy who finally achieved greatness because his mom said he could ;_;7 It also has a very friendly community that is very helpful to beginners. I recommend this game to any and all casual gamers, especially fans of light, friendly games and their community, like Club Penguin and 4 ch. an. Also, characters in this game are very easy to learn and their abilities are easy to utilize, allowing easy collaboration with teammates and friends, for example: Meepo the Geomancer is a great character for those new to the game, and I recommend all new players choose him. There's minor drawbacks in useful content though, like certain things are outright useless (like Couriers and Support characters) and they should be removed from the game to make it perfect and this is coming from a long term investor of this game who has dedicated many hours (1337, to be exact) to this extremely fun indie game. All in all, if you've never played a videogame in your life or have never spent time on the internet, Dota 2 is right for you! This is a very non- informative review.
Harakant;-;English Review I was a fan and player of DOTA 1 and I've been passionate player of new version DOTA 2 for some time already. Audio and video are incomparable. There were cube, cross in the older version, but in everything's smooth in new version. I mind the looks of some heros (sorting by race), but I used to it. Though what I miss from the older version is graphical visualization of objects, which was glowing out of them (aura, colors). But sound messages are just wonderful! Control, choice of using spells, items ... it's up to player, also like graphics and sounds. Great benefit is that you don't have to download and search maps, there is automatic update and synchronization. I give a big plus for buying, gaining of trading items. It's just huge jump and movement in this game. Who was devotee of the older version, he will also fall in love with this one. I recommend for 100%. Rating: 10/10 Slovak Review Bol som fanikom a hrom DOTA ''1'' a som i novej verzie DOTA 2. Audio a video s nezrovnaten. V starej verzii boli ''kocka, krik'' v novej ve pekne vyhladen. Trochu mu vad na poniektorch herov vzor (rozdelenie poda rasy), ale to som si u zvykol. o mi avak chba z prvej verzei je grafick vizulizcia predmetov, ktor z nich vyarovala (aury, sfarbenia, ...). o sa tka hlok: ,,S uasn!'' Ovldatenos, vber pouvania spellov, itemov, ... je na hrovi, taktie ako grafika i zvuky. Obrovksou vhodou je nesahovania a nehadanie mp, ale automatick aktualizcia a synchronizcia. Vek plus dvam i kpu, zskavania i trejdovania itemov. Proste obrovsk skok a posun v tejto hre. Kto bol zarytcom do starej verzie, tak isto si zamiluje i tto nov. Odporam na 100%. Hodnotenie: 10/10
StrongNico;-;Ugh. I hate myself.
Fed;-;Socially dangerous tool to destroy and sap the life out of friendship.
Nik;-;This game didn't give me cancer.
Jumbotron;-;If you don't work well with other people, if you can't take criticism and tend to blame others for your mistake, and/or if you don't like to communicate, or can't because you speak a different language. You will fit in well here; would recommend 10/10.
FeNIX;-;This game is awful and filled with awful people.
Sassy;-;at least its not league of dinnerplates
Ephixea;-;Finally found a game i really suck at. Let this be a warning note for all gamers that have been a prisoner of their own style but then again trying to give Dota 2 a shot for a change of scene. if you are new to MOBA or just downright have had suck at it for whatever reasons, this game wont be any different by any means. So let us begin reviewing the game where comeback comes back and hits you in your face more than the Taken Franchise (i know they should have stopped after the first film..) -+- The game itself is pretty darn vast with approximately 112 heroes in the roster and just a bunch of different purchasable items to buy from the Gold you receive every second and by kills with. Its your job to figure out the strength and weaknesses of each of the character you are about to take down/ lead with and set your perks accordingly. -+- Objective aren't any different for other MOBAS, you take down enemy structures to make the 'Ancient' aka the final tower vulnerable and then take it out. -+- The community is definitely one of the most rage induced people piled together in a game where communication and tactical planning are crucial. Every team i was assigned to there seemed some guy Screaming his throat out at me or some other bad player in out team. Just like an ex-boyfriend with emotional issues. I don't really blame them, it is one of the most competitively played games out there. -+- The graphics are better than most and seem well thought out. the animations of characters on the lower box really adds to it. Its well thought out and isn't much flashy, should help most people unlike my ADHD sufferer cousin. And the system requirements aren't as much so you should do fine with most potatoes. -+- Sounds are quite varying for all items and also visually the effects are quite different that is definitely a mention for the creative team responsible for it. -+- They have drops! yep just like CS:GO you have a chance to get an item drop that can be tradable/marketable. some drops do cost a lot and can buy you a game on steam sale (cumulative drops) if you are dedicated to it. -+- I'd also like to mention playing with bots will only get you so far in a game against people. The tactics people use are nothing like they programmed those binary butts with. There is still a lot to conclude in what seems to be a game based on a chessboard turned side ways, but i wont ruin it all by discussing it here. So spend some money on a better internet and try it for yourself, Gaben knows you'll need it. This game did have its moments for me but it just sadly wasn't a meant to be. Well the opponent team will surely mourn for me for all those victories i snagged them. sadly i cant say the same for my friends. (I hear one of them ended up with Tourette Syndrome.)
B181;-;-Failed at my finals. -Lost a great friend because of lane argument. -Lost 3 months. 10/10 This game ruined my life.
kingkah;-;I learned russian in less then 4 weeks.
Lifestalker;-;A really good game let down by the god awful community. Every game you have someone complaining or swearing. On top of that. almost every game you have someone feeding, basicly giving a free win to the enemy team. I can't tell you how many times I've uninstalled this game in rage, due to playing with people that are so idiotic that you can't comprehend it.
driller2kx;-;It's free to play. 10/10
rexarski;-;"I came, I saw, I conquered." after spending 9 hours in tutorial part and 1 win against other players, i decided to quit playing this game and keep my 100% winning rate.
Morning Wood;-;Being an old League of Legends player I really needed some time off LoL since I knew every champion, every item and every possible outcome for hero duels, I came to Dota 2. If you are just like me then I would strongly suggest taking a look at dota 2. It is much more realistic and I can guarantee it once you get to know a little bit the mechanics of the game and if you play it with a friend or two then you will have so much fun. No bugs whatsoever, very fluid game and most of all very diverse range of heroes. The only bad thing there might be (from what I have seen) is that there is quite a big number of trolls in the game.
maggo;-;An online game about meeting russians and learning russian, great for students looking to learn a new language. /10
Nav;-;_  Give TECHIES
exorcism;-;best of the best
+|Mr.BOB|+;-;IT will ruin you life man. ITS LIKE A DRUG BUT LEGAL. YOU HAVE BEEN WARNED. DONT NOT ATTEMPT.
Andy;-;don't play if you hate russians!
Woofless;-;Que simulator 2014 is a gr8/10 game. I was able to get a combo of over 12 minutes the other day. Would totally recommend for all hardcore gamers.
$hw@bo Thu~;-;A true masterpiece and a milestone in gaming, this sequel to a genre-definer that is now just bursting in a global scale is a great point of reference to anyone attempting to make a game of this genre. Great graphics, amazing sound and voice design, and rich backstories in every corner are just some of the features that make Dota 2 great. But it's major strong point is the depth in its mechanics. While Dota 2's gameplay might seem daunting at first, it's one of the best and more engaging ever seen in a game, and learning it is just one of the reasons why this game is addicting. Other games such as League of Legends end up falling short because their devs decided to cut much from the original formula, but Dota 2 kept it intact, and makes sure you learn something new everyday. Not only the core game is strong, but also the eSport scene surrounding it is amazing and growing, with several tournaments going on, including Valve's own The International. At the time of release, the game looks like a train with no brakes, about to crash against its competitors and run them over, raising the bar on the genre with a myriad of awesome features that perfectly compliment an awesome game.
=D;-;Ruined my life. No girlfriend, no friends, no family. Now is only me and Dota 2. I wish to touch some boobs, but I can't. So I will imagine myself touching Lina boobs. Oh... I forgot something... In my dreams, I am sniper... and i say: BOOM, HEADSHOT! when I kill a Russian. I'm Brazilian, but I don't like this country... so, sometimes I dream that I'm Nature's Prophet, and I teleport to the jungle, and... *snif, snif*, why they ganked me? Why Crystal Maiden didn't warded?! She hates me?! I guess I used to much the Mask of Madness...
Phil Ken Sebben;-;Awful, unhelpful community. 3/10 wouldn't recommend to my worst enemy.
Disheartened;-;More Russian than Moscow! 10/10 DotA2 is a Russian simulator, explore the every day life of a Russian glued behind his computer screen wondering why these English capitalist dogs do not speak the almighty language of justice. Enjoy not being able to understand your teammates and swearing at eachother in a variety of Spanish/French (very rarely English) and most of all: Russian. You can play on the Europe West servers (with Russians), American servers (with Russians) or if you're missing out on that full Russian experience, play on the Russian servers. No wonder Ukraine is not taken yet, they're all too busy ''playing'' this game. Feel free to enjoy Solo Queue and end up with a group of 3 Russians and a Spanish 13 year old repeatedly, listening to a repeated soliloquy of backwards letters you've only seen once in a Chernobyl documentary. Attempt Duo Queue and end up with 3 Russians, which kind of diminishes the full blown Russian experience; thus I do not recommend you try this or you can play with bots, which are surprisingly better teammates than the Russians. Just for good measure I'll throw in an extra ''Russians'' to get the point across. Enjoy yourself, comrad. For those of you that do not enjoy the full Russian gaming experience, there is always CS:GO, which is the softcore version of DotA2. Disclaimer: Long exposure to DotA2 might cause capitalist ideals to give way to communism.
cazsim83;-;Like almost any other MOBA out there, it's "free" unless you want any of your looks customized. I only played a handful of matches, and being at least semi-literate in both MOBA UIs and old custom Warcraft and Starcraft maps, I can in no way recommend this game to anyone but the most hardcore of MOBA fans. The UI is unintuitive, the shop is a mess to look at if you're new, and you will likely get your face smashed in by even the computer-controlled players time and time again while you punishingly learn every little thing it takes to be good at this game. If you have never played a MOBA, if you don't have a friend who already plays this and can walk you through what to do, do NOT try this game. If you really love MOBAs and are looking for a new one, yes, definitely try this and I hope you enjoy it. I did not, not even remotely.
Toad King;-;Oh, so apparently it's MY fault you fed Anti-Mage. Yeah, okay bro.
[CARE] MrMountains;-;Dota 2 is a 5-v-5 MOBA game. You have a selection out of 108 unique heroes, each with a unique skillset. Every hero is also available from the minute you start. No playing X amount of games before this hero becomes available. The object of Dota 2 is to destroy the other teams Ancient. To do this, you can work your way down any of the 3 lanes (Top, Mid or Bottom) by destroying the outer towers. Youll start most matches pairing up or going into a lane solo trying to get some experience and gold by last hitting creeps. As the game progresses, youll start teaming up more with your other team members to take on the other team or to quickly kill of a solo member of their team. Because of the importance of coordinating your attacks with other team members, communication is a very important aspect of the game. I therefor also recommend playing this game with some friends because random people that youll be teamed up with wont always show the same willingness to communicate. If youre just starting out playing Dota 2, I also recommend playing with a friend who already has some experience in the game because the learning curve is very steep, especially when you have to figure everything out by yourself. The skill ceiling is also extremely high. So every time you play, you might learn something new. Due to the high number of available heroes, skills and items, you can be sure that every game is unique. Something to be wary of is the community. There are people out there that take this game way more seriously than you might. Most players have an opinion of what you should have done in a certain situation and will be happy to blame a lost teamfight on you not taking that action. Flaming is something that could happen often. But if youre playing with a team entirely made up of your friends, this shouldnt prove to be an issue. If this is not the case, dont worry. You can always mute the players that are causing you grief and continue enjoying this wonderful, team oriented game.
BjB - Alejandro;-;ruined my life too addictive
3301;-;Best language teacher      10/10
Ulakith;-;Dota 2, a very frustrating game that forces you to play with and against other players. You'll rely on your team to preform their selected roles, and then watch in horror as they completely ignore the game mechanics and just chase down kills, rarely successfully. You build in game items during the match to enhance your characters role and then hope and pray your team doesn't feed the opposition too much. Team fights, normally 5v5, tend not to happen as you watch your fellow team members run to meet their fate and be a hero. Sadly this ends up throwing the game and you lose. I would still recommend this game, purely for those few matches when the your whole teams synergy is in harmony, watch as the gold floods in, the towers crumble and the opposition blame each other for their loss.
KuzLine;-;Nice game ever
Darren;-;Kill me now.
Totally NOT an OWL;-;Best MOBA out there!
nutting;-;Full of people with autism, don't bother.
Aliuos;-;if you speak more than just russian i would reccomend this game if not the game isnt for you
[HC] MrLuke;-;Great game to uninstall, 4/20 IGN
TUNNEL_SNAKES_RULE;-;Alright kids listen up cause heres a life lesson. THIS GAME IS DANGEROUS. You'll start out fine but then your life will perpetuate into a spiral of doom. You will be called some of the most horrid things ever typed by a human being in every language there is and all for picking some purple horned . You will rage inumerable times and get sent to Valve's version of hell, LOW PRIORITY. Here everything is worse more Russians, worse players, more profanity, and its all your fault for some reason. You'll quit, play again, quit again, play again, buy $1000 of cosmetic items, cry, laugh, its almost as if this is Valve's version of a Shakspeareian play from the pits of hell that Gabe dragged up personaly for us. Its shown as free to play but its not by any means this game will steal your soul and laugh at you while it does so, and the best part is you'll love every minuet of your life hat you burn on this game. Get it now befor it gets you.
Boonem;-;A message to my fellow conservatives: all is lost. A message to my fellow classical economists: we're all Keynesians now. With the release of How to Train your Dragon 2 (which might've been more suitably named "How to be a Dictator 2"), Communist influence has been seeded into the minds of the children, destroying the potential for a perfect laissez faire economy for future generations. How to Train your Dragon 2 is a story of a young Shaggy Rogers discovering the wonders of "Sandwiches" for the first time with the Rottweiler he owned before Scooby. Our protagonist, a rebellious socialist who never came to grasp the true meaning of Republican Motherhood, is a frequenter of the parks, motivating the homeless by promising them peace and beating them until they promise to get a job or preaching to the innocent picnickers about the evils of animal cruelty. A subtheme of gun control is dished out discreetly as the script writers encourage us to do better than what game theorists think we are capable of with flawed moral consciences. In the same way viewers are assured that we have learned from the days of the arms race by subtly bringing up the Marilyn Monroe-JFK scandal. Obnoxious and unorginal, the production draws content heavily from the movies E.T. and Avatar, indicating that it could have been funded by a collective effort between PETA, James Cameron, the public health institute, Heidi Fleiss, and Joseph Stalin. In the end, the main character's tyrannical liberal-minded father boards a boat to Russia under heavy artillery fire by social darwinists, portrayed as defiant and unruly teenagers that want nothing but an end to civilization. I can say with certainty that any child who watches this film WILL become a democrat at some point in their lives, and, like the movie suggests, the only way to prevent the disease from spreading is to contain it. Oh and Dota 2 is a pretty good game too.
Basta;-;About as fun as.. Clapping with your elbows..
Alison;-;Defense of the Ancients 2 or DotA 2 for short, is like being addicted to an extremely harmful substance. No matter how many times you queue for Europe West and get Russians. No matter how many times you get an insta-pick Pudge going mid to feed. No matter how many times you see a Bounty Hunter build BattleFury. You'll keep coming back for that one taste of glory. It's an extremely abusive relationship that is impossible to leave.
@aru;-;I can't really write a good review for the ever-changing landscape that is Dota2. But I will say the following generic things: Dota2 is not a simple team game. There are a huge amount of advanced techniques that you will have to be told or lookup online. You come into Dota to have fun with "tools", every character is a different tool. They move different, they turn different, they attack differently. If you enjoy playing the same game over and over and perfecting little, small tricks to give yourself a slight advatange, then this is for you. If you come from any fighting game for example, you can get into this. Like really into this. What makes Dota2 different from other MOBAs? Depth. Dota offers much more variety, much more freedom to experiment. Other MOBAs shy away from the huge complexity that is giving more tools to the tools. You have items that give you more movement options, that take away movement options from the opponent, even random modifiers that spawn on the map periodically. In other games you will find these "options" baked into a character, they try to guide you into learning how a character "should" be played. Dota2 gives you the sandbox to experiment, As a reminder, it's never anyone's fault when you fail to build your tool properly. This is a game. Have fun. Most people just look up to a player and copy his playstyle, and Valve facilitates this. But you don't have to. Everything depends in Dota2. Should you try Dota2? Yes. But remember to have fun. You will be playing a game that can last 1 hour per match. Enjoy. Smile. A lot of people forget this. If you're not enjoying Dota2. Uninstall.
Tems;-;Has a steep learning curve because the community punishes new players (expect loads of trash talk) but it's worth it if you play with friends who can teach you. Teamwork is essential in this game. Keep practicing and eventually you will develop good decision-making skills, which you might also be able to use in real life. Much better than League of Legends in terms of objective depth, which is the reason why I prefer this game over other MOBAs.
seunL;-;This game almost made me forget what real, human breasts look like.
MadrYx -TPF-;-;......................//) ....................,/../ .................../..../ .............//'...'/` ........../'/.../..../......./\ ........('(.......... ~/'...') .........\.................'...../ ..........''...\.......... _. ............\..............( ..............\.............\...  this game
RX-0;-;This game is totally full of idiots and noob players. If you want to play this game, make sure to find 4 other friends to play too
DrumManSam;-;Brilliant MOBA with endless 'replayability'. Heavily dependant on your team mates who may or may not possess logic/reason/language you understand.
ImBaNooB;-;Dota 2 is an awesome game ruined by its lacking match making skills. I found a guy who had 0% knowledge of the game so i tell steam plz fix this and do not match people with same level but same skill meaning judge a persons skill. Any by the way i have seen lvl4 people playing with lvl76 people i mean whats that about really.
McLovin! (MangoKing);-;When you play for the first time all this game seems like is just a bunch of wierd colored creatures punching each other with sticks. It seems really stupid, but you suck it up and play through the tutorial. Then you stupidly decide to play your first game of real dota. Put short you fed, badly. After going 0/30 your first game you kinda hate dota. But you stupidly decide to play another, and chances are you lost again. And this keeps happening until you discover your first newb hero. Drow seems so op doesnt she. Afterwards you decide to play this hero again and again, and doesn't it feel good to win. 50 games deep you'll hate noobstomp heroes like riki, sniper, drow, and bloodseeker. Obvisously these heroes are really op. 100 games deep and you'll find yourself trying out some new heroes, tidehunters ravange is pretty epic you have to agree. 200 games deep and you'll have played every hero, with the exception to earth spirt. How the hell do you play that guy, I dont get it. 300 games deep and those newb stomp heroes dont seem so bad anymore. Manfight riki, stand right next to drow, get blademail for sniper, and buy a tp for bloodseeker. And dont forget to buy dust. 400 games in you will know how to ward, rune control, stack and pull and play a support. You will understand the basics of having one person farm while another supports and harrasses. Holy  you've made it to 500 games. Remeber your first match if only you could see yourself now. By this point you understand the basics of dota! Remeber to dodge the sunstrike! 600 games in and you'll realize that for the past months dota is the only game you have played. Like the only game, because once you start playing dota you never come back. Unless your power dies.... By 700 games you'll start playing against trilanes. Now as an offlaner you have to do your best to not die, and get some farm. Hide in the trees and sap xp where you can. By 800 your tempted to buy that arcana. Not saying you will but it sure does look tempting. By 900 you know what to buy, and you get what every hero can do. You know where to be and when and you get the feeling when there smoke ganking and roshing. Gamesense op! By 1000 games you hit a milestone. The game doesnt seem like colored creatures punching eachother. Welcome to dota 2. Noob Advice: read guides when your trying out new heroes. Practice in bots, and dont stick to one hero, play them all. And stick in there, your first 10 games will suck. Purge has some great guides that you really should watch before you even step into your first game. And also play with friends, otherwise you might have to put up with peruvians who keep screaming noob in chat when you make one mistake. People who have to rage at everything (thats why theres reports), and russians who will play uber aggresive all the time, which to be fair on there part works half of the time. Welcome to dota 2. Oh yeah and nerf void!
Axel;-;How to play this gme?!
ErichZann;-;This game was shocking to me.When i played it couple times i learned that my mom was ed by hendreds of people who plays dota 2 and that i have some brain diseases. You should play it to know some very important stuff
i am noob pls ban;-;russian party simulator 11/10
R.I.P Porkins 1964 - 2015;-;got abused by russians and shouted at by a guy named roguecop. wouldn't play again.
cvre.drazh x);-;Welcome to Dota 2, the Hotel California of online gaming. Late Last March, I was naive enough to dip a toe in its beguiling waters and today, 450 hours of gameplay later, I return as a semi-functional human to regale you with tales from its realm. Dota 2 is unlike any other game Ive ever played, both in its nature and history. It started off as a StarCraft mod popular enough to be ported to Warcraft 3, which then exploded into a kaleidoscope of player-made variants and eventually coalesced again into a single entity titled Defense of the Ancients Allstars. There is no single author of Dota, though all the anonymous contributors whove made it what it is have come from the community that first started playing the mods. As such, Dota is the very definition of grassroots game development. The idea of a game made by the people for the people, as a certain American president might put it, fills me with a particularly warm and fuzzy sensation. Of course, I knew none of this when I first picked up Dota. A friend recommended it because its free and Im cheap. I understood that the game had a team-based format where killing the other guys was a good thing, like with first-person shooters, but your character also leveled up through the course of a match, as in role-playing games. That seemed like a recipe for unbalanced gameplay, but as it turns out, its precisely Dotas balance that makes it so unbelievably addictive. You start off as a member of a ragtag group of five heroes intent on destroying the enemys base, which is embodied by the titular Ancient structure. Through a series of skirmishes against the other team, their defensive towers, and waves of autonomous creeps, you gain experience and gold, the latter of which can be spent on items that make you stronger, swifter, and deadlier. The more you kill, the more you make, the more you buy, the more you kill. Rinse, repeat, and make sure to say "gg" at the end. LEARNING A LANGUAGE MIGHT BE QUICKER THAN MASTERING THE FULL BREADTH OF DOTA Excuse me if Im making this sound simple, because it really isnt. Dota 2 has a roster of over 100 heroes to choose from, and the combinations of items they can obtain is an order of magnitude greater still. Each hero has four or more unique abilities, and to have any hope of defeating a skilled opponent, you have to know what those are, what items he or she is carrying, and how they affect your chances of survival. Ignoring all of that nuance, I jumped straight into the game with the Juggernaut and was promptly beaten into a pulp of samurai sushi. A dozen humbling  whoopings later, I was online and reading the Dota Fire hero guides. DOTA 2 CHOICES The key reassurance I can offer is that all of these intricacies are, in fact, worth learning. As daunting as Dotas complexity may be, without it the game just wouldnt be as rewarding. My way of rising to the high bar of basic skill required was to pick the last enemy hero to destroy me. Thus I went from playing Juggernaut to Bounty Hunter to Bloodseeker to Ursa to Spirit Breaker. Each time I was sure I had the "right" hero, a better player would come along, expose my weaknesses, and teach me something new. Im the worst loser I know and yet I played Dota 2 for nearly 100 hours before I could get my winning percentage above 50. Maybe if I could actually see that I was being dominated by 14-year-old kids listening to Darudes Sandstorm on repeat, I might have felt sufficiently embarrassed to retreat in shame. I stuck through it, though, because, in the immortal words of Agent Smith, "as a species, human beings define their reality through suffering and misery," and Dota delivers both with just enough victory to keep me titillated. And once I had a couple of hundred hours of experience under my belt, I too started passing on the sacred knowledge of Dota through the time-honored tradition of owning noobs. IM THE WORST LOSER I KNOW AND IM ADDICTED TO A GAME THAT KEEPS KICKING MY  This is not a game for the impatient. Success in Dota 2 requires the strategic forethought of chess, the unselfish teamwork of basketball, and the steely nerves of poker. None of those skills are acquired with ease and theres no magic number of matches or hours played to achieve Dota competence. Its a lot like learning a language: I never felt discrete upgrades in my knowledge and skill, but eventually I got to the point where I could tell you every typo in the games hero descriptions and every corner of its single asymmetric map. Just know that the commitment required is on a whole different scale to other games. You could complete the epic Mass Effect trilogy (plus all of its expansion packs) in less time than it takes the average Dota player to familiarize himself with everything from Abbadons Aphotic Shield to Zeuss Lightning Bolt. But thats really the point. Mastering this game in 50 hours wouldnt feel anywhere near as satisfying as taking a good 500.
Cyanotic1994;-;I play both games but I like Dota 2 more than LoL because: - great graphics, music. - seductive heros. - and main reason : I can learn many different languages while playing: Philip, Malai, Thailand... j/k Sometimes I think it would be better if this game gets worse or bankrupt ...., because i can go outside, play with my friends in real life :( I really miss u but I can't play with u anymore _________________________Send to: Sona, Katarina, Syndra, Fiora, Vi, Ahri..... =)))))
Dark69Slayer;-;Don't play this, I will keep inviting you to play this game with me and talk about how important team play is, but it's just to lure you in. 500+ hours for a single game? Play 10 other games instead.
Forsaken;-;*click click click click click click click click click click click click click click click click click clickclickclickclickclickclick click click click click clickclickclickclickclickclickclickclickclickclickclickclickclickclickclickclick*
MobiusKnight;-;Reporting simulator! 10/10 would be reported again
OGMA;-;I've been playing Dota since Waracraft III, after HoN and LoL. Then I bought Dota 2 in beta and there is no better moba in my opinion. Valve is doing a good job on keeping game up and interesting and I hope it will be keep doing well in the future too.
RoarJr;-;With over 110 heroes to choose from, Dota 2 has one of the steepest learning curves of all the games available on Steam. Many players find that even after 100+ hours of gameplay, they feel incompetent at the game. While this is probably Dota 2's greatest downfall, it is also the aspect that makes the game as great as it is. There is just so much to learn in this game, that it will provide fans with countless hours of playtime. Verdict: Dota 2 is an extremely difficult game, and that is what makes it most rewarding. Yes, the amount of time it will take a new player to become even an "average" player may take well over 100 hours. However, if you are can overcome its steep learning curve and are looking for a game long term, DOTA 2 may just be the best game you can currently find - and it is free.
Nato.Chlorthalidone;-;Dota 2 was the final, fatal blow to what was left of my social life. Now I just play meepo and rage at peruvians.
Mole [LV];-;Choose in which Russia you want to play and you're good to go.
Than;-;Lose all your spare time, learn russian and become uneccessarily angry for the great price of free! 10/10
Mental Chicken Fundamental;-;Do you like great matchmaking systems? Do you like friendly communities? Do you like everyone staying in the game until the match ends? If you do, this game isn't for you.
Zilenix;-;Better than LoL.
drp;-;It's a free internet cafe game for peruvians. Recommended if you're a peruvian in an internet cafe in Peru.
Voshond;-;A game you will both love and hate more than any other game.
Lidless.873;-;Very good game. Easiest way to learn Russian in one day.
Marayan;-;yes this game is awesome to play
Ilisay_;-;>the best Cultural Interactive Simulator ever made >learn to hate eveyone who doesn't speak English >start arguing with people speaking the same language as you >buy a courrier to gain street rep >report people who beg you to commend them >feed Riki >10/10, would yell at Russians again
[=.=] Wunwa;-;ing piece of  addictive  game
S E R A P H I M;-;--------------------------------------------------- Dota 2 --------------------------------------------------- Dota 2 is a wonderful game for teamplay, if you love games like destroying the enemy base and five heroes vs five heroes you would definitely love this game. The game works like this ,that there are two teams, first team is called "Radiant" , second team is called "Dire" and each team will have a base, that base is called "Ancient" , then to win this game you have to destroy there base. So basically the first one to destroy the enemy's ancient wins, but before that you must go through the enemy's towers, there's three tower on each lane, so you can't destroy their ancient if you don't destroy the three towers and you cant advance to the second tower or third tower, you must destroy the first, second and third then finally their ancient. Last thing is , each team will have five players so you and your teammate must cooperate if not you guys will lose instantly the game, then each player will have a to pick a their role. There are 10 roles. After you guys pick a roles. There will be three lanes there's "Mid" , "Top" , and "Bottom" . So it can be like this 1 in the mid, 2 at the top and 2 at the bottom. 10 Roles Carry - will bring victory if he levels up faster and makes gold faster. Support - will provide wards and courier, also will upgrade the courier. Lane Support - useful even without farm and can go to other lanes to help others Initiator - will start the teamfight. Jungle - can get gold in the jungle so the other teammate can solo top/bottom. Pusher - can push faster through first, second and third tower. Escape - can bait the enemy or bring the enemy to your trap. Disabler - will stun the enemy or cancel the enemy's spell cast. Durable - will tank(shield) the teamfight so he's teammates wont die fast. Nuker - will bring massive damage too the enemy. This the common role in game, if you have this team you have 50/50 chance of winning Player 1 Carry this role will kill all the enemys and finish the game Player 2 Support this role will help the carry to farm because the other team will try to kill your carry Player 3 Durable this role will help in the teamfight, he will take all the damage of the enemy so the carry will live Player 4 Initiator this role will start the teamfight so you guys will have an advantage of the enemy Player 5 Disabler this role will stun the enemy so the enemy can't cast spell or attack I hope you like it and I really recommend this game, so good luck and had fun :) Pls like my review Originally posted by author : Steven Baes A.K.A. Stefphen
twin dicks;-;nice and relaxing, makes me love ppl, genuine source of happiness 10/10
SCION // sofyand;-;Have an urge to review this game with its latest situation. We had a down time during Christmas time... and lately it seems that the player(s) were more frustating than before (closed beta, invite-only period). Also the leavers and the disconnected players are more rampant now. Which make this game more and more unenjoyable now. Noob-calling, negative not-team-players and the blame games involved, yes those kind that you have to expect when playing with total strangers. You'll be wasting 30-45 or even 60+ minutes of your life, thanks to them, losing easily. So this time around, you have to prepare yourself mentally to face those kinds. :D Good thing is that they have implemented the local lobby feature, so that you can actually play locally within your LAN. Should be a very good game worthy of having a LAN party again. I like the balance changes they put into the game, the item changes and things that make the early games more "fun", but... I'm putting this as a "No" for those who play only with a friend or two. You better play this with a full five-person-team to fully enjoy this game and the time not wasted. Or perhaps due to its current state, players similar to me might not have the reason(s) on how to fully enjoy this game. Hope Valve and the team can continue to improve on this game more.
Valien;-;This used to be a great game, one of my favourites but Valve is now ruining it. All they care about is money and competitive, they ignore the community. This game is now crap dont spend any money on it
(EffectzTV);-;An extremely fun Strategy game that involves teamwork, brainpower,co-ordination, the quick reaction of the gamer and a powerful computer. :D In this game, every millisecond counts and teamwork and co-ordination is the most important. Not to mention a powerful computer :D This game can be very nerve wrecking at times and also fun! The wide range of heroes and combinations of heroes /items also makes this game unique for different gamers! Highly Recommended! 9.5/10 -WinterApple
xX-Nigerian-prince-Xx (SPAS);-;If you want to learn russian swearwords you've come to the right place m9. Our community is unique. We're better than LoL cuz we have russians. Here's What Gaben stated in dreamhack 1337 The russians have a special part in the Dota 2 community.They are well educated and really know the game. - Gaben 1337 gaben=putin==illuminati
Jethro Wellington;-;how do i change my killstreak rewards
OBERYN MARTELL;-;Time Consuming Monster
NoX;-;I dont usually write reviews but this is a game that I played really much because I enjoy the genre and tried many games in it to compare DotA 2 with. Basically in tems of speed DotA 2, along with Strife (which is basically DotA 2 in graphics style of LoL with a pet+item system which you can level up by playing) is average, so if you think a MOBA should be slower you should try League of Legends and if you think it should be faster you should try Heroes of Newerth. If you are looking for an alternative that is less knowledge based you should probably try Heroes of the Storm, since you dont have to learn as many item effects. DotA 2 in a "nutshell" after ~2400h of playtime: -New players (if interested in cosmetic items) will have to visit the shop now because game drops have become so incredibly rare that it has become hilarious. -IF you buy item chests in the shop and dont get the set you bought it for, you can't sell the items since volvo put a trade+market cooldown (2 months I think) on every new item that gets released (yay!) so if you dont want to spend money until you have each possible drop from that single chest (RNG is strong in this one) you're better off waiting until the desired item is marketable and then buy it off the market. -Volvo greed simulator: The old loot system, in which you could acutally gain items after a game ,for DotA 2 profile levels, and a leveling chest you had in your inventory (which could be opened every few profile levels and contained a new chest to open later) was successfully reworked into greed-mode. The chances to get ANY items after a game are as low as getting a legendary (or higher) before. Sure they drop ENTIRE sets now, but most of them are common to rare, which overall is still less rewards than before if you add up singe items and put them up against the set drop chance now in both, item quantity AND value. Maybe you should try some "never change a running system" in this particular function. -Mostly developer/support abandoned game. the new content this game releases is mostly made by the community since the hero sets are workshop based and hero releases/patches are just really really rare. Special events are mostly the same every year and the report system is most likely 100% count-based/not reviewed by support employes (for example if you express your annoyance towards...lets say russians...for not being able to communicate in english on EU servers, you will most likely end up muted because out of the 10 players in a EU game 3 (probably more) are most likely russian and will report you for speaking english) -These days russian-infested to the max...8/10 games you play will result in eyecancer due to russian chatspam, even though they have their own servers(!) because its way cooler to go to international servers and spam your native language, thanks volvo for letting that happen! maybe one day the EU servers will be renamed into russia 2 and russia 3 and the actual EU will have to play on american servers after all :D *EDIT*-In addition to the listed issues, the game servers are now absolute ! 1/4-1/5 of the games crash and are not counted due to connection issues with the servers, great job of making it even worse when ppl thought that wasn't possible... Conclusion: If you want to play a game in which you get rewarded for playing (in terms of cosmetic effects and/or profile progression) this probably is not the right choice anymore, because as stated you don't get level rewards or similar stuff anymore, just REALLY rare item drops (probably in the 0,2% range). If you want to blow off some steam with trolling other players, spamming your native language while being sure nobody will be able to understand you this might probably be YOUR gamechoice #1. The community these days is mostly toxic and troll based so this is NOT your game for some serious gametime (at least not in solo matchmaking). I didnt check the other games these days but the community in HoN was much more friendly and less russian. In my personal opinion DotA 2 isn't playable solo anymore because there is too few games where you can actually play properly, without being annoyed by trolls or russians... Gameplay/Balance: 9/10 Community: 2,5/10 Rewards System: 1/10
JakkaWakka;-;You see... As a true christian, I was raised to to believe the true saviour, gaben. But when I heard about this game I said "This game has everything I need, religion, no sinners and a very casual experience." I praised the lord for this mighty gift from the highest heights of heaven. So, like any other true christian would I decided to play and not stray away from the reightous path, but when I loaded up the game the loading screens were riddled with satanic images and meanings. I was outraged by this atrocity more than when my son told me he had "sinned" by doing some dispicable acts. As Matthew McConau said in chapter 16:9, "Thou hou slay thou demonic presence shou nourish in the heighest points of heaven". So, after I got away from them satanic signs I started to become somewhat suspicious of this game. I pressed play and began to sweat as the jesus juices excreted from my body. I crossed my heart and prayed to God to forgive me for this act of satanism and waited for the match to started. Upon the game starting I was stunned by the amount of pagon rituals and signs that were in the game. I closed my eyes and picked a random hero only to discover something truly horrifying. My beer had run out. My bacon stained, sweat soaked vest had ripped. The russians were here, they were everywhere. My ears started to bleed as the russian flame began. I tried to continue on the righteous path but sin was inevitable. I pressed enter, I started to flame back, my fingers were numb. And then I realised, I had sinned. My heart stopped, I could hear God reaching down to me, but even he could not stop this. I had become the thing I dreaded most (more than a gay person)... A Dota 2 player.
Cheozer || Lebaran Buka Malam;-;good game in the world
Mr.Merdy;-;I fkng love memes that review that will save your life :') np np
Mindset_;-;Don't bother spending hundreds on other language learning programs, or ones that claim to be the best, like Rosetta Stone. DotA 2 has the market cornered and you would have to be a fool to pay anything for these "superior" pieces of software when DotA 2 is completely free of charge! When you want to learn a new language, simply queue for your region, and select the language that you already know. Valve's patented system will immediately match you with other language speakers who will get you on the fast track to success! You will love your learning experience. I can guarantee that you will not grow to hate other cultures due to a language barrier, because soon you will be able to speak Portugeuse, Spanish, Russian, and Chinese!
Nuck;-;I used to do things before this game. 10/10
Basilius;-;"Their sanity I'll shatter. Their dreams of conquest I'll destroy." Of Warcrafts Custom Maps, one stood a little taller than the rest: Defense of the Ancients. Here the heroes of Azeroth, freed from the tedious management of cities and armies, could fight as they were meant to: with weapons and experience, teamwork and tactics, all unadulterated by some abstract general and convoluted mission. A vast pool of heroes, pulled into one map, normalized and equalized through patches, armed with improved weaponry, combined to cement a gameplay experience that appealed to our encyclopedic minds, our fantastical tendencies, and our social impulse. Here was an unthinkable union of knowledge, skill, mythology, role playing, individuality, and balance. Here DotA matured to perfection. But this perfection was uneven. The brilliance lay there, but burdened by the crust and grime of history. The games greatest hero, Ice Frog, was a player who saw in DotA a wondrous achievement and vowed not to let that masterpiece deteriorate and die. Seeing the game as a growing process, owned by a community, ever meant to experiment and improve, Ice Frogs leadership kept DotA alive. Suffocated by a dated engine and forgotten game, he and his team worked with the legion of adoring fans to nourish what could be saved, and eradicate what could not. But even tenacity has limits, and in order for DOTA to break free it needed a new body; a new platform in which to siege the world. Here, as ever, an angel swooped from above. It was Valve, and they released the building pressure of DOTA into the atmosphere of mainstream gaming; steam that would finally power the community it deserved. The rest is history. Adopting the FTP model, utilizing the source engine and steam community, DotA has its outlet: DOTA 2. Players marvel at the games sheer number of balanced heroes, how it feels difficult yet strangely compelling, sophisticated in its strategy but gleeful in its murder, at times silly but still dark, oppressive but always promising emancipation if you practice hard and reflect often, so reliant on your allies, often complete strangers, that autonomous action can never rival teamwork. Like members of a symphony, clashing with your enemies in near perfect tug-and-war, entailing chess-like prediction and FPS-like twitching, your team fights together, wins together, and dies together. Never before except in professional sports has your weakest link dragged you down or raised you up. But drag you down they do. Even in the most porcelain masks do we see blemishes, and DOTA 2 has its fair share. Teams can and do exploit the weakest member of the opposite team, bullying with a savagery only seen in competitive gaming. Because of this exploitation, and the difficult nature of the game as a whole, frustration often runs high in the experience. Losses feel more painful than wins feel enjoyable, and the hope for those rare games in which perfect harmony among both teams leads to razor-sharp tactics and thrilling plays can be ruined by the cruel hand of fate, where a single hero out of position or a single RNG move can turn the tide of battle. DOTA 2 is, paradoxically, rarely satisfying, but when it is players never forget that feeling of triumph. Video Games, more than any other art, rely on us to deliver an experience. Whether they tell a story or present puzzles to solve, games need us to be competent and attentive. DOTA 2 takes this to new heights, and presents us with an outlet where the more we pour into it, the more it gives back. Eventually our exhaustion clouds the luster somewhat, but we shouldnt judge the game by our own limitations. Feral, profound, and terrifically challenging, DOTA 2 is competitive team-based gaming in its prime.
Nuck;-;I used to do things before this game. 10/10
Sheezus();-;Good game though,just can't get enough
[]effoR;-;Very good game, especially if you want to experience russian cultural heritage without visiting russia.
Jill.i.am;-;This is best game ever and ever.
wonton2003;-;I know how to abuse people in Russian now
Ra.;-;Posted: 5 Feb @ 5:18pm Updated: 10 Jun @ 2:38pm wow, League of Legands is for kids. A friend told me that the difference between League of Legends and Dota 2 is huge, but the biggest is that if you are a beginner or need help/support, players in dota 2 will help you. Which is not so common in League of Legends. 9/10. Vlv <3 ^ wrote that review when i`ve played dota 2 for like 100-200 hours. The only thing i can say about this game now is:    Much russians  Noob 1kmmr  Such flame
Taylor_1234;-;10/10 Because of this game i now hate most of my friends.
Moondye7;-;10/10 Ruined my Life, would recommend.
Mizu-;-;can i refund this game? ive been play for 3190hrs and i need to uninstall it now...
Clammington;-;This game is the best, I used to be a flithy casual until I picked this up, now I hate my friends, Russians and everyone else who scores lower than I do. Anti-social Simulator at its finest. 10/10
OO;-;I miss my malaysian girl . and she dont have latest picture that i wanted to see :(
Son of Putin;-;Great game! You will speak russian fluently in no time at the price of faith in humanity and your will to live. A must buy for all people who like being screamed at by braindead imbecils that deserve no less than a slow and painfull death. /10
Papa Gandhi;-;Stole a British guy's Triple Kill. He called me a Gandhi loving . And to that I replied: "Peace, Love, and Opium" 10/10
Ace;-;THIS GAME SO FANTASTIC , AWESOME . YOU ALL MUST TRY THIS! This game maybe can make you move from the other game HIGH QUALITY GRAPHIC , HIGH RESOLUTION , really enjoy this game so much you must try it . At least 1 time , like me i try it 1 time then i play night by night , i swear this game i recommended so much! ENJOY IT MY FRIEND
ManBearPig;-;If you want to play a game that makes you wonder if you're actually having fun, then play this. It is more than likely to make you angry than happy
Koyuki;-;I recommend that you play with a full party.
Fluttertard;-;DA KAKOVA HUYA BLYA YA NE MOGU VIIGRAT' BLYAT'. PACIMU PROTIV MENYA 5 POTNUH UEBKOV, KOTORIM NA TI4 PORA, A SO MNOY 4 LUCHSHIH VYPUSKNIKA DETSADA "TORMOZOK" BLYAT' Recommended
RAP GAME BOBBY HILL;-;Enjoy being called racial slurs? Enjoy being screamed at in a language that you don't understand? Take everything all too seriously? Don't have a social life or interested in losing yours? Then this game is for you. 10/10 completely ruined my life.
Tachyon;-;Dota is a really fun game if you have friends to play it with, If you don't, then you're going to have to play it with your enemies, which in this case is most likely going to be anyone who lives in a country where vodka is a major export.
KoliS;-;Complex and tough for newcomers. You are able to make new bonds with diffrent kind of Russians and learn their fantastic language
GC.I am the chozen juan;-;Dear valve, Today i have done something illigal, i have uninstalled and i reported someone because only 1 thing,  U SILENCER, i went to the bathroom for 10 hours crying and i didnt do anything eles that day and just because of this i will vote for dota 10/10 will cri again.  U SILENCER PIECE OF
ITINAGO!;-;Guide to playing Dota 2: Rush pick Pudge (no practice required). Spew Russian insults. Hook a creep. Blame Icefraud. Ask everyone to report Blood Seeker. Cry yourself to sleep. 10/10 would cry myself to sleep again.
GriM;-;A big portion of my nerve system died while palying this game. I no longer can express human emotions. My friends abandoned me as I fail to laugh at their joke or show I feel them when they share some tragic news. I am working on a application that can modify my photo with my emotionless face to a state I am really at. Most likely I will make billions, as Kristen Stewart is already on the project, so are many other famous actors (Mark Wahlberg, Channing Tatum and so on). I would recommend this game, as even if a part of you dies.... New part is always being born! Sometimes new part might require a straight jacket.
DEUSGOSTA;-;Cheaper than a girlfriend Funnier than a girlfriend Easier to manage than a girlfriend i also don't have a girlfriend
Tycoonmon;-;The neverending story. Skills never achieved at best and very hard game to learn. Many mistakes can be reason of losing game and game one of the hardest with opportunities which requires the years of effort and practice. Community full of all type of people from global. Players can report each other and happens often get reported by player because of his own mistakes. Also you must be smart and strong to survive people harassment. Definitely harder than League of Legends, World of Warcraft and many others games. Game play improved by many years of development and will be improved until Dota exist. Community loves professional players and players playing most of time very good at games but hates beginners or people not playing good enough. Better you play, harder you will win games alone. One of the best games for playing with real life friends, solo or with teams.
Creator of Feed;-;you can farm 35min BoTs tinker and still have friends by the end of the game!
bpm;-;this game ruined my life
Fear n Loathing in Las Vegas;-;buy ward plz
Allerianna;-;I hate this game. I mothering HATE this game. Hell, I hate every MOBA there is on this universe so much, it's actually among the FEEEEW games that truly makes me rage. I hate it's players too, you can all go  yourselves, ing . Still, it's a pretty well made game, albeit, like every moba, poorly balanced when it claims to be. Why do I play it? I dunno, I keep coming back to this now and then, just to be paired with noobs, russians,  or rage quitters. This game is like drugs, it s you up, and you can never come back. This game will probably be the reason of heart attacks or strokes for many of you out there. It is good if you are a masochist, a  that can't survive in ranked and goes to casual matches, or if you are good at the game AND have a good team, 'cuz you can't carry 4 noobs around the whole game. I ing dare you, you can't just play this game without raging at least once, right? Oh yeah, by the way, I also got basically forced to play this game back then, and I just kept getting ganked 24/7, I dunno how I managed to play this much. It also has items, and being the hoarder that I am, I just can't stay away from it, it's too late. 10 Rages out of mothering 10.
Mason Jr.;-;I learned how to swear in different languages, am constantly angry whenever i hear spanish or russian being spoken, have learned that there is a whole culture devoted to Dota2 Hentai also boobs 10/10 would get
ROADMAN;-;this is an excellnt game if you want a really dynamic playstyle and a unique item shop which offers much variation. The reason i choose dota over LoL is beacuse of the friendly community and the helpful players i often find in the games who are always willing to help me out if im stuck with what to buy or when they're telling me i shouldn't be initiating teamfights as the courier but whatever this game is great i'd give it a solid 7/10 just beacuse it's such an easy game to pick up after about 100 games you will have the basics mastered like how to last hit the minions and once you have that down you can learn how to kill your own minions to deny gold which is pretty hard and i still can't do it properly. I hope that in the next 20 games or so in can manage to get the basics of jungling down because it's very complicated and i always forget to eat the trees for health LOL. yes would reccomend definately to any new players looking for an online moba game which is really easy to pick up and get going aftert 10 games.
r4ch3l;-;like --> nice dislike --> too many scrubs (pi__y)
RiskySaber Mimi;-;I recommend this game if you have actual friends to play with and have fun playing together or you are a person who doesn't give a dam about anything and just turn on music and plays game without saying anything *like me ;3* ... If you go solo - 1) at start you get flamed all the time, because you are not really skilled ( even when others do x10 times worst ) 2) when you get good, you start to flame newbie players, because they aren't skilled and its because you get treated like that when you started, and its a high possibility that it will be seen in your actual life now or later on 3) You can get pretty fast addicted to this game * you can see in other reviews, or just look at there played time* which may make you un-social person ( if you weren't before ) 4) Tons of russians, even if you select other regions, you still gonna get them ....... If you are person like in first sentence or don't care anything what came after *If you go solo*, they you may like this game
#NTC Games Store | Bundle Wallet;-;this is awesome.. but sometimes we got server problem.. but at least this greatest game i ever played
thehappydinosower;-;I missed by a pixel and everyone hated me 10/10
DiPPeR;-;I hate this game so much. It consumes all of your time and you get nothing from it. Because of this game i now hate russians, south americans and every other ing person on this planet. 0/10
[AJSA] Lego;-;Too many russians.
EvO;-;It's all Dororo's and Lachesis's fault, he's the one that made me come back and play.
That's Fascinating;-;I don't get it. League of Legends I eventually got but this... this is a game with way too many mechanics and with no idea how to use them all. There is just too much  to think about in an average game, too much to juggle, to much to much TO. MUCH. Cut out the stuff that isn't mission critical to the actual experience and the clash of skills between two sides and you would get League though, so I suppose there is a place for this. Also, Valve is a much better dev team than Riot is, hands down, its just a shame that the games they own aren't reversed.
SmartHeart;-;Ruined my life :( 10/10
Veni, Vidi, Vici;-;Ever wondered what  and bylat meant? Get this game.
Regen;-;10/10 I love practicing racial slurs and constantly be reminded why I really don't like a particular group of people on the internet.
Pumpy;-;I played over 3000+ hours of Dota 2 as of right now. While playing this game I have been called the worst profanities that one could imagine, I have been tormented by loss and betrayal, I have dealt with the worst human beings this world has to offer, I have cried, suffered and lost my sanity at the hands of this game and yet I still keep playing... I definitely recommend :3
Sunbellow;-;My least played heroes are some popular badass carries cause no one buys wards and couriers on my team and I have to play support all the time. Wards placing and couriers buying simulator.10/10 Normally people don't speak English on US server while I'm not even a native English speaker and I speak English. Multi-languages bad words learning tools.10/10 The most words you will hear from your teammates are not good try or nice play but OMG THAT XXXXX IS A ING NOOB. REPORT HIM AND FF PLZ Learning the attitude to your teammates like a real loser tool. 10/10 Conclusion: Find 4 nice teammates in order to group up and shout at each other or just play bots game and do kill secure with Dagon while reading others typing really? all the time. And yes, dota2 is not a MOBA game. Dota2 is a hero sets and unusual couriers simulation, which is 10/10 also.
Lole;-;Bye bye life...Hello Source 2 <333
A.T;-;The greatest MOBA of them all. ..but I furiously hate these kind of ing  games,  them so bad, and may it die horribly. But if you get past that, 10/10.
Waifu  Laifu;-;If you enjoy dedicating your life to this game while at the same time ignoring your family, friends, and any sort of social interaction, then you will certainly enjoy fighting with your teammates over who will support or who will buy courier. By playing this glorious game you will also learn how to speak several languages as for some reason russians and mexicans like to join the US East and West servers when they have servers in their own country. Im sure you are already sold by this point, but just to add on one more thing about this game is that you will also learn how seriously people take this game and realize truly how terrible you are at this game because you are a noob with less than 3,000 hours on a game.
OttoVeimar;-;I am done with this .
Nitrous;-;It's a game.
SaberTooth(AFK!);-;Best MOBA I've ever come across and trust me on this one guys LOL is nothing as compared to DotA or Dota 2 . The voice acting is over thr top and is quite hillarious at time and though being a MOBA it looks beautifull and once u get a hang of it , it becomes quite addictive
[AHU] Joviz (aka Santana);-;10/10 has ruined my life. great for rage quitting and getting  off at your friends. woo
Fredda;-;This game taught me about the diversity of cultures that our small little corner of the universe offers. Then it taught me to hate them all.
Chrome;-;Side effects include: -Hatred of other humans -Lack of trust in others -Carpal Tunnel -Improved hand eye coordination -A large ego -Weight gain -Weight loss -Confidence -Despression -Extreme Racism -EXTREME RACISM -Increased strategic thinking capabilities -Mushy-brain syndrome -Subconsciously learning a new language -Subconsciously learning to hate the culture of said language -Literally every ailment that is not a transmitable disease 9/10 Doctors accepted this game on their recommendation list, but the tenth was afk
Grizzt;-;It's like roulette; fun until it turns into Russian.
psych0tic;-;Causes anxiety problems, low self esteem, Tourette's syndrome, mood swings, Bipolar disorder, breakdown of relationships, raging erections, racism. Would definitely recommend.
Sentimental Oriental;-;In Dota 2, Not many people speak your language. Not many people play well. Not many people talk nicely. Not many people work as a team. But if you find people that do... You'll have the most fun you've ever had.
Kyubashi;-;And you thought real life was a struggle.
ephir;-;I only played a little but it was fun.
Captain Obvious;-;Things I gave to DotA: 1. Money 2. Time 3. Love Things DotA gave me: 1. Arthritis 2. Carpal tunnel syndrome 3, Hatred of Russians, Mexicans, Spanish, Finnish, and Russians 4. Broken keyboard 5. Broken mouse 6. 9/10 ready 7. Server crashes 8. 4 stacks of Russians in EUW servers on English prefrence settings 9. Ranked matches 10. Free to play but Pay to win games (I.E. - Foreseer's contract, New Bloom 2015) 11. "It's in the bag" spam (especially Skywrath) 12. Multilingual cursing - I guess this is a good thing? 13. Split second math - Reliable/Unreliable gold and gold loss on death vs. Buyback availability - This is good too Essentially - DotA is a greedy woman, but I love her all the same. 11 / 10 would play again
HekaDooM;-;"THE PUB SUPPORT" "Where are wards?" The pub Carry demanded. "I placed them and they were countered" the Support began, "I am trying to juggle giving you complete lane farm, protecting you and harrassing the enemy while saving to buy more, also possibly sentries to remove their-" "UP COUR PLS" the mid hero politely added. "Give Savle" The Carry demanded. "Certainly." replies the support, using the salve on the Carry who subsequently ran headlong into an enemy creepwave. "So where is mek?" the Carry said, after he was ganked due to overextending. The Support died saving him and was treated to a rather enthusiastic series of map pings on his corpse. "Again, having not even enough to buy boots as well as wards, I don't think a 7 minute Mek is viable." The Support replies. "Haha look your level, so low, noob" the Carry retorted. "U have no item xaxa". "Well, jungle gold and experience through stacking and pulling with blocked camps is nowhere near as much as on lane which I attempted to give you, the carry, the priority over." The Carry is subsequently ganked again at the enemy tower, oblivious to the enemy tp that the Support moved away from. "Report Support, usless" The carry cried in allchat, in between mentioning various aspects of the Support's Mother's anatomy. "Instead of reporting and acting like that, why don't you try supporting for randoms sometime instead of instapicking a carry?" the Support asked, as he watched the Carry return to afk-lasthitting lane creeps. "HAH, support is for noskill noobs like you!"
flanadlivv;-;One day, a wise man intoduce me into this game. "it shall protect your virginity, my lad" he said.
Dmejd;-;Played a match and everyone stole my kills and farm 10/1
DansGame;-;There I was, ready for a classic game of late night dota with renowned hustler Joshua Marc Baillie, harkening back to our good old days - a well spent youth of boisterous cheer and plays 'a plenty. Then our world was sh*t upon by the powers that be; Gaben and Icefraud, both nigh on untouchable behind their shroud of lies and broken promises. We queued, ready for the action, the thrill, the skill, to survive and thrive in a high skilled scenario we'd spent over a thousand hours training for. This, this was our moment. We chose our heroes, heroes we have always enjoyed playing, heroes that happen to be OP this patch. Our spirits were higher than Snoop Dogg in a forest fire. We hit 'Play'. I entered the game... Josh did not. My brother-in-arms had fallen, nay, been tripped at the first hurdle! Gaben would simply not allow him access. His dota would restart and he'd spam the play button again and again but to no avail. This sordid process went on for 5 minutes. 5 minutes I will never forget. The worst 5 minutes of my life. Eventually Josh gave up, uninstalled and played Poker Night. And in that moment I remembered the hundreds of pounds I have poured into Valve. The armory of virtual hats I have treasured and loathed in the pursuit of cosmetic gratification. And a great rage swelled within me. A rage that threatened to burst upon volvo customer support in a dire tide of expletives and jokes about HL3. But I contained this anger, because I still had a game to win in honour of my betrayed comrade. I will not forget the injustices I have seen this day, and the hats might find themselves getting rather short of company in the months to come... #justice4josh #pray4josh #Ti4godssake #gameisbroken #biginternetwords #watchyourselves #Kappa
Flip;-;This is the worst game I've ever played. Please send help.
very big grab;-;not even once
PhoeniX^;-;Great MOBA game but match time is too long Worst part of the game '' Russians '' (Language sucks) But better than children's game such as League of Legends
MareleAlb;-;A team game were over 90% of people dont want to cooperate, play as a team, talk, plan, do strats and so on. Game looks good at first, but at the end of the day, its just a horrible online experience. If you have a 5 man stack, with good game knowledge, good coordination, yeah matches can be decent (but i recommend setting up "inhouse matches" with another 5 man stack!!). If you dont have a 5 man stack, its a pub train all day (or just plain bad/noobish). You win 50-5, then you lose 45-7, then you win 41-17, then you lose 60-28 and so on. Its all about the "lucky roll of the dice" named matchmaking. Most players that play this game have lvl 0-1 accounts, with only dota or other free to play games. So dont think if you report them, they care. They just make another account to troll, feed or w/e. Also, alot of people play this game drunk, stoned, or just very tired. That can be ok i guess in a 1v1 game, or a 2v2 with one of their buddies. But in a 5v5 team game, its not nice. They just ruin the experience for alot of other people. Most people use their own language. Chatting or writing. Teamspeak or just skype is not on their menu. So most russians will speak russian, most turks will speak turkish and so on. There is no region lock. Again, for a 1v1 game, maybe that could work. But for a game like dota, having a player from Australia or Peru joining the Euro server with 300-400 ping is not cool. And alot of people just check more servers for faster queue times and also check more languages. So if you check EU West or US East, and expect all people to have good pings and speak english, think again :)). At least some of the dota 2 players, played wc3 or dota 1, dont even get me started with the other mobas... Its the only genre that makes me feel ive wasted my time in most cases when i play the game. Bonus: People either flame/curse etc, or just dont know what the hell they are doing. In most cases both ^_^ So, i recommend using your free time / gaming time, playing other games. And stay away from all free to play team games / MMO's. They are a magnet for trolls, kids or just noobs that dont care. And you know why? Bcuz they can make 1000 accounts... So if they get banned or their ranking has gone down, its no problem, new acc on the way. Its kinda sad, game could have been fun. But its not. And thigs will never change bcuz of all the reasons ive stated above. The game at its core is good, but the overall online experience is bad. Cant recommend this for a new player, a true newbie. Cant recommend this either for an old skool RTS player. These guys online dont even look at the minimap!! So most of the time the games/matches wont be good and fun. Even most of the wins are fun just bcuz you had fun / a good talk or w/e, with a real life friend that you had on skype, or a gaming friend that you laned with, not bcuz of the dota match tbh. So just go and drink beer with that mate, or just play other games with him/them. With this concept of f2p and team gameplay, i cant see valve fixing this, so i cant see a reason to recommend this. Sure you can get random good matches, but after all my experience playing this, i think you are better off without this game / genre completely. Peace!
gaucho marx;-;If you want to spend 2,000 hours damaging your mental health with stress, rage and feelings of inadequacy, then this is the game for you.
I'M THE DOCTOR;-;this game makes my brother extremly horney and jerks it to pudge
Jarmix;-;If you are a nudist Russian than 10?10 but if you are a half decent person then leave now and forever hold you peace.
Johnny Destiny;-;>Dude wanna play this? >%username% invited you to play >15 yo 420noscopeweed420killer invited you to waste your life time with him in this stupid  game Like rly guys, suck a d*** Like rly do I look like I have nothing to do except playing this  k? I actually have a life Ok I don't have a life :(((( But man even in this state I am now, I wouldn't play it Like rly Just get up, right now. Go near mirror and look at yourself. Is this rly bad? Was it some deep and horrible thing you experienced in childhood that made you mental cripple, or it's like just some disfunction in your brain that makes you rtarded? Pls go think about your life, if you played this  more than 1 hour you have something to think about, man
KaZe~;-;You can't call yourself 'gamer' if you've never played this game, seriously!
Give Me Reddit Gold PLz;-;Although Moba communities in general suck complete donkey chode this one sucks a chode of 4 inches in cirumfrence which by my standards is A+.
Sur;-;easiest game of my life
banksby;-;One of the worst games I've ever played, valve doesnt know how to play it so they recommend  items on a lot of heroes which ends up screwing me because I only get people who have terminal autism on my team and have to be plugged into a machine to ing breathe and always build  items like BFury on Gondar . Game only gets you mad it's only fun if you're a  who 5 stacks all your games and pick heroes iceFRAUD decided to make OP like ing Drow and you win all game but you're still a no life  2/10 better stiking to tic tac toe with your grandma if you want to have fun because otherwise have fun getting brazillians and russians with the IQ of a rock queuing with you and you cant win because it's 1v9 and no hero can take that on unless the enemy literally takes there hands off the keyboard and mouse and just go read a book because reading a book is more productive than playing this   game by the way if you suck your friends will make you play the support  every time and that is literally the worst role because all you do is get ed at because your carry cant carry because he has downs so much he's in ing china and all you do is get insta gibbed every fight because enemy is guaranteed to have a sven/drow/magnus/bounty hunter on the enemy team and are too poor to get any sort of item other than wards which just get countered immediately overall this game just makes you angry and its just like stealing a star from someone in mario party your friends will just whine and you'll get angry at them and then remove them over this  game because of skill difference tldr  you this game sucks you should probably get Secret of the Magic Crystals instead
DustyBuns;-;Dota.... Dota has its times where you play with your friends with a max team of 5... However things happe. When alone you are swarmed with Asians, Mexicans, Russians , and maybe even aliens who would know. Also Aliens will watch and learn about the people in this world by peoples name calling and yelling. You will be screamed at by other languages and dont know what is going on. Then you will be in games with blamers that blame everything on you. Filled with racism and Yelling 10/10
foxx.assassin;-;cool game:D
Crystal Maiden;-;At this very moment, there are twelve million brazillians pumping light in and out of a 360 degree notion of Brazillian servers. Not easy. At this very moment, a dozen long islanders are stranded on a server somewhere in australia. Not easy. At this very moment, the Puervians are probably hurtling out of control, plummeting toward a world shatter collision - as simulatiniously predicted by three equally archaic culture who had barely installed DOTA. Somewhere, a simple Russian plants seeds into his veins, in hopes that he will become Nature's Prophet. And here we stand, the combined energy of our four magnificent teammates, irrocably focused on that one guy who kind of lost his lane. DOTA isn't easy. Not easy at all. Would not reccomend this game
oi m8;-;Best Russian learning device. ! BLYAT! UP COURIER FAKING ! REPORT THIS  PLS! (the most common things you will see in the game)
Onix1;-;A maelstrom of anger, fear, disillusionment and sheer ecstasy, Dota 2 is all these things and more. Youll learn to hate your friends and love random strangers during the forty five minutes an average match takes. In that short amount of time, grudges will be born, heroes will rise and poor plays will be vilified like a G R R Martin epic. And yet for all its emotional drama, both the highs and the lows, youll still yearn for more. Just learning to play is an adventure into masochism. Everyone begins as a dreaded n00b, unable to contribute anything but gold and XP to the opposing team. A few weeks later, and theyll have learned a few tricks: where to place wards, how to turn off auto attack in the options and crucially, the ability to take abuse on the chin without rage quitting. Give it a few months and theyll be rolling with the regulars. Double stacking, recrowing and GGWP will become part of their vernacular. Immunity to the insults will be delivered to them upon chins which have since grown thick with stubble and caloused skin. They'll have succesfully joined an inclusive club whose members include the heroes of the world's burgeoning e-sports scene. Consider the football metaphor, pub matches are like a kick about down the local park using the same boots, strips and footballs Rooney, Messi and Neymar use in packed stadiums full of shouting people. If all of the above sounds a bit much, ask yourself, whats the point of playing if you dont feel something in the end? Dota 2 delivers passion and fury in spades, and like all great games, its hidden depths forever tease like sirens upon the rocks, always ready to punish an overblown sense of ego. Just dont look at the item store; your partner/parents/common sense will never understand why you spent $35 on some virtual eye candy for your favourite hero
Humanista Secular Ateu.;-;As of now, middle of june 2014 approaches, the fourth biggest DotA 2 tournament is being warmed up as 16 teams compete for the prize of 10 MILLION US DOLLARS (U$10.000.000,00) That is simply ab-fu.cking-surd. The tournament name is: THE INTERNATIONAL . 1st - 2011, total prize for the winners was U$ 1.600.000,00 (1st - 1mi, 2nd - 250k, 3rd - 150k and up to 8th dividing 200k) 2nd - 2012, total prize for the winners was U$ 1.600.000,00 (1st - 1mi, 2nd - 250k, 3rd - 150k and up to 8th dividing 200k) 3rd - 2013, total prize for the winners was U$ 2.874.381,00 (1st - 1.4mi, 2nd - 632k, 3rd 287k and up to 8th dividing 514k) 4rd - 2014, total prize pool is close to U$ 10.000.000,00. Oh, about the game... revamped the classical moba from warcraft 3. Same gameplay minus bugs because of the engine, voice acting, particles all around, cosmetic items so you can be fancy as , acid community but some fun can be achieved though. This game is HARD, in this game, there must be a victor and there must be a loser. In today's America WORLD, no child ever loses. There are no losers anymore. Everyone's a winner. No matter what the game or sport or competition, everybody wins. Everybody wins, everybody gets a trophy, no one is a loser. No child these days ever gets to hear those all-important, character building words: "You lost, Bobby!" "You lost, you're a loser, Bobby!" They miss out on that. You know what they tell a kid who lost these days? "You were the last winner." A lot of these kids never get to hear the truth about themselves until they're in their twenties. When their boss calls them in and says "Bobby, clean the  out of your desk and get the  out of here, you're a loser." Of course Bobby's parents can't understand why he can't hold a job, in school he was always on the honor roll. Well what they don't understand of course is that in today' schools everyone is on the honor roll, everyone is on the honor roll because in order to be on the honor roll all you really need to do is to maintain a body temperature roughly in the 90F (32C) So be ready to face some insults, hateful gamers with absolutely no empaty for your learning cause. You will begin to draw pleasure as you learn the game and all your team relies on you to win the game, those are the moments where skill and happiness are at your side, while agony and pain are in the other side.
hydracrossthedark;-;Learn English, Portuguese and Spanish in an illiterate/dyslexic way in just 1 game. Very nasty place, full of enemies
Johann;-;THIS GAME IS CANCER YOU CAN'T HAVE FUN WITH DOTA 2 DONT PLAY THIS
mm ze;-;I used to play this game with kind of delight. But it was a long time ago when everything started. You know- you came from school to play some good games, start picking and ... OH MY GOOOD! There are no supports and whole your team is speaking some kind of magic language, that you can heard only in fairytales. Yea I am talking about azbuka. And you know, doesen't matter if you checked before finding the game that you wanna play with english speaking people, oh no! It really doesen't matter if you checked EU or NA region, or no... They are everywhere you watch, even in your bed. There is aboelly no hope to get anything normall from them. You can just enjoy their mighty "" words or glorious "blyat" words for whole game long in your chat. Theese gyus are so good that thay can stay whole game in you base, just sitting their  and spamming voice chat with that two words. Eventually if you are playing solo and they come as four or three stack, you can next game enjoy your low prio or mute, because of nice reports they made. And yea, I almost forgot about MatchMaking- you can just hope that you will not play with someone who has plyed 4000 hours when you have played like 90 hours. MM here is kind a surprise what you get. But remember you will never play against someone who has 10 hours when you have 1000 not really. Thats the power of good matchmaking, or not?
doot doot;-;Dota 2 is a first person MMO RPG survival horror game developed by EA and EA only where you have to fight to survive in the drunken robot zombie apocalypse with nothing but your bare feet, as your hands are too pre-occupied taking off your panties in excitement for this sick filth. The main protagonist is you, Jakob. You are a lone survivor and every other player in the entire damn universe is an enemy. Jakob's model really matches his personality. A hipster, emo, gothic sex-driven male paired with the voice acting of Morgan Freeman really make this character pop out and helps make him really relatable. The storyline is great. I love how the developers have a completely separate "prologue" chapter for the story, explaining how such an apocalypse could have ever risen from the deep depths of hell (that's not a spoiler as you see that in the first 15 minutes of the game). You start out in the middle of ... er, Russia, spending time with your beloved family, and find out you are really, REALLY attracted to your cousin. You take her out to "show her the world" when suddenly a crack opens from the ground beneath you. Your cousin falls into the crevice. You are devastated. You try to rush home, but then all of a sudden, you hear a big ... er, plop. You look behind you, and there are robot zombies, all drinking vodka. You then turn all around and find yourself surrounded. And I'll stop there, otherwise I may end up spoiling the prologue! The PvP in this game is SPOT ON. It's like the developers KNOW that you're the main character and give you the most overpowered arsenal right from the get-go! It's brilliant, need I say more? Fine, I shall! Just like the amazingness that was Dungeon Keeper Mobile, you too can attain the most powerful arsenal by slamming your wallet into EA's pockets! It's fantastic! The best part too? It's --free.     ,    ,   . Um, what I meant to say was "It doesn't even cost a dime!" Overall I would say this game is a 10/10, a must-have game. EA has really shown how to create such a game. I'm just waiting on the DLC to come out later since, surprisingly, there was no day-one DLC.
#TRYHARD;-;lovely game. It's an amazing game - technically outstanding, showing all of Valve's usual polish and attention to detail, especially in the all-important multiplayer aspects. The continual balance tweaks and new heroes combined with the vast amount of content in the game offer countless hours of enjoyment. It's hard to master but good wins with your teammates are incredibly satisfying. It took me a long time to warm up to, but I'm helplessly addicted and every day look forward to getting home to fire this up with my friends. If you can spare the time - play it.
MiePangsit;-;very addict games!
TARS;-;A game that isn't for the faint of heart. While not matching the level of gore or horror in other game, Dota 2 and other MOBA's will get your heart and blood pumping like no other games. Its highly competetive nature is both its best and worst feature though as people sometimes can't get over the fact they just got owned by another player or are about as graceful as a dancing hippo when they own another player. I'm not entirely bothered either way, this is a great game with insanly compelling mechanics. At the low low price of nothing, this is a must try. A more detailed look at Dota 2, its history and its significance can be found in my review of it on my blog: http://mouseandcontroller.blogspot.com/2013/08/dota-2.html.
Keksimus Maximus;-;Heed these words, for although it is too late for me it may not be too late for you. This game is like heroin. I want to stop so badly but I just can't. The community is awful and the matchmaking makes me want to cry, but still, I cannot stop. Get out while you can...
Anjakie <3 <3;-;I liked in dota 2 are the items you are earning everytime you play or everytime you trade with people. Rather that playing dota 1 you dont even have a earnings there.
Glete;-;its ok
Entsha;-;Opened game. Found Match. Chose random. Got Invoker. Told to go mid. Went Midlane. Told to uninstall. Uninstalled.
Heavenstamp;-;this is not just a game, this is a masterpiece, somewhat reminds me of wheel, television, toilet and another human great inventions...
HellioN;-;this game is full of noobs , so you can easily start playing it and enjoy because you will be also noob
normie;-;home of the casual scum
Chair!;-;this game makes me want to eat ice cream
Azzarona;-;Great RTS. If your a fan of League of Legends you'll be addicted to this game. Plus it's free, so why not?
Puppybull;-;If you are looking for an easy way to get frustrated FAST, or perhaps some way to eliminate the fun from your life, THIS IS JUST THE GAME FOR YOU!!!1one In fact, get a friend or two to join you! Soon, they will be your friends no longer ! In all honesty though, with a beautiful community and  gameplay mechanics, if you don't play this to meet new amusing people then you just aren't playing it right. Download and install this Free To Play game provided by Valve, creator of the Steam Community Market. I promise you, there will be no tears, only dreams now!
Dr. Dick Pebis;-;I once got the Jax ult to toally frag Pudge when he was trying to heal Nasus!
Catapilla;-;Note that this game needs brain to be played. If you lack it, then go for other MOBAs. There are plenty of them.
Mauii;-;if you're looking for a good free-to-play competitive coop game. then this one is for you. the game requires players to have good communication skills to plan and execute a game-winning strategy. and you will sure have fun with the amazingly detailed graphics. not to mention the awesome cosmetics.
Navillus;-;Picked a hero that can cast a Black Hole. Didn't suck in the whole entire map. 2/10 would not play again.
Loli P E N I S;-;This game will allow you to expand your vocabulary and learn other languages while playing. Meet people from all around the third world and learn their fantastic languages as you jolly communicate with them. You'll also find the best matchmaking system ever known to man, that puts you with EVENLY SKILLED PLAYERS no matter what, and a report system that will punish toxic players that trash talk or feed, 10000% guaranteed. In this long escalation of skills you'll find better players as you improve. It's one game you'll never want to stop playing, teamwork, communication and frinedliness are in the order of the day. Greatly recommended to anyone that enjoys teamwork and competitive teamwork oriented games.
Young Scientist;-;If you hold interest in PvP games like League of Legends or HoN -This game would be the best thing ever for you! However, unlike the basic knowledge that you require to play in LoL and HoN, this is more like an expert mode game. You need to practice and know a lot in order to be good in the matches and be respectable in the community. Dota2 has nice graphics, if you have played Dota in 'The Warcraft III - The Frozen Throne', you will absolutely love it. Nice details of the models of the heroes, nice animations and the voices of heroes are nicely done by expert professionals. I've been playing this game for 2 years, I've played LoL, HoN, Starcraft, Warcraft III, Torchlight II and many similar games. My Facebook Page: www.facebook.com/youngscientist This is one of the biggest growing RPG-MOBA in the gaming industry. The Dota2 community have some issues, people are not very likely to be friendly. The people in Dota2 are thirsty to play with and against skilled players -even if they are not one of them. There are updates, where bugs and glitches with items,heroes,models,voices etc are fixed. If you are looking something just for time pass, i would not recommend this for you then. If only you are willing to pay off some loads of time and are willing to learn and stay in the Dota2-community for a long time, only then thy shall be recommended to play it! Once you get the hang of it, it's incredibly addicting, fun and massive time-killer! Good luck!
anlide;-;Worst game evar, ruined my life
NeverMinD;-;''Best strategy''
Xyz;-;Pinoy everywhere
1 Malaysia Develoment Berhad;-;This game is very good for train our teamwork with mates, but individual skills is very important especially when you are deal with mid. Other things i can say this game is the next level of business and investment! but its all on your own risk
Large Amount of Jet Fuel;-;I feel my life slip away, fleeting with every hour I play. I can't stop, it is too much. When was the last time I saw the sun? I cannot remember, likley years ago. It's a trap, sucks you in and won't let go. I can't rightly remember what my life was like before Dota, its a faint a vauge blur. I seem to remember human interaction, friends, happiness... It was so long ago now, yet I yearn to go back. Sadly, there is no going back, not now. I'm in too deep, I've strayed too far, down the path to Dota I go. What matters now? No, it is not joy, though I wish it was. No, no, no, what matters now is MMR, a seemingly meaningless number with a grasp tighter than any drug. My life is in shambles, I wish to escape, it is encompassing me, it has consu- Oh hey, "Match is Ready"!
Sad Leonardo;-;Why am i still playing? I don't know, it sucks
forbags;-;Played game, picked support got one shot walked to lane, got one shot, cycle continued of me getting one shot until my team carried me to victory. Was told to uinstall, happily uninstalled, would not recommend.
Dendi;-;DOTA 2 is great Fair game, Not a Pay-To-Win! game... Mostly you just need to be good and Cooperative :) Luck is most of the time there... You need to have patience and Good plan to win. Good Sets of heroes To Strength,Intellegence and Agility. And you'll find yourself awake 5:00 in the morning after playing in a good game with good players... The game is so Awesome! i'll give it 10/10 Sohinki Thumbs up! :D
XirofomPoila;-;greatest stategy game
vfonirek;-;WAR ALL THE TIME AND GOT RAMPAGE AHAHAHA
StallioN;-;Played Dota 1 tryiong Dota 2. Its Amazing
Ghostie;-;In this game you can play as a guy who beats up mages as a guy who beats up invisible people as a guy who doesn't beat up anyone because he's just an energy ball and get angry because there's only russians and chileans and the mother ers just ruin everything and you want to be a good player once in your life but you can't BECAUSE JUAN STOLE YOUR FARMING WITHOUT ANY SHAME WHEN YOU NEEDED MONEY THEN YOU COMPLAIN AND HE SAYS "asco" AND QUITS THEN YOU CRY AND TRY TO FIND ANOTHER MATCH JUST TO FIND JUAN AGAIN OR PACO ALWAYS FREAKING PACO
Queen of Valgora;-;cool game, better than that lol  :)))
Pelican;-;this game is great because it makes you hate everything
the jngla;-;Throughout your time in Dota 2, you will hate your teammates, be hated by your teammates, ruin your friendships, waste countless hours, get reported for no missing, lose game after game, say "volvo pls fix", encounter the level 11 hump, question reality and manage catch every single one of Mirana's sacred arrows. But it's pretty fun so you should play Dota.
w;-;Learn russian and many other languages while getting  off at a virgin assassin for FREE!!
muniz;-;Don't play a game with such a full of hatred, complainful and dull community. Don't encourage games that are filled with 'people' like this.
nekhe;-;ruined my life
homicide hare;-;take a virtual tour of other countries' military power, namely brazil and russia
Th3Shad0w;-;Best game! You must play it :)
Dwarf Princess II;-;You pick only US East server? doesn't matter, DOTA match making will always match you with russians and latinos on your team, so your team will be ethnically balanced, promoting love and tolerance between people from different countries and places, making the dota community an understanding place for everyone from all sides of the world, communication barriers are nonexistent in this game, you will never feel discriminated by other and your team mates will be always supportive, this is just the perfect environment for making friends. 10/10 this game changed my life.
Darude - King of Hyrule;-;DotA = Waaaay better than LoL
Na' Vi Extreme;-;"I dont like MOBAs" this was my very first reaction when a buddy of mine was trying to convince me to play Dota2. At that moment I didn't want to but for the sake of friendship, I decided to give it a shot. At first, the game seemed hella confusing. The only thing I liked back then was the Main Menu music and how ironic the menu and heroes looked :P We played it through and through and ultimately there came a time when the confusion came to an end and that's when the addiction started. As of the game, it's a Strategy based MOBA game. Difficult to understand all at once but easy when broken into segments. You have to choose a hero from a pool of 100+ heroes. Each and every Hero is Unique in their own way, having different abilities/powers etc. Your main goal is to destroy the Opposition's Home Base Building "Ancient" in order to secure win. It sounds easy but  always hits the fan xD. You are given a shop, from where you can purchase items to upgrade your hero's abilities and attributes. My experience with this game sucked at the start, but turned opposite as of now. The Competetion is real hard. There's also a Leveling system for the Casual record along with a ranking system for competetive mode(Ranked Match) called "MMR" or Match Making Rating. Just like Counter Strike Global Offensive, there's a match making system, which helps each and every player of similar skillz to compete with each other. So, I'd say to download this game asap because I already regret for not playing it from the start :P Remember, I was one of those who said "Dota sucks" and now it's an integral part of my life. Above all, there's something calm about this game unlike CSGO xD It's always fun to play. Few kids.
Lium;-;I wank over hentai of this game
Petyr Baelish;-;Screamed at by foriegners simulator 2015 /10
evil;-;I used to have a life..
Panda #DubNation;-;Im broke and Im not doing my school work but at least I got a streak on my Sand King so... 10/10
Skz;-;SO THERE I WAS BEING GABEN WHEN MY DOTA 2 HEAD DEVELOPERS CAME IN AND WERE LIKE "WE NEED TO DO MORE THAN ADD CHESTS AND  COSMETICS EVERY ING PATCH" AND I WAS LIKE " YOU" SO THEY WERE LIKE "WHAT ABOUT REGION LOCKING THE RUSSIANS AND BRAZILIANS ?" AND I WAS LIKE " YOU" AND I MADE LOTS AND LOTS OF MONEY I LOVE MY LIFE
FungineeR;-;This game will leave you with no friends and braindead.
Kinzu;-;This is the Best Game that i ever played.
[HAVX];-;Well there is no need to tell you much about this game. It's just so popular. Many people consider this game as a piece of artwork. True is that it needs a lot of skills to be good in it. To be honest it's just not my type of game, anyway I recommend to try ;)
noscopewagon;-;Well, I played Dota 2 just 30 Minutes ( 1 Match ), and here's what I think about that Game. Even when people Think or Say that people in Dota aren't Friendly, they're probably wrong, I won't decline the Fact that there are some of them, but Angry Gamers are in every game possible, y' know? Even when I've played with a "plague" of Dota 2 and CS:GO - Russians, I've heard 5-6 Swears and mostly because they were amused. About the Game itself. Gameplay may seem a Bit hard for the First time, but after you Play Tutorial + Some Matches, you'll get familiar with it. It's quite fun and Teamwork-ish, nothing here is Possible without Teamwork ( and Creeps ). Plus, it's this kind of a Games, where you have to be Sliced in a Half, and Complete some Objectives while Farming for Some EXP and Gold. The Match is getting REAL somewhere around 17 Minute of a game, Both teams got Heroes with Special Attacks, new Items, more Creeps. That;s where it starts. When you Bash through a Horde of Creeps and Kill a Sniper who was About to use a Shrapnel, then attack Creeps from Behind and you Push through Towers and even More Creeps with your Teammates. Sadly, but this Game was so Negatively Reviewed for most of the Time, but, everybody has an Opinion, right? Try it out by yourself, you'll Like it.
Triple F - Feline Force Feeder;-;Playing DotA 2 is like playing Monopoly with my girlfriend. Whenever I make a good move, she talks  on me. Whenever she makes a good move, she trash talks me how bad I am. When I win, it's because (insert random reason) affects her play. When I lose, it's because I can't play the game properly. Also, we both have a lot of russian co workers. Recomended for people with masochistic tendencies, russians and/or people with 4 friends who don't know how to teamplay.
SPD.Pink Ranger;-;Pros : 1) Free 2) most played game on steam guarantees you can play this game 24X7, when the world is asleep, dota players are raging at their noob teammates, or being a noob themselves 3) low system requirements means your 3rd world friend with a  pc/laptop would be able to play the game Cons: 1) Most toxic community of any game, you know you are doing well in the game as a noob if you arent asked to uninstall the game 2) selfish players that take heros that make no sense considering the enemy draft. 5 carry teams or 5 support teams are not too uncommon 3) you are guaranteed to rage at the same noobs that you were when you start getting good at the game. not recommended for heart patients or pregnant woman.
Happymeal;-;It's worth maybe somewhere between 1000 - 1500 hours, but once you become fairly decent at the game, you realize there's not much to it. it's neither complicated nor possesses too much variety. The most fun portion of this game is irking the other players. Actually, it also becomes fairly monotonous as you find players who don't even know what last hitting is despite attempting to employ advanced tactics. However, the game ios intrinsically bad, not in result of the players. Like I said, once you get somewhere between 1000 - 1500 hours of playing every character, it becomes boring. They end up playing too much like one another. I never feel a difference between playing lion, lina, vengeful, Cm, etc. as support. Sure, the abilities vary, but the use of those abilities don't. You're still going to stun when you need to, you're going to harass when you need to, etc. It's all the same. Unfortunately a majority of people I've met who are actually social are the ones whom I've seen play DOTA frequently.
adcaspdouwoieuqeiaskldjslkdjadas;-;Addictive game.
Coookie shall return!!!;-;Dota2 often claimed to be the hardest MOBA there is and that is because the game is very complex, which is why there is a ~10 hour tutorial trying to breakdown the game mechanics into little pieces and if you want to get faster and easier into it you can't avoid watching videos for more tips'n'tricks, which makes this game very time consuming, not to mention that an average game is between 30 and 50 minutes long. However when you dig yourself through the wall of Dota2 and got to the point, where you start understanding what you are doing wrong. Then the game gets very rewarding and fun. Playing Dota2 is a combination of strategy - which hero to pick, where to lane, what items to buy and satisfying combat, one hero usually has 4 abilities and one of them being there ultimate ability, which is the hero's strongest ability, for newbies, there are a lot of hero's with passives and few abilities. Something, which I don't usually mention in reviews, is the voice acting, this game, although it has 108 different characters, has really good voice acting for every single hero. Although the game is getting to get a bit older now, its graphics are definetly up to date and personally I really like the water, it looks really good. Overall if have a lot of spare time and for a very strategic in-depth game go for it! It is free and you have excess to all heroes from Level 0 on. This game gets a 'G' for Good(A>G>O)
[MNI] Ch[]i | mNNNNN;-;Russians. Russians everywhere.
potaetosak;-;get ready to get bullied. hard.
RussianDoge;-;If dota 2 was a giant weiner id let it bend me over and F me hard.
Lucy Heartfilia;-;Carefull Russian Everywhere Carefull Pinoy Everywhere Carefull Noob Everywhere Carefull Scamer Everywhere Carefull Rage Everywhere Carefull Low Priority Everywhere 10/10 Would Care Again.
MaksWCK;-;Perfect sequel to first and best MOBA game there is. DOTA2 taught me a lot about how to deal with angry russian children! Heres a simple guide: -Try to be polite and ask how the 4th grade is going - Mention homework, but don't push it - Encorage them to tell you more, describe how interesting they are - Ask them if their parent are siblings and compliment the offspring 10/10 dota players dating my mother in a respectfull, mature way
Dan;-;+f***ed my life +f***ed my mother +f***ed my PC -f2p 9.9/10
HAHAHA ZIP ZAP;-;i have no life after playing this game please help me
CO2;-;I really like this game!
Cloaked;-;Alcohol not only gives you the ability to talk to girls but it also gives you the ability to write reviews so this is my review while drunk. I like this game because yes.
Maplesyrup;-;If you're looking for a game that is filled with flamers, trolls, and players whose main language isn't English on NA servers, THIS IS THE GAME FOR YOU!!!!
Syksy;-;A very confusing game, that strives to continue where Heroes of Legends left off, but resorts a bit too often to slavic jump-scares to create an immersive Slenderman-like experience. Current main issues: Pros: - A friendly and positive community - Possibility to make friends and discuss delicate topics with new people from various ethnic backgrounds, chat comes with emoticons and other essential stuff - Strong focus for learning new languages - Full of fun mini-games if the main game is not compelling, like the Shopkeeper's quiz, buying stuff from the Valve shop, in-game advertisement clicking, guess-games for DOTA 2 network offline times etc Cons: - I picked the Sniper class but had trouble aiming in the first person mode, needs to be fixed asap - Playing the game with Oculus Rift resulted in nausea - Low replayability, after their first game everone I know has practically reached their skill cap - Basic things like in-game quicksave and quickload functionality is missing - Raid bosses like Roshan and Troll Warlord are hard to understand and severely imbalanced - Steam achievements were teased but are still not working, I already ate my 500th tree but didn't get the achievement - The crafting system is confusing and unintuitive - Want to create a drum? Well, you need a robe and a bracer, of course! Want to create a buckler? Yep, you guessed it, you need a chainmail shirt armor and a branch! - Hitboxes are off and often clipping; for example, I bought a bigger sword for the Sven class, but game doesn't register hits that clearly happen against smaller models like the Phantom Assassin - NPCs like the mud golem and the shopkeeper only have few lazy dialogue lines, I was more interested in hearing their immersive part of the story while constructing a hut in a nearby forest out of treebranches - RTS system for building or repairing base components are limited to only a few heroes and could use a revamp - Character wipes happen a bit too often in the servers I've been at Without going into too many spoilers, finishing the campaign left me with more questions than satisfying answers. For example, why was the evil Dragon Knight so eager to hurt the seemingly innocent creeps for monetary gain? Why did the mysterious Drow Ranger attack our valiant hero? Why does Axe look like a tomato? So many questions, yet so few answers. Overall, the game is OK for an early access FPS-RPG hybrid but doesn't entertain the more hardcore gamers for very long. For a small-time indie developer team I guess it's acceptable, but I'd wait for more available DLC expansions before paying anything for the main game.
giggle goose;-;great skill ceiling great competitive scene great player base great use of steam workshop best in its genre
khalif ibrahim;-;ruined my life 0/10
White Heat;-;Incredibly fun MOBA or ASSS game. Highly recommend checking it out but starting off slow. Don't be turned off by the immature community but rise above and embrace it.
drink sum orange juice,get high;-;Extremly rage inducing game, recommended only for ages 12-65. You will be able to learn every aspect of racism and realize what actually "e-" means within DotA 2 i.e Anyone below 3000 MMR is trash tier with a 2 inch  and their opinion is always invalid. DotA 2 is also a pathway for you to be fluent in many different languages such as Chineese, Korean, Thai, Malay, Russian and many others. The secret to climbing MMR is insta-locking the most broken hero in every game. Overall 10/10 game, highly recommended.
[NI]- Scion of Weaboon;-;Causes mood swings, eating disorders, triggered sociopathy and a chronic breakdown of human decency. Also fufills the second language requirement for numerous eastern european universities. 420/10 would play again.
KucingTampan;-;this is nice game for me :)
Sgt Paul;-;DotA 2; What is there you didn't want in a game? This game; Yes can be frustrating and unforgiving and yes can be hard to get used to, BUT that is the fun in which this game provides you with. You may struggle to survive in the jungle against a five man gank and continuously get slaughtered but as a team and with strategies, you and your team can survive to become the victors at the end of the game. When I first started playing this game I had a hard time getting used to MOBA's and never had seen them before which in turn made it so much more difficult for me to understand what was going on but with the support of my mates I learnt and gradually got better. I would strongly reccommed new players to play a few hours of Bot games first because going online with no experience (like I did) doesn't benifit your team, yes you may win but was it worth all the jeering and crude comments from both your own team for feeding and the opposition for being quite horrible at the game? But MOST importantly you MUST have Fun. Playing a game without having fun makes there no reason to play it.
angel;-;I NEVER liked RTS games . I thought they were for nerds . I played League of Legends about 5 years ago as AbilityPower/AttackSpeed/AttackDamage/LifeSteal-Shen-@-Middle before it was Cool [leagueoflegends.wikia.com] . When Dota 2 came out i Quickly Favorited Keeper of the Light [dota2.gamepedia.com] & Juggernaut [dota2.gamepedia.com] and play them both Middle . my strategy as a support player is to control the entire map's flow of "Creeps" this gives the enemy much more to worry about than just their opponents . they now also have to contend with a large group of little guys aswell . . . How annoying ! This is a Tower Defense game . there is an "Ancient" inside of each teams Base . The objective of the game is to kill the creeps , destroy the towers and work your way into the opposing teams base and destroy their "Ancient" . it is Very competitive and addicting . So give it a try it's something new and i'm sure you will find a [ Character/Hero ] that suits your playstyle
Zyph;-;Despite the hours in this account, I have played dota for at least 50 hours at my other account. 1 Year had passed since i played dota, This game is a Strategy game. If i'm not wrong, You have to defend your tower and destroy the enemies one, Using various characters will different weapons, You plan how to defeat the enemy. It was really fun since that day and i will try to play this game in this account. NOTE: 0.1 hours played on this account. We'll see how this goes.
Space Created;-;This game is solely responsible for my hatred of the human species. 10/10
Galaxy;-;Minecraft clone
big daddy;-;Nice game, I think this game better than LOL, it has more details at operation, interesting tools, weather is sprightly, and all hero is free!!! Undoubtedly, DOTA2 is a diversified game, you won't guess what happen in next time! And DOTA2 makes player needs some individual skills, so we can free choice of heroes, not boring EU tactic. In the end, if you are loving DOTA(or MOBA) game, don't missed DOTA2!!!
$(oRp!0;-;I love ths game while playng with friends and making new friends
Z D J I A N;-;I've played this game since I was in my highschool, Dota 1 days were surely a jumpstart for me. Now I'm a licensed Interior Designer and I still play this game. In-game items make this game a whole lot more interesting than before. But since I'm a new player, it's sad to know that DYNAMIC PRESENTS are now unavailable. Rendering Old Players an edge of having good set of items while New ones can never have while they level up. So this makes leveling up your dota profile a bit of useless to me. Leveling up a profile knowing that there is no use or benefit can be disappointing at some point. And hopefully soon there will be an AUTOBAN for rude players in-game. Some sort of a "PROFANE" word detection thru out any language. There are a lot of rude and tactless players out there that can most of the time disappoint newbies from playing the game. Not everyone though. But nonetheless, this game is still as awesome for me as it was before in Dota 1. Very nice graphics and enjoyable game. Keep up the good work!
JMB;-;Horrible game, I hate it...... yet I still play every night..... hmmm
LORD PUCKINGTON THE GREAT;-;It's a good game and all. but it has so many flaws. first off, the pros. The game is getting massive content every now and so and it feels fresh, the map is fantastic and simple to learn. same with the heroes too and the community made content is fantastic! but the cons.. where do I begin? now, I love this game and everything... but the community is just what ruins it. I've been into games and I have over 800 hours plus and still being called an noob and everything and blames me. there is some situations that I couldn't do anything and my friend keeps trying to help, and no one else trys to come to the lane. and i'm the one getting blamed. also, the game seriously need either: more servers, or region locks. because I am sick and tired of being matched with peruvians, portugese, russians, etc. and not to mention, if you're in a parties. more chances you're gonna find some stupid clan team that does nothing but just does stun stacks while we just wanna have fun. the worse of all, is the people who always spam "UMADBRO?" and take insults from . but seriously, it's impossible to not be frustrated in a video game, espacilly dota... seriously. it's just sad that these kind of communities just ruin a game, and I can no longer have fun. To me, the game is just not fun anymore. some heroes are broken as hell, heck valve tried to nerf riki... but they just buffed him more instead. well gg.
Kush Kush;-;Many people play this game. The masses are idoits.
Wild Mint;-;this game eats your life, and leave you with nothing
mies backfire;-;Terrible game for terrible people.
SwaggaWaggon #NNPTC;-;If you can get past the steep learning curve, this is perhaps the most fun game on the planet.
ZappaKappa;-;I have been using several Russian language simulators but it wasnt working for me. Then a friend recommended Dota 2. I had a hard time in the beginning because I hadnt learnt the meaning of the word  yet. Now that I have, a whole world has opened for me! It's so much when except for when u are playing against drow, bloodseeker, axe, viper, sniper, death, pudge or riki. 11/10 would play again
CARNIVORE;-;THE BEST GAME EVER!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
Befaro;-;2000 hours atm. I regrest only maybe 10. This is the best game so far.
Iguana;-;I used to get mad at the flaming and feeding peruvians and brazilians in my games, but now I act just like them.
Mizakylt;-;,      Warcraft 3
Bleson;-;Magic sucks and no fun shall be had.
Trafalgar Law;-;Best Game In The Steam :)
Trollny;-;Ruined my life once. Never go back to this sh*t.
TheBombOCat;-;To be honest this is totally not my game! === This rating is based on my own XP, opinion, butthurt and lots of frustration! === Graphics: 7/10 (only thing I can rate here :p [this thing lags on medium, dammit!] Sound: 10/10 (kinda good to hear) Gameplay: 1/10. Community: One of the worst game Communites ever! ("GTFO", "f**k you, noob", etc.) Rating: 6/10. Note: Insanely hard, so I do not recommend this game for FPS lovers just like me.
Vennya;-;this is an awesome game!!!
Spaghetti;-;the community's so toxic i can only spe-c ,
Hyperchaotic;-;It's like kawaingpieceofdogshit.
Sigvatr;-;See your friends change into giant sprouting anuses.
Meido;-;Why play Dota 2 when you could just mow a lawn?
JoJo!;-;DOTA got me laid in school, This bich was like Oh sheit yu got big dota dikc pls gib me fukc nad i sed k and we fukc'd
Umorist;-;This game succk, especially if ypu are noob. wrost comunity ever. but if u played it once, twice or 600-times, ypu will never stop playing it....
Flip;-;This is the worst game I've ever played. Please send help.
anita.saaks;-;Simply put, this game is misogynitic. It does nothing but further harmful female stereotypes and it celebrates patriarchy and he mental, emotional and mostly physical abuse of women. >all of the female characters are supports >they make less money than the men, and are expected to support the male characters who achieve everything >the one female carry, a strong, independent brown transwoman is banned from tournaments, because her mere existence threatens weak white cishets This is why Dota will never be taken seriously.
Golden Bear;-;i just want to get rid of this game
Pinoy Game Store;-;Dota 2 is the number 1 free to play game in the Philippines. Pinoy Game Store - safe and convenient transactions for Dota 2 items in the Philippines
Sagoreth;-;Give my life back!!!
Souseiseki;-;Horrible game, awful community, bad graphics, don`t play that game!!!!
CUL DE SAC;-;csgo has broken smoke since release date doto get patches twice a week tables on wheels f u  k you valve
Violence Jack;-;This is by far one of the worst RPGs or whatever the hell type of game this is, Its overrated, hard to learn, the players are always aresholes, it feels lazly and halfed  put together. If you enjoy being a sane happy person DON'T PLAY THIS GAME!
Nik *BACKPACKING;-;Still better than League of Legends.
sadpanda.jpg;-;I started playing Dota 2 around 2 years ago, at that time it was still at Beta and I would never have expected that this game would greatly affect my life. When I started I did not have any experience and much expectation of the game, due to the genre - it was all new to me, however before trying out the game it took my friends awhile to get into the game because I did not like the fact the game was still at Beta and at that time I was detesting its predecessor DotA due to the fact the gameplay was confusing which it turned me off and also the graphics was years outdated without even trying the game out. I was able to give its successor a chance when a friend of mine introduced the ESports scene within the game community of the genre. I was hooked due to I never have expected that a type of sport has been running for almost a decade which it has been under my radar. I personally was not a fan for Sports in general although after hearing about ESports is completely change my perspective on both of the game and sports. ESports is a term for organized video game competitions, especially between professional. It is known as competitive gaming, professional gaming and cyber sport. The most common video game genres associated with electronic sports are real-time strategy, fighting, first-person shooter, and multiplayer online battle arena. Generally Dota 2 would fall under the MOBA genre due to it consists of session-based online multiplayer matches, in which two teams of five players attempt to destroy their opponents' fortified strongholds known as Ancients. Each player controls a "Hero" character and, over the course of an individual game, focuses on improving their Hero's abilities, acquiring items, and fighting against the other team. Welcome to Dota, You Suck, is a well-known proverb within the DotA Community, which is aimed at new player. In fact is the truth, especially for new to the genre, for the first dozen hours or so, you will be showered with too much information and an often unforgiving community of extremely competitive players. On the other hand if you persevere, Dota 2 becomes one of the most rewarding and tense team-based multiplayer experiences anywhere in gaming. It's an achievement owed to uncompromising depth and complex gameplay, being a free-to-play, and the great features developer Valve has built up around it. That said, you should not expect to have fun on your first day playing... or even your first week. It is due to the unforgiving players within your team which expects you to do your job flawlessly although it is impossible even pro players can make a mistake, however theres a method of this insanity. In order survive in Dota 2 you need to understand every single hero and mechanics and how they interact with one another. Everything from learning to work as a member of a coordinated team to the counter-intuitive practice of killing your own AI units to deny the enemy experience points and gold theyd get from doing it themselves, and understanding the effects of hundreds of complex abilities. There are 102 Dota 2 heroes (and counting) each consist of different abilities and mechanics and serves different roles from each other. For example Riki, is an melee Agility hero in which when he acquire his ultimate at level 6 he becomes permanent invisible, which is an obvious choice for most of new player. However there are various ways to counter an invisble heroes, this can be done by purchasing either a Dust of Apperance, Sentry Wards or Gem of true sight, anyone can purschase these item during a game, making the game more balanced. In addition some heroes has an ability to track an invis heroes for a short period of time. In conclusion, DOTA 2 is fun and challenging and deeply rewarding unlike other games, and despite its vast popularity it still feels like a secret waiting to be discovered. It has clear visuals and more balance gameplay unlike League of Legends and has an incredible longevity
BOT CrazyRussianFaget;-;PLAY DOTKA DRINK VODKA 5/5 recommend
MySpace;-;Meet new players from all over the world! ( They are probably all russian tough ) Lose all your faith in humanity! Great if you have too many friends and you need to lose a few! Meh.
hanwudi;-;Too short.
El Macho Man;-;If you're a filipino and planning to try dota 2 for the first time. You're gonna have a bad time. 10/10 would totally recommend to a filipino
The Great And Powerful Trixie;-;Only game where you can get yelled at in Russian, shoot a demon with a laser beam, and win a hat all at the same time. 11/10 would recommend.
Smel RIbson;-;If you ever wanted to take a thirty inch slong across your face then you'll love this
Tacet_;-;I've been playing DotA 1 since 2003. I switched to DotA 2 a couple months ago from all my friends shifting over. Here is a short list of pros and cons that I have seen in DotA 2 as opposed to DotA 1. Pros: * Better mechanics, many heros function differently in DotA 1 due to the restrictions of the Warcraft 3 World Editor. * Visually stimulating, DotA 2 has many ways to customize heros, couriers, wards, animations, and more. * Item drops, as opposed to DotA 1, even casual players can end up making some money just by playing. * Spectating * Much easier for new players to learn due to the new system to help starting players. * Builds display on the item panel * Has many events in which additional items can be earned * Has an in game mic system as well as quick toggle phrases. Cons: * Currently doesnt have all the heros or neutral camps that DotA 1 has. * Lacks some of the game modes of DotA 1. * Surprisingly, lacks some of the important mechanics of DotA 1. The most notable one that I can pull off the top of my head is Batriders napalm does not trigger any damage bonus on radiance + veil even when the threshold for doing so is met. * Servers tend to be down for a brief period of time after nearly every update. * Doesnt have as well of a language division as DotA 1. I que US east and west with the language of English in DotA 2; yet 1:3 games, if not more, will have another language. I wouldnt even mind if it was something like Spanish or French, but I am getting everything from Russian, Chinese, Portuguese, Ukraine, Korean, Japanese, and many more that I cant even identify. * Double courier is a lot harder to use in DotA 2, even with hotkeys and grouping. I find this to take away from bottle crowing as well as make it harder for 2 farmers to get their items quickly for they will likely be on the opposite sides of the map. Even if they arent, the offlane will still likely need it to get items to survive. Every game will only have 1 courier unless someone accidentally buys another. Neutral: * DotA 2 has much better pathing and makes it harder to get stuck on unpathable areas. This makes sure you will never stupidly get stuck somewhere, but also takes away from some hero abilities that do move other heroes or yourself. * There is currently no public lobby system. There is everything from private, fiends, guild, etc., but there is no way to host them publicly for anyone to join. * Your computer needs to be decent to run DotA 2. At least 4 GB of ram and a decent graphics card is highly advised. In conclusion, DotA 2 is definitely a f2p game that you should look into. If you have yet to play any MOBA it may seem a bit difficult at first, but it will grow on you. To avoid the initial hate you may come across, I advise having someone assist you with learning the basics or look up some tutorials online. Going into this game with absolutely no knowledge of how this game works is definitely not a good idea. Once you learn the game, it can easily become the most enjoyable strategy game you have ever played.
dumpster girl;-;do not play this game
Tica;-;Absolutely GG.
Sebron;-;I've been addicted since this was a warcraft 3 mod, and I'm still here. The recent additions of features with TI13 and now TI14 are amazing. No matter what, this will always be one of my favorite games of all time.
v3nom;-;When i first started DOTA2 I was a little overwhelmed, as my first ARTS/MOBA game it was pretty complicated. I soon started to pick up the mechanics like last hitting and denying. Before I knew it, i was performing  and better. I stopped making silly  and  got vastly better and not  the enemy . For the  part, everyone I've met was very helpful and , there  the  k however. As  -y play DOTA2 ce   ,  yee, o   ooa .    y  x!  - - https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=AOAtz8xWM0w&feature=kp
Khota, Lord of war;-;Best mental training program to be in the military EU. feed - get shouted out and abused very extremely.
Zachmatosis;-;This game ruined my life 11/10
KingGui;-;Dude, This is just awesome...If you like MOBA well this game is just the right thing for you. And even more, the events and all that happens in the game, is as Cool as the game looks. Hope This Helped... Tchow :)
Th3Assasinat0R;-;Every game is different, every game is fun. Must play for all MOBA fans.
Thats My Mother;-;Studies suggest this game is more addicting than heroin. Free Dota Addiction Hotline: 1-866-925-7411 11/10
R3a1 S4 K1d5!;-;Very cool, which is better than Dota 1 and graphic is awesome...
Lifestyle;-;step 1: be russian step 2: be drunk step 3: yell over  laptop mic step 4: become pro
*...KaTrInAKnows...*;-;it is a great game
BlitzNexus;-;Want to become racist towards Russians? Play this game.
Thekerrek;-;Haven't played it much but it seems good.
SNM;-;Play this game= Life lost 14/10
AgatoN<3;-;Every hour spent on it totally worth it,ruined my life but who cares its fun and addictive. If you want to have bad grades and dont want to get out from your home this is the game you play. Also you will learn russian language so its educational game after all :)
JJMerrill;-;To fully illustrate what makes DOTA one of the most compelling multiplayer games of all time, it helps to have a bit of background on the game itself. DOTA has its roots as a Warcraft 3 modification. Warcraft 3 introduced a unique mechanic in its campaign and multiplayer modes of "hero" units - units that actually gained experience points, abilities, and items as the game progresses. This really made it feel like you had an investment in these units, and you grew attached to them. To a degree these hero units, effectively commanders of your army of relatively disposable units, became your avatar in-game. It was a brilliant concept, and DOTA took it a step further. DOTA created a multiplayer mode that focused *exclusively* on playing these hero units - it removed the base building and unit management seen in the standard RTS format. It's one of the best examples of "less is more" than I've ever seen, and that description hardly does it justice. Managing your individual hero and your income, position on the map, constant decision making, and being able to size yourself up versus your enemy brings more depth than any other game I've ever played. I've yet to play any other multiplayer game where *every* member of your 5-man team is crucial to your victory. Everyone must do their part, and do it better than the other 5-man team. There are very few cases of where a game can be winnable 4v5, and teamwork becomes a huge factor. In the most intense and close games, the level of immersion really can't be matched. It's hard to think of another game that draws you in more than DOTA, especially when other people are counting on you to do well! It's a hectic, stressful, enormously complex and in-depth experience - not to mention absurdly fun. This is what keeps me coming back, and I'd recommend it to anyone looking to really experience what multiplayer gaming can truly offer. If you're new to the game and want some background on specific heroes and strategies, or just want to watch some gameplay, be sure to check out my YouTube channel. Thanks for reading! http://www.youtube.com/user/JJMerrill
Icefreg;-;I'm convinced all Dota players are masochists, including myself. I just can't enough of that desire to drown small puppies before, during, and after every game I play. Would reccommend frequent anger management classes if you happen to play this game past the tutorial. Kappa/Kapperino
***KiRoV***(Traveled);-;Dota 2 is still better than LoL
DsG-A| Panda \\ WoW;-;Dota 2 is great, 10/10 for people that are wanting to learn Korean, Russian, Spanish and French. The players on here really understand you and have a great warm feeling towards you playing with them. Your team will always have a Russian in, so you can learn Russian and play the game!
Kono;-;Dota 2 is a fps developed by bungie in 1998 for the nintendo 64. Its a game that presents itself as a point and click adventure, similarly to the "best game of the year 10/10 - New york times" Gone home, you play a young lesbian trying to find love, however the game presents multiple obstacles to keep you from achieveing your goal. The obstacles are mostly stuns and supressions that every playable champ in the game has access to, accept for surpressor who has access to a global ult that puts all his opponents into low prio but thats another story. The game also has access to cool cosmetic items that give players direct access to their facebook allowing everyone to see how vibrant and colorful their language is when losing an mmorpg. Dota 2 is also an amazing language software, on pare with Rosetta stone that allows players to learn multiple languages, including but not limited too, Russian, Mexican, Spanish, Burrito Burrito Taco, ecceterra. I would highly suggest this game to you and your friends, despite it being so over priced at 89.99 msrb, it is worth every penny. Dota 2 is also the only good video game to come out in the last 28 years and will stay that way for years to come, and thats how i spent my summer vacation - ferris bueller
Michael De Santomak;-;Nice graphic, a lot of features to help beginners to adapt with the game if they never play DOTA before. And it's free to play too. Great game.
cathal;-;league of legends is an old-time strategy game developed in 1993 by tesco in collaboration with that guy from the indie game thing. the game is very easy and beginner friendly, clearly inspired by the gameplay mechanics of hey you pikachu. in legend league, the player adventures through maps known as legend lands in order to find all 7 bags of decomposed lamb. the first team to get all 10 of the 33 bags is the winner. the winning team is then awarded with a meat medal which can be spent at the ingame store in exchange for various trinkets and goodies, such as oprah winfrey memoribilia and more copies of the game itself. the graphics are really bad and clearly stolen from fortress craft. look at this for example. what the  is this ? is that meant to be a fedora? jesus christ sainsburys at least make an effort. the character roster consists entirely of short humanoids wielding weapons that aren't actually weapons. for example, this is just a midget covered in loo roll right? nope. it's apparently meant to be a magical mummy creature. ing political correctness. the game revolves around the main character, meaty m8 blaze it, and follows him through his journey to save his wife and family from the evil ruler known as notch. an optional hidden storyline can be unlocked after completing the game, in which meaty m8 blaze it attempts to conquer europe and eradicate all minorities within it. in conclusion, it's not as good as other fps games on the market, but still worth buying. i r8 it 8/8 m8.
TBMC;-;Dota flippin 2, by a long shot my fav game to play on the good ol pc. (not like i play anything else though) This game is prehaps one of the best freetoplay game ever. ok correction, is the best freetoplay game ever. Dota 2 has a very sketchy begining for most players. I really didnt see what was so good about at the begining, it felt........ bland and not very exiting. but after a few matches with my friends and a few good wins, MY LIFE BECAME DEDICATED TO MASTERING THIS GAME. And now ever after 503 hours i still have a very long way to go. Dota 2 has a big learning curve at the begining, as you'll here from every other player. There are so many aspects of the game to learn. But even at the begining it is insainly fun, and as you develop your skill the game becomes more and more enjoyable. And if you get really good you can assemble a worthy team, and if our teams got the skillz to pay the billz you can run for the Dota 2 International championships, however that an very very long shot. but hey the prize money is 10 million flippin dollars this year, and next year it will grow even bigger. So why not try hey. So go flippin get this game and waste thousands of enjoyable hours of your life doing no much. (And please please what ever you do, dont play F**KING RIKI)
Pen.Apple;-;I play DotA since it was a Warcraft III custom map, more than 7 years I think. The matchmaking in DotA 1 was completelity random! So you could not improve too much your skills playing pub games. Now, past 2 years DotA 2 has been released, the matchmaking is much better (their system 'wants' you to win 50% and lose the other 50%). I play DotA more than 7 years but 90% I know about DotA it's because I improved and learned the past 2 years . Pros: -> DotA 2 have a steep, daunting learning curve. You can't just be a good DotA 2 player with 100 games.. sometimes you'll have to get tips with friends, search strategies on google and watch competitive games. This can be fun and challenging. -> It's very fun when you play pub games with your friends and WIN the game. Otherwise.. heh -> Although it's always the same map and objective, there's a lot of combination and strategy plays you can do ! (more than 100 heroes). -> If you like MOBA/RTS game, when you spend a lot of time in DotA 2 and learn advanced plays you'll not stop playing. Well, I do not know if it's a good or bad quality.. Cons: -> DotA 2 is a RTS (Real Time Strategy) 5x5 game, so it's very frustating when you play with people you do not like. -> It does not have a good tutorial explaining all the advanced plays.. you'll have to learn by yourself or by a friend. You can search on forums in the internet too. -> It's very difficult in the beginning, if you do not have patience and time it will be a very difficult game to enjoy.
Biscuit factory;-;I played this instead of going to exams. 10/10
Ringo Starr;-;So after 781 hours of this game (up until 8/16/14), a lot of yelling by commendable teammates and dozens of items later, I still enjoy this game. Previously with most games, they get really repetitive and boring after about 200-250 hours but Dota 2 is not one of those kind of games. I would recommend for others as this is an incredible MOBA, but may be difficult to learn for the un-educated. I would not recommend for others to procrastinate from school/uni work. Trust me, I learnt the hard way. All in all, I give it a 10/10. Story Time! Me (Sven) 200 health: Probably should get back Milkman (Ogre) full: Ye, probably should *3 enemies come from nowhere* *thinking I'm going to die anyway* MIlkman: Dude, get back NOW! Me: Na na na, I got this. *I get triple kill (MoM and cleave really pays off) Me: Thats what I thought! Milkman: *speechless* My advice: The impossible is impossible unless the possibility of the impossibility is possible.
DotaWizard;-;I really love this game it is amazing and it can easily lure you toward its addiction and once u start u will never find the time to stop and the time to stop will never come trust me :) I just hate the fact that there is no banning nor option to stop having newbies in your games ... otherwise, I recommend it for everyone :) just plz don't be noobs and ruin our games
theValkyr;-;it's like league of legends with russians
Luft's Anarchy;-;I've been playing DotA for around 5 years now and everthing about this game seems to be perfect for me ... both the visual effects as well as the gameplay are wonderful experiences waiting to be enjoyed ...
FirdausRichgold;-;VERY GOOD STRATEGY GAME I EVER PLAYED WITH MY FRIEND.I ALSO GET TO KNOW THE OTHER PLAYER FROM ITHR REGION LIKE RUSSIAN AND ASIAN.
@Pazozo;-;You learn how to play like a team and how to insult russians in that game. So that's nice.
*TRF* The Great Clean One;-;Dota 2 is a 5v5 game where you play on your own, it's automatically your team's fault for losing. And remember, it is never, ever your own fault. This is also a great game if you're looking for nicknames. From your first day you'll already get some cool nicknames like '', 'noob', and so on. This game also let's you learn russian very easily, all you have to do is click 'Find Match' and it's for free ! But remember, you don't have to speak english in here if that's not your main language, just speak your own, i'm sure it'll be nice for your team. A tip for when you play a hero with a big ultimate such as Enigma, Magnus and all of those. Buy a blink and as soon as you see a good time to use it, use it, don't tell your team you're going to use your ultimate. Just do it and then blame your team afterwards for dying when they didn't go in with you. Also, make sure to bring lots of food when you play Dota 2, and share it with the enemy team. Feeders are greatly appreciated in this game. If you are a russian, or any person that doesn't want to speak english, be sure to visit the english servers, you'll make lots of friends for sure. When you play a game that's going back and forth and takes over 50 minutes, be sure to say 'EZ GAME GG NOOBS' if you win. If you end up losing, just open all chat and say your team sucks and threw the game, no matter what your own score is. If an enemy or a teammate tries something but fails to kill anyone, make sure to laugh in all chat and call them noobs. Then they'll say something like ' 1x1'. Be sure to accept, it's always fun to make nice friends when you're alone. A tip for laning: Always take mid, no matter which hero you are, mid is mostly a solo lane so nobody to steal your exp or last hits, never gank a side lane, if they're good they'll win the lane no matter which heroes they are up against. If they lose their lane, just call them noobs and say you can never gank because they're always dead. If you have 2 supports and 2 carries in your lane, the best option would be to put the 2 supports on the safelane and carries on the hardlane. If people go with you in a lane when you tell them not to, just call them cykas and take all their last hits. When playing a support hero, make sure to take all the last hits on your lane, a good support always takes last hits so he can buy support items early such as dagon or a maelstorm. Also make sure to tell your carries to buy the courier and wards, a support can't afford to waste money on things like that, he needs lots of farm. To kill a hero, just right click the enemy hero and let your carry do all the damage, then, when your carry dies and the enemy is low, you can safely use your skills now because you are sure to get the kill. 10/10 would recommend, never played a better game
Frainbreze;-;this game make me horny :3
LoL.Crispy.EarthBound;-;Dota 2 is the greatest game ever created for the Apple Macintosh.
Wombo Combo;-;Game is awesome. Took me a little while to get in to it, because when you first start Dota seems complicated, confusing, and spontaneous. After a week or so of playing/trying to understand the game I understood it and tried to learn some of the basics so I could actually play. So try it, it will take you a while to get a hang of it but when you do this game will be so fun you need to play it every day for the rest of your life. I HIGHLY recommend this game to everyone! Try it out!
Frainbreze;-;this game make me horny :3
Sniff My Coke;-;I don't really understand it. But I like it.
LoL.Crispy.EarthBound;-;Dota 2 is the greatest game ever created for the Apple Macintosh.
Frosty The Pervert;-;A very nice game! :D
[i]Soak;-;I've played 70ish hours and here's my impression: The game is quite good, but the community is pure toxic waste. You can't surrender or leave their games because their client punishes you, so you're forced to play it out with the little gremlins. I might quit if I can't find some regulars to queue with who aren't so bad... hasn't happened yet... though I don't play much any more... However: Ever want to have a teammate call you a 'lil ' after you say hi? Ever want to farm for 20 minutes in the lategame because there's no stalemate breaking mechanic? Ever want to get cussed out for calling somebody out for bullying a teammate? Ever want to play with teams who will not speak to each other to save their lives, except for insults? Ever want to leave a game filled with people like this, but not want to deal with whatever punishment Valve has come up with for leavers? Then it might be the game for you! ...I really do wish it weren't so, since the game itself is otherwise great when it's not crashing...
B1;-;Mid or feed, or feed mid? That is the question. 322/10 IGN Russia
Nyaruko;-;This is a MOBA game, what else could I say about it? I'm pretty sure you've read a bunch of reviews upon dota before coming to this review. Getting straight to the point that this game is probably worth playing if you're interested in facing people across the internet who are skilled in tactics and strategy against their opponents within a MOBA like world with a variety of different characters each with their different playstyles.
B1;-;Mid or feed, or feed mid? That is the question. 322/10 IGN Russia
DarkerThanShaq;-;If you are contemplating suicide, this game will help you shoot yourself in the face quicker than ever!
ik;-;Best way to become (and meet) a heartless and cruel individual who enjoys inflicting suffering upon others, specially if they are less skilled and experienced. In addition murdering innocent by-standers as well as trees seems to be the trend, while flaming teammates or opponents is another popular culture in the game. But at the end of it all this game is all about channeling your innner hatred and getting all your frustration out on those who dares to press the "Find Match" button in around the same time as you. All in all excellent gaming experience and obviously the best use of your time.
Nerviex;-;after 3k hours of dota i learned one important thing ...  russian for you, and you,  russian for everyone
SUPA HOT FIRE;-;I played this game for couple minutes but i can say: Dota is the best russian a i have ever seen he steals lifes not bikes and teaches russian for sure /10 would learn again. (sorry for my 'bed' russian)
OverMarz;-;Valve want more $$$ as Riot Games = Boring Events, Boring Items and Boring New Heroes... R.I.P Dota 2, i play HotS in the Future!!!
EmiLy;-;This game is most successful game ever made. But it need self-control and u also need to calm down while playing
Agent McGuffin;-;This game is a Petri dish; an enviroment for which the vilest and most putrid of gamers can thrive and cultivate to their heart's content. I walked into this world unsuspecting and walked right back out changed, scarred by the soviet fires and new meta revolutions. I would favour my eyes being scooped out viscously with one of those McFlurry spoons than spend further time drowning in this cesspool of a F2P game. Unfortunately, I still need my eyes in order to investigate this growing Red Menace and further stop the Vlads, Stalins and Ivans from further infiltrating the Steam network and send them right back to the AK47 mines from which they spawned. Terrible 9/10 Joe McCarthy had the right idea.
piesio;-;What am I doing with my life
uB|Shogun;-;This game just purely sucks
Me;-;It suck that I can't remove this crepe from my library. Ever. It's there forever whether I want it there or not. Oh and it sucks.
ez;-;if this game suits me well, it must be suits anybody else as well :)
Isaac Clarke;-;The best free to play game
charlie.kheneldy;-;recommended to play since it got better graphic than dota 1 that we play on battle net
Exxorian;-;Learn Russian in about 500 hours with this easy language software!
Isaac Clarke;-;The best free to play game
mjau;-;I immediately regret my decision
ez;-;if this game suits me well, it must be suits anybody else as well :)
uB|Shogun;-;This game just purely sucks
Me;-;It suck that I can't remove this crepe from my library. Ever. It's there forever whether I want it there or not. Oh and it sucks.
AFROCHAD | LOL KUNJAT;-;Heroes of WHAT? League of WHAT? Sorry, what was that? I can't hear you clearly over THE AWESOMENESS OF DOTA.
crab_f ringme?;-;If you live with your mother, smoke pot, watch wrestling, cant vote, and love The Cramps or have a big brother who does, you will likely have a blast with this game.
AntoineFromAfar;-;I dont get this game, it's like Civilization, every one picks one of the 108 country but it's a 5v5 game. The diplomatic exchanges with your team mates are limited because you can trade a limited amount of luxuries and you have to spend a big amount of gold to upgrade your country, there is no research feature, also the spying are realy limited as you can only place "wards" (wich replace spys in this game) on the map but they are usless. They are city states but they just stand here and hit what's in range and never come to help you when you are far from them. Finaly there a only 3 era (early, mid and late) but it dont change much the gameplay and some country are too OP in the late era and you can't buy atomic bomb to nuke them 2/10, this game lacks a lot of content to pretend to be a Civlization-Like
Darude - Sandstorm;-;There's too much to say about Dota 2. In short... a very diverse community, a never ending learning curve, and lots of fun.
D_M_;-;Game bad Full of russia Bad game Not play
B4XT3R;-;Created by Blizzard and stolen by Valve, Dota 2 is one of today's most popular Multiplayer Online Battle Arena games, with a mere 9 million more monthly players than its close competitor, Avalon Heroes. Based on a third-party modification for Warcraft III, Dota 2 strives to fill the wallets of its developers and empty the wallets of its players. This classic strategy game offers a substantial amount of playable heroes (each with their own unique and blatantly overpowered abilities to fit any playstyle), only one map and a metric buttload of entirely worthless cosmetic items. Being the best video game in existence comes at a price: Dota 2 has a very steep learning curve, requiring an estimated 14 years played before gaining a basic understanding of how the game works and another 30 years to get a very weak grasp of any one hero's hundreds of thousands of spells and abilities. On top of individual skill, this game heavily relies on teamwork, coordination and communication - this ensures that you will get buttraped the first 500 games you play. Also it's free. Rubbish game straight from the bargain bin; 10/10.
Yuuhi;-;Great Game love it when playing with friends will hate when playing with randoms :D
Mushroom;-;Best p4f moba i`ve played since started with Warcraft III.
DR4zEROS;-;Raged so hard gave me anal retention. How to speak Russian in 20 minutes. Ruined my ing life. 10/10 would reccommend
Szymer-senpai;-;Definitive YES! No matter if you're just starting your adventure with MOBA games or you're a veterean already. Doto is fun. Doto is life. Even playing with Russian is good in Dota 2 (sometimes). It teaches about the teamwork in the hard way, you just can't win match alone. I strongly recomend Dota for anyone, maybe except LoL players, but it's always time to get in the flow with Doto 2!
QaK.Finger. Licking. Good.;-;Day in the life of Dota 2 player: -Wake up in the morning and think about playing some Dota but instead prepare for school. -Watch some famous players play Dota the last few minutes you have before you leave. -Get on the bus and fall asleep only to think about Dota. -Get to class and make murmurs here and there about Dota and curses about noobs or matches you lost. -Get random smiles throughout the day when you remember a really amazing match, but sadly have nobody to share it with because all your friends play League. -Get on the bus to get home and realize you have a lot of homework, have to walk far from the bus to get home, and play Dota. -Run like a mad man from bus stop to get home for Dota. -Have an argument with yourself on whether you should play Dota or finish your project you have been putting off for Dota. -Play dota for only 1 match he says. Finishes at 10pm he does. -Hate yourself because you didnt finish any work, talk to any non-Dota friends, and played 7+ hours of Dota. -Cry yourself to sleep and wake up in the morning to do it again. Dota has essentially ruined my life. I went onto the steam store to find a F2P game because I was always bored with hours of time. I played stuff like warface and what not and I kept seeing this. I had also heard about youtubers making jokes about the game so I figured why the heck not. Played the game ONCE. That's when the addiction started. Soon my hours of freetime reduced to minutes, seconds, sometimes I would stay up 3+ hours later just to play more matches. DONT EVEN THINK OF MAKING FRIENDS ON HERE, THEY ONLY ENCOURAGE YOU TO PLAY MORE. Dota has essentially taken my life away, and I must say im ing loving it. Dota is love Dota is life. Warning game causes following symptoms: -Racism towards Russians for reasons you don't even udnerstand, -Insomnia -Anxiety -High blood Pressure -Low blood Sugar -Malnutrition -EXTREME LEVELS OF STRESS -Hyperventalation -High amounts of giddyness and happyness -Extremem amounts of sadness -Rage And carpul tunnel. Worth it. 10/10
B4XT3R;-;Created by Blizzard and stolen by Valve, Dota 2 is one of today's most popular Multiplayer Online Battle Arena games, with a mere 9 million more monthly players than its close competitor, Avalon Heroes. Based on a third-party modification for Warcraft III, Dota 2 strives to fill the wallets of its developers and empty the wallets of its players. This classic strategy game offers a substantial amount of playable heroes (each with their own unique and blatantly overpowered abilities to fit any playstyle), only one map and a metric buttload of entirely worthless cosmetic items. Being the best video game in existence comes at a price: Dota 2 has a very steep learning curve, requiring an estimated 14 years played before gaining a basic understanding of how the game works and another 30 years to get a very weak grasp of any one hero's hundreds of thousands of spells and abilities. On top of individual skill, this game heavily relies on teamwork, coordination and communication - this ensures that you will get buttraped the first 500 games you play. Also it's free. Rubbish game straight from the bargain bin; 10/10.
Zaggeta;-;Dota 2 is one of those games which cause a myriad of emotions. You'll love it and hate it all at the same time but that doesn't stop it from being the most competitive and professional eSport games on the planet. One of the first negative things you're going to encounter in Dota 2 is the learning curve. It isn't like most games. It requires knowledge of many unique aspects and only after encountering every hero at least once, will you start to get comfortable. If you want to take Dota 2 seriously, or even casually, prepare to invest a lot of time. Guides can of course cut this time substantially. When you do learn to play, you will be rewarded with one of the biggest feelings of accomplishment of any game. You will feel like a god among men - but remember, most people feel this, and as such, the Dota community is one of arrogant and toxic tossers. There are nice players, but there are plenty of unpleasant ones. If you want to play Dota 2 properly, you need to play with friends - or just learn to mute people. Overall, Dota 2 is a team game that is really hard to play casually. You will either love it or hate it - but more often than not, both at the same time.
BloodCrow;-;The best thing about DOTA 2 is its player vs player action. The worst thing about DOTA 2 is its player vs player interaction.
- NEVER GIVE UP;-;i ing hate that i like this game so much.
[EDIM];-;Dota 2: As we are entering the moba territory where the fan bases exist to the extremes, I decided to test out all the moba games that I had access to which was League, HoN, HoTS, Smite and Demigod so that I tested out all games fairly and equally. After playing them all I believe that DOTA 2 is probably the best moba out there if you like strategy and a more grownup moba game. DOTA 2 does well with a focus on each hero being unique and each having their pros and cons to assist the team in their own special ways, so this means that each match will never be the same due to the choices of heroes and peoples playstyles. Its developers and lead designer Icefrog have a focus on balancing every hero on every major update and making sure that no hero is extremely overpowered. The game follows Valves concept of Free to Play games where the only thing up for purchase is cosmetics with nothing that will change or alter the gameplay, the game also has item drops at the end of the matches but at the time of this review the drop rates were changed and its current nigh impossible to even get a single item. The only issue I really see is the issue with some of the servers due to the outsourcing of servers to other companies and their locations. So Ill write down the list of servers that have issues that I know of: SEA (Location: Singapore) (E-Club) - Its a gamble, there is two servers and one is good and one is awful. Sometimes up, sometimes down. Good luck. Japan (Location: Tokyo) (NEXON) - It doesn't exist yet, they are holding it hostage for the past year. US Servers (Valve) - They are currently using Mail Pigeon for packets. (West - Seattle, East - Sterling) Russia (Stockholm) (?) - The server is perfectly fine, the only issue is the distance from Russia to Stockholm causes increase latency -------- Other than some of the server issues you can have loads of fun and you might even pick up the Russian, Spanish, Portuguese or Filipino languages. Dota is a quality gaming addiction and language learner. 10/10
Chinkocho;-;11/10 Would rate again because dota is my girlfriend.
Fallen;-;It requires a lot of patience and teamwork other than that, it's an excellent game.
XiantheMiguel;-;TL;DR: AMAZING. PREPARE YOURSELF FOR A DANK ADVENTURE. 10/10. By playing this game you basically sell your soul to Gabe Newell. Aside being one of the best balanced MOBA ARTS games ever, other features include: > Dota 2 offers a system called "matchmaking" that allows you to learn multiple foreign languages. (Ranging from Russian to Chinese! You'll be learning c and  like it was 1, 2, 3!) > For a fee ranging from BZZ pugna bracers to Dragonclaw Hook, you can customise any hero's look (Except Zeus, so Valve doesn't get sued by Nintendo.) with virtual hats. > Owning and frequently playing Dota 2 allows you to safely assume every other ARTS (or MOBA, in other languages such as LoLspeak) is inferior and therefore concluding that Dota 2 is the best game of its genre. (Interested in the Dota master race? Go to reddit.com/r/dotamasterrace now.) > A very balanced ranking system measured in "MMR" which is, according to the majority of "me mid" players, an accurate measurement of a player's genitals. However, fear not, as MMR experts from /r/DotA2 claim that MMR is substance-less after the 6000 mark, as matchmaking morphs full agility and matches you with players 2000 points below your rating and pre-pubescent children that bought a 5k account! Isn't that just great? Bored with the game? No problem! You can indulge in the world of Dota without playing via a plethora of ways: > You can participate in Steam discussions where you can assume you know what you're talking about. > Go on reddit and discuss anything about Dota, whether it's a thread about serious metagame discussion, or a thread about Arteezy tweeting about a thread about Arteezy tweeting. > Or you could experience the "pinnacle" of human stupidity by participating in any popular Dota stream's twitch chat. The persons chatting there offer a broad range of insight about the stream or the game in general, be it "() I'M LOL FAN AND I HAVE DOWN SYNDROME ()" ,"   (___FISSURE_____()" or the simple, yet very concise "322" or "fEEd." Disclaimer: Playing this game seriously may cause severe trauma, lack of sleep, heavy breathing, and brain cancer. If you go full tryhard, contact your doctor immediately.
Aurora;-;It is a fun dress up game with over a hundred dolls to choose from.
Hiruki;-;Great moba where you can dress up your heroes like barbies, the only reason to play matches is to get more dresses for your heroes. 10/10 would dress up barbies.
MSGS [KiraYamato];-;very2 important game to me .. nice
Rice_Cube;-;This game made me hate gamers.
Jordan Schlansky;-;>install dota 2 >realise what im playing >uninstall pretty fun tbh
Furrikane;-;This type of game is disgusting and its Jewish propaganda like this thats gonna cover the world in darkness and signal the beginning of the Rapture. I just hope all the sinners supporting this evil spawn of Satan (Gabe Newell) will be safe when the time comes for judgement 0/10
Towlot- A M D;-;Rosetta stone 2.0 This amazing program allowed me to understand South American languages and most european languages except I am still trying to learn Cantonese because I only know Mandarin because I was born in China. Thank you Valve :).
bassturd :)))));-;I think I'm better off with the uninstall button.
Alpaca Appreciator;-;THIS GAME HELPS YOU LEARN NEW LANGUAGES I learned Russian and Spanish because of this Better language learning program Rosetta Stone, and it's free!! This program uses the efficient Strategy of frustration, anger, idiotic people, raging, and loss in hope of humanity. 10/10 would dota again
ZERO;-;Love spending my free time with ah bengs pinoys
Bink;-;Uninstall.
Mench Many;-;A GAME OF STRATEGY AND TEAMWORK! NICE GAME! its not actually a nice Community but hey there are no games with people who doesnt have bad attitudes.
Havoc;-;Excellent game. But be warned, It will ruin your life.
@MitchyD;-;Too easy.
Hunson;-;A fun game all about wandering into a forest, figuring out what every button on your keyboard does, and then murdering a bunch of wizards. 10/10
Gorlocker;-;Is this League of Legends?
GrimRift;-;I love this game I'm so addicted to it. Its what I look forward to on the weekends. I could just spend hours on hours if my scedule allowed me. Volvo you've really out done yourself on this one. I also llove the 6.82 Bloodseeker "w" abillity.
Pillage_in_the_Village;-;Defense of the anciets is defnitely one of my personal favourite games. Sure it has a a steep learning curve and competition can be brutal, with the occasional rager :wink:, but it will make you come back for more...Highly enjoyed by friends
DotaFX;-;One of the best Sequels ever made! :)
Galahad;-;Pub game : There is always 1-2  on your team. They will act like they know the game for so long and call you a noob when you die a single time. (this does not, In any way promote better team play so do not do this) Then there's the 1 good support who loses his mind when he sees that your carry is dumb as a rock. Then there's the carry who does not time his attacks. Basically, He just attacks ground. Then there's the complaining sonofa. "We need wards, Why didn't you help me, It's so hard here!, etc." Then there's the dumbass who picks a carry when there's already a passive carry for a first pick. (Passive carries:Can't contribute during early game due to item reliability) Then there's the aggressive guy who'll say MID or FEED. Then feeds anyway. Then there's the silent type. I don't know if this guy doesn't understand English, Or just chose to not talk to anyone. Then there's the "I'll go offlane!!" Then proceeds to pick a hero not suited for an offlane. Of course he feeds and he blames the team for not doing their job. "Why didn't you gank my lane? etc." The game is actually good. 10/10 but the DotA2 community is getting worse every day.
FlyIn ChICkeN;-;Helm Of Dominator__%15 lifesteal Vladmir's Offering___%16 lifesteal Mask Of Madness___%20 lifesteal Satanic__________%25 lifesteal Broodmother______%80 lifesteal DOTA 2_________%100 lifesteal
666terrific;-;You can learn about russia
FUX;-;Solo is the new Yolo
stupid.straycat;-;Now seriously, why would I waste my time with this?
pder;-;DO NOT DOWNLOAD THIS GAME IT WILL GIVE YOU A HEADACHE AND A  ADDICTION AFTER 200+ HOURS I HATE IT BUT I CAN'T STOP IT PLS DON'T DOWNLOAD BEFORE IT CONSUMES YOU ALIVE
Not genius, just russian;-;According to the U.S. Foreign Service Institute, it takes approximately 1,300 hours to acquire advanced proficiency in Japanese language. It would take approximately 3,060 hours of studying to finish university and receive a major. According to The National Jurist, it takes about 400 to 600 hours to prepare for the bar exam (passing which makes you a lawyer). It requires near 52 hours to read Leo Tolstoy's "War and Peace" and "Anna Karenina" both. The Department of Health and Human Services of the USA recommends an average adult to do roughly 125 hours of sports a year to stay healthy... *** You get the point. Don't even frakking think of playing this.
Kuro;-;Choose from a wide variety of sober russian servers filled with english speaking brazilians and enjoy your blame game! Would play, vodka/taco!
Secret Agent X-9;-;If you like playing with the most condescending, hateful, intolerable, and reprehensible scum of the entire universe, play Dota 2. Still better than LoL. 10/10 *Only thing that can make me achieve an erection
Microsoft Word;-;This is the worst game I have ever played in my life. I can't stand a second playing this game because it's graphic's are garbage and I rather die than play with all the loser's with no life on this game. This map is repetative and is really starting to get stupid. The creator's must have half a brain to think people would even like this game at all due to how bad it is and how much they want you to pay to buy a stupid item in the shop. I rather buy hello kitty island adventure than buy these worthless pathetic item's in the shop that DO NOTHING AT ALL. Suicide sound's more fun than this game.
Not Enough Pancakes;-;Ruined my life 10/10
shot_ods;-;Ruined my life, and my will to play any other games. 10/10.
Sekai;-;a fun game with friends :D
Gma;-;My Main Enemies - Pignoy Please Ban Philippines From Playing Dota2
Dennis Stanistan;-;It took me 115 minutes to beat the first objective in this game which is to find the options menu, 10/10.
! Prongs CS Key 6400 , D2 8500;-;its a recomended
DEAD;-;This game has heroes.
never gonna let you down;-;Best apps to learn how to swear in Indonesian, Filipino and Russian!!
omean;-;Git gud plis.... 11/10  simulater 2014 10/10 Rage simulater 2015 11/10 Would bang... forget that last one... yea awk...
<blank>;-;the new drop system is not fair. I didn't get any drop from last two level ups whereas all m friends recieved good sets and items in drop
Moap #Migrating;-;DONT PLAY THIS GAME, THIS IS A BAD GAME
N7T~Nicoo7T;-;Love the game 100% But sad people like to bully and mock other people in-game and affect other people too -But still love the game (Y) 9.5/10
[UGL] CaspeR;-;I'll make it easy for you. This game is amazing! If you want to know why then keep reading. DOTA 2 is a completely free to play MOBA. The things that you can buy are mostly just for novelty or cosmetics for your heroes. There's no paying to win in this game. If you are interested in winning expect to put a lot of time in as this game has a STEEP learning curve. The good news is that this game is so popular that you won't have any trouble finding some game guides or youtube videos to help you out. Dota 2 is also one of the best Esports games out there currently. They have tournaments on a regular basis and you are able to watch them directly from in game! This game also has fantastic graphics and can run easily on most PCs. On top of that the game is developed by Valve so of course it has fantastic support both from them and the community. This without a doubt is one of the best games available today. Did I mention it was free? Read more game reviews at www.unitedgaminglegion.com
MonaSodaBikarbona;-;Teaches you how to curse in russian. 10/10
Lee;-;This game is stupid
WolferS;-;Good Game Rate Up +
Rhino;-;Friends? Hah! Family? Lel. If you are going to achieve anything in life, you invest 2000 hours in this coming of age game about a boy trying to find out who he is by looking into his dead fathers past. And they said Crack was good for you. Worth the 99.99 I paid. Yes of No.
Greed;-;Worst game I've ever seen, just because of their players.
Intendi;-;This is a magnet for  and russians, or is that the same thing?  you valve, great matchmaking as allways.
Shoul;-;One of the best MOBA game ever
mugolmaniak;-;Its hard, its addictive, had to quit.
A Judgemental Waifu;-;This game creates an astonishing level of rivalry between two friends. I was at the company of my friend whilst we played some jolly Dota 2. When we was contacted by a wild Russian, then another and so forth. We fealt threatened so I used all that i had in my power to fight back against the Russian scourge. With a twisted grin and keg of ale, the Dapper Whale clicked report. Again and again on each Russian within my grasp, my grin was growing crooked. Now stretching across from cheek to cheek. I began to laugh and squeal with delight. At the power that was bestowed upon me. Imaging what i could do with this button, first i will report the Russians, THEN America, why stop there i might even attack China! I had reported every teamate but one. My friend. With a wry smile, and a cackle i whispered one utterance to my friend through a messenger pigeon called "Skype" With a click and a report i felt that my work here was done and the game had lost all enterainment value for the day. So i exited the game and now i'm in low prio for another ing week because i refused to play with Russians because the language filter dosen't ing work.
duckinabag;-;DotA 2. One of the finest MOBA's to date. From a background of StarCraft, LoL and HoN - without playing the original DotA, my expectations for it were slim as I refused to see what valve, through DotA, could bring new to the genre. However what I see in DotA is a refined version of previous MOBAs' with new strategic and tactical decisions, rather than the spamming of all your skills hotkeys and your heroes auto attack, what DotA does is realise what items benefit you and your team as you try to destroy the enemy's ancient. Also including a concept of denying your own creeps, towers and items which adds a whole new dynamic to the game. However what DotA fails to achieve is consistency. Just like other MOBA's it updates and refreshes the game to keep players coming back, but when this update is applied the game breaks down instead of growing stronger. This includes' the shutdown of all servers for hours or days with the odd chance you get into a match but fail to have good game as your ping is at 1000ms. However, for a daily shutdown every couple of months is the price to pay for a great time which has recently became free to play. DotA's community is also the most rewarding with players being able to become pro and play their favourite game for money to benefit acclaim fame it also allows designers to create customisables for heroes that can get into the game if it is voted up by the community itself. However the community in-game can be irritating at first but you can make friends and have a laugh. In conclusion with its small problems', DotA is my preferred MOBA and I will continue to play it until the apocalypse. 9/10
Coach Boyardee;-;It will consume your life. You will never play any other game. You will stop talking to your friends and family. You will stop eating, drinking, and going to the bathroom. If you do not value any of these things, this game is for you.
Trinity;-;Was meathooked by invisible Pudge. 420/69.
lame.;-;DotA is life. 'Nuff said.
Necromann;-;Okay, lets begin with the most important Part: This Game is NOT in ANY way Pay to win. All you CAN buy is Cosmetics (skin parts for Heroes, like hats, shoes, Weapons and so on, new skins/models for your Courier, narrators or HUD skins) You think that is nice? Wait, best is coming: You get these Items for FREE! No way? Than let me explain: You have a chance of getting a Item after every match you play(against other players, or against Bots in the Koop mode), but thats not all. You gain something called "battlepoints" and it is Basicly a experience, BUT if you lvl up, the ONLY thing that happens is: You get an Item for free! So you have a chance of getting a Item after every Match AND a item after every lvl up....yes it stacks and you can get 2 items after just 1 game! So not only is it free to play, but you get the things you can buy for free! If that is not awesome, i dont know what is! So, we got the Pay concept, now lets talk about Gameplay and than Community. Dota 2 is a Strategie Game, sub class - Moba -> Multiplayer Online Battle Arena That means, that you have Control over your Hero as if in a Strategie Game(top down view), you control a Hero you selected in the first place ( out of 104 Heroes if i remember right) You start the Game with no buffing equipment(so skins you have to equip too, but they dont "buff" you in any way, other than you are better looking) and some starting Gold. You than have to choose where you gonna go (one of the 3 "lanes" or "paths" that connect your Area with the Enemys) After the timer run out(1 minute) the Game begins, and Soldiers of both opposite Teams spawn. These are non Hero creatures, that give less experience and Gold than a Hero, but are way easier to kill. Now you and your enemys kill each others Soldiers(and each other) and try to progress faster than the opponent, to basicly crush the enemys base(where the Soldiers spawn and you resurect after you die) I will not go more in Detail about the Gameplay, because it is way to much to explain. Lets instead talk about the Community. The Dota 2 Community is not better or worse than any other Community i would say. You have the spammer/scammers, but it is easy to just ignor list them. You have the people who are frendly and Help you if they can(even if they themself dont know much) and you have the people who are rude. This can have many reasons, but i would suggest to Ignor them for the most part. Just remember everybody can have a bad day so just ignor his flame and enjoy the Game as much as you can. I would recommend Koop-Bot Matches after finishing the toturial, till you manage to have a Positive score against the Hardest Bots. If you do so you should: 1. Get enough experience with many Heroes, so you know what they can do(skills) 2.Get to know the different (at least 3 out of) 5 roles 3. Know where to buy the different Items 4. How the Jungle and the Rune system Works 5. Get some reflexes you may not have in the first place You will lvl up and progress your Gameplay if you do so, but dont worry: If you dont play against other Players in the Normal matchmaking, you will not get to play against more Profesional Players. You will be Playing against new People mostly who dont have as much experience as you have, and you can adjust your Gamestyle(because there are differences if you play vs Bot or Humans) So i hope you know know what this Game is about. I love this Game and have over 1000 Hours of Gameplay(think it is somewhere at 1300 at the moment), i recommend it highly and I believe that is the Best MOBA out there right know. Ladys and Gentleman, it was a honor for me. sincerely Necromann
bobo pls;-;3,000+ hours on dota and this is my 3rd steam account. and i've been playing dota 1 for 3x the hours i've spent on dota2. if you're looking to ruin your life, 10/10 would recommend!
Hazel Grace;-;Very good game Must play it...
meemomeemo;-;If you're looking for a good, visually appealing and challenging game, perhaps you like League of Legends a lot but you're looking for a new game? Then this is for you. I personally like this a whole lot more than League. Dota 2 has all of the things League of Legends is missing, like couriers and a stash. It's free and the costumizables are a huge bonus, just like in TF2 with all the hats. Although it might be hard in the beginning, if you stick to it I'm sure you'll find many hours of fun, and to add one last thing: it's best played with friends!
Rocx;-;When I first started DOTA2 I was a little overwhelmed, as my first ARTS/MOBA game it was pretty complicated. I soon started to pick up the mechanics like last hitting and denying. Before I knew it, I was performing  and better. I stopped making silly  and  got vastly better at not  the enemy . For the  part, everyone I've met was very helpful and , there  the   however. As  - play DOTA2    ,  ,     .      !
Christopher;-;It will drain your soul. In a bad way.
Pakalu Papito;-;Because of dota 2 i fail school Because of dota 2 i dont eat Because of dota 2 i dont sleep Because of dota 2 i need rehab If you wanna play dota, prepare uranus
:D;-;very nice game epic GMAE!
Kloetee;-;Teaches me russian every day, for free! Try it!
FrozenCoffee;-;This game is a good and exciting game to play, but unfortunately I suck at it...
A9.NyxBack;-;Good game,where your team feed and love your mom..:D
Sweet Pitta tea at Mcdonalds;-;This is an exact copy of Mario kart 8
cancer.;-;its better to never play this "game"
COG.Jukes of Hazzard;-;Where a large majority of the team fights are in the chat.
Yoshino;-;Play this and you will be the juke master.
PandAssassin;-;Picked this game up the other day, not too bad.
@bu;-;this game make you very addicted and cant get away from front of your pc so dont touch this game if you just usuall gamers
Pness;-;This game is unbalanced, riot fix pls
Awang;-;team work game
-PICADOR-;-;Helped me realise that it's not hard to hate people. Took all my money and friends. But aleast I got...oh wait, you gain nothing from this game. Would reccomend
Basil the Moor;-;Interested in being horribly abused? Interested in knowing your demise but being forced to watch it slowly approaching? Do you like micromanaging and understand that multiplayer games aren't for fun? Well, look no further! An online community of arrogant, abusive and autistic nerds is waiting for YOU!
Fishpig;-;It's ok
Hawkeye Drake;-;Not League of Legends.
lubacos;-;with original dota , best game ever easy !
GeT 7ucKiNg R3cT;-;not a childs game
Cing_iwil;-;I like this game because I feel more alive when playing this game
Facefull Void;-;Everyone is incredibly predjudiced to Supports... "YOU'RE A SUPPORT! YOU DON'T NEED LAST HITS" "IDC THAT I HAVE MONEY FOR A COURIER! IT'S YOUR JOB" "YOU'RE SUPPOSED TO STAND BACK!!! NOT COME AND FIGHT THINGS" "YOU DONT NEED THAT REGEN RUNE! I WANTED IT" "WHY DIDN'T YOU USE YOUR CLARITY ON ME!?!?!!" "YOU SHOULD'VE USED YOUR HEALING SALVE ON ME!" "I WAS GOING TO KILL THAT GUY! YOU STOLE HIM FROM ME"
DO;-;What this game costs in terms of money: Nothing at all What this game actually costs: Your time, your soul, your self esteem, and your relationships. But for that price you learn Russian, Portugese and Brazilian. Fair trade, /10 would play again
templar85;-;this is the best game!!!!!
[F.I.L] Chance the Rapper;-;Super awesome game. All the coke I've snorted to stay awake and keep playing is testament to how awesome it is. Fun to an infinite power. 10/10
Hazel Grace;-;Very good game Must play it...
Zantetsuken;-;Try out this game, it's so much fun! ( ^^ c)
Trinity;-;Was meathooked by invisible Pudge. 420/69.
lame.;-;DotA is life. 'Nuff said.
Necromann;-;Okay, lets begin with the most important Part: This Game is NOT in ANY way Pay to win. All you CAN buy is Cosmetics (skin parts for Heroes, like hats, shoes, Weapons and so on, new skins/models for your Courier, narrators or HUD skins) You think that is nice? Wait, best is coming: You get these Items for FREE! No way? Than let me explain: You have a chance of getting a Item after every match you play(against other players, or against Bots in the Koop mode), but thats not all. You gain something called "battlepoints" and it is Basicly a experience, BUT if you lvl up, the ONLY thing that happens is: You get an Item for free! So you have a chance of getting a Item after every Match AND a item after every lvl up....yes it stacks and you can get 2 items after just 1 game! So not only is it free to play, but you get the things you can buy for free! If that is not awesome, i dont know what is! So, we got the Pay concept, now lets talk about Gameplay and than Community. Dota 2 is a Strategie Game, sub class - Moba -> Multiplayer Online Battle Arena That means, that you have Control over your Hero as if in a Strategie Game(top down view), you control a Hero you selected in the first place ( out of 104 Heroes if i remember right) You start the Game with no buffing equipment(so skins you have to equip too, but they dont "buff" you in any way, other than you are better looking) and some starting Gold. You than have to choose where you gonna go (one of the 3 "lanes" or "paths" that connect your Area with the Enemys) After the timer run out(1 minute) the Game begins, and Soldiers of both opposite Teams spawn. These are non Hero creatures, that give less experience and Gold than a Hero, but are way easier to kill. Now you and your enemys kill each others Soldiers(and each other) and try to progress faster than the opponent, to basicly crush the enemys base(where the Soldiers spawn and you resurect after you die) I will not go more in Detail about the Gameplay, because it is way to much to explain. Lets instead talk about the Community. The Dota 2 Community is not better or worse than any other Community i would say. You have the spammer/scammers, but it is easy to just ignor list them. You have the people who are frendly and Help you if they can(even if they themself dont know much) and you have the people who are rude. This can have many reasons, but i would suggest to Ignor them for the most part. Just remember everybody can have a bad day so just ignor his flame and enjoy the Game as much as you can. I would recommend Koop-Bot Matches after finishing the toturial, till you manage to have a Positive score against the Hardest Bots. If you do so you should: 1. Get enough experience with many Heroes, so you know what they can do(skills) 2.Get to know the different (at least 3 out of) 5 roles 3. Know where to buy the different Items 4. How the Jungle and the Rune system Works 5. Get some reflexes you may not have in the first place You will lvl up and progress your Gameplay if you do so, but dont worry: If you dont play against other Players in the Normal matchmaking, you will not get to play against more Profesional Players. You will be Playing against new People mostly who dont have as much experience as you have, and you can adjust your Gamestyle(because there are differences if you play vs Bot or Humans) So i hope you know know what this Game is about. I love this Game and have over 1000 Hours of Gameplay(think it is somewhere at 1300 at the moment), i recommend it highly and I believe that is the Best MOBA out there right know. Ladys and Gentleman, it was a honor for me. sincerely Necromann
bobo pls;-;3,000+ hours on dota and this is my 3rd steam account. and i've been playing dota 1 for 3x the hours i've spent on dota2. if you're looking to ruin your life, 10/10 would recommend!
J9;-;nice game make me addicted, challenged me to play agains the other great player
Deimos Adesko;-;What is Dota 2?  A welcoming community, where everyone is so kind, that they are even ready to take care of your relatives, especially your dear mother.  9/10 players are always ready to play with you  A very multicultural community. It literally erases the borders between genders, nations, ages, anything. Just like in real life, you can meet foreigners anywhere.  Has a lot of mini-games within such as: King of the Hill, Hot Rapier (a Dota 2 version of "Hot potato"), Hide and Seek, Base Race and many others.  Experienced players are always ready to teach you how to play. Always.
Mechanarchy;-;If you play with your friends it is fun.If you play with Russians... well gg
Charmander;-;If new to MOBA's: One of the best MOBA's out there if not the best. To make an un-biased opinion as a faithful Dota player, ever since the Warcraft 3 custom map, Dota is hard to learn at first and expect other players to flame you if you're new and you join in the matchmaking fray. If a friend of yours dragged you into this life-draining game, or if you're a girl, most likely your boyfriend (because he needs a support), worry not! There is a coaching system for new players to be guided by their Steam friends and a very thorough tutorial at the start which I could not emphasise any more but to complete. Trust me, it may seem like a long tutorial but after awhile you'd realise that it really isn't as much and it was worth doing - plus it saves you from other players flaming you. Oh, and always pick Sniper. Sniper is life. Sniper is love. Or Viper, use Viper. If coming from League of Legends: It's just like the LoL 3-lane 5v5 matchmaking map with different game modes which you should be familiar with after awhile. Unlike League of Legends, in Dota 2 all the heroes are balanced in-game and no external bonuses are given to them if you buy cosmetics (pay2win) such as runes but they do make your heroes (champions) look good and gives you that good feeling that you're supporting the eSports pro-scene. Here in Dota 2, the meta-game is similar: jungling, supporting, wards, carries, towers (turrets), etc. and you'll learn these as you go by just as you did in LoL. In this game, you also get to deny creeps (minions), heroes, and towers to rob enemy heroes of their exp or possible gold and that, in my opinion is a big quality which new Lol-to-Dota2 transferees don't realise. Now unless you've been living under the rock like Patrick, you'd realise that there's a huge hate factor between LoL and Dota 2 players. Just don't listen to them, they're immature. A big difference between LoL and Dota 2's meta-game is how LoL relies more on skillshots while Dota 2 relies on strategy - this you'd agree upon if you're not like the immature fanboys/fangirls of each side. On the other note, just give the game a shot, seriously. This review is an attempt to making an un-biased personal opinion on the game but however much someone tells you how good or bad a game is shouldn't affect your personal likes and dislikes. Although personally, I would recommend this. Hope to welcome a new player to the Dota 2 community soon! And if you ever feel like raging - keep calm, relax. It's just a game.
NippleLicker2000;-;play this game for 24hours per day. 7days per week. And your father will not consider you as his son anymore.
Cpt. Prinny's bizarre adventure;-;ed up my life Thumb up
Shadow Shaymin;-;Magic and ACTUAL teamwork in a stunning MOBA that provides a refreshing game genre for someone who has played mostly FPS (mainly me).
SkrubbyNosetradamus;-;the best game i ever played! >:)
WutFace;-;really good game but takes all your time but i strongly advise if you're a gamer with so much time to waste :D
Anal Devastator  (   );-;There are alot to say about Dota (Defenders of the Ancients).It's a remake of the "old" Dota mod for Warcraft. Actually i could say that the transition from Dota->Dota 2 gameplay was amazing,they didn't forgot a single thing and added even more than original Dota.The game got amazingly cool graphics and a great Soundtrack.The menu organisation are very simply and easy to understand to all new players.Valve really cares about your learning in Dota2 so they've made a "Learning" page where they "teach" you how to play better by making you a recommendation of the best items (Dota 2 have in stores always recommended items for you to purchase for each hero),because Dota 1 didn't had that option,so you need to now by your experience what to buy.They have videos where they show you each skill of each hero and it does.If you also want you can play with tips in your game if you need more help and also ask a more "professional" player to teach you (it's called coach),he will spectate your game and make you tips. The gameplay is amazing,i love it because it's very realistic and logic (dota 2 got a lot of logic,instead mobas like lol don't have).The art of Heroes are sorry but i'll repeat it,are amazing,everything is amazing in dota (almost) xD Still dota got some problems that need to be corrected: 1st-The community.Dota 2 community is full of stupid noobish kids,who don't know how to play and don't even learn how to play,and when you say them don't feed or other item,they'll always say to you fuc...you,noob,i've fuc.. your mother...(typical answer of russian 12 y.o kids). 2-Some updates that don't needed to be done (like removing the pudge fountain hook,because it had a lot of logic....and they removed it).but nevermind to this. 3-I can't tell you if Dota2 still got many bugs or not,but i notice that they still have a few,like shop bug where you can't buy items. 4-Servers.I don't know why but it's normal to have the servers down in dota2,and sometimes in the game will appear "Searching for Dota2 Network",don't know why this happens but probably their servers can't hold so much people?(my opinion). So yeah thats pretty what i've wrote.I hope you play this game and like it and enjoy as i do. Good Luck & Have Fun :)
DiAnnE_.');-;please pick a support and it will be a good game for us... xD
Artemwhite;-;That game stole my friend
The Anal Avenger;-;Dota 2 is a fast-paced first person shooter with some RPG elements mixed in. In all my years of playing indie games, I have never seen a better real time strategy game. For a space travel simulator, its lacking in rocketships, but overall, it is one of the greatest zombie survival game on the market. If you could possibly desire a better game, then you should think about purchasing Drake of the 99 Dragons. Both it and Dota 2 share many similarites.
I <3 my Duck;-;I love this game ))) especially when there are events and bonus XP ))) reccomended to all of my friends some of tham started to play ))) my favorite heroes are supports who are nuckers and pushers )))) I highly reccomend this game to people of different types , for tanky natures , for passive and for aggresisive players )) for those who love strategy and enjoy teamfights )))
huffyheeks;-;Press R to win games.
THE King Weeb;-;There are no side effects to playing this great MOBA. Side effects may include: Loss of social interactions Lack of sleep Less functional motor skills Extreme ammounts of teamwork Competativeness to another level of extremeness Feeling like a total badass Death by hunger Buy now.
A9.NyxBack;-;Good game,where your team feed and love your mom..:D
[AHU] Roma;-;This game has completely taken over my life, but in a good way. Great stragety game, great graphics, great characters, just such an amazing game.
Matt. @StrikeBack;-;This game is clearly a great game on the Steam Store and its free to play....What else can I say? SOMETIMES online is smooth, depends on wifi connection and your opponents wifi too. The games not noob-friendly but you gotta get the hang of the damn game, they have something called practice and youtube guides. Yeah i'd definetely freaking reccomend this game no matter what. Its very addictive especially once you get the hang of it. My favorite characters are Sven and Zeus, they're pretty good. I personally think Ursa and Sniper are overused, So you may wanna use some underused characters like Death Prophet! >:D Have fun playing! If you see me online gimme a Haiiiii ;D (Note: Im an average Dota2 player. Im not an expert nor a noob. You have been warned.) ;3
Tragic Johnson;-;Listen here, you uncouth curs. This a game about "heroes." Not "champions," HEROES. They go around and do crazy  like hit each other with magic and , all high fantasy nonsense. Look here man, I watched some lady dressed all in black two shot a ing god, where else can you find this level of ludicrosity!? WHERE?! On top of that, this game goes way back. It has like, an established culture and if you don't follow it, you will be ostrascized as if this were ing Sydney. That was a lame  joke but it makes sense because where else would find a rat- ostrich than Australia?! WHERE?! All you need to know is that words like "" and "blat" are some of the finest praise that you can get in this game, and feel free to use them when you see an invoker drop an EMP or when you look at the shop and look all lost and confused. You will fit in just fine. But what the  do I know? I just play wtf mode with my one really cool friend and this other guy who I really dont like to be seen in public with. I was not on any narcotics while writing this review...honest.
Kudryavka;-;Recommended!
<font face="impact">koffee;-;what i like about this game is that its really easy to play compare to dota1...the hero's in dota1 that you cant play, you can play here..what i mean is that you can easily memorize coz the easy controls... the graphics, features and most of all you each hero here you can dress them...lol
Snake on tiger Claws;-;This game is super
Techies for 4th of July;-;Game sucks no kill streak rewrads dont play it
mocka;-;Best Ever Game, I Love This Game.
< panda >;-;play with fun
ZetaKitsune;-;Well it's got a brick wall as a learning curve, and a not very cohesive tutorial; I still cannot figure out how to jump. But once you finally start to get a grasp of the game you realize that the community is horrendous, not only will they yell at you but 20% of the time they won't even understand your language! Overall all the non-game mechanics mechanics are stupidly terrible. 10/10
Enchanted Mando;-;I used to be a healthy and contributing member of society until I encountered Dota 2. The moment I started playing it, I thought to myself "Wow.", "This is it.", "The game that will finally do what no other can." I was right, ever since I played Dota 2, my family has disowned me, I lost my job, my girlfriend dumped me, and I was left by my dog. Instead of talking civilly to other human beings like I used to, I now simply scream expletives at them without even looking. I no longer have to remember purposeless numerics such as my social security number, my cellphone number, my age, and even the number of children I have. Before I played Dota 2, I thought I can measure my life's worth with useless factors such as my income, quality of living, or contribution to society, but now I know the truth and realize how foolish I was, Dota 2 taught me the true meaning of living, that is, one's MMR, the one thing that separates 7k gods from other 1k scrub trash. After Dota 2, I have never looked at life the same way again. 10/10
Trade bot #257;-;You should buy some hats.
i59;-;Quite possibly the most awesome game ever.
Raventhekid;-;Very good tool to learn new words, such as , , , and . Very easy way to learn to immitate an accent, such as russian 12 year old! "Suk mai deek noop". All of this at the low low price of your social life, family and faith in others. overall, 11/10 it's ok. - IGN
[Insert Name Here];-;If you are willing to waste hundres or even thousands of hours of your life playing the same map and the same heroes over and over and over again only to be flamed by your team in russian then this is the game for you!
9'Play.Stif3r;-;i like this Dota 2 playing!!!!
BANGBANG;-;very very good game and addicted so much in this game nice!
switch;-;i gotta say if i said there was ever a better game id be lying 2/10
holographic meatloaf;-;Good game. Very challenging. Has a lot of ups and downs. Huge learning curve at around 50 hours worth of gameplay.
hehehehe;-;you can play as a pirate i mean i never have myself but i know you can
Inaba Himeko;-;Its fun but always remember one wrong move and you're dead.
2EZ4MRTZ;-;Dota 2 is better than league of legends and other
Shadow Shaymin;-;Magic and ACTUAL teamwork in a stunning MOBA that provides a refreshing game genre for someone who has played mostly FPS (mainly me).
SkrubbyNosetradamus;-;the best game i ever played! >:)
<font face="impact">koffee;-;what i like about this game is that its really easy to play compare to dota1...the hero's in dota1 that you cant play, you can play here..what i mean is that you can easily memorize coz the easy controls... the graphics, features and most of all you each hero here you can dress them...lol
Flambe'd Frick-Frack;-;Brought to you by the directors of "The Complete Works of Shakespeare - Abridged", Dota 2 is the story of a lifetime. Based on the in-game universe from "Halo - Combat Evolved", follow Ezio and friends as they traverse modern-day Iraq.
Snake on tiger Claws;-;This game is super
Lawlum Bawlum;-;same as it was in Warcraft III game made up of eliteists
Danz the Stupid Buttface;-;In mother russia, we dont use phone to talk to people in other country, we use dota.
Mineski Event Team;-;Well Been playing this for almost 2.7k hours definitely the best moba for me. Cons - sea server or dota 2 community always crash with the new event/patch I still recommend it
LXZ;-;this is game full Strategy and this game into category MOBA , and please play this game and u will get a big fun from this game :)
Aidan is on holidays;-;Absolutely outstanding strategy game, although it can get very annoying. It is really addictive. And I almost do better than the Russians Almost...
Never Give Up Bitch!!!;-;it is cool
Aidan is on holidays;-;Absolutely outstanding strategy game, although it can get very annoying. It is really addictive. And I almost do better than the Russians Almost...
Never Give Up Bitch!!!;-;it is cool
Mineski Event Team;-;Well Been playing this for almost 2.7k hours definitely the best moba for me. Cons - sea server or dota 2 community always crash with the new event/patch I still recommend it
Jano;-;I like this game very much it keeps my stress away
THE King Weeb;-;There are no side effects to playing this great MOBA. Side effects may include: Loss of social interactions Lack of sleep Less functional motor skills Extreme ammounts of teamwork Competativeness to another level of extremeness Feeling like a total badass Death by hunger Buy now.
2EZ4MRTZ;-;Dota 2 is better than league of legends and other
Durkle;-;Do you want ing cancer? Then play Dota.
holographic meatloaf;-;Good game. Very challenging. Has a lot of ups and downs. Huge learning curve at around 50 hours worth of gameplay.
hehehehe;-;you can play as a pirate i mean i never have myself but i know you can
Inaba Himeko;-;Its fun but always remember one wrong move and you're dead.
The Notorious A.N.D;-;i wanted to play a game so i played this but i didnt know what was going on so i didnt play
MAMA.Apple;-;Banana usually play this game but he never get pro
DOTL;-;My favorite game ever, I have wasted most of my life with the Warcraft 3 DotA. Now I will waste the rest of it with DotA 2 100000000000/10 Would play forever.
Classy Hat Dog;-;Fantastic game!! Hands down the best free to play game on Steam!
Scrubs.Shrek.MtDew;-;>Lost my friends >Failed my degree >Parents disowned me >Became homeless >Play dota on laptop in  internet cafe 11/10
711.HyperX;-;Nice game and graphic :D
-PICADOR-;-;Helped me realise that it's not hard to hate people. Took all my money and friends. But aleast I got...oh wait, you gain nothing from this game. Would reccomend
Basil the Moor;-;Interested in being horribly abused? Interested in knowing your demise but being forced to watch it slowly approaching? Do you like micromanaging and understand that multiplayer games aren't for fun? Well, look no further! An online community of arrogant, abusive and autistic nerds is waiting for YOU!
Fishpig;-;It's ok
Spooky Skeleton;-;It's like Skyrim but with imba heroes.
Andedu;-;How to Properly Play the Game Step 1: Open Dota 2 and jump straight into matchmaking in Russia, it is multi-functional as you can learn Dota 2 AND Russian racial slurs Step 2: Pick the coolest looking character you can find Step 3: After you picked Meepo, head to the middle lane Step 4: Die to the enemy, it shall boost their morale to make them more reckless Step 5: Keep dying, it probably will pay off Step 6: At the 15 minute mark, buy the courier that everybody has been swearing about Step 7: Click on the courier Step 8: AHA! YOU CLICKED ON THE COURIER! Now, you will forever be a Donkey, in the midst of your confusion, bravely clop to the battlefield Step 9: After much "wtf", blame the support for being a noob to keep your reputation intact Step 10: After you lost the match, head towards to the store and buy everything you can to improve. Cooler looking stuff should probably buff your character, right? Step 11: Get mistaken for a pro due to your accessories Step 12: Repeat steps 4, 5, 9, and 10 until you lose your soul Step 13: Sue Valve to calm your emotional distress
KickYourFace;-;A great game filled with action and strategy. Takes a very long time to learn, longer to master. After 700 hours I still cant play each hero, and havent mastered quite all of the advanced mechanics. You must play this game for 50-100 hours before you can even think about deciding if its a game for you. It is very competetive, and sensitive people will not enjoy it. You will be insulted, a lot. If you get to a high lvl and have played many matches like me, you wont be paired up with Peruvians or Russian quite as much, but at the beginning there will be someone who doesnt speak English (in a U.S. English server) and they will most likely suck and lose the game for you. There will be heros that will wreck you every game until you (and those idiots you call allies) learn how to play against them. Even after all the hardships, I'm still playing this game. Those 700 hours? I found this game 6 months ago, 500 of those hours only on the weekends, even with school. It's a fun game, but people suck. Enjoy
- B l  C K ^;-;Nice game
banta09;-;Who knew a game could ruin so many people's lives? 10/10
Memelord Bena, Master Yolomancer;-;A game of wits, friendships, rivalries and yelling at insta-lock carries; This game does indeed have a steeper learning curve than its rival League of Legends, but in my opinion, it's far more interesting. If you don't already have it, then you should try to get into the beta. If you do have it, then you should play it. With me. I'm lonely. :(
Christine <3;-;yes i like the graphic of this game but im having a hard time to learn this game. but i dont lose hope. good game
1cemaniac;-;This is a game which has taken hundreds of hours out of many people's lives. It is a strtergy gae where, from a bird's eye view you will fight the enemy team seeking to destroy their ancient/base. I would recommend it for anyon who likes stratergy games and doesn't hate people. If you want a truely amazing game, for free, this is for you.
Kamon;-;10/10 make me lose all my freinds and all forms of social life, and it helped me learn the many different servers that russia owns and the language of the motherland
Sweet Pitta tea at Mcdonalds;-;This is an exact copy of Mario kart 8
cancer.;-;its better to never play this "game"
Help;-;this good
Fredda;-;This game taught me about the diversity of cultures that our small little corner of the universe offers. Then it taught me to hate them all.
Chrome;-;Side effects include: -Hatred of other humans -Lack of trust in others -Carpal Tunnel -Improved hand eye coordination -A large ego -Weight gain -Weight loss -Confidence -Despression -Extreme Racism -EXTREME RACISM -Increased strategic thinking capabilities -Mushy-brain syndrome -Subconsciously learning a new language -Subconsciously learning to hate the culture of said language -Literally every ailment that is not a transmitable disease 9/10 Doctors accepted this game on their recommendation list, but the tenth was afk
Grizzt;-;It's like roulette; fun until it turns into Russian.
psych0tic;-;Causes anxiety problems, low self esteem, Tourette's syndrome, mood swings, Bipolar disorder, breakdown of relationships, raging erections, racism. Would definitely recommend.
Sentimental Oriental;-;In Dota 2, Not many people speak your language. Not many people play well. Not many people talk nicely. Not many people work as a team. But if you find people that do... You'll have the most fun you've ever had.
Kyubashi;-;And you thought real life was a struggle.
ephir;-;I only played a little but it was fun.
Captain Obvious;-;Things I gave to DotA: 1. Money 2. Time 3. Love Things DotA gave me: 1. Arthritis 2. Carpal tunnel syndrome 3, Hatred of Russians, Mexicans, Spanish, Finnish, and Russians 4. Broken keyboard 5. Broken mouse 6. 9/10 ready 7. Server crashes 8. 4 stacks of Russians in EUW servers on English prefrence settings 9. Ranked matches 10. Free to play but Pay to win games (I.E. - Foreseer's contract, New Bloom 2015) 11. "It's in the bag" spam (especially Skywrath) 12. Multilingual cursing - I guess this is a good thing? 13. Split second math - Reliable/Unreliable gold and gold loss on death vs. Buyback availability - This is good too Essentially - DotA is a greedy woman, but I love her all the same. 11 / 10 would play again
HekaDooM;-;"THE PUB SUPPORT" "Where are wards?" The pub Carry demanded. "I placed them and they were countered" the Support began, "I am trying to juggle giving you complete lane farm, protecting you and harrassing the enemy while saving to buy more, also possibly sentries to remove their-" "UP COUR PLS" the mid hero politely added. "Give Savle" The Carry demanded. "Certainly." replies the support, using the salve on the Carry who subsequently ran headlong into an enemy creepwave. "So where is mek?" the Carry said, after he was ganked due to overextending. The Support died saving him and was treated to a rather enthusiastic series of map pings on his corpse. "Again, having not even enough to buy boots as well as wards, I don't think a 7 minute Mek is viable." The Support replies. "Haha look your level, so low, noob" the Carry retorted. "U have no item xaxa". "Well, jungle gold and experience through stacking and pulling with blocked camps is nowhere near as much as on lane which I attempted to give you, the carry, the priority over." The Carry is subsequently ganked again at the enemy tower, oblivious to the enemy tp that the Support moved away from. "Report Support, usless" The carry cried in allchat, in between mentioning various aspects of the Support's Mother's anatomy. "Instead of reporting and acting like that, why don't you try supporting for randoms sometime instead of instapicking a carry?" the Support asked, as he watched the Carry return to afk-lasthitting lane creeps. "HAH, support is for noskill noobs like you!"
flanadlivv;-;One day, a wise man intoduce me into this game. "it shall protect your virginity, my lad" he said.
HG;-;As a "newbish" moba player i have to say, Dota 2 is an excellent game. I learned most of the basics of mobas through it. The tutorials are well made (thank you Valve), The heros are interesting and well made and the way you can customize them through items you can buy from the store or steam marketplace. The community is mostly not toxic and i've enjoyed it. As most of non-moba players whine about it being repetitive, it's not. There are a lot of different teams of heros you can have in a match just like in League of Legends. I guess you thought that i won't talk about League of Legends? You were wrong. Both games have their own unique that might have some similarities champions/heros, both have the same type of map layout (which is what i like), Both are free to play and fun to play. Dota 2 might have some things that might make it more harder to master but practice makes you better. Couldn't we all just play our own games and not fight about which one is better. Both have their good and bad parts. I give this game an 8/10
Durkle;-;Do you want ing cancer? Then play Dota.
Slein;-;Literally the worst game i have ever played
Fishy;-;1,400 hours in the game gimmie my life back could of bought a car a house gotten a girl friend had babies babies had babies could of been a grandpa but no i play dota and i play pudge
*Blank*;-;After 5 minutes I found myself sitting staring crosseyed at the screen clicking on anyone who was red. Gameplay consisted of constant clicking, with the occasional press of 'w' or 'q'.
Potato Sama;-;They said just try it, now I'm in too deep Best RPG Strategy or something like that :D
Slein;-;Literally the worst game i have ever played
Fishy;-;1,400 hours in the game gimmie my life back could of bought a car a house gotten a girl friend had babies babies had babies could of been a grandpa but no i play dota and i play pudge
.aMazing.;-;I'll be a bit wierd and start with the bad stuff.... CONS : > Steep learning curve. > A bunch of your friends (probably) won't want to play it. > All the virtual hats/swords/hammers/staffs/animals cost either real money or a lot of time and effort. > People sometimes abandon games. This sucks. > Can't get off any time, you kinda need to finish games. > People look for servers for languages they don't speak. This also sucks. However.... PROS : > Once you know how to play, loads of fun. > Extremely replayable, I'm not bored yet and there's people with five times my hours played. > Getting a rampage (whole team kill) is literally the most rewarding thing you will ever do. Ever. > It's made by Valve. This means the largest collection of virtual hats/swords/hammers/staffs/animals of any game in the world is in Dota 2. > I have a flying panda. This is (apparently) important to the Dota 2 community. > Easy to find a server most times. > Teams are great, many funny people on the internet. > The tutorials teach you all the important mechanics and controls for starting. > Better than League or HoN. This is a fact. Unless you like League or HoN more. Then play those or something.....
*Blank*;-;After 5 minutes I found myself sitting staring crosseyed at the screen clicking on anyone who was red. Gameplay consisted of constant clicking, with the occasional press of 'w' or 'q'.
ChooMotherfucker\_()_/;-;wow many moba such skill very dota 2 much recommend amaze
Fpz;-;It worse than you think.
chico man;-;i hate this game and as a result of playing this game i realised just how much i hate my ing life too there's nothing left to live for also my dad left me when i was 12 and i like to play omniknight because he reminds me of my dad because he'd make all the pain go away similar to how omniknight does with his heal move and also my cat died last week and that was really sad and i have no friends too and like my cat was really my only friend or something and everyone thinks im a freak at school and they dont understand my cool haircut they make fun of it and like they all push me over and stuff and this one time all the bullies picked me up and put me in a garbage bin and this other time they set the classroom on fire then blamed it on me and i got in heaps of trouble and i was grounded for a whole year by my fukn mum who i suspect hates me and thinks im a waste of space i reckon she'd be happy if i necked myself which i might as well do hey i mean there's no real point going on any longer as im only a nuisance one time i got in trouble by the police cause i got really high and then smashed a car window but it was all just a cry for help and no one understands and i wont ever forget the look my mum gave me the kind of look where you know you have truly failed someone and that in that moment they have lost all love for you maybe ill join the army or something to escape my problems you know theres nothing like running away to solve your probems i mean it must of worked for my dad heybut yeah anyway
[SANDLE] jon;-;game is a big suck too much like lego legions and is an rip of off good james like dota 2
Kaneki;-;yes it is an awesome game
Abhi-wan-kenobhi;-;Don't ever EVER start playing this game. EVER.
Suscar;-;Dota 2 is the best strategy game ever!!!!!
AdmiralBulldong;-;10/10 you get to teekle things in the butt. Makes you want to violently strangle every russian/peruvian you come in contact with. 10/10
GAINStax;-;Do you like being reported by South Americans? Then Dota 2 is for you
lvc3;-;When I began high school I chose to study russian as my second language. However the language is very hard to master with complicated grammar and pronunciations. During my first year in school I only could reach a D in grade. Later on, my teatcher gave me tips to improve myself in Russian. She told me that next years course will be much harder and that I have to come in contact with the language on a daily basis to improve my Russian. Knowing that I like video games, she recommended me to play a game she usually plays. "In Russia everyone plays DOTA 2" she said. Obviously, I could not really belive that the whole Russian population plays a single game. But if the solution to my grade was video games, I would not complain. Desperate for anything to help my grade I gave DOTA 2 a chance. I loaded up on the Russian server, but all I found where a german open mic stack where talking to each other. It was very courious, how could possibly find no Russians on their own server? The following day I told my teatcher about my problem. Frankly, I was more than surprised by her answer. "Oh ,don't you know? Russians allways only play on the Eu west server" she said laughingly. Now this this truly seemed like a mystery worth investigating, why are Russians not playing on their own server? The answer I recieved from my teatcher made me only more confused. There seems not to exist an acceptable answer. I have tried to answer this question later on in life in my master's dissertation, but it's no use. Finding an acceptable answer to that question is like finding the meaning of life. Anyway, if you could ignore this issue and proceed with playing on EU West you will improve your Russian greatly like I did. Everyday after school,I played DOTA 2 on EU West. With each game my understanding for this complex game increased aswell as my Russian language skills. Thanks to DOTA 2 I have gotten a chanse to come across Russian in both speech and writing. This game is really spectacular if you; like me want to become better at Russian and have the time to play it. As for my grades in Russian I recived a B in 2 grade and A in my third when I started to spend a lot of time on DOTA 2.
Serpa;-;I've never really take the time to try and learn this game, but I hear from everyone it's a great game so I guess I'll take their word on it and recommend it myself.
69MolesterManLovesButtSex69<3;-;I'll rate this game 11/10 since I am genuinely attracted to this kind of game alone. :) I was 4 years old since I was playing Dota and Warcraft the expansion pack too. Dota in that day was kinda rubbish but it has it's unique style of playing aside from the game itself just been copied from another map. Dota2 is pretty much has introduced the new selection og games style, plus the game itself is packed up with good allocations and good formation but sadly other players tend to be salty and act like a boss. But I don't care almost all games has all those player. I or you could be one of them depending on the matter of discussion. Graphics are epic and the game style is hyper. (Y) Decent Game indeed.
Contemplative Panda;-;All I know from this game is screaming into my microphone in a rage both at myself, my team, and the enemy team. You should try it.
nickdunobruno;-;This game sorts out the weak from the strong. The weak continue playing. The strong uninstall it and never look back.
@Christiannmp;-;Its ok.
Flusha;-;Dieter is a cool guy.
- ForeveR -;-;i love this game! Easy to play and very easy to handle.
[DvM] dlrowpuekaw;-;Quick and simple overview: 4200 hrs logged + 400 second account. I gave this a thunbs down so people reading the negetive comments can get a more accruate description of issues and read the positives. Active players 10/10 Community 8/10 Game breaking issues bugs(none) 9/10 Enjoyment (MOBA) 10/10 Overall- 9/10 PROS: 1) *Rewards the player for the effort placed into the game.* Very challenging game to play/learn. How willing you are to do reserch(online) and sit in created games to practice combos/lh ect.. will dictate how well you will progress. 2) *Easy to jump right into with a group of friends.* If you have a group of friends that play it can be very fun to LEARN tegether. 3) **It is a competative enviroment** if you are a competative person this is the game for you. 4) **A lot of classes of heros to choose from** over 100. Although some are better then others every hero in the right/wrong situation can be very useful or bad. 5) **NOT A PAY TO WIN GAME**... Doesn't even nickle and dime you to death. You pay for HUDs, skins, loading screens ect; But, nothing that can affect how well players play or others. 6) **Dev's are quick to respond to issues on offical forums** They also fix them in a timly manner. CONS: 1) **A lot of reserch and guided practice is NEEDED to be decent at this game.** This might be a bummer for those who like to d/l and game and insta win.... If this is you stay away...far away 2) **The "guantlet" most mmr players need to go through".** This "guantlet" consist of other people players will be teamed up with that will troll, not speak your selceted language, or just not give a damn about your game. These people tend to ruin games and will hinder advancement in the MMR (ranked) or hidden mmr (un-ranked) system. The "guantlet" consist of the lower tiers usually low hidden mmr and 1-2.8k MMR area. It is possible to pass the guantlet but a lot of practice is needed or you can party with friends. 3) **Server Issues** Everynow and then they will have laggy servers or down networks randomly but a restart of steam or a bathroom break easily solves these uncommon issues.
Riot;-;Do not play this game. It is a bad game with arguably the worst community since YouTube comments.
KUCAK;-;After the new market rules, we can't even trade according to our will. After every half-an-hour there is an update to 50-100 mb, I think dota2 is not for playing, rather it is for updating.
[] Vandal;-;I've played this game since it was a mod for Warcraft, and I have to say, it's one of my favorite games. However, much like TF2, it has its fair share of problems. For starters, this game has a stupidly high learning curve. There's no one true way to play any of the 100+ heroes, and it can get very frustrating very fast trying to find what you can easily work with for any of them with the gigantic selection of items. Other than a small pool of heroes that I'm confident enough with to pick on a regular basis, the largest part of the roster is alien to me, with my success {or lack thereof, which is normally the case} depending largely on the skill level of the enemy team and my teammates. Which brings us to the next point. 90% of the people who play this game are stupid. Now, I don't claim to be good at this. I'm slightly above average at best. However, it's hard to play on anything outside of solo bot servers when you're constantly thrown in with stupid people, first timers, people who don't speak the server regions language, people who are only there to prance around in costumes, or don't want to follow simple orders/use common sense. Or any combination of the above. Meanwhile, you can rest assured that your opponents will almost always have their act together, and be an unstoppable force that you futilely try to at least hinder. Which is made even harder when your teammates insist on throwing themselves into unwinnable battles, further feeding them until the point where there's a 10+ level gap between you and the lowest leveled enemy. On the other hand, you might go up against a team that's super bad. As in, it's a game that lasts less than 20 minutes. In which case, you've learned nothing, and your time is wasted just as thoroughly as it would be against people out of your league. Or, on the occasion that you get teammates that know what they're doing, you can expect them to whine about your choice of hero, your starting items/abilities, your lane choice, or god forbid, your costume. At which point, 9/10 of these people will purposefully feed the enemy or go afk, and then either rage quit or stop when you've ceased your apparently unforgivable behavior. Or they might report you to try and get you thrown into low priority, which is Dota's equivalent of hell. And unlike TF2, you can't just drop out whenever you wish without taking a heavy penalty for doing so. So have fun being in matches where there will be almost no fun a majority of the time. Now, there is a report system, which in theory, is supposed to shoo away the vermin that don't need to be playing this in the first place. In practice, it's horribly broken, due to being automated. Doing amazingly good, but you're the odd man out in a Peruvian 4 stack that you've somehow managed to offend? Expect to have the low priority message pop up when you exit to the menu after the match. Or maybe you want to report that 0/25 Treant that refused to do his job, and started purposely dying to feed the enemy. The entire server could report him, but he could still easily slip through without getting lp. In all seriousness, it's down to luck if it does work when you want it to, and doesn't when it's being abused. Up next, hero balance. Thankfully, this isn't quite as bad as it could be, but there is still silliness here and there. Some heroes have one or two overpowered abilities, while others are all around unbalanced, and others still are in sore need of buffing. At the same time, some heroes are nicely balanced, but are easily outclassed by other heroes who can perform the same role, only much better and easier. Why pick Legion Commander and eventually out damage the enemy team using skill, when you can pick Ursa and out damage them from level 3 onwards and rarely have to press more than one button? Why pick Weaver and alternate between your 2 escapes when you can pick Storm Spirit and have an escape with no cooldown? Why pick Centaur Warrunner to be durable when you can pick Axe and not only be durable, but be so durable the lane gets locked down for your enemy? There's tons of examples like this. Also, you'll see some heroes almost every match, {Pudge, Sniper, Zeus, who all have skills that can be more or less mindlessly spammed/have low risk high reward play styles.} but lots are seen either rarely, or rarely outside of comp play {Io, Meepo, Dark Seer, who all take some degree of skill/have high risk decent reward play styles}. What it sadly boils down to is, why play a hero where you have more than 1 button to press and risk being overwhelmed but have a more rewarding experience, when you can pick a hero that more or less does the same thing, but with less complexity? As with TF2, Valve is slowly but surely turning this into another hat simulator. I played a ton of the original Dota, and I sure don't remember any customization, because that would have been silly. This game is hard enough without being distracted by someone's super pimped out loadout, or worrying if you're going to get a nice drop {if any, only 2-3 people usually get drops at the end of the round}. The main problem with character customization though, is that much like TF2, it attracts half wits that only want to play the super easy classes and dress them up, then look down on everyone else who isn't wearing a 20c wolf hat. Yeah, take your little wolf hat into a ranked match. See how they like it. Also like TF2, Valve focuses more on cosmetic items than the game itself, which started off small, but in recent months has led to them: 1. Canceling popular game modes, in order to {in their own words} 'focus more on cosmetic sets'. 2. Building entire game modes around expensive sets {although in fairness, said sets only enhanced the modes/tracked stats for them, but still...}, or just flat out making new modes pay to win {the Year Beast Brawl was p2w to the point that disgusting amounts of money and cheap tactics trumped genuine skill almost 100% of the time}. 3. Doing inane things like changing the perfectly fine models of heroes, and then using that as an excuse to make more money {Shadow Fiend's model was just fine, but then he got a redesign that looked like an angsty 12 year old made it, and a $35 cosmetic that looked like an even more angsty 10 year old designed it}. 4. Possibly the worst, outright ignoring critical server issues to focus on cosmetic item bugs. Overall, the game would be greatly improved if Valve would do the following things: 1. Mandatory region locking for everyone, to heavily cut down on the language barrier. 2. A proper {and required} tutorial for new players. 3. Rather than adding new cosmetics every week, finally adding the remaining heroes from the mod, as well as much needed balancing for all the heroes. As fun as this game is, I reccomend it to no one, other than someone willing to go through absolute misery to occasionally have fun.
@Christiannmp;-;Its ok.
Contemplative Panda;-;All I know from this game is screaming into my microphone in a rage both at myself, my team, and the enemy team. You should try it.
nickdunobruno;-;This game sorts out the weak from the strong. The weak continue playing. The strong uninstall it and never look back.
69MolesterManLovesButtSex69<3;-;I'll rate this game 11/10 since I am genuinely attracted to this kind of game alone. :) I was 4 years old since I was playing Dota and Warcraft the expansion pack too. Dota in that day was kinda rubbish but it has it's unique style of playing aside from the game itself just been copied from another map. Dota2 is pretty much has introduced the new selection og games style, plus the game itself is packed up with good allocations and good formation but sadly other players tend to be salty and act like a boss. But I don't care almost all games has all those player. I or you could be one of them depending on the matter of discussion. Graphics are epic and the game style is hyper. (Y) Decent Game indeed.
Kaneki;-;yes it is an awesome game
tuduloo~;-;I give this a  out of  madre. Never have i had such a concha ajajajaja kinda katka in my life
MatijaxD;-;This game has a flying donkey 10/10
"Gilang~;-;This is owesome game! u guys should try!
lim1t;-;The reason i'm a virgin
CptHoppy;-;At first I had a faint idea what a social life was. Then I played this game. help me.
lim1t;-;The reason i'm a virgin
yrn.Sexy_Chocolate_Minotaur;-;If Dota was a  with AIDS i would still  it. Kinda like Daniella.
[DD]Random;-;The most expensive free game I've ever played, has cost me my health, happiness and hope for the future of the human race. 10/10
AvuKamu;-;If you ever had to devote your life to one game, it'd probably be this one. And then you'd die of cancer at the age of 28. But who wants to live until they're 30 anyways?
Geru;-;this game is probably the worst i've ever played.... but i can't stop playing it. i think i need help...
StrangeConfectioner;-;I played for 4 hours ev day,i though that nothing could not be better,so enough of 800 hours and realized that this  for donaters created by THE GREATES GABE NEWELL!!!
Randy's M.I.A;-;Dota Ruined me. I hate the game but keep playing it.
Mangomancer;-;Everything that you need
burnedrobot;-;>insert LoL fanboy complaint
RIP MMR;-;One way to forget about pain is to do something that you will be in it completely.. so computer games.
Day Noctua;-;A game about 10 random fairy-tale heroes thrown into a merciless battle for survival and the protection of their Ancient, behind almost every hero there's a mighty russian who you can trust your life with. 10/10 over 6 russian servers to choose from all over the globe.
_1;-;This game is for trolls and russians. Play it!
Demon;-;The best game I've ever play before. Strategic, teamwork and Skill are the most important thing to win the game!
Samed;-;The greatest FPS since Medal of Honor, Warfighter
warfrozen;-;dota 2 is play by play
CuBoyd;-;10/10 would play again
AoH..!!jet!!;-;NIce Game
Standin.SirHerg1;-;This game is absolutely the worst experience I've ever had to sit through for a multitude of slow-paced hours. Never in my life have I had to put up with so many mexicans, russians, french, Iroquoians and africans who refuse to play on their local servers and play on US West. After politely asking foreigners to speak english while on US West servers, they respond with reports, death threats and various other verbal abuses. This game has also taught me many skills in terms of raging. Never in my life have I been able to creatively use 14 swear words in 1 sentence, all because of a ing Riki throwing an hour and a half match by building assault cuirrass and wondering around into an enemy team. If all this game is a great game to play if you struggle with pride issues. The game's brilliant matchmaking will take 8 minutes to help you get paired up with players clearly above your league, just for the sake of getting you  in every possible area (many you never even knew existed). Additionally, the 8 minute matchmaking system will also pair you with downies, russians, autists and Josh Elliot, who will all most likely blame their 20 minute loss on you. Oh, also before I forget, there is a lack of a surrender button so you if things go  up for your team,  you, you have to sit through an hour of watching the entire enemy team snowball, and if they want to prolong the game by not pushing when they can,  you, you have to sit through it. Of course, there is a way to skip this, and that is by abandoning. After abandoning a match, you will play in a low priority pool for X amount of games. The low priority pool is where you will finally get a chance to play with fellow American players who speak your language as they are too, people just like you who rage quit a match after hearing "Chinga tu madre" dozens of times thanks to the addition of high quality voice chat. With all these factors of the game, it is bound to lower anyone's self esteem and realize that they are nothing without their team mates and they are forced to make friends if they are to win a game. Overall, I give this game an 8/8 m8 a must buy Great if you want to learn different languages, lower your self esteem, suffer from anger issues and screw your life over. I love it
PAW.Predator;-;run for your life stay away from this russians only game
aldebaran-;-;This is the best game i have played in my entire life!!!!!!
cool drone jones;-;i havent even played this  yet and i already feel like a north korean refugee in south korea hiding out as a video games enthusiast and living off of livestream and advertising money in a basement in the gangseo district in seoul.
Schwarzenegger;-;Game is horrible; too many abusive players. Not a pleasent gaming experience but good graphics.
primocat;-;The ultimate co-operative game for the terminally unco-operative. Fast paced, full-on action "team" fighting game for noobs and pros alike. Be prepared for name calling, and Russians who clog up your English only speaking servers :( - Fun and addictive!
/KitKat/;-;Russian Rage Simulator 2014 10/10
Dr. Deformity;-;I am an Anchor dragging my team down, butt the game is learning, I don't need school. EDIT: This was posted by Dumpy?
A.K.A Gery;-;hell yeah
ma/|/iaC;-;Play one time and u wont stop playing this  -_-
Lady ko <3 (K3U) ^_^;-;i love this game :D
Day Noctua;-;A game about 10 random fairy-tale heroes thrown into a merciless battle for survival and the protection of their Ancient, behind almost every hero there's a mighty russian who you can trust your life with. 10/10 over 6 russian servers to choose from all over the globe.
AoH..!!jet!!;-;NIce Game
Standin.SirHerg1;-;This game is absolutely the worst experience I've ever had to sit through for a multitude of slow-paced hours. Never in my life have I had to put up with so many mexicans, russians, french, Iroquoians and africans who refuse to play on their local servers and play on US West. After politely asking foreigners to speak english while on US West servers, they respond with reports, death threats and various other verbal abuses. This game has also taught me many skills in terms of raging. Never in my life have I been able to creatively use 14 swear words in 1 sentence, all because of a ing Riki throwing an hour and a half match by building assault cuirrass and wondering around into an enemy team. If all this game is a great game to play if you struggle with pride issues. The game's brilliant matchmaking will take 8 minutes to help you get paired up with players clearly above your league, just for the sake of getting you  in every possible area (many you never even knew existed). Additionally, the 8 minute matchmaking system will also pair you with downies, russians, autists and Josh Elliot, who will all most likely blame their 20 minute loss on you. Oh, also before I forget, there is a lack of a surrender button so you if things go  up for your team,  you, you have to sit through an hour of watching the entire enemy team snowball, and if they want to prolong the game by not pushing when they can,  you, you have to sit through it. Of course, there is a way to skip this, and that is by abandoning. After abandoning a match, you will play in a low priority pool for X amount of games. The low priority pool is where you will finally get a chance to play with fellow American players who speak your language as they are too, people just like you who rage quit a match after hearing "Chinga tu madre" dozens of times thanks to the addition of high quality voice chat. With all these factors of the game, it is bound to lower anyone's self esteem and realize that they are nothing without their team mates and they are forced to make friends if they are to win a game. Overall, I give this game an 8/8 m8 a must buy Great if you want to learn different languages, lower your self esteem, suffer from anger issues and screw your life over. I love it
CuBoyd;-;10/10 would play again
warfrozen;-;dota 2 is play by play
RaKu;-;Still better than LoL
Homeless Polarbear;-;BEST GAME EVER Like my grandma but with more haterz
Flo;-;Rosetta stone in game form, but restricted to brazilian portuguese, russian, and korean.
MortalzZ !!;-;Play dota 2 Brooo,, We Make it Easyy !!
Leighton;-;Overall it's not bad - a bit boring, but then again so am I Also,  cyka stop feed noob ajaja xaxaxaxa 11/10
Vanuatuian;-;This game is more addictive than crack cocaine, you will loose you girlfriend and end up in the streets after when the game is done with you. 10/10 would play again.
The twisted sense of humor;-;it's like kissing cancer and this has a lot of hateful people
Copil;-;waste of time!
Rebecca;-;This game has pretty much killed every friendship I've ever had. It also gave me cancer. 0/10
memes;-;I learned languages such as Russian, and Spanish, for the low, low price of free. 10/10 EDIT: If you want to see what im talking about, watch this https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=g0uu79FWKgc
Ryuk;-;Awesome game. Recemmonded!
cool drone jones;-;i havent even played this  yet and i already feel like a north korean refugee in south korea hiding out as a video games enthusiast and living off of livestream and advertising money in a basement in the gangseo district in seoul.
Taylor Swift;-;Please Give Me A Fair Game.... If lose, i still proud... oyeah... (^_^)
toph;-;Simple. Addictive. Cruel. Intensive. Bizarre. An incredibly deep, rewarding multiplayer experience. While the original was one of the best games Ive ever played Im happy to report this sequel is better in every single way possible. Played both professionally and casually by millions of passionate fans worldwide, Dota 2 is what every other MOBA is trying to achieve. If you play League of Legends, stop playing that and play this. The supreme MOBA and my favorite game of 2013. Full article here: http://www.livepixel.tv/christophers-top-10-games-of-2013/
MaGiK;-;The Best game in the History of E-Sports
eltaco;-;Dota 2 is probably tied with Call of Duty for the best online multiplayer indie anime game. The people who made this game knew what they needed to do to make this into the great game that it is today. I have about .3 hours on this game and I can tell you those were the best .3 hours of my life. The great thing about this game is the friendly community, I remember after a match the person on the opposite team said I was a , I assumed that was the German word for Gg. All and all I reccomend this game to any one who loves a game with a good campaign and story. And remember to say  after every Dota 2 match.
Olly;-;Amazing. BUT. Russia. Just Russia. Pray to God that you do not get put with Russians who play on the Europe west Server.
ILikeDicksInMy[A]ss;-;Is Dota 2 better than League of Legends? Not better, but something different. Both games have many similarities but also some differences in the way of playing. Hardcore fans of the original Wacraft 3-Modifkation Defense of the Ancients definitely feel at home because Dota 2 is practically only a technical remake of its predecessor. But even those who have over the years played League of Legends tired and looking for a new challenge in the genre, will find pleasure in the game. Genre newbies may take a look of course, especially since Dota 2 is Free-2Play. Beginners should expect frustration moments when it comes to first games against human opponents but despite the solid tutorials. Only if some experienced players come equal to each other, unfolds Dota 2 its full potential fun. For me, DotA 2 is the best MOBA and with his multitude of heroes and revised engine, significantly better than the outdated League of Legends. In addition, I think that DotA (in work with Steam) will become more and more players with the time. CAUTION: Makes you addicted to more. 97/100
Duckus6;-;Dota 2 is a Multiplayer Online Battle Area (MOBA) game with a huge community and fanbase. This game takes the player's hand-to-eye coordination, decision making, reaction time and teamwork and puts it to the test in a 5 vs 5 situation. Unlike most of the MOBA games on the market Dota 2 is free of charge from the beginning with no money, in-game or real money being spent to unlock playable characters meaning players do not have an advantage over others on the choices they have and it's easier for beginners to get to know a hero. However this game does have a rather steep learning 'cliff' (similar to a learning curve but instead of gradually learning, it takes some time then the game *snaps* into focus for you and you become pretty good and then it's a normal learning curve from there on). There are a few issues with the levels of toxicity of some of the players but overall this is a good game, higly addictive though and you'll probably end up being glued to the screen for hours on end.
Sono al mare :D;-;I'll give a thumbs up only because the game itself is pretty good, but this is not an actual review, its more like a short summary about my over 900 hours spent into this game (LOL n00b cant write  until 2kh NOOB). I started playing it because my friends convinced me, and because almost everybody in the forum I post on play this. So I started playing it both with my friends and solo. Today at the end of my very last match(which I lost) I realized that I have never had fun in this game. I mean, out of 900 hours I can only remember like, 7-8 really funny moments where I actually laughed. Oh, the irony of fate, the very last laugh was in my very last match. I was Earthshaker top dire in lane with Warlock against Death Prophet and Batrider, we got first blood like 10 seconds after the 00:00 mark, I spotted DP warding our jungle, I used fissure to block her escape way and Warlock used Shadow Word. While we were AA her, she started to move left and right like she didn't know what to do, it looked like she was dancing, and it reminded me of that case of mass hysteria happening around the early XVI century in France, where several people started dancing uncontrollably for weeks until they died(yes I know, my interests are ed up), and THAT actually made me laugh, THAT to me was a funny moment, not the quick first blood, not the 2 more kills we did on bat in the next couple of minutes (warlock got all of them btw) but the fact that DP started dancing while we were beating her up. This made me think a little, but only for a couple of seconds, there's a game to win here guys! Focus! There's very little to say about what happened next, the typical things that usually happen in a bad, unranked, 0 MMR, trench  tier match; me without blink until 25:00; our Drow disconnecting (and abandoned) cause of PC problems, Lina with Aghanim and no Meka; wards only for half match(I'm guilty of it too); we lost Roshan two times, over 20 kills of difference for the Radiants, Lina and Storm Spirit arguing with each other, calling names, your mama did this, your fatha did that, your sista lul  don't evel let me start on that one, and so on. At the very end of the match, we hid in the fountain waiting for them to FF GG WP EZ QQ M8S ecc, and in that moment, reading the argue between Lina and Storm, i asked myself some questions: Am i having fun? Is this game making me laugh? How many funny moments i can remember about this game? Is that normal that to me every single match i've done looks exactly the same as the others(lul of cuz yes u ing <2kh scum n00b)? The answers to the questions were: no, no, not even 10, i don't know. In that instant, I realized that this game, to me, was just a gigantic waste of time. How many times have I actually enjoyed what was going on on screen? Why am I taking this so seriously? Why do I want to win so desperately? Why do my teammates want to win so desperately? ... How many times have I smiled while playing this game? ... These are not pro player matches we play, we are earning nothing from this, there's no need to yell at each other! This makes me sad. I've heard yelling my whole life, I play games because they help me forget about how life is hard, to relax and laugh at the hundreds and hundreds of funny, silly, nonsense moments this beautiful piece of software can gift me. Games really help me, they help me a lot. Please, guys, stop, dont get mad, Im serious! This is a game, right? Games are meant to be fun! Please stop arguing, we lost a videogame, its not the end of the world, next time you will win, we will all win :) and even if you don't, who cares! Its just a videogame! Enjoy the little things you can get out of it! Remember DP dancing to death? Wasn't that fun? Remember Pudge denying himself after we wasted literally all we got at him? And then the Radiants team wiped us? Yes, we lost money and experience, but wasn't that kinda fun? Sorta fun? Even a little bit? Yes we lost this match but cmon! Don't hide in the fountain! Lets do something silly to them! Lets annoy them! Storm, use your ulti to get near them and then immediately go back in the fountain! Lets watch them throwing everything at you in the attempt of catching you! Isn't that fun? :D <<Storm?>> <<Storm?>> <<Storm?, are you listening to me?, Storm are you still arguing with Lina because of her Aghanim? She made a mistake, everybody makes mistakes, there is no need to take it personally! Now she knows that Aghanim is a no-no, shes got it, now just chill out man, its a game!>> :D *SLAP* << :O b-but Storm, w-why? ;( >> <<BECAUSE U R A ING L0SER THATS WHY YOU PIECE OF ! YOU FED LIKE YOUR ING MOTHA LAST NIGHT YOU ING N00B IDIOT  SCUM ING UNISTAL DOTO YOU  PIECE OF TRASH I HOPE THIS NIGHT YOU DIE IN YOUR SLEEP DREAMING OF ONE THOUSANDS ING BIG BLACK  RAPING ALL YOUR HOLES, ALL YOUR MOTHA'S HOLES, ALL YOUR FATHA'S HOLES, ALL YOUR LITTLE SISTAH'S HOLES, ALL YOUR DOG'S HOLES, ALL YOUR CAT'S HOLES ALL YOUR ING FAMILY HOLES!!!11 AND THEN I HOPE THEY PUT YOUR BODY AND ALL YOUR FAMILY'S BODIES IN THE DARKEST CORNER OF YOUR  WHITE TRASH WOODEN HOUSE AND THEN  ALL OVER YOU AND YOUR FAMILY IN AN ORGY OF PAIN, BLOOD, LUST, ,  AND SMELLY  ONLY TO LATER CATCH FIRE TO THE  AND MASTURBATE ON THE STINKING PILE OF BURNED  THAT IS YOUR BODY NOW.>> << ... >> << b-but, this is a game remember? We play to have fun, it has been like this since we were kids in school! :D>> <<THIS IS NOT JUST A ING GAME YOU  WORTHLESS PIECE OF  THIS IS REAL! THIS IS THE BIG DEAL! THIS IS SERIOUS ING BUSINESS! THATS WHAT YOU DON'T UNDERSTAND YOU STEAMING PILE OF RAT ! HAVE YOU SEEN THE INTERNATIONAL WITH THAT CRAPPY CONNECTION YOU HAVE? HAVE YOU SEEN IT IDIOT? AH? HAVE YOU? HAVE YOU SEEN HOW MUCH MONEY CAN YOU MAKE WITH THIS ING PIECE OF NASTY  OF A GAME? MILLIONS FOR GOD'S SAKE! MILLIONS! CAN YOU EVEN SPELL THAT? << o-of course I can Dave! We went to school together!>> <<THAT WAS IRONIC YOU DUMB >> << d-dave, i -i think you meant "sarcastic", you see, the difference is that "irony" consist in saying one thing, but in reality, you meant the exact opposite in a funny and jolly way :D! While "sarcastic" is the same thing but ... in a ... not so ... funny way. ??? >> :( << ... >> << I'm going to kill you Joseph. I'm going to kill you so hard you'll die. Its not like I will miss you or anything, during my whole life, mum and dad always had to compare me to you. "Oh Dave, why can't you be more like Joseph? He loves studying, he's nice, gentle, very popular at school, hell at he's age he already has a little girlfriend! And she's cute too". You disgust me, Joseph. I hate you. I hate you and now I will end your miserable life. But I'm not doing it because of mum and dad, oh nou. I'm doing this because you're bad at Doto, Joseph. You suck at this game, you suck so hard its outstanding.>> << b-but, its just a game! >> :( << Its my way out of this ty town we live in, Joseph, and having a brother bad at Doto will ruin my glorious yet-to-come pro player reputation. Now be a man and make your brother happy, Ive already loaded dad's Glock.>> << B-but Dave! Do you really want to kill your brother just because you lost a videogame???>> T_T <<ROTFLNO, of course I don't want to kill my brother only because I lost a videogame. Silly Josephine.>> :D <<I want to kill you because YOU made ME lose a videogame.>> D: *BANG* TL;DR lul git gud n00b trench scum
*IVSure*;-;Want to learn russian language? Go get this game now. Every match there gonna be at least one russian guy who yell on you all the time. Love this game
Samed;-;The greatest FPS since Medal of Honor, Warfighter
Vault Hunter;-;10/10 would recommend to spoil your life
Ivannovick #CantvMarico;-;Im noob, I don't understand nothing and nobody in my team want explain me. 10/10
Br@ndo;-;i like recomend this game to all people leaving in russia continent!! its maybe no so nice because it always match us on people from continents like EUROPE WESTERN, EUROPE EASTERN, EUROPE NORTHERN etc.. i ask what the hell? why no let us play only continent RUSIA???? anyway i started play game when my girlfrend dad sayed me : " u want to nutela plug my daughter, u gota go straight 5k mmr son" and i repleyed: "yes, i gona get ur daughter nutela" so it began. At first i was not so good because i was only 3k mmr and i played only bad heroes. But i improved and reached 4k. Then it was very hard because i had noob teammate from EUROPE and they losed me games. But i started playing many ursa game in jungler and antimage on offlane (1v3 style) and I winner 80% of games there. Thats how i worked hard for my first girl nutela opening. Ty for reading all, many love, your brendao
[TS3H-CO]King2203;-;Really fun game with friends or solo play alot of heros and updates and fetures skins and upgrades!
1up;-;Boring
YUVABOZAN;-;Such a great game. If you like teamplay go and play. But pay attention to Russians!!! (speacially brainless russians)
Fabi;-;this game is your best friend and worst enemy at the same time if you start playing it you can't leave anymore imagine your very personal hell
Femme Fatale;-;LOL, but I love this game, because the train teamwork, quick thinking in making decisions, and there are many interesting things in this game .. bye bye
Rusty Nail;-;the best game
Alternate;-;No one wants to buy the donkey. Cannot jump. Will ruin your life. It's 3am right now and I haven't slept in 3 days. This game sucks. 11/10
Grim.;-;Want some of your friends to fail in their colleges and schools ? Recommend them this title then .. Will surely help .. (10/10)
Felvet;-;A slower version of the hit MOBA League of Legends. Dota 2 seems to have more consistency between heros as to what works and what doesn't. It's map is much larger and allows for more juke spots and places to farm safely. The game is a welcome sequel to everyone's battle.net favorite Dota. Not recomended to newer MOBA players but for those who have played League and found the game too fast, too simple or too hard to come back from when behind this is a great game. Those who enjoyed s1 and s2 League where boots were one of the earliest items you got and many champions were unforgiving will enjoy that feel once again in Dota 2. This game has a very wide pool of itemization for all roles although it still suffers from gold starved supports like most MOBAs. I would say that this game is a MOBA for those who have already learned the basics in other MOBAs and are ready to try something a bit slower but more complex. Bugs, balence issues etc are dealt with in a very timley manner which allows for stable gameplay. I think this game has sucked away my soul more than my wife and that is saying something. I give this game: a 9.4/10
Deja Vu;-;cool
Desert Heat;-;It takes like 80 hours before you reach the stage where if you screw up, you will know why and can learn from it. Once you're there, though, it's really really fun. My greatest advice to new players: please don't try using Meepo, even though he has a funny face. Also, Kunkka is the bane of your eixistence early game when you're new. Other than that, when you're in a game, the little book thing in the top left contains community guides that will light up which skills you should get in order. Wish someone told me that when I started out.
torgon1;-;What more can be said about this game that havent already been said?
DT.Emeric;-;If you want to learn different languages without a teacher, this is the best way to do it. If you want to argue with everybody, this is the best way to do it. If you want to loose your time, this is the best way to do it.
lejen;-;i wish i had a life. 2.5k hours in dota is very embarrasing.
Okama;-;An execeltn way to create fake dreams for yourself, Insult random people, Become absolutely racist towards Russians, Peruvians and what not, Loose all social life/ fail academicly But look at the bright side, you're 4k mmr now!!! 10/10
Donnie Fucking Darko;-;This game undoubtedly made me hate all Russians that have and ever will exist. Possibly the dumbest most annoying population to step foot on this earth. Gas the Russians.
boxes;-;"Like Bad Rats, Revelations 2012 combined, with magic." - IGN
Mordecai Bot;-;I'm single because of this game. 5 stars
Gollon;-;Jesus christ have I really been playing this for nearly a year??
DarK_St3alth;-;Rank: 9/10 Recommendation(s): Play some RTS games before, play other valve games as well. Major Theme: Serious gameplay to be found here, with Valve's item system. Bought at Price: $0 - Beta test Put it this way, I have over a thousand hours in this title for a reason. Something always brings me back to it. It has even elapsed my hours in Counter-Strike somehow. What is it exactly that keeps bringing me back here? First off, this game is of the "MOBA" breed. It isn't an RTS, FPS, or even MMORPG. It's roots are from Warcraft III, and other RTS games. Someone brought these games out of the shadows and gave them an overhaul. You have probably heard about LoL, being League of Legends, the most direct competitor with Dota 2. Not getting into the whole thing, simply put, Dota 2 is more "hardcore" and "punishing" than League of Legends while still providing a fun and inviting atmosphere. This I can say with certainty because I have played both titles in their infency. Valve is known for their work. There's obvious reasons for this. They don't scam you out of your money (*cough**cough*EA*cough**cough*), but rather let you spend money. Items are cosmetic, and you don't really have to participate in trading, collecting, or even buying anything in Dota 2. Just like Team Fortress 2, all items are random drops at the end of a game -- which can be from 20 minutes to 90 some odd minutes. Just like other Valve games, they are best played with friends. Reasoning being that you know how they play, and they know how you play. Enjoyment can come from winning, but I think it comes more from a collective win, where everyone felt like they did something to win. This is more obivous in the matchmaking in ranked play. Unranked seems to be all over the place, but with ranked, you play with players of like skill. Plus this is the only game I can think of where pausing a multiplayer game works more than half the time. Graphics aren't a huge thing here. They can be scaled down quite well, but be expected to run a reasonable setup. This isn't Half Life 1 or 2 in terms of system requirements. I've managed to get it running on my laptop which says something. Overall, like I've said before, there's solid good reasons to play and continue playing Dota 2. Since the title is free, hop on and try it out.
Mordecai Bot;-;I'm single because of this game. 5 stars
Neighbor;-;A game where the other team of russians are better than your left over unwanted few russians that any command equals them sprinting to the front lines alone. Also teaches the fact of how brutal and cold the internet is, no remorce for trying to have fun in a game, no effort from teammates to make any single move or to communicate other than when you die once your team will all become the most social members all to chip in a report for your feeding. But this game still finds its way back on to my computer.
xX_Pr0Sc0p3r_Xx | trade.tf;-;Okay, I recommend and do NOT recommend at the same time: Why I recommend: - It's a Valve game, Come on people! - The training missions are good. I put 2 hours into them. - It's freaking free - Just get it if you're looking for a random game to play Why I do no recommend: - It just sucks - I am not the kind of person to play this game. - I like campaigns, not massively multiplayer stuff.
Conquistador;-;Dota 2 is one of the most addictive games I have ever played, as you can see by my hours. I managed to achieve nothing in life over the course of 1100 hours. However, with these hours I have learned a lot about the game, like for instance if you ever meet people from Bali they're like some of the coolest people you can meet. If you meet an american sounding Indian you will find one of the funnest s I have met. If you meet and angry Japanese boy, that kid is Tigha, stay away from him at all possible. This game overall is a battle between Pinoys and the World. Well as far as the South East Asian server is concerned. Pinoys are at constant odds with everyone else in the game. They seem to live in a world where when they do worse than you, you are the noob. Very intresting philosophy by them. The Dota community has something that we can all learn, "If you talk , you will get hit." This has been demonstrated many times over the course of my dota career. And of course if someone instantly calls mid, you have already lost. Overall this game has brought me to tears, both happy and sad. Even though I sometimes hate this game, I always come back for more. 754/13 Lucky Charm Marshmallows
[DJ]Jordan^Google.com;-;This Game Gave Me: Achondroplasia Acne AIDS Albinism Alcoholic hepatitis Allergy Alopecia Alzheimer's disease Amblyopia Amebiasis Anemia Aneurdu Anorexia Anosmia Anotia Anthrax Appendicitis Apraxia Argyria Arthritis Aseptic meningitis Asthenia Asthma Astigmatism Atherosclerosis Athetosis Atrophy Bacterial meningitis Barack Obama syndrome Beriberi Black Death Botulism Breast cancer Bronchitis Brucellosis Bubonic plague Bunion Bella killer Calculi Campylobacter infection Cancer Candidiasis Carbon monoxide poisoning Celiacs disease Cerebral palsy Chagas disease Chalazion Chancroid Chavia Cherubism Chickenpox Child elongated  syndrome Chlamydia Chlamydia trachomatis Cholera Chordoma Chorea Chronic fatigue syndrome Circadian rhythm sleep disorder Coccidioidomycosis Colitis Common cold Condyloma Congestive heart disease Coronary heart disease Cowpox Cretinism Crohn's Disease Dengue Diabetes mellitus Diphtheria Dehydration Ear infection Ebola Encephalitis Emphysema Epilepsy Erectile dysfunction Foodborne illness Gangrene Gastroenteritis Genital herpes GERD Goitre Gonorrhea Heart disease Hepatitis A Hepatitis B Hepatitis C Hepatitis D Hepatitis E Hepatitis F (Childhood Herpes) Histiocytosis (Childhood Cancer) HIV Human papillomavirus Huntington's disease Hypermetropia Hyperopia Hyperthyroidism Hypothermia Hypothyroid Hypotonia Impetigo Infertility Influenza Interstitial cystitis Iritis Iron-deficiencyanemia Irritable bowel syndrome Ignious Syndrome Jaundice Keloids Kuru Kwashiorkor Laryngitis Lead poisoning Leaking scrotum syndrome Legionellosis Leishmaniasis Leprosy Leptospirosis Listeriosis Leukemia Lice Loiasis Lung cancer Lupus erythematosus Lyme disease Lymphogranulomavenereum Lymphoma Malaria Marburg fever Measles Melanoma Melioidosis Metastatic cancer Mnire's disease Meningitis Migraine Mononucleosis Multiple myeloma Multiple sclerosis Mumps Muscular dystrophy Myasthenia gravis Myelitis Myoclonus Myopia Myxedema Morquio Syndrome Mattticular syndrome Neoplasm eritis Non-gonococcal urethritis Necrotizing Fasciitis Night blindness Obesity Osteoarthritis Osteoporosis Otitis Palindromic rheumatism Paratyphoid fever Parkinson's disease Pelvic inflammatory disease Peritonitis Periodontal disease Pertussis Phenylketonuria Plague Poliomyelitis Porphyria Progeria Prostatitis Psittacosis Psoriasis Pubic lice Pulmonary embolism Pilia Q fever Ques fever Rabies Repetitive strain injury Rheumatic fever Rheumatic heart Rheumatism Rheumatoid arthritis Rickets Rift Valley fever Rocky Mountain spotted fever Rubella Salmonellosis Sandy  Scabies Scarlet fever Sciatica Scleroderma Scrapie Scurvy Sepsis Septicemia SARS Shigellosis Shin splints Shingles Sickle-cell anemia Siderosis SIDS Silicosis Smallpox Stevens-Johnsonsyndrome Stomach flu Stomach ulcers Strabismus Strep throat Streptococcal infection Swag Synovitis Syphilis Swine influenza Schizophrenia Taeniasis Tay-Sachs disease Tennis elbow Teratoma Tetanus Thalassaemia Thrush Thymoma Tinnitus Tonsillitis Tooth decay Toxic shock syndrome Trichinosis Trichomoniasis Trisomy Tuberculosis Tularemia Tungiasis Typhoid fever Typhus Tumor Ulcerative colitis Ulcers Uremia Urticaria Uveitis l warts Varicella Varicose veins Vasovagal syncope Vitiligo Von Hippel-Lindau disease Viral fever Viral meningitis Warkany syndrome Warts Watkins Yellow fever Yersiniosis Zygamantis + Russian ppl swearing me and my mom Would recommend 10/10
SPUCK BOY;-;caught severe autism and type two diabetes from this game really good
SPUCK BOY;-;caught severe autism and type two diabetes from this game really good
DarK_St3alth;-;Rank: 9/10 Recommendation(s): Play some RTS games before, play other valve games as well. Major Theme: Serious gameplay to be found here, with Valve's item system. Bought at Price: $0 - Beta test Put it this way, I have over a thousand hours in this title for a reason. Something always brings me back to it. It has even elapsed my hours in Counter-Strike somehow. What is it exactly that keeps bringing me back here? First off, this game is of the "MOBA" breed. It isn't an RTS, FPS, or even MMORPG. It's roots are from Warcraft III, and other RTS games. Someone brought these games out of the shadows and gave them an overhaul. You have probably heard about LoL, being League of Legends, the most direct competitor with Dota 2. Not getting into the whole thing, simply put, Dota 2 is more "hardcore" and "punishing" than League of Legends while still providing a fun and inviting atmosphere. This I can say with certainty because I have played both titles in their infency. Valve is known for their work. There's obvious reasons for this. They don't scam you out of your money (*cough**cough*EA*cough**cough*), but rather let you spend money. Items are cosmetic, and you don't really have to participate in trading, collecting, or even buying anything in Dota 2. Just like Team Fortress 2, all items are random drops at the end of a game -- which can be from 20 minutes to 90 some odd minutes. Just like other Valve games, they are best played with friends. Reasoning being that you know how they play, and they know how you play. Enjoyment can come from winning, but I think it comes more from a collective win, where everyone felt like they did something to win. This is more obivous in the matchmaking in ranked play. Unranked seems to be all over the place, but with ranked, you play with players of like skill. Plus this is the only game I can think of where pausing a multiplayer game works more than half the time. Graphics aren't a huge thing here. They can be scaled down quite well, but be expected to run a reasonable setup. This isn't Half Life 1 or 2 in terms of system requirements. I've managed to get it running on my laptop which says something. Overall, like I've said before, there's solid good reasons to play and continue playing Dota 2. Since the title is free, hop on and try it out.
Gollon;-;Jesus christ have I really been playing this for nearly a year??
AlexaFleur;-;love hate relationship
Molecules;-;i love this game very much :)
Mango;-;I came from the world of FPS and I barely know the mechanics of DOTA when I started. This game will consume your stamina but you will keep on playing it. I've been reported for a few times due to AFK. I wasn't really AFK, I fell asleep on my desk. Pros: - Taught me more about team work. This is meta gaming. You can't win without good team work. - Taught me different languages (doesn't matter if it's a bad word. A newly learned word is knowledge! lol) - I became logical (in a way.. yeah) - Good game to combat depression or any negative feeling (no need to take meds, this is your medicine! lmao). Cons: - I always end up doing impulse buying (whenever a set is on sale). - Sleepless nights @.@ - Goodbye social life Advises: 1. Please do not use Vladimir's offering if your hero is Sniper. 2. If the tower is attacking your hero, hit a friendly creep around and the tower will stop attacking you. 3. Never deny an Aegis.
Eno Etukeno;-;If you play a match without a Russian swearing at you you're playing the game wrong.
beardATTACK * fren;-;Just like real-time chess, but everyone is a queen. Some queens shoot lasers, some summon huge Golems and some sing so hard your eardrums burst. Dota 2 is definitely one of the best games of this generation, and I'm certain it will remain as popular and as influnencal for many years to come. Graphics: 8.5/10 Very pretty, the art direction in DotA 2 is one of the best. The source engine ensures you can run it on anything more powerful than a toaster, and have it look great too. Cosmetics look great, and fit perfectly, with some exceptions,(I'm looking at you Alpine Ursa) but many stay true to the heros artstyle. Sound: 9.5/10 All heros have a multitude of voice lines,and some even respond to one another (e.g Tidehunters hatred for Kunnka). If you find the default anouncer not too flash, theres a huge variety of optional packs, from the smoth talking Narrator from bastion, to the harsh condescending tone of Pyrion Flax. Gameplay: 10/10 The big one. Theres a reason DotA Allstars got so popular, not just from the incredible passsion from the community, or the dedication of IceFrog and co., but from the incredible gameplay that spawned one of gamings most popular genres. From perfectly co-ordinating a fountain hook, to getting stuck on top of a cliff accidentally as Storm Spirit, no other genre rivals DotA 2 outstanding strategic gameplay and near-vertical learning curve. At the time of writing, I have 7,469 hours played and I've only just scratched the surface in the combos, stratagy and 107 availble heros to use, it takes year of hard work, dedication and passion to become truly great at the strategical masterpeice that is Dota 2. - beardATTACK @ fren
Pieeer1;-;EternaLEnVy: How'd you lose to complexity? Arteezy: LMFAO wHo cAREAS HAHA Xd
25I-NBOMe;-;Do you want to have fun? Do you want to play with skilled, smart and mature people? Do you want to relax from a frustrating day at work? If the answers were No, No and No, this is the game for you! 10/10 would rage again
Jamie;-;This game is simply the most thrilling game I have ever played. The combantion of the complex mechanics and the team based gamplay make this one of the best games to play with friends. However this game has many, many side effects such as..... Trash Talking anybody on your and the enemy teams, Lose alot of sleep, any money that you have will be spent on usless cosmetics such as skins, hudskins and announcers. You will not eat any food as Dota is more important, you will learn to hate every member of your team or the enemy team that is from eastern europe (mostly the russians) as they suck balls at dota, everybody else on your team will apear worse than you and you will want to kill them with a blunt object. these are just some of the reason to play the amazing game that is DotA 2!
Ultr4pan1k;-;First of all Dota is the best game I have ever played. Before Im going into details I just have to say that I recommend the game for everyone. It can be fun and challenging and it is mostly very well balanced (compare to other game of this genre) Positive: -Its free to play and not pay to win -There are like over 110 heroes to choose and everyone got its own special play style -Its a very great game to play with friends -The game is based on high skill, sometimes a bit luck and of course on teamplay -The game has a "never give" up effect -Once you started to play Dota 2, you wont every be able to stop playing it -The workshop adds nice new thing into the game like skins (Made for fans by fans) -There are many cool gamemodes -The competitive scence is very fun to watch and you can learn very much from the pros -There are many reallife events based on Dota 2 like the TI -The game never gets boring -Its like a passion Negative: -Lets be honest: The Community (There are so many arrogant and  people in Dota 2 that sometimes its just make me wanna cry and thats of course very brutal for noobs. But i have to say just move on and play, ignore these stupid players) -In my perspective, Dota 2 is very well balanced but there are still heroes who are just too strong and broke which can frustrate hard -Language problems (There are like in every game some Russians who think they can freely write russian in the chat although its an english server. I think thats unrespectful towards the people who actually write english although they are also from other countries besides Russia like me) -Pauses (Seriously these unpauses s everyone up and nobody is able to wait for like 3 minutes -.-) My rating for Dota 2 would be 95 out of 100 Thats all from me. Hope you enjoyed my review and see ya !
Slab;-;My Grandfather smoked his whole life. I was about 10 years old when my mother said to him, 'If you ever want to see your grandchildren graduate, you have to stop immediately.'. Tears welled up in his eyes when he realized what exactly was at stake. He gave it up immediately. Three years later he died of lung cancer. It was really sad and destroyed me. My mother said to me- 'Don't ever smoke. Please don't put your family through what your Grandfather put us through." I agreed. At 28, I have never touched a cigarette. I must say, I feel a very slight sense of regret for never having done it, because russians, turks and peruvians gave me cancer anyway.
Kraster;-;Taught me more Russian in ten matches than I learned in 3 years of high school
HT || Cannibal Shia LaBeouf;-;S'alright
-[E]ver[O]ne-;-;I Like This Game
BSJxd;-;Downloaded 2 months ago. I'm taking Russian language exams the next week. 10/10 no ragrets.
Dr. Flying Cows [PHD];-;Good game, too good. Don't play it if you want to play other games too.
Arji;-;Help me please . .
oo |;-;a game full of noobs . if u want to break your head into wall this game work good . best matchmakings and best team ever .
Fuuka;-;Full Of Racist in this game... This game doesn't match your MMR with others at all... I played this not just because of friends, becuase of free cash for other games. (Personal review)
neilbryson;-;The good: The game itself is great. Beautiful hero models Optimization is excellent. Great voice acting Everything in the game can be accessed without purchasing anything. The bad: The community I've been playing Dota 2 since closed beta and it was obviously beta (better) than it is today. That was the time when there were no cosmetic items and no ranked matchmaking. People back then only focus on enjoying (and testing) the game. Now, because of this ranked MMR, everyone's picking carries, thinking we can win the game with four hard carries. I've given up.
Fish-E;-;I still recommend this.
MVP H6;-;hello to all DOTA 2 gamers...
Satoru Iwata();-;Valve Really Need to fix their dota 2 server.I got 2 DC in A row both of them are in winning situation.Other than that the game works perfectly
Marton;-;I highly recommend this over it's competitor, Rosetta Stone. While Rosetta Stone promised "Adaptive Learning", "Social Sharing", and "Community Learning", I found Dota 2 to be a much better product in terms of cultural exposure and hands on training. Unlike Rosetta Stone, Dota 2 matches you up with real Spanish-speakers, Russian-speakers, or dirty Pinoys that are fresh off the boat and ready to help you delve into their ethnic practices and language. As an English speaker, I learned the Peruvian dialect of Spanish in less than 3 months solely playing Dota 2 for an hour a day. I highly recommend this game. As we say in Spanish, "jajajajajaj gringo noob la  madre concha tu madre. idiota hijo de la gran  calla csm. que huevon eres. pajero de  .l. jajajajaj xDDD."
President Obermer;-;My Grandfather smoked his whole life. I was about 10 years old when my mother said to him, "If you ever want to see your grandchildren graduate, you have to stop immediately." Tears welled up in his eyes when he realized what exactly was at stake. He gave it up immediately. Three years later he died of lung cancer. It was really sad and destroyed me. My mother said to me- "Don't ever smoke. Please don't put your family through what your Grandfather put us through." I agreed. At 28, I have never touched a cigarette. I must say, I feel a very slight sense of regret for never having done it, because this game gave me cancer anyway.
Superfluous;-;If I had spent the amount of hours I have in and watching Dota learning another language, I could've become fluent. Right now, I could be a translator in Italy giving a tour of the colosseum. I could be a journalist reporting on the economic difficulties in Greece and Spain, or a correspondent analyzing the Syrian civil war. People on my friends list have four times as many hours in Dota as I do. We regret nothing.
Pats ni Palan;-;worth playing.
.Vandy;-;This game is so awesome.. recommended
Twisted_Smile;-;It's so good.
StarmiX_;-;BEST LANGUAGE LEARNING TOOL FOR ANYONE OUT THERE. VOLVO INTRODUCES A NEW AGE IN LEARNING WHERE YOU GET YELLED AT IN 25+ DIFFERENT LANGUAGES. INCLUDING (BUT NOT LIMITED TO- RUSSIAN,FRENCH,SPANISH,PORTUGESE AND A HELL OF ALOT MORE. F*CK ROSSETTA STONE AND ANY OTHER LANGUAGE LEARNING TOOL. DOTA 2 IS THE SURE-FIRE WAY TO LEARN ANY LANGUAGE FOR FREE AT THE COST OF YOUR SANITY, HAPPINESS, AND EVERYTHING THAT'S GOOD ABOUT YOU. This game also ruined my life 10/10
+ Youth Of Freedom +;-;GAMEPLAY : 9/10 As you begin to play this game,you're given a tutorial on how the gameplay works. As you finish completing the tutorial you would have options to either play with bots or with online players. There is a wide variety of modes to choose from. All of the heroes are unlocked from the start so you don't have to unlock them one by one like any other MOBA game. Each heroes have their own specific roles so choose wisely and don't anyhow go whatever you feel like. There is no in-game money in this game and you earned different rewards as you play many matches. There is a lore for you to read for each character if you're interested. However these game have a steep leaning curve and those who are new to MOBA genre will struggle how the gameplay system work. It require a lot of tactics & teamwork in order to win a match........that is if your partner will listen to you cause a lot of player i found will quickly rage at you if you make a minor issue while some other just rage quit because they felt like they cannot make a comeback. A lot of heroes are memorable mainly because sometimes you would see those heroes interact with one another depending if they are rival or allied. GRAPHICS : 9.5/10 This is one of the best looking MOBA games i ever seen. The environment,character details and the visual are neatly done. Some skills are pretty to look at and the particle look awesome. Despite only having one map available to play only,you won't get sick of looking at it just because the details they put into those maps are amazing. Did i not mention it also featured day & night time as well ? These feature sometimes grant a huge benefit to specific heroes. AUDIO : 9.5/10 Icefrog did really well with the sound effects. A lot of the heroes skills are jaw-dropping due to how pleasing and awesome it sound. While there is only a few music in the game,i wasn't bothered much because of how great the sound effects are. Voice acting is pretty well done too and none of them want to make you block your ear because of how horrible it sounds. LONG-LASTING APPEAL : 9.5/10 I would say that this game have a lot going on. Even though you keep playing the same map or heroes. Every match offered some sort of challenge mainly because you have against other players that have better skills than you. There is some crazy modes to choose from if you bored playing normal match. By leveling up,you unlock certain gears which you can use to customize your heroes appearance and many different more modes. There is a compendium where you able to complete numerous challenge which gives you compendium points. If you gain more compendium points,you level up your compendium. From there you able to gain numerous boots,items,courier and many more. FINAL VERDICT : 9.4/10 To those who want a challenging MOBA games and not too noob-friendly,then this is the right game for you. I spent quite a lot of time playing this game and it a really an enjoyable experience. BEWARE....the community like any MOBA games are the worst i ever seen. You would find people trash talking at you,raging at you and even people that like to troll. The game seem to have a lot of server issue also which can be extremely frustrating when you almost win a match. Nevertheless the game is really great. Also play with bots if you hate playing with d0uchebag because you gonna encounter a lot of them. GRADE : A ( Excellent )
Rigby;-;Dota 2 is a Multiplayer Online Battle Arena, MOBA for short. In Dota 2 is a pure free-to-play game, which means that you don't have to unlock heroes, maps or other stuff. The only way to be good at Dota 2 is to know the game. You need to know every single item and hero to become a really good player. And that's the reason i like this game so much. However, this can be a problem for new players. You don't know anything about the game when you spawn in your base with 4 teammates.
visualvibe;-;This game will eat your soul and make you hate russian/polish people . Also Llama couriers. 10/10
KRiMZ;-;This game is the absolute life-ruiner.
LimSizy;-;Dota 2              .      DotA (Defense of the Ancients   )   Warcraft III.    ,         Action-RTS,    ,  ,   .       ,      .     ,   .    ,   .        ,  ,  .       ,     .     .  ,          ,      .      ,    .  ,       ,       ,     .          ,      ,  .       ,      .  ,           .
xXxxxXxxxXx;-;Terrible game. Jockeys are too overpowered in certain maps.
SWAT V4;-;I will definitely recommend this game.
Keeper-Outcast;-;Just try it. Worth every minute invested. And ofc, no outher moba has Invoker.
YOU'VE BEEN THUNDERSTRUCK;-;Very good game 9/10 Probably the best MOBA I have ever played 10x better than league of losers. All the heroes are free of course NO PAYING INVOLVED. The only thing you can pay for is skin's and accesories which does nothing except give your hero a different look. Although heroes are "Cheap" as people say, this is not completely true, every hero in the game is counterable (And yes that means Sniper). The game entirely depends on teamwork to win the match and skill as well. One hero cannot win you the game *NOTE* 2 hero's may be able to win the game with previous experiences. PROS - ALL heroes are FREE - Skins and accesories are fairly cheap - Lots of playable heroes - Unique game modes - Nice community with lots of friendly players - Good report system - Most of the heroes require some amount of skill - Frequent updates and patches - Voice Chat (Very helpful when communicating with teamates CONS - Players neglect lane calling - Players base lanes on what hero you go - Extremely buffed heroes (ex. Phantom Assasin, Templar Assasin, Axe) - No extreme buffs for heroes that require skill to play - Poorly balanced heroes Would I suggest this game? I would highly suggest this game to anyone who likes f2p MOBA's 9/10
zrtx;-;This game is enormously screwed... It has no hope... The community of this game is most awful thing i saw in centuries, its impossible to confront a thousands of idiots that u have given by the mmr system (by the way, popular rating system that doesnt work completely, its pure luck if u had a good team or if u even have a good team there is always 1 idiot who try to ruin it on purpose or on accident). Dont even try to install this game, i spent almost 2300 hours playing this  until realised how awfully made it was, the low priority ban doesnt work to search and punish all the idiots for their mistakes or pranks, the mmr system always finds you teammates not matched your skill and their skill comparatively. If u want to waste ur time for nothing go on and take it, you will regret this whole time, and u may like it in the first time until u will realise all things that i wrote up in that review. My english may not be good, but i sent my message to you all, if you already playing this game, please, dont spent money on this , other GOOD games need your support, not the volvo machine that consumes only money, not positive feedbacks about their multiplayer games lately. Thx volvo for a great game, i think you should send this game to alpha, cuz its broken hard.
Eggiwegs!;-;hello my name is joey and this is my dota (defense of the asians) 2 review doter two is a moba game whcih means that you are a battle solier that has to fite other battle soldier on a map teh map has three pathways or lanes and you have to kill the enemy asian with ur teame. the game was made by 3 autists in the summer of 2008 after playing boardd games and getting their positive results back, they wanted 2 make a game about autism and asians so they sstarted programming and got the disaster that is doter 2 personly i think the game is super super hard and its not balanced the sniper dude can instanltiy kill you but its fun when you kill an asian my final rating is 7/10 because bad but still good
Gnome;-;This game will not make you leave the room. You will never see the sunlight again. You have to be a team player!
HeLLFiRe ExiLeMoDe #DND;-;Very Mind Involving Strategic game Loved it :)
[Myth]Windery_K;-;Teamwork, knowledge of skill and item builds... it's all needed for you to battle against your enemies...
molang;-;I will love you as how much I love Waddles, DOTO FOREVER.
gNatFreak;-;My first MOBA game. Very difficult, and very competitive. Easily the worst part of this game is the community. However, your performance does impact your team's performance, so be sure to watch some videos, play some bot games, and ask some questions before you play matchmaking, or you will definitely jarate off your entire team. There's a very nice hero selection, so you have a lot of choices. It now just needs more maps ;) (I'm no map purist)
KappaPride;-;Highly addictive game a must played for online game lovers
Mr Skeltal;-;ing russians.  game, dont ever play this game on an EU server or you are ed.
Miles;-;Really good fun to play, You have so many choices to play the role you like best. This game really gives you the freedom to do what you wanna do the way you want to do it :) You do get a lot of useless players in this game who spend the whole time sitting in spawn flaming you, but if you look past that, you can actually find a great community within this game!
MAD;-;Dota 2, is the best game to see ppl raging. Welldone volvo.
1234;-;Fun to play against many other players, those who are skilled and those who are just learning. Very Competitive!
Mikasa;-;This game is the best tools to learn many SEA languages putangina mo bobo,5555, anjing,diam,cb.
MyLove-;-;F*ck russian servers
Nine;-;gaem never play it
Sorrow;-;If you wanna spend your life for nothing, then keep going to play this game.
HLTVARMY;-;this game is like counterstrike except it sucks and valve actually cares about it
I'LL NEVER STORM AGAIN;-;DO NOT GET THIS GAME. PLEASE DON'T.
M'aiq;-;Playerbase is made up of elitist nerds that  and cry about everything. Worst community on steam in my opinion. Also the game itself isn't that special. 1 map and gamemode? Lame. Bunch of dumb gimmicky heros.
HULK;-;Really nice moba!
Kemokemo;-;i liked it because it is a strategy game even when they are trashtalkers and others are angry if the player is noob
Mr. Donger;-;Dota 2 Teach me how to spend $200 and cut my algebra classes the good thing about dota 2 is you can learn to speak Russian,Portuguese,Spanish and Chinese School will never taught you how to speak foreign language. its also a good language simulator if you want to practice your language skills all you have to do is to click Russia and communicate with your Russian comrades MOTHER RUSSIA WILL LOVE YOU <3 After playing Dota 2 expect these few things 1.You can speak Russian language 2.You become more aggressive 3.You'll spend more than $300 on awesome cosmetic items 4.Expect high electricity bill 5.Say Goodbye to your future Goodbye to my future ruined my life 11/10 TOTALLY WORTH IT
Charlietheclown;-;This games players act like somthing that came out of chernobyl. When i play the game that night i have to take some Rad away. Like my post if you have two not one but two C@cks and if you call now you will get a free Rock for Rust.
MY TEAM SUCKS;-;Great depth and variety will keep you playing til you lose all your friends from yelling at them.
ROAD ROLLAAAAA;-;This is truly a masterpiece of gaming. Naughty Dog's latest title, and their first foray into the first-person shooter genre, is without a doubt a dazzling success. Drumstick of the Albatross 2, co-designed by Gabe Newell and David "Phreak" Turley, has everything: HUNDREDS of weapons to choose from, an ENORMOUS array of materials obtainable to build one's own home base, and THREE different unlockable character models. At the low price of $5.99 each, booster packs are an amazing addition, allowing one's character and mount to be personalized even further. But where DotA 2 really shines is in its gameplay. The tight control scheme, designed exclusively for the Steam controller, allows a seemingly seamless interface between man and machine--you ARE the character. The experience of battling with enemy mechs up-close and personal is unrivalled by any game, especially with the advanced mango physics. Overall, I would rate DotA 2 a 9.8/10 experience; its only flaw is the slight lack of purchasable, pay-to-win content that I usually rely on to make my gaming experiences successful. I'd love to see a DotA 3, especially if Zynga takes a note out of Blizzard's book and makes the game dozens of times easier for paying customers to succeed at PvP.
PrpOxy;-;Wanna learn russian? , blyat!! Wanna feel angry enough to punch a baby? Like to be insulted in every way possible in a foreign language? Then this is the game for you! Enter the wonderful world of Dota, you may become good enough to win milions one day (not).
K-Geezy;-;You have to give it a try. Otherwise you will never know. Have to warn you, that this game sucks you in, completely. I've been a pationated player since the old DotA Allstars-days. I started off like, on patch 6.12b or something like that (who cares, right). So, I'm pretty happy with the fact that Valve got their hands on Dota 2 developement project. I owe Valve a lot for making: CS 1.5 and 1.6 ;) No doubt, game turned out to be a success. Graphics are amazing, hero models are well done, voice-overs are awesome. There has to be something wrong with this game, and yes - it is - the community. It is most likely one of the biggest reasons why all of the other MOBA-players are trying to stay away from Dota 2. They find it unfriendly and harsh, but whatever. I approve that fact but I got used to it, so whenever I hear any of the "cyKka" or "jaja" it feels like: "home, sweet home." ;) Haters gonna hate but I still find Dota 2 - the best RNG-based action game that has ever happened to the human kind. Cheers, folks! ;)
,PLEASE LET ME WIN;-;I should be a rocket scientist by now if I didn't spend more than 2,200hrs of my life on this game. But it's worth it. 10/10
Had_217;-;The best game in steam ever. a little bit hard to learn but it is ing epic
BigBoobZ|READY WALLET;-;This Game so NICE
moms;-;ruined my marriage and made me a better father
Rowley Jefferson;-;I hate Russians.
Pvt. Garcia [29ID];-;All I have to say is: -It's free, you can make money with it. -It's hard, you'll never master it completely (Unless you are chinese) -It's free, you can make money with it. -A lot of people play it, seriously, a lot. -It's free, you can make money with it. -Steam Workshop that makes valve constantly add new cosmetics to the game. -It's free, you can make money with it. -A ton of heroes to play with, there will surely be one that fits your play style. -It's free, you can make money with it. -You can play with friends, cmon, you surely have a friend or 50 that plays it(or get new ones). -It's free, you can make money with it. Did I mention you can get more funds for your wallet with it?
Matthew Bellamy;-;This game will increasing your IQ !!
FireFly;-;Dota is a game where you will be reported for making mistakes. Dota is a game where you will be hated if you are new, a game where if you decide to socialise with people within the game they will respond in Russian. Dota is a game about skill and being able to purchase wards. Playing Dota means sacrificing your current language to learn the amazing beauty of words like '' and 'axaxaxax'. Prepare for countless moments of sadness and rage as your team mates forget to purchase dust and look forward to many games of success as you randomly obtain kill steals and accidently hook your team mates. Lastly look forward to incredible moments of landing a perfect Black Hole on an entire creep wave. 12/10. No sorry... 10/10 (-2 points for Russians) Definately will hate Russians again.. And Again.. (And Again) << Best Game 2kCyka14
[9] Shenanigans;-;Take to the streets for intense close quarters combat, where a team's survival depends upon securing crucial strongholds and destroying enemy supply in this multiplayer and cooperative Source Engine based experience. The follow-up game to the award-winning Source mod, Insurgency is highly competitive and unforgivingly lethal, striking a balance between one-life gameplay and prolonged action.
-;-;Dota 2, it's not only about defending the ancient, but how to treat people in a good way. Have fun !
Slynch;-;My butt hurts from all this death I receive from meepo, night stalker, tiny, sven, slardar, sand king, earthshaker, dragon knight, tide hunter, lifestealer, omniknight, huskar, doom, pudge again, spirit breaker, lycan, brewmaster, treant protector, io, chaos knight, undying, centaur warrunner, magnus, abaddon, bristleback, elder titan, earth spirit, legion commander, anti-mage, bloodseeker, drow ranger, shadow fiend, juggernaut, razor, venomancer, mirana, faceless void, morphling, phantom assassin, phantom lancer, vengeful spirit, viper, clinkz, riki, sniper, templar assassin, broodmother, weaver, luna, spectre, bounty hunter, meepo again, ursa, nyx assassin, gyrocopter, slark, lone druid, medua, naga siren, troll warlord, ember spirit, crystal maiden, bane, lich, puck, lion, storm spirit, windranger, witch doctor, zeus, enigma, lina, necrophos, shadow shaman, warlock, enchantress, queen of pain, nature's prophet, death prophet, tinker, pugna, dazzle, jakiro, chen, leshrac, silencer, dark seer, ogre magi, batrider, rubick, invoker, ancient apparition, KotL, outworld devourer, skywrath mage, shadow demon, disruptor and visage. That or I suck at this game.
driftaaaa;-;You can eat trees and cause some banter with russians 11/10 would recommend.
PloppyWhacker;-;Dota 2 is the newest part of the "Wizard-em-up" genre, with League of Legends leading the helm. You work together with a band of Peruvian Warriors to defeat the kotka tribe and their leader clan_iraq. Will you survive?
Shiro~Senpai;-;Dota has it's up's and down's and with that at the start you might hate it and see it as its very complicated even i myself hated it for the first time i played it but i decided to give it a shot and i got stuck playing it for a while now UP'S : +You get to kill russians +You feel badass for killing someone in a videogame +you lose your life to this game DOWN'S : -You may end up with a broken screen / mouse / keyboard -If you fail to comply with your team once you get reported and get 6 games in low priority -way too complicated for people with an actual life -there is always one  that rejects the 6 minutes wait
NEVALYASHKA;-;i predstavlyau you samiu great obzor na doty-2 piece of  man, its game piece of  and  off and  a fukss up ,thanks of prochitanuy informasion of  piece
janneth;-;about the steamcommunity market!
Compromise;-;We had two bags of tango, animal courier, five high-powered healing salves, a saltshaker half-full of dust of appearance, a whole galaxy of multi-colored wards... Also, a quart of clarity, a case smoke of deceit, a bottle with a double damage rune, and two town portal scrolls. Not that we needed all that for the Dota, but once you get locked into a serious items collection, the tendency is to push it as far as you can. The only thing that really worried me was the bottle with a double damage rune. There is nothing in the world more helpless and irresponsible and depraved than a man with the double damage, and I knew we'd get into that rotten stuff pretty soon.
Twitch.tv/Luvnatsu;-;hmm very well game ;)
Matthelorz;-;Cassy Stop
rachelsomething;-;One of those games you get better at the more you play. I'm really loving the wide range of characters and abilities. With some approvements it could be better but any changes might alter the what makes the game great in the first place. Definitely worth more than a try.
Vorpal;-;It's .
EMP;-;This is a short story about a player named Karl and his experience with Dota 2. There once was a time, long ago when Karl played games expecting no help from the team... He chose snowball heroes his MMR rose, there was a certain joy in his victories no matter how badly his team did. Then after long nights of 1v5 he thought to himself "I wonder how it would be if i played with those other four russians" For a week he tried to help lead others into the light of smart plays, excelent ward placement, and proper item choices. He led by example keeping the games close through the mid-game. But when the late game struck and the enemies BKBs were built, the team he spent the past thirty minutes of his life guiding and supporting were not there. They were not there when the bottom rax fell, they were not there when the ward spotted the Radiant attempt on roshan's life, they were not there when the mid rax was taken, they were farming, chasing illusions and supports. When the time came. When the last set of rax seemed doomed to fall, they came. In came my four hard carries like the lost children of a single mother they came to defend my home from the void. They had spent so much time farming and leaving the fighting to me that they hadnt a clue how to fight together. the four of them died a horrible death, only killing a crystal maiden they saw on their way back to the base... Why do i tell you this tale? Because there is a moral to the story, never play a support to climb the MMR bracket. It only leaves you heart broken, and 25MMR less. 10/10 would Carry again.
Massacre;-;One of the most addictive games i have played so far. Yes i have the greed of drops no lying but this one is just kickass :D Different heroes their abilities and the items. <3 Heroes range from funny to creepy :D . Okay for those who will start new there are a few things. Just don't ignore the tutorial it's boring at first but really important. and do ask you friends while in game which item is good for which hero and go for easy heroes at first like Rikki or Razor, don't wish to make lots of kills at first just hang around your friends and towers and defend, it's generally a helping community, Start making friends when you understand the game better to make a team for when you have to play ranked matches. People do say go after the recommended items and it's right for when you start playing first but after that every item has an detailed explanation just go through them and with your gut feeling because it doesn't matter what skills the heroes have what matters is how you use their skills and no one knows it better than you yourself.
Thee Man;-;A Really nice game that you can play alone or with friends
Schecter Synyster Custom S;-;Dota 2 is very good game, I like to play with my friends and i have enjoyed ^_^
Rootin For Putin;-;The absolutely best language tool ever designed. All you have to do, is to select which Russian server you want to queue in. Only side effect is your transformation into a racist on the level of a KKK Kligarpp.
[=.=] Nymph;-;Making Russians angry is always funny.
WASH;-;sick, they have unusuals too
LouieLouieLouiee;-;i love this game and giff me ferrari_430 ta set
[UMCS]Cubrick;-;I cannot delete this piece of  game from my library
@Cr4ck4r;-;Dont play on EU west.. if you are NOT russian -.- uninstall this game, until VOLVO will get a damn IP ban for RUSSIANS on EUROPE !!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
Pici;-;i waste my 2 676 hours with this game , playing with  russians , pinoys , feeders , afk's and RUSSIANS again . i unninstaled it because of a RUSSIAN streak. just... don't play it . please . if you want to have a good life.
Akira...;-;This game is fun and entertaining if you actule have teammates to play with.... Do not play this game solo you will get crushed by partys from opposing team who know how to make combinations with heros... But that is not the worst part of this game, the worst part is the fact that you will most likely get teamed up with Russain players or Spanish who are uncapable of speaking English language at all. I have spent two years in this game trying to find one or two good teammates, but all i found in this game is non English speaking teammates who keep kill stealing and blameing others for their own mistake. This game is no fun for me, its real pain filled with anger and haitred....
Creeper "The Great";-;Item Confirmation Simulator 2015 How i play this game: 1. Install 2. Play 3. Open Armory 4. Accept an item that i bought for my friend (item not tradable bug) 5. Wait for 5 minutes, so i can write this review 6. Quit Game 7. Uninstall Score : 9.5/10 (If i like this game, i will give 10/10)
Hodor.;-;This game is loads of fun. easy tutorial for beginners :)!
Momark;-;I recommend that game for every MOBA fans and other's :)
KebabFan67;-;Who needs a life when you have DOTA 2?
NCG | infinit3_dant3;-;Its a wonderful yet brutal experience which leaves you with a strange love-hate feeling for it, like any worth while relationship does. For veterans from Warcraft 3 mod days will fell quite nostalgic and really appreciate the up scaling done to the game. Newcomers will still have a sense of how detailed the game is, both graphically and game mechanics wise. At its core it's an RPG through and through with leveling systems, items and fixed hero abilities. The community still needs to grow in terms of mannerism but anyone with thick skin can power through the nasties, which aren't that many anyway.
shrinu30;-;Awesome game, didnt even know i was racist!!
snapple;-;A fantastic multiplayer experience. This game is deeply complex with it's metagame and many strategies a team can employ. The community is not as toxic as many say it is. Yes there are the few rude, obnoxious, and annoying players but that is true for all multiplayer games. There are many ways to play such as the carry, support, nuker, initiator, and jungler. These roles all have their place in this game and there is something for everyone. Pros: - complex but easy to get into - many ways to play - relies on teamwork - great esport community - 100% free - nice aesthetic - many heroes to choose from - great ui - very rare glitches - dota tv - metagame Cons - a little difficult to get into - players not playing on thier region's server - first few hours are not very fun - occasionally takes a while to join a game
Easy;-;yeah cause this game is very good to people
Pig Pen;-;Worst community ever.
Edgar Allan Poe's Raven;-;This game is a best way to prepare for living in the upcoming Russian Empire.
FiShiro;-;Worst Call of Duty game ever.
BAAAM Freeman;-;Great game. Valve is a master of making games and/or employing people who make good games and take it for themselves :P Seriously. THIS IS A GREAT GAME. And free ;). Hard to get at first, but you wont be dissapointed!
(_);-;Great game, once you get started you can't stop playing it. I'm hooked on this game and i can't stop playing it. I think i have a problem.
Randomology;-;Amazing game. Honestly its the only game that has managed to keep me coming back and back for years. Dont be discouraged by the high learning curve once you understand the game and have mastered the core functions you will never need another game again. Competitive and highly addicting 10/10!
AirXL;-;Awesome, incredible, unpredictable, amazing... Best Game Ever
Ad;-;Worst addiction ever! Ruined my life, I could have programmed myself new game for a time being on dota. U will meet some awesome people but those are minor in compare too "nervous, low self esteem, hardcore, racist, disorderly, anorexic maniacs" which outnumbers normal standards.
Cheese And Pickle Sandwich;-;Best game iv'e ever played :D takes a little while to learn to play and get good but its worth it.
Handsome_WombatX6969;-;Dont play this is game! it'll suck the life out of you!
eGGzy;-;Ruined my school grades, my money management and my sleep schedule. 10/10 it's okay
cheekymonkee;-;I was jungling chaos knight one afternoon, racking up the six figure kill spree when I had an epiphany. After about 3 matches you've seen it all- this is a painfully simple game that offers no challenge whatsoever. I have some suggestions to improve the gameplay at least twentyfold: 1. Introduce a loadout screen and killstreak perks, such as uavs and AC-130s, to reward hardcore junglers such as myself. 2. Have an in game marketplace, where in game gold can be purchased for bitcoins, at a ratio of 1:1. 3. Increase number of players per team to 16 for epic battles.
Let me play Sensei;-;this game is awesome , the market , the items and image are best . but ranking and report system need to be improved a little bit more . 10/10 dota 2 .
DarkStar;-;This is by FAR the greatest choice making RPG to date.There are over a hundred characters and each character has stunning storys that can change based on your choices. It seems every new game I start has diffrent NPC and voice lines that drive the story through the end. The ending is generally the same wether the Dark lord or light lord wins. This single player RPG allows building of the story through dicisions and item purcheses. Like recently I choose the Character Phantom Assassin and built the powerful mechinism that allowed me to heal my party members. The dialoge on this story line was great though the curse filter was removed as I heard lines from the ever changing juggernuat character such as " this noob feed loses the game" and "She took safe lane for a ing mech?". though there are still a few bugs such as the one that causes incorrect traslation of the NPCs lines, as in my PA storyline the Puck character was translated in spanish and my ally in arms Keeper Of The Light was incorrectly translated to Russian. Though sad I will miss their dialoge im sure there is much more to come, as I havent had the same dialoge yet in my 3000 hours of gameplay [10/10 would shoot myself.]
Arsha;-;Fun game if you meet pro players Bad game if you meet pinoys players
Kiticat;-;-Do you like games with strategic gameplay where everyone matters? -Do you like a friendly community? -Do you enjoy when you made mistakes, people help you figure out your problem and admire you when you do good? Then you came to the wrong place.     . !!! 11/10
Pudge.com;-;off this
Tiobuenofriki;-;Dota 2 is like roulette, It's fun until a russian joins.
Weegee;-;Much fun, very wow
Fun;-;Dota 2 has more nicodene than drug... Makes you dammn addicted>>
Boobies is <3;-;GOOD GAME strategic and teamplay are observed
[69ER]Sir Zane the Inzane;-;A game where the majority of your team are russians. They are feeding, AFK and doesn't understand when you tell them to leave your lane. Still would recommend it anyday. 11/10
Sire Dkarysalot II;-;learn insults from other languages with this simulator  bobo 10/10
322 is real;-;The best MOBA in my opinion. Would play/10
PingedChicken;-;Much of my life has gone into this game. Although it is a bit difficult at first (and you will suck) it quickly becomes heaps of fun and will consume your free time.
Xyclopz;-;Ruined my life
Haruhi Suzumiya;-;How to Play dota2 Step 1. Enter pubs Step 2. cry Step 3.  Step 4. Praise our lord and savior gabe newell for teaming up with icefag to create this game. Bonus Step: Waste $400 praying for rare items Bonus Step 2: Waste your life getting a pudge hook.
DARK INFERNO;-;Team based game where nothing matters and everyone is terrible.
Ul;-;Nice game
Knight of Felvis;-;casual scum stay away
Standin.KayKay;-;This is a good game ! The best game in this world ! :D
DanteHyperX;-;love this one
xihot;-;Very addictive and fun game. Real men do Dota!!
EDooley;-;The greatest game of all time. But, it will take over your life!
Ayy Lmao;-;Dota is certainly a game with a learning curve, but after you get past the basics it is obviously very very fun, as you can see by the amount of players. Ofcoarse this is always compared with LoL, but in my opinion i find Dota far more fun. I suppose it just depends on what you like, if your friends play one or the other, and other factors. But the best thing about this game and LoL...theyre both FREEEEEEEEEEEEEE, which is ing incredible.
Rarka;-;Dota is great and really enjoyable game. Do not worry if you suck at it, because even those pros who are being watched by thousands had to start somewhere. Maybe you'll be the one being looked up at.
Dread;-;It ruined my life,can't sleep.can't eat.It's awesome
Sloma;-;Wonderfull MOBA type of game. It's a lot better than LoL for me, graphics style is more appealing to adults than it's competitor. I'd score it for 9,5/10 and recommended it to all players.
Liliewei;-;Do you have a good day ? Do you have social life ? Do you have a girlfriend ? Do you have a good relationship with your family ? Do your college life full of rose ? Do your grade is good ? If one of those is yes then dota 2 is the perfect game for you. It can sovle any possitive problem with your life. In addition, dota 2 also come with an anger managements and russian language quick training programs without charging you any peny. What you are waiting for, go play it. Oh wait, do you have a lot of money ? Because cosmestic items are waiting you.
Penguin Bot;-;If you want to learn spanish and lose your social life this game is great for you.
Slippery Slimy Waifu;-;Dota 2 is one of the best games out there. It is a massive rage factory, and you will hear insults come out of your mouth that you didn't even think you knew. You can play powerful heroes, like a succubus with a pain fetish, or a massive red man who loves to splatter people into numbers. Also, the learning curve is best described as a learning cliff. But whatever i tell you doesn't matter, because you people read the reviews for comedy, rather than purchasing information.
Let's Get Rich;-;Might be the best and hardest MOBA out there, the best of it all it is free to play with no payable benefits only item for show START TO PLAY THIS GAME need a coach? ---> add Spidark on steam and i will give you a great first impression
Fucking BitchyGirl;-;Great game.
Texicutioner;-;I hate my life. 10/10
FCK U ANTON;-;Your skill level increases as your cosmetic value increases. Pay2Win. 9/10. Would recommend.
Bluvoyei;-;the perfect game to spend leisure time. 10/10
HaLiL *RaZeR;-;Nice game
Dsol;-;Dota 2 is the sequel to the popular Warcraft III mod known as Dota. It is very well crafted and improves the gameplay from orginal modification in the source engine. Gameplay mechanics are solid and is very difficult, it requires to be attentive at all times. Positioning is key throughout due to the very long stun times and high damage output by every hero at a certain point in the game. Dota 2's graphics are much improved from the original Warcraft III modification in the Warcraft engine respectivly and shows great colours and lighting on the map and characters. Unfortunatley due to it's difficult nature and very large learning curb and tends to push back a large amount of players. My recommendation is to start with a group of friends in bot matchs, and play every single hero at least once to figure out their abilities. Then play the game online where everyone is an idiot or russian. GLHF
KennyPi;-;amazing best game i play so far
Way Too Sexy  (Sinigang);-;love this game!
PapaCazulo23;-;The best online game ever
Popeye the Sailor;-;Do not play this in' game!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
.:SiN:.;-;Good Game. Totally Fu*k up my life since 2011.
Neivo;-;Best game in the planet
SilverLine;-;Try to gentle
Somebody Order The Sausage?;-;Not all sequels suck. Try this and destroy your life.
CorpseLord;-;Good game playing for 2 years now
YB Bobzin #Hypernatremia;-;Before i started playing dota i had everything. Now i dont. 10/10
Mycz;-;Never get tired of it
[FTv]Kyuuji;-;This Game is Awesome
Fall Fall;-;Ruined my life and still continues to do so. 10/10
JUVSX;-;THIS GAME CHANGED MY LIFE
SampleWiz;-;Dota 2 is great game
I Have Special Eyes;-;This game has both enriched and destroyed my life, on one hand i dont have friends any more but that also means i have more time for dota 10/10
AkA-BaGhE!!;-;Frickn awesome game!!!!! (y)
Mr.Inconsistent;-;dis gaem is supr rip of league of lesbianz 0/10 wud recommend
Ins@ne;-;Probably the best game of its genre. There's tons of copies or look-a-likes out there but none of them comes close to the original. If you want to join the MOBA genre stop looking and download Dota2! However - for those who are interested - there's a point I'd like to make, depending on your previous MOBA experience: If you have never played a game like Dota2 before (also goes for people who might be thinking about changing from LoL), you will have to be willing to learn. And you will have to learn A TON! Trust me, before you're any good at this game, you're going through a hell of climbing up a mountain of things you need to learn with people at the top  all over you while insulting your mother (or insulting you in a language you can't even read). If you're prepared to face the most toxic community of all game genres out there, you will find a game here which could potentially accompany your whole life! It won't get boring EVER - literally. To be fair, the learning part goes for every game of this genre. And since it's a team game, your teammates will hate you for everything you're doing wrong - or they THINK you're doing wrong, even if it's right! The moment you mastered the basics though, this game will prove to be one of those you can play for years and still have fun with it!
Jokke;-;Dota 2 is a lot of fun if you meet the right team - too bad that doesn't happen very often. The community is more toxic than botulinum toxin. On the other hand, I've learned several Russian swear words since 70% of the community is Russian. Russian simulator 10/10
WIZARD KITTEN;-;learn russian and qq'ing~
{Cos.} BiG BaLLZ;-;one of the most addicting games ive played yet just a personal note to new players watch a few totoriuls before playing a official game other players get easely agitetd by "noobs" sorry for the bad spelling im actually not english x
RIP Iwata;-;terrible all you do is right click
Tywin Fuckin' Lannister #eatit;-;Would you like to play one of the most competitive, high skill capped games on steam? Here it is, you are gazing upon Dota2's famous legacy, down from my childhood Warcraft 3 days, where I'd be mid with some other guy not knowing what to do. To now my current self, playing on the competitive scene. This game is free, AMAZING! The community is by far better than most other known Mobas *points at League* It also has great micro-transactions incase you wanna make your favorite hero a total and utter badass with items, but wait. You don't need to buy the items, because in time you will get them! Sure it's all randomed and time is consuming but that's the joy of it, it's all just free. Great Game overall, I could spend countless hours on this thing, and many more! I'd give this a solid 9.2/10 Just because of how great it is
Xiao Bao (GT);-;is a nice game : 3
Meta;-;Play against russians. Play with russians. Become a russian.
Xiaosen;-;fully my live, thanks dota2 ;)
[RP$];-;It's Fun and addictive game. It's one of the must try f2p games in Steam
`Secret;-;Nice this Game.....
Puffs;-;Steep learning curve, but once you invest the time to not suck then it is a pretty addictive and fun game. The teamwork aspect of it is what makes it and/or breaks it if you are unlucky to be paired with a feeding player. That said, if you can find a small core of people that you consistently play with then win or lose it is a pretty awesome game. Oh, and don't use Riki or Sniper unless you have to. Just trust me.
Takeo Kun;-;look at some of the good reviews. im just messing around here.
BurningLegacy;-;This game is great, the community may be a little mean at times but if you find a good group of friends to play with it is amazing.
emVee;-;I've spent a lot of time playing this game. I even participated in a few tournaments last year. And, you know, I will definitely advise this game to everyone. First of all, the amount of things, that you have to know to be a good player, is really huge. It is very good, because the more you learn and try to remember, the better your memory becomes. Secondly, the number of possible game situations is, probably, more than a billion. Different item builds, skill builds, moves, skill usage etc etc. This stuff improves your logic and tactical skillz. Thirdly, you have to make your in-game decisions very fast, and it improves your mind skillz. As a conclusion, I'd want to say, that this game is an excellent thing if you muse about self-perfection. And don't give a f...k about the raging community, if their rage is unfair: just mute them. If their rage is fair, consider your mistakes, learn to play with bots and Let Gaben Be With You.
Ribs;-;DotA 2. This is one of the MOST AMAZING games I have played in a very long time. It's a simple idea, a 5 vs 5 arena with the same map everytime, both teams trying to kill the others base. You fight as over 100 heroes, each with different roles. That's all it is. Team communication is VITAL, you can't win without coordinating and fighting as a team. Overall, it is definately a game for certain types of people. You need to be able to work and talk with your teamates, and be concentrated pretty much 100% of the time. Also, it's a lot more fun to play with people you know. Form up a group with four of your friends, and it will be much more fun. The games can take anywhere from 30-70 minutes, but most of the time game I play only take about 40-50 minutes. Lastly, don't jump right into matchmaking right away. You will probably get flamed and insulted and hurrased by your teamates if you don't do well. Play some bot matches first, learn what heroes you are good with. If people DO flame and insult you, take it with a grain of salt. Just don't yell back, that won't help anybody. It's a really fun game, and you should all try it out. Bonus: It's free, so you don't lose anything by playing a couple games, then learning you hate it. Chances are though, you will LOVE it!
Ripper;-;Fantastic game, best of the bunch. If you like HoN you can easily slide right in.
Symbiote;-;Absolutely fantastic, fun and addictive. One of the best games ever made. If you get this game though, make sure you do the tutorials and some bot matches before you play pvp matches, otherwise you will get anhilliated, and won't want to play the game again
MS_KiNKi RYUSAKI;-;how to trade the item ... some one tell me
Blanc;-;better than LOL
ReveL3D's;-;You can possess a tree You can eat a tree to gain hp You can exorcise a tree this game is op
BnnbDD;-;this is great game. go on and play it, great community (sometimes)
GMbeR;-;Play with your friends and you will definitely enjoy.
Daekir;-;Excellent game, highly strategict and fun!
Feil Fitler!;-;I like the Dota2 Community, but the matchmaking is very unfair.
Whewshie;-;Leauge of legends without the baby stuff. 10/10
peru;-;i have beat campaign mode 7 times, and na'vi still hasn't recruited me.
Crixus;-;really interesting game
<i><u><b>Blank;-;i like this game because you can earn a real money at the sametime you can play :)
TRAPWOLF;-;Heard of Dota 2 all my life from friends around me.....and now I see why xD Its.. 1) Addictive 2) Fun 3) Competitive 4) Challenging 5) Teaches something that's not only important 'in game' but also in the real life which is TEAMWORK! 6) This point may sound awkward/weird to people to be a PROS instead of a CONS...but! its the 'LEARNING CURVE'. Wut!? how is this PROS instead of CONS you say!? Let me explain... Every game you play you either win or lose. Now not all games are meant to be won ;) Cause its when you lose you learn something and even when you think you havn't learnt a thing from a game of loss? You just did. You learn't that you did something wrong to have achived that loss and should try to improve in that missing element. Knowing the fact that no ones perfect. This is what makes Dota 2 fun and keeps you playing over and over, day after day so its hard to get even close to 1% of being bored. Plus in top of that there are 100+ Heroes, that makes getting bored of this game dead impossible :') and that gives us point #1 ;) So I recommend everyone to play this game, even if you're a cat...... cause cats are awesome.......so is Dota 2 ;) Happy Gaming! -Arafat / TRAPWOLF
PrefecT Is Shit;-;this is a really good game but it takes so long to be a professional on this game ! but im telling to play this game. its awesome
Eza;-;It's ok.
Hinks;-;'It's alright' 11/10 - IGN
acephalia;-;This is a great game. I used to play the warcraft 3 user map settings version. It was addicting way back then, and it is still addicting now. I played league of legends before I played dota 2, and I admit i was a little scared of the transition from league to dota. But as I write this review now, I do not think I will ever play league of legends again. I will stick to playing dota2 from now until forever. Perhaps it's the nostalgia it gives me or perhaps it's fact that everyone is a  on league of legends. Eitherway, this is a great game to get into, especially if MOBAs are your type of game.
Harfun;-;learned alot of curse word from all over the world, 10/10
Czgames.net| Cold_Zero;-;This game is very good
Dingo;-;Teaches patience, coordination, decision making, creative thinking, teamwork, curse words in over 19 different languages, intolerance and frustration. 9/10
Billionaire;-;Don't play, just it, don't even open this game.
R.;-;Play Dota. Lose all friends. Play more Dota.
DrNSN.;-;Thumbs up if you want this game. Because its Awesome and free.
PACHORRA ELETRICA;-;nice game bad players
Happy Cookies;-;Best game of it's type. I love dota 2, and I'm sure many other would too. Though the tutorial is a little boring, the game quickly warms up and is a great thrill. The abillity to buy and sell stuff on the steam market is very cool as well.
@Flipside915;-;It takes effort to learn Dota, period! So to all the newcomers out there please dont lose hope when you stumble from losing games, it is normal. It normally takes about 30-100 games to really master each hero plus their item builds. Good Luck!
Eric Clapton;-;it's hard to move on from dota 1.. after i try 2-3 games on this game, i'm so regret, why i'm not move on to dota 2 from long ago..
the Walrus;-;I dont like it I promised myself Id never play it, but now I cant stop playing it. Very addictive and makes you very competitive even if your not the "competitive easily addicted to a game" type of person. Edit (*12/28/14): The game and the community is full of trolls and intentional feeders. The only hope for a goodgame is now only in the ranked playlist, and even there you'll get your trolls from time to time. If you're going to play, bring some friends to have a team, or dont even bother at all. It used to be fun and you could search an all pick and actually encounter people who want to win and play but now it seems that all the CoD casuals have drifted over to DOTA 2.
Cengceremet;-;wow i like this game
Kappa;-;Very fun game, I suggest it to everyone.
Whoyomych;-;Wasting of time!
tRUST;-;Joined game, learned russian, learned how not to be friendly. Thanks valve
Black Elsa;-;Welcome to the game of English majors, Russians, Peruvians, and this; "GG report riki ez mid" This game is like your abusive father. You sorta kinda hate it, you know its' not good for your life, but you still come back to it at one point or another because this is some kind of forced relationship that you know that you will get beaten or yelled at if you try to escape it Also, Gaben.
[TF9L]Centurion;-;I played a little and it was fun.
DT-hendripottersix;-;hope can become to strong
Twitch.tv/Merlindima;-;Ok so its dota 2, The larges and most popular game on steam at the time of writing, If you dont have this game and you are an avid gamer. You will most likely pick up this game at some point, due to the fact that it is free, and well why not? From a Graphics point of view at maxed out on a GTX 660 easily it looks fantastic and that isnt even the best graphics card so the requirements arnt huge but much lower than that on budget PC with the worst graphics card ever and you might get a few people compaining about your *Wooden PC* increasing the time to load up into the game, and if worst comes to worse you can turn it to complete minium and I bet you that even if you laptop has one of the worst GPU's on the market you can eventually get it to run at a playable pace. From a gameplay point of view, as you can see I have spent well over 500 hours on this game so it must be pretty good and some other reviewers have spent from 1000 hours and above, the reason? Well there is 1 map that has a few variables that can change the game such as the runes, weather you get a good creep from the jungle to control and take on your enemies with. So 1 map you think hummm that must be pretty limited, well yes i would kind of agree with you but the fact is that becuase of the 100+ heros and many hero combinations and counters no game is the same with each game changing the way you play slightly depending the character you play, how you play it and who you are against and how they play it so the game does take a while to get old and even then having the same map means that you can really know it, like REALLY know it. How to do specific techneques and pulling creeps, where the enemy heros can see you and how to position yourself. So in that term the gameplay remains fun and interesting while still for players like me challenging. The Community: This is the one issue you get with this game some people are not very forgiving for your mistakes and there is a lot of anti-russian stuff, mainly because when you go to play on an English or US server and you get strange man shouting at you and your team in a strange language that no one on your team but him can understand, people get a little (to say the least) annoyed. Althrough the higher your battle rank and mmr (I will talk about that later) means that eventually you will get players who actually make an effort to co-ordinate with you. The Ranking system and how valve makes its money: So the game is free and so how does valve make its money? Well first let me explain the ranking system: Basicaly after each game you will recieve an ammount of battle points for you to increase your battle point level, each level you will recieve an item (I think) and acasionally you will be able to open a present to get free items, these items can also be dropped through luck randomaly to people at the end of the game. Valve also sells hero costumes in the dota store/in game shop these items will only change the look of your character and will not actualy affect the gameplay which I find very unique and means that there arnt huge pay to wins in the game which annoys me hugely when people make a good game and then make it pay to win. These costume items are very effective with the steam market allowing players to sell their items cheaply to other players but valve still profits of that by taking a transaction fee. Also due to the popular steam workshop players can submit their item designs to be avaliable in game and they will also get a cut of the money made which is a nice thing for new artists to make some money while having something to potentially put on a CV. Also when you reach a battle point rank of 13 you will unlock ranked matchmaking which will allow you to play games with other people of that level 13 and higher to increase your MMR with the top MMR being 7500 and bottom 0 (You really have to be bad to get 0) with 5000+ mmr being very high. MMR is for more serious players that want to really test their skills with others of that level, but on a down side note, 2000-2700 mmr is very hard to get past as there are people from all different abilities so that can be a little dificult to get past. but eventually with experience and a little luck you will get past and eventually be on the climb you your ability level. This concludes my review for dota with a few 10/10 statistics Also please consider taking a look at my youtube channel where there is some dota content and some help videos for new players: https://www.youtube.com/user/MerlinICVideos Graphics: 8.5/10 Gameplay: 9/10 Community: 6/10 As it gets better later on Ranking/Progression System: 9/10
Hyooo;-;this is a really good game from valve in which a competitive MObA game. DOTA 2 is a MOBA game involving 10 people and 5 member on each team. each team called radiant and dire defending the ancient (core of their life). members of the team choose one of 100++ heroes. there are 3 basic stats ability, which are strength, intellegent, and agility. both team fight each other have the purpose to protect their ancient and destroy the enemy ancient. to sum up, this game is really recommended, though for new player it is needed to follow the training, not all of players are friendly to new player, make sure to understand the system of the game and be polite to each other. Dont forget to commend a player that you assume is well worth commend and report those player who you assume as a ruiner.
jaSPERM;-;Dota is mother of all MOBA games
Beacon of Knowledge;-;This game requires logical thinking. It's fun when you have a team that knows what they're doing. Prefer this over League of Legends. DotA 2 = Chess. LoL= Checkers. That pretty much sums it up. Pros- -Fun. -Well balanced. -Every hero is and has a counter-hero. -Meet different people. -More strategic depth. -You don't have to buy your Heroes or characters, this disables in-game advantage to people who use real money. -Wider Hero diversity. No gap closer, slow, utility spell on everyone unlike LoL. Every Hero is unique. Cons- -Tutorial isn't done yet. Pretty hard for people who are new to MOBA. -The learning curve is very, very, very steep. -LoL also has outside factors affecting the game, such as runes you can unlock and equip outside of the game, to affect every match in some way. DotA doesn't have any idiocy like that. Your win or loss is completely unaffected outside of the current match you are in. This is coming from someone who hasn't played a lot of videogames. I have compared it with LoL and that is my opinion. This is affected my academics significantly. My family doesn't like me anymore because I'm addicted to this game a lot, to be honest. Also, this game needs some changes on its MMR system, because of which I had to create this account to start DotA all over again to improve my stats. I hope something would be done about it in the future, and new servers would be opened up in countries where people get terrible ping such as India. I would definitely recommend this to people who are capable of logical thinking. Decisions need to be made much faster and people who would love such games and not easy ones such as LoL should definitely give this game a try. This ruined my life. My social life is pathetic, my parents don't like me, and I'm terrible at academics as I mentioned earlier. At home, people made sure I don't play DotA 2. So, I secretly game at a gaming parlor almost everyday. I spent half or all of my college fund on DotA 2 and other games on Steam. My parents are unaware of this. Addicted so much, and I'm just in high school. Good game life. Reason - DotA 2. 5 out of 5. Definitely would recommend.
NoLimits;-;One of the best, most difficult and truly competitive games I've ever played. It is free and doesn't have any pay-to-win, all heroes are free, the only paid content are cosmetical items that DO NOT change gameplay.
D'Kid;-;try this game
[BusyBees] Ted!;-;This game is free. The community might ruin this game for most players.
George W. Pudge;-;-too many russians -very competitive -noobs gonna have a hard time(ing much flaming in the first weeks... well kinda always xD) -you will learn most swears in russian -you gonna be a russian racist after literally 1-3months -its pretty much about tactics,roles and strategy -free 2 play -10million Players -100+ Heros and 100+ different Items make this game very complex -Noobs might need like 1-3 months to get along with the game (hard mechanics,tower/creep aggro,lasthitting,day/night sight, juking, skillshots and so on) well all in all i have to say its not the Best game for beginners id say that might be his younger brother LoL. Though if you have time to get along with it. Then my friend you gonna have so much fun, for literally endless hours of playing. As i said awesome game go and DL gl hf :D
Murthles;-;Keep playing Dota 2 and you'll eventually learn russian, or romanian. Yes, I highly recommend it.
Fumey;-;Honestly the most intense, competetive game I've played since back in the days of CoD:WaW! Bad example, but especially for being free and the huge following...I've drowned more time that I'd like to admit on this game. So addictive and fun when you actually get past the learning curve and start to get good. Always something to learn, and mostly every patch adds something cool or refreshing to the game i.e a new hero or changes to the map or something of the sort! Download, and enjoy kicking  with your friends!
Ak9199;-;what i dislike about this game is some noobs who doesnt listen to teammates and dont support in the game that whay i really dislike other then that its a great game if you play as a team its victory all the way and its fun
32-DOOM;-;It's like a better LoL!
Handsome_WombatX6969;-;Dont play this is game! it'll suck the life out of you!
eGGzy;-;Ruined my school grades, my money management and my sleep schedule. 10/10 it's okay
Dedenne;-;Lots of  pinoys
cli_51;-;This game is hard
Dunkin Deez Nutzz;-;BEST GAME IN THE WORLD
!- ADP -!;-;the best game in my whole life .
Ignas / www.interpid.org;-;Worst game I have ever played in my entire life.
mouZ';-;This game is good for the trashbin. Featuring one of the worst matchmaking system in the history of videogames.
boytoy ples;-;This game is a waste of your life
Zaade;-;LoL is a different game then Dota 2 in many ways, but there are several things that are very similar to both game I've played both (not on this account), and I have to say that both games will make you hate mexicans, french people, brasilians, russians and pretty much anything that is foreign it will make you a  both ingame and irl, both games will make more addicted then Whitney Huston was on coke. To be just (even though I prefer LoL over Dota), I think Dota 2 is a better game then League for the simple reason that it is more interactive and you can play with your friends easier.
murderousheart;-;I get to learn so many different languages.
Arthur;-;This  is the best game I've ever played , contents , elements , whatever . If u dont play dota , u have wasted ur life.
H@Rt_Mirana;-;the most great game in the world { DOTA WILL NEVER DIE }
Klonoa;-;It's ok
Aura;-;It's a awesome game which you can troll the pinoy
Moonlight;-;9/10 would feed and rage again
{WNNA} Bolbi;-;This game is a tutorial for how to hate Peruvians.
Akodking;-;It ruined my life...
@Desire;-;play and learn russian
-TB- Frequency Zero;-;This Games Amazing I Play It Every Day Since I Downloaded It
| Branzee;-;O.K ive nearly played 800hrs of this sh*t game, dont get it...but when you win its its great :D if you dont mind the stress and heart problems this game comes bundled with and that it destroys friendships by all means download DOTA 2, that being said the stratergy and teamwork you need to preform flawless kills and team ganks on the enemy team is not easy but when done correctly and played as a team this game is truly a gem you will never find a game like this that gives you the satisfaction that the choices you make can change the game in a matter of seconds. P.S- The game does have a tutorial to get you going but If your new to the MOBA scene take the time to learn, watch guides becuase this game has quite a steep learning curve and quite a big selection of items to buy (it can be overwhelming to the new player), i recommend playing a few bot games before jumping into a match against other players.
Knight of Felvis;-;casual scum stay away
Standin.KayKay;-;This is a good game ! The best game in this world ! :D
DanteHyperX;-;love this one
xihot;-;Very addictive and fun game. Real men do Dota!!
Way Too Sexy  (Sinigang);-;love this game!
PapaCazulo23;-;The best online game ever
Popeye the Sailor;-;Do not play this in' game!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
Fucking BitchyGirl;-;Great game.
Texicutioner;-;I hate my life. 10/10
Take everything;-;It's an awesome teamplay-minded multiplayer game. It's lots of fun to play and becomes even more fun when you get good at playing the (over 100) characters available.
ugly;-;WOw dis gasme fukkin suckz  lol evry1 is a fukkin idiot aND plays stupid and then blame u its in stupid top down like runescape and grafics fukin suck and no1 speakz english DO NOT play dis game if u like  and get laid dis gaime will make u an instan virgin lol -0/5 jus play cod mw3 on xbox
Let's Get Rich;-;Might be the best and hardest MOBA out there, the best of it all it is free to play with no payable benefits only item for show START TO PLAY THIS GAME need a coach? ---> add Spidark on steam and i will give you a great first impression
Penguin Bot;-;If you want to learn spanish and lose your social life this game is great for you.
Slippery Slimy Waifu;-;Dota 2 is one of the best games out there. It is a massive rage factory, and you will hear insults come out of your mouth that you didn't even think you knew. You can play powerful heroes, like a succubus with a pain fetish, or a massive red man who loves to splatter people into numbers. Also, the learning curve is best described as a learning cliff. But whatever i tell you doesn't matter, because you people read the reviews for comedy, rather than purchasing information.
.:SiN:.;-;Good Game. Totally Fu*k up my life since 2011.
Neivo;-;Best game in the planet
Ul;-;Nice game
Gaspra;-;Doto is life. All praise the mighty Volvo for the blessing they have bestowed upon our puny mortal souls. This is an amazing game; the level of balance for such a wide variety of playable heroes is beyond impressive. It has the steepest learning curve of any game I've ever played. If you are bored of games being too easy, play Dota. Learn Russian. Enjoyable the inevitable hatred that will consume your soul!
Rabbi Moshe the Foreskin Stealer;-;I ate a tree to gain health and I punched a flying donkey with a sword. 4/2.0
Park Song Jun;-;As i start playing dota 2 it was pretty confusing at first. The few games ive played with bots were nice and later on i learned many mechannics of the game. As I advanced on to play more i suddenly find myself in a more  environment. The people i started inteacting with were pretty . Some of them just    feeding. As i      ive become a part of something . Weeks and    ive played aloneside comrades.
Ayy Lmao;-;Dota is certainly a game with a learning curve, but after you get past the basics it is obviously very very fun, as you can see by the amount of players. Ofcoarse this is always compared with LoL, but in my opinion i find Dota far more fun. I suppose it just depends on what you like, if your friends play one or the other, and other factors. But the best thing about this game and LoL...theyre both FREEEEEEEEEEEEEE, which is ing incredible.
Rarka;-;Dota is great and really enjoyable game. Do not worry if you suck at it, because even those pros who are being watched by thousands had to start somewhere. Maybe you'll be the one being looked up at.
Dread;-;It ruined my life,can't sleep.can't eat.It's awesome
Sloma;-;Wonderfull MOBA type of game. It's a lot better than LoL for me, graphics style is more appealing to adults than it's competitor. I'd score it for 9,5/10 and recommended it to all players.
Arsha;-;Fun game if you meet pro players Bad game if you meet pinoys players
Kiticat;-;-Do you like games with strategic gameplay where everyone matters? -Do you like a friendly community? -Do you enjoy when you made mistakes, people help you figure out your problem and admire you when you do good? Then you came to the wrong place.     . !!! 11/10
<font face="ravie">Riki_phiju;-;Fantastic game...!! Once played get addicted quickly..
MiRvoKeR;-;This game is awesome
Weegee;-;Much fun, very wow
Fun;-;Dota 2 has more nicodene than drug... Makes you dammn addicted>>
DDoS;-;This is the game of the century!
Mad Kael'thas;-;it's my first best game on pc ,this game making me dnt want go to school just kidding ,seriously i love this game .
Akodking;-;It ruined my life...
@Desire;-;play and learn russian
-TB- Frequency Zero;-;This Games Amazing I Play It Every Day Since I Downloaded It
| Branzee;-;O.K ive nearly played 800hrs of this sh*t game, dont get it...but when you win its its great :D if you dont mind the stress and heart problems this game comes bundled with and that it destroys friendships by all means download DOTA 2, that being said the stratergy and teamwork you need to preform flawless kills and team ganks on the enemy team is not easy but when done correctly and played as a team this game is truly a gem you will never find a game like this that gives you the satisfaction that the choices you make can change the game in a matter of seconds. P.S- The game does have a tutorial to get you going but If your new to the MOBA scene take the time to learn, watch guides becuase this game has quite a steep learning curve and quite a big selection of items to buy (it can be overwhelming to the new player), i recommend playing a few bot games before jumping into a match against other players.
Honorius Chisurius;-;Best way to pratice anger management.
Pig Pen;-;Worst community ever.
Edgar Allan Poe's Raven;-;This game is a best way to prepare for living in the upcoming Russian Empire.
[69ER]Sir Zane the Inzane;-;A game where the majority of your team are russians. They are feeding, AFK and doesn't understand when you tell them to leave your lane. Still would recommend it anyday. 11/10
Dercas Roirraw Raksuh;-;learn insults from other languages with this simulator  bobo 10/10
322 is real;-;The best MOBA in my opinion. Would play/10
PingedChicken;-;Much of my life has gone into this game. Although it is a bit difficult at first (and you will suck) it quickly becomes heaps of fun and will consume your free time.
Xyclopz;-;Ruined my life
RobotOverlord;-;This game is DOTA. DOTA is the game. You need to play this game if you dont like it you didnt pay for it oh well but if you do... welcome to the club
crestan;-;You have a nice fulfilling life? You have lots of friends to play with? Why don't you try some dota?! Lose all your friends, get brain cancer and cry yourself to sleep every night.
Phantom Assassin;-;This is a good game.
veL;-;Playing DoTa 2 is like drinking vodka: It's addicting, draws all the russians, and makes you regret each time you do it. 10/10. Will play forever.
Coma;-;Turned me into an autist and a racist. 10/10
The Kyros Peak;-;game. ing sick of it .
Anna Akana;-;its teaching how to be good at teamwork
fame1337;-;After playin this game I understand how stupid Russians are. Thank you dota. 10/10
Fantasy;-;Turn hours of your life to great rage. Forces you to lose confidence in all other. 10/10
Statass;-;I finally fulfilled my dream of becoming a dirty water puddle. Thank you Morphling. IGN 11/10
Sir GrafSky - Reborn!;-;A solid Multiplayer-Online Battle-Arena game... What is a MOBA? a Moba is probably a game where by fundamentals everything is first set in total equilibrium... and players actions, skills, teamwork and effort is what makes the difference for one team to finally win over another. With over 100 different heroes to choose from, all absolutely free, no need to unlock and no need to buy anything.... On top of the "seemingly" repetitive one map and mode there's actually different events with a very distinct gameplay and features.. ranging from Team versus Team like Diretide and even Co-oP like the Wraith Night. The game's business model is the way I see it, most user-friendly... Everything you want unlocked is unlocked... Everything that u can buy is purely eye-candy and visual effects and models... But at the same time, one courier... one announcer... one "set" on your favorite hero is enough to make the game experience just SO MUCH more! Be Vary though.... Amongst the player base lurk some really irrittating and annoying children from all across the globe, who's primary aim and goal ( in game and in life ) is to just annoy people and  them off for their own pleasure. Steer clear of falling into arguments with them that cost you the whole game and some nerve cells... There's the report abuse button and let the MODs do the rest!
oo;-;Probably the best game ever made. Always come back to it, and always find a reason to yell at  and russians. Thanks Obama.
Momark;-;I recommend that game for every MOBA fans and other's :)
KebabFan67;-;Who needs a life when you have DOTA 2?
NCG | infinit3_dant3;-;Its a wonderful yet brutal experience which leaves you with a strange love-hate feeling for it, like any worth while relationship does. For veterans from Warcraft 3 mod days will fell quite nostalgic and really appreciate the up scaling done to the game. Newcomers will still have a sense of how detailed the game is, both graphically and game mechanics wise. At its core it's an RPG through and through with leveling systems, items and fixed hero abilities. The community still needs to grow in terms of mannerism but anyone with thick skin can power through the nasties, which aren't that many anyway.
cheekymonkee;-;I was jungling chaos knight one afternoon, racking up the six figure kill spree when I had an epiphany. After about 3 matches you've seen it all- this is a painfully simple game that offers no challenge whatsoever. I have some suggestions to improve the gameplay at least twentyfold: 1. Introduce a loadout screen and killstreak perks, such as uavs and AC-130s, to reward hardcore junglers such as myself. 2. Have an in game marketplace, where in game gold can be purchased for bitcoins, at a ratio of 1:1. 3. Increase number of players per team to 16 for epic battles.
Let me play Sensei;-;this game is awesome , the market , the items and image are best . but ranking and report system need to be improved a little bit more . 10/10 dota 2 .
DarkStar;-;This is by FAR the greatest choice making RPG to date.There are over a hundred characters and each character has stunning storys that can change based on your choices. It seems every new game I start has diffrent NPC and voice lines that drive the story through the end. The ending is generally the same wether the Dark lord or light lord wins. This single player RPG allows building of the story through dicisions and item purcheses. Like recently I choose the Character Phantom Assassin and built the powerful mechinism that allowed me to heal my party members. The dialoge on this story line was great though the curse filter was removed as I heard lines from the ever changing juggernuat character such as " this noob feed loses the game" and "She took safe lane for a ing mech?". though there are still a few bugs such as the one that causes incorrect traslation of the NPCs lines, as in my PA storyline the Puck character was translated in spanish and my ally in arms Keeper Of The Light was incorrectly translated to Russian. Though sad I will miss their dialoge im sure there is much more to come, as I havent had the same dialoge yet in my 3000 hours of gameplay [10/10 would shoot myself.]
Fuck bitches, get APEX;-;I had good grades until i started playing DotA, now im failing maths... 11/10 Would buy again
Vermon;-;Dont play this game if you dont want to ruin your social life. 10/10
J_x_I;-;Full of Russians which do the opposite to what you say 101/9
JinMao;-;Dota 2 is a 2013 multiplayer online battle arena video game and the stand-alone sequel to the Defense of the Ancients (DotA) Warcraft III: Reign of Chaos and Warcraft III: The Frozen Throne mod. Developed by Valve Corporation, Dota 2 was released as a free-to-play title for Microsoft Windows, OS X and Linux in July 2013, concluding a Windows-only public beta testing phase that began in 2011. The game is available exclusively through Valve's content-delivery platform, Steam. Dota 2 is played in discrete matches involving two teams of five players, each of which occupies a stronghold at a corner of the map. Each stronghold contains a building called the "Ancient", which the opposite team must destroy to win the match. Each player controls a "Hero" character and focuses on leveling up, collecting gold, acquiring items and fighting against the other team to achieve victory. Development of Dota 2 began in 2009, when the developer of the DotA mod, IceFrog, was hired by Valve as lead designer. Dota 2 was praised by critics for its gameplay, production quality and faithfulness to its predecessor. However, the game was criticized for its steep learning curve and inhospitable community. Dota 2 has become the most actively played game on Steam, with daily peaks of over 800,000 concurrent players.
l;-;Slowly eats away at your life 100% Lifesteal ! i r8ed 8/8 m8 would masterb8
Fighter;-;The best Game in the World.
You've Seen The Butcher;-;One of the best strategy games, but terrible community.
Jrow74;-;awesome game to wreck kids on there dads laptop.
Tulithti;-;It's like a drug. At first you think it's awful and confusing to use, but as you learn the ways of using it.. you become addicted, no hope, no social life, no girlfriend. It will take away everything that you love away from you... But it is so worth it.
Mogul Khan;-;I want to introduce you to a game, Defense of the Ancients is its name. In this game, our chances are all the same So when you are good, it will bring you fame. But when you are bad, it will bring you ''flame in-game'' Since becoming a good player always be your aim. And the game starts for Radiant and Dire Ten heroes are picked from a pool of 107. Five heroes for each, all different styles From being Supportive, selfish to even vile. Unstoppable, wicked sick and beyond godlike, For a single purpose: to defend the ancients with all their might Many many more i'd like to say, But it will take too much time of my day. So i will stop and step out of your way, Cause you've known the basic, it's now your time to play...
Cromoly;-;I can stop anytime I want.
FAPochino~;-;Recommending DotA because its DotA nuf said
Lord Random;-;Countless rage hours make this so bitter when you lose, but so sweet when you win. Use your abilities, please.
NyaNyaSeele(VACATION);-;I learned russian in this game more than school so you should play this game............of russians.
[DT] YEEART;-;I had stopped playing DotA 2 for a while, and I came back. I had lost 5 games in a row, one of which was due to 1 second lag in the first 5 minutes of the game which corrected itself right after the point where I was too underfarmed to do anything anyway. Then, I played a game and I started winning. I worked well with my lane partner, I ganked the enemy safelane five times as Timbersaw before the 10 minute mark and got my bloodstone at 7 minutes. Then, during an exciting teamfight in which I was the #1 damage dealer and Ace on the team, the game crashed. The entire East Coast crashed. Because I was winning. Because I was having fun. Half of America's DotA servers blew up because I thought I could have fun.  you, DotA.
Take everything;-;It's an awesome teamplay-minded multiplayer game. It's lots of fun to play and becomes even more fun when you get good at playing the (over 100) characters available.
ugly;-;WOw dis gasme fukkin suckz  lol evry1 is a fukkin idiot aND plays stupid and then blame u its in stupid top down like runescape and grafics fukin suck and no1 speakz english DO NOT play dis game if u like  and get laid dis gaime will make u an instan virgin lol -0/5 jus play cod mw3 on xbox
<font face="ravie">Riki_phiju;-;Fantastic game...!! Once played get addicted quickly..
MiRvoKeR;-;This game is awesome
Conspiracy;-;Playing DOTA 2 is a lot like smoking meth: it's highly addictive, causes violent outbursts, and will slowly destroy your relationships with your friends and family. Never play this game.
++KAPATID.cybergerms;-;The most recognized esport game in the Philippines...
Thirt13n || >.< ||;-;Great Game !
Randomology;-;Amazing game. Honestly its the only game that has managed to keep me coming back and back for years. Dont be discouraged by the high learning curve once you understand the game and have mastered the core functions you will never need another game again. Competitive and highly addicting 10/10!
ChalkyAtom;-;This. This game is the king of free to plays. It is the king of Moba's and it will ruin your life with it's addiction. The depth of this game is amazing, a huge variety of items and characters to do battle 5 vs 5 in online multiplayer. I would like to point out that this game has only one map. One ing map that never gets boring. The best way I can describe Dota 2 is that it's like chess and football, it's a game of momentum as well as timing and skill. Everyone needs Dota 2 in their life. Put it like this, I have 80+ games that I may as well uninstall because I only play this game. 10/10.
LEEEROOOOY JENKIIIIINSSS;-;I used to play alot League of Legends like 3 years or so ..I played Dota 2 Closed Beta and i really didn't liked game because it was so bloody difficult.. But now few months ago i realized this is what is this game about . I really do like Dota now , I am not playing League of Legends anymore because it became boring without denying , loosing gold on death . It just feel to simple to me.. So yeah.. TL;DR : DOTA 2 > LoL
g 0 0 s e;-;If you're fond of blaming others for everything or uncomfortable with acknowledging the fact that there will always be someone better than you out there, this is not the game for you. If you like a constant challenge and you're capable of continual improvement than it comes highly recommended. The game itself is crazy fun and varied, the map is ridiculously intricate, and it's all free-to-play without being pay-to-win! The matchmaking system on the other hand leaves a lot to be desired, ie. no region lock, solo-queue disadvantage, questionable balance methods, etc. The community really isn't as bad as everyone says, and the hero that you think is OP is not. There's always more to learn, and that's what keeps me coming back.
[H_G] MONSTERENERGY;-;good game.can create a extra ordinary friendship
Politikz;-;I love the game.It's super fun but only after the huge learning curve.But in the end all the time put in is worth it.
GoldenDimitri;-;Dota 2 full of russians
Bellsore;-;I dont think I can recommend this game. Yes, I have a hell of alot of hours, but thats just becoming sort of good. In the beginning of your playing, its frustrating, everyone gets mad at you, and its just not fun. Also, icefrog doesnt care about normal people, just money. I have fun with it, but you probably won't.
<font face="segoe script">Faith;-;hmmm i think dota 2 good graphic then dota .. good joob !
Captain Falkiln;-;It's like Rosetta Stone for Russian, except the learning curve is harder and you are punished if you can't play all the way through a 60 minute session with Russian pop quizzes, which the software names the "Low Priority Pool." Superior to Rosetta Stone Russian, given the abundance of scantily clad female characters. 10/10
KillMePls;-;Best game ever!! Join up and invite ur friends. =D
Die Einsamen Berg;-;EPIC! 11/10 will play again today and tomorrow and every day till I play so much I crash the game globally
Ardes;-;The most fun I've had with a competitive game in years. The levels of strategy and depth DotA has to offer ensures that every player -- from novice to veteran -- can learn something new and continue to improve. The number of heroes, laning options and team compositions make for a different game every time. I love DotA and can't wait to to see it grow in popularity in the future.
veL;-;Playing DoTa 2 is like drinking vodka: It's addicting, draws all the russians, and makes you regret each time you do it. 10/10. Will play forever.
easy;-;ruined my life ! 10/10 definitely recommend
SaltyMoses;-;Better than Fifa 14
falcon_knife34;-;Awesome game, ecvept it's a bit different from dota 1. I have been playing it since closed beta. I quite like the game because of the warcraft story. Hope they won't spoil it. Also I have an advice for beginners please brace yourselves for the RUSSIANS
ianMoone.Antidote;-;this game is freaky cool :D
Leonair;-;The Warcraft III Mod that took the world by storm is now a stand alone game in F2p model with microtransactions and cosmetic items that allow for customization as well as a bustling digital market for trading currency. I can see this going the way of TF2 where it stays a relevant game for years to come. I bet Blizzard is kicking themselves over cause if they had picked this up before Valve did, they'd be making a whole lot more money. M.o.b.a. games are a trend these days and the original DotA was a game i really got into for years. I recently only started playing again and immediately i remembered how petty and elitist certain players are. Sometimes you don't even enjoy playing the game, sometimes you just play cause you wanna even up the losses from the last time you lost. This game makes you rage in ways you thought you never could. Ah but the feeling of crushing your enemies is a fair trade off, no? Good graphics, gameplay hasn't changed that much, events are pretty cool, marketable items are nice too. If they do promotional tie-ins with certain games like how TF2 did (for rare items. other than that genuine master thief set.) that'd certainly make it more interesting. Pudge with a super meat boy outfit or maybe Sniper with a tf2 sniper set. I give it an 8 out of 10. Play it if you don't mind getting flak from your teammates when you mess up one tiny bit. I'd play LoL but then its too cutesy for my taste. To each his own.
Pommes;-;good! +free play +communication plattform +well remastered from original version +various interesting events +continous update
Steve From Human Resources;-;"Welcome to Dota 2: You Suck" TL;DR : Amazing game, try it. I was never really the type of guy to play one game for prolonged periods of time, but there are exceptions. Dota 2 is one of them. I discovered this game through a friend, downloaded it, played it, immediately hated it, and everything about it. But not because it was a horrible game. I hated it because it was soul-crushingly cruel; coming from FPS games, I was tossed into the game with no idea on how to play passed last hitting. Even that, I couldn't do right. After about six hours of trying heroes, different lane combinations/strategies, and subsequently feeding, I essentially gave up on it. Three months later, I decided that I didn't give Dota the chance it deserved. I redownloaded it, studied up on guides, practiced for hours as one hero until I got it right, and I found that this game was much deeper than I had initially thought. I was a long-time FPS player, but I was familiar with League of Legends. In LoL, you're expected to push and harass; amass gold, gank and kill to win. Simple, right? So I thought the same should be done for Dota 2. Just push the lane until I win, that's how things are in League. I learned one thing after hours and hours of getting owned by Medium Co-Op bots: Dota 2 isn't LoL. Not even close. In LoL, it's basically a pushing contest with ganks thrown in. In Dota 2, I had to learn how to counter pick, orbwalk, gank, control creep waves, stack jungle camps, stack ancients with helm of the dominator, deny junglers EXP by placing wards in camps, harass without getting aggro, what heroes countered my heroes (all of them), which lanes are best for which heroes, learn when it's better to defend or trade towers, when to buy items like Hand of Midas. It's a daunting task for... anyone. To learn all of that at once would be nothing short of overwhelming. But you don't learn it all at once, you learn it through hours and hours of humiliation and practice. Then there are the heroes; I prefer Dota 2 heroes over LoL Champions. In LoL, they expect you to work for heroes or buy them right-out with real world money, the same for any cosmetic items you may want. Dota hands you all the heroes in the game for free, and any item you see in the shop can be earned (at random) through playing a match. The items are also tradeable. The champions in League were always so-so to me, I never really connected with them either because they looked cartoony to me or because they just simply didn't talk enough/have enough lines. Heroes in Dota are rather serious and usually have over a hundred lines each, which really lets you get a good feel for who they are. Note: I don't dislike LoL as I've played it myself, I just prefer Dota. Like I said before, I was a long-time FPS shooter before coming to Dota 2 (I still am, but I digress), and a part of why it was fun was because I had friends playing with me. Yeah, I get to talk to people I know while we kill random people online, that's fun. But it was just us going rogue and seeing who can kill more people than the other while we talk about mundane things. Dota 2 is different. My friends and I found that we *had* to rely on each other to win. We were given the opportunity to organize plans, tell each other what we were doing, if we needed a gank, ect. High fives went around the room whenever we won, and gaming with friends has never been more fun. Dota 2 is that rare type of game that doesn't hold your hand through it all; you don't just pick it up instantly. It demands your time and attention; it deserves it. Dota 2 has one of the steepest learning curves of any game, the steepest I've ever experienced. But that doesn't take away from how great the game is; even when you fail, it only feeds your desire to become better. You get to reading more guides, finding which heroes you play best with, getting rid of the ones you don't, learning of the strategies you could use, and learn how to talk with your team. Much more emphasis is placed on learning, practicing and communication than most games, but that only adds to the greatness. Dota 2 is needlessly cruel, but it may be the most fun you'll ever have. An amazing game, there's no reason why you aren't playing it. Give it a try, you won't be sorry when you come out of it.
Waddles;-;My favorite games on steam! If you play a lot and your good come join my guild! My guild is called Calicos Crew (Crew). We are planning to go into tornaments and crush the competition. I highly reccomend this game if you have steam why haven't you downloaded this game yet. Click that install button. Oh yeah best part its free!
Cherimoya;-;If you've ever felt the need to experience a community saltier than the Dead Sea, try Dota.
I kiss Goats;-;The game is good, but the community is trash. Give it a try if you like MOBA and teamplay but find friends to play with, use a third party voice-chat and never, ever look at the ingame chat log, otherwise you will get verbally assaulted by a horde of 9 years old keyboard warriors discovering human interaction for the first time...
Paaskehare;-;In this game you steal kills, deny runes/items/aegis/etc... Flame your team and force staff your teammates when diving fountain. Good Game (Y)
slime girl;-;i hate this game and i hate me
#Rt3k;-;Never drop any items from lastest update :(
Hamster :'3;-;Best MOBA there is!
I Still Love Miley Cyrus;-;this game.just yes. you will hate it , but what does you ...really need?
Mary;-;I hate this game
Cydrox;-;The worst game you could ever play. 100 / 10
=  =;-;ruined my life. 10 /10
DeuX - Transexual Honey Badger;-;Probably the best competitive game made in any genre. Will be played by humans forever. It's a steep learning curve but it is the game we will watch world cup in when we are retired so you better learn it now. Oh and did I say its the most fun to play since you are back to square one in every game and 40 minutes is enough of a grinding span. Requires teamplay, twitch skill, lore understanding, tactics, strategy, awarness, balls, good judgment, reaction, anticipation, intuition, time sense, people sense, empathy, multi tasking, spatial and temporal awareness and focus.
Sarah;-;Dis gaem ez leik best gaem i've plaid in long time!? It halp me wif engrish skillz i need 2 provide for mai famree bak home in united staits of thailandia. one dai i 2 will bcum profeshunal prayer like mai fathur and his fathur b4 him!!!!!! plaiplaiplai nice cokmunities )))
[PNAY]Mheyceelazy;-;I like playing this game ! I had fun playing with my friends , send gifts and more. God Speed to all of the staffs of this game.keep it up!
RagnarTheRed;-;10/10 would do again except meepo
Slz;-;"An amazing Russian/Portugese/Pinoy learning program."
y~mt;-;consider making some coffee !
Moonlight;-;9/10 would feed and rage again
ezekiel_49;-;It's time for a serious review. I ing hate this game. I have lost a countless number of braincells arguing in three different language not stop in this ing game. I hate noobs wrecking the game toward the point of no return. I hate going for a  and coming back to notice that I have now 0 gold left because my teammates are victims of aids and alzheimers that have disabled their basic cognitive behaviour of reading. But I love it. I love coming back from  &  circumstances and winning with 25 deaths and 2 kills. I enjoy a good game with good people who can communicate like a grown human being that has a decent brain capability. I love to come from my lesson and just to find out that icefrog ed it even more. I love it. I love it!
Limondov Joe;-;First lie in Dota2: "All heroes are balanced"
gorillaCHEEZ;-;this game will make you racist
[SwUn] Ballistic;-;Hey, you people should play this!!! Its really fun and has a competitve aspect to it. A little difficult at first if you aren't used to MOBA style games but you get used to it really quickly. And since it's a free game i definitely recommend it.
Skot;-;failed my university degree because of this game would recommend 10/10
*Spooky*;-;10/10 bought a weiner dog with a weiner attactched to a stick dangling in front of it's face as a courier.
d .;-;The Dota2 is very nice game !
god is not great;-;If you have over 2000 hours of free time this game is for you!
ADMIRAL.BuLLDoG;-;qwerty
Asena;-;I didn't play any MOBA before, I always thought it was boring and not fun at all. DOTA2 proved me wrong. While the community is not that pleasant (a lot of swearing, not so friendy teammates, etc) , you'll find this game VERY addicting. You can never use the same strategy twice, and obviously, one game will never be the same to you! 10/10
thiendinh;-;I think Dota 2 need to be added in a list " Top game you must play in your life ". 10/10
Queef of Pain;-;Sells your soul to Gaben If given the chance to start over would download again 10/10
Mits;-;The most challenging strategic multiplayer game that i have ever played, that tests your discipline, continence, cooperation, communication and agile responces among the other 4 teammates, by finding new strategies to beat the opponents and destroying their base (as known, the Ancient). The only requirement is that you should know the roles of the heroes and the items that they use, mostly by reading the dota 2 wiki [dota2.gamepedia.com] or watching videos of experienced players like from Youtube or Twitch. In order to enjoy the full potential of the game you should form a team with family or friends instead random people if that's possible. Free to play, with amazing graphics, music, sounds, voice acting and reqular updates, pretty balanced and with a big hero pool to choose from and more heroes to come in future. Also, like other Valve games, cosmetic items make their presence, giving you the ability to customize your heroes, by buying them (optionally) in order to support the community contributors and creators, or simply finding them from ingame free drops and trading with other players, or you can even create your own. 10/10 would defend my Ancient again (and destroy my enemie's).
Ardeo;-;As a heads up, this game is highly addicting. Aside from that, the gameplay can be complicated and a vast majority of the community is toxic to bad players and foreigners. If you are fortunate or skilled you can also find some of the more nicer areas of the community. One nice area/stream I can promise is twitch.tv/travdood. I leave it up for you to choose. GL HF
Farady;-;I see the red sign and i want it painted black (c) The Rolling Stones
RJ;-;worst fkng game ever bu**sh*t servers fk valve fk steam fk dota 2
Asaladin;-;I feel like this is the same for everyone who likes it... You start off by saying "what an addicted community! These idiots can't stop playing! Luckily I at least have a life." The thing is, you don't exactly let go of your life when you play the game, but you don't stop playing in your free time. I've only scratched the surface of strategies and statistics and how all the heroes work at my level! I don't recognize most abilities in ability draft at very first glance. The way the game keeps people so enticed I believe is that they want to know every nook and cranny in it! It is the most addicting and amazing game ever in it's own Wright. (puns for other games I like) How it remains amazing with only 1 map is beyond comprehension, there's just so much to that one map even! The community is that of Xbox Live with every game. Exceptions being there is no 6 year old calling every other player the N-word or the F-word on Dota 2. It's been replaced with Russians calling you a . Not the game's fault though.
Nostalgias;-;I don't know how to say , Just play it.
MatriX_VrX  SsGroup;-;keep calm and farm
stealwas;-;Fun and russian hate.
Dingo;-;Teaches patience, coordination, decision making, creative thinking, teamwork, curse words in over 19 different languages, intolerance and frustration. 9/10
[BT]MadCauseBad;-;This game is terrible for coop and making friends. Its Russian and Brazil 101. I lost all my friends and my family disowned me for playing this game with me.
Peppermint Jack;-;Doto is gaem wer u kill enemys and u destroi teh turrents and u get  teams wer evr1 complaint and nevr work and u dstroi the think in anemy base an won game an dnt chose drw renger bcs is 4 fegets an zues is prtty stronk 2. Dota 2 is a pretty good Moba though.
That Lucky Ol' Smeal;-;Who the  needs rosetta stone?
Lord Random;-;Countless rage hours make this so bitter when you lose, but so sweet when you win. Use your abilities, please.
NyaNyaSeele(VACATION);-;I learned russian in this game more than school so you should play this game............of russians.
Ayessa Claudette;-;I Love Dota Because my friends play this game. :P
MavericK;-;this is a good game :D
Baron Frederick Von TwinkleToes;-;Dota 2=The only game that promotes racism
unQle Ben;-;DotA (2) is a work of genius. This game will bring together everybody from around the world, and as players load into the game one by one, there's a good sense of kindness and respect from all players as we greet each other and comment on how the last loading player needs to shovel his/her coal just that little bit faster. It's really a good feeling, you've just loaded into this brilliant game, with friendly players on both sides, and you get ready to pick. This however is where it all breaks down, this is where you find out your parents never loved you, they're not actually your parents, your not so much mom has slept with almost every player in the server and you miraculously recieve a new age and mental health rating from your team mates (FREE OF CHARGE!). Once the picking phase is over, you move onto the playing the actual game, and this is the part where you truly learn to multi-task, no other game teaches you to cry, rage, swear, click/ping 6000 times/second, attempt suicide, question all humanity, question your own intelligence as well as others, all while controlling your pretty little faerie dragon at the exact same time! All in all, 9/10. I would ;)
EzraFitch;-;Free 2 Play if you get accepted to beta ~ apply here. Super addicting, and great game with friends. {LINK REMOVED} http://.com/3skfrs4
ILuvStars;-;Ruined my life Best russian simulator 9.9/10 Learned fluent russian in only 2 years
-twitch.tv/SlashStrike;-;Easily the best game in existence, hands down.
Misy;-;This game is the only reason how I passed my Russian exam.
(   );-;Beware of russians
Riddle;-;Dota 2 is not something you lazily play once a week, but something you live. You hate it and love it, you fear it and you enjoy it. It's everything at the same time but most of all - never boring!
stantheman;-;pick hero, feed, make your team angry and repeat. i like it 10/10
Tip Tip Fedora;-;Not League of Legends
Red Alice;-;Alt-Click Simulator 2015 9/10 would play.
biask;-;this game sucks.you cant even jump
Jerry Minefield;-;Are language tutors like Rosetta Stone too pricy for you? Do you enjoy repeating tasks for hours for losses that will tear apart friendships and wins that will be forgotten about immediately? Do you find pride in knowing that you and your group of friends can work as hard as you can, and train for thousands of hours, only to be destroyed by a melanin enriched man livining in his chicken-farming parents' shack? Regardless of whether or not he's on your team? Do you like to receive a couple shiny, colourful virtual objects that compel you to spend money on more? Do you enjoy spectating other people playing games, and thinking to yourself "Gosh, they're so bad. If I were them, I would be doing so much better."? Do you enjoy semi-high pitched 'ping' noises? Do you enjoy shouting being emitted from a chain smoking Peruvian, into a ham radio, into a headset from 1993 radiating out of your speakers? Do you enjoy being blamed for every fault within your team? Do you enjoy right clicking? Are you a masochist? If you answered yes to any of these questions, Dota 2 is the game for you.
Speedy;-;Dota 2 is an amazing game! Cant stop playing!!
im excused;-;waht the fukc is this
Mocha Bloke;-;This game is worse than drugs. You'll lose your job You'll lose your friends You'll lose your girlfriend You'll lose your mind. I still give it 10/10, would play again since it teaches you languages and how to be racist in said languages.
Revenge;-;Better than League of Fgts ^^
SSSSSSSSSSSSSSSSSSSTONE!;-;You agree to comply with all applicable import/export laws and regulations. You agree not to export the Content and Services or allow use of your Account by individuals of any terrorist supporting countries to which encryption exports are at the time of exportation restricted by the U.S. Bureau of Export Administration. You represent and warrant that you are not located in, under the control of, or a national or resident of any such prohibited country.
Dust;-;Using this simple language tool you too could learn all the myriad ways to insult an individual in russian online such as screaming BLYAAAAAT SOOOOKAAAAAA! at random people on the internet and insulting Mr putin. 10/10
rest0;-;The best MOBA game ever created
Moon Man;-;This game would be great if all russian players were removed.
Fear no Defeat;-;Over six thousand hours.... What now???
Get Rext;-;Game has dragons, horses, explosions, , pro skills, not so pro skills, giant trees, killer bears, friendly bears, pirates, firey witches,  and russians. Would bang/10
Kek;-;*Downloads Dota* *Gets in first game* *Dies alot* *Team rages* *Exits* *Deletes Dota* 10/10 for community.
Hyperveno[M].-;-;One of the finest Games created by Valve [Steam works]. I recommend this to all gamers to go ahead and be a part of a vast RPG! Commendations to all staff and designers and engineers! #Respect.
[OP] Red Fish;-;Dear Valve, Before I played DOTA 2, I believed that every person on this Earth deserved basic human rights. I believed that no matter how evil or cruel a person you may be, you deserve a chance to be rehabilitated or helped to become a functioning, helpful member of society. I beleived that regardless of the language you speak, you can come to a common ground with another human being based on a mutual goal. This is all wrong, and DOTA 2 has shown me why.
-|DANONE|-ThatsCool-;-;I am excited to play Dota 2
Bananaman69;-;Dota 2 is my passion.
Doma;-;10/10 would sell my soul again.
Jenko;-;EVERYTHING IS AWESOME IN THIS GAME .....
Bullshat;-;This game is really great if you like taking  in your
spanky;-;This game is really painful.
Aurora;-;I wanted to learn Russian, so instead of buying a video to help me progress in the language, I played Dota 2. I would rate this game:   / 10 Love from,  . (Or Putin Vodka)
Shana;-;Other people say DotA will ruin your life... I say they look like Pudge.
Imadeoutwithmedusa;-;I need to review a game for one of the crappy badges so I chose dota cause it's A+.
Drakesfjord;-;If Dota 2 was a potato.. It would be a good potato
=NV=Subterfuge3927;-;Want a game that has the mentality of chess, paper-rock-scissors, crafting mini-games and the reliance on 4 other people that will inevitably fail you more often than not? How about having thousands of hours on record, and still being a miserable scrub-feeding noob? Well then, Dota is for you! It will frustrate you, take all your time, make you feel worthless and have you come back for more!
papa geppetto;-;turned me into a racist Game of the Year
C.S | Japa | 4:20;-;This the real GAME
anonymous;-;best game on steam is dota2
What am I doing with my life;-;Very good to learn Russian and Spanish 10/10 Would bang again
MissJasmineBaby;-;This game is addictive, will waste your time and will make you hate everyone. Recommended!
Eto;-;Was supposed to do my project after I played this game...a week has already passed and I haven't gotten any good rares yet. 5 stars!
Crimson.Froh;-;This game is good, according to Axe!
Okami;-;Dota is a free-as-heck MOBA game that supplies hours and hours of non-stop anger, happiness, Russians, and depression! It'll ruin your life, definitely a must-get!
Pr;-;its like cod but except for being in first person you are not and you are animals and aliens and things that are pretty much playing headquarters so sniper guy is obviously the best one to pick 10.1/10 - ign worth every cent of the purchase price ._.
KakAxE;-;If you want supportive and optimistic community, this game is right for you!!!. I also get gf from playing this game <3
Kirino Kousaka;-;Dota 2 is a game I've been playing for about a year or so now, and I don't think I've ever been so addicted to a game before. It's a game with teamwork, strategy and beautiful visuals. The hero pool has a huge variety of different looks, skills and basic stats. The game modes for the online mode are also cool, but I wish some people who play captains mode will actually listen to their teammates instead of just picking wherever they want to. Overall this game is really fun to play and it's free! I would definately recommend this game to people who have a semi-long attention span and a quick reaction time.
The Next Mockingjay;-;this a good very good
nizY^;-;A very nice game for everyone who loves good storylines, peace games and a relaxing gaming. I LIED  BLYAT DAVAI DAVAI 11/10
{SuN} Colgate;-;Write a review for Dota 2 Please describe what you liked or disliked about this game and whether you recommend it to others. Please remember to be polite and follow the Rules and Guidelines. Do you recommend this game? Formatting Help Visibility: Public Language: English Yes No
Aloisia FrozenHeart;-;League of Legends with Improved gameplay and Russians
Awenggg_Dota2_Store;-;I like the game items so cool but to expensive :)
Angellie;-;how i earned an special item VALVE ??
iyatiya;-;Nice game
Chamomile Tea;-;Really great game. Introduced me to MOBA's. Very addictive and a friendly and helpful community. Little confusing at first but fun once you get used to it. Fascinating graphics and crisp sounds. Gameplay can feel repetitive but there's always an element of suspense. Each player hero is unique and powerful and the user interface of the game is easy to understand. Does not constantly bug you for micro-transactions which is great. Only problem is that finding a match, even on my closest servers takes quite some time (3-4 mins.) Loving the game otherwise. 9/10 - The Best MOBA
Purekill;-;taught me to hate mankind 10/10
Lona {Random Player};-;Very Fun and make good work together
Baron Frederick Von TwinkleToes;-;Dota 2=The only game that promotes racism
unQle Ben;-;DotA (2) is a work of genius. This game will bring together everybody from around the world, and as players load into the game one by one, there's a good sense of kindness and respect from all players as we greet each other and comment on how the last loading player needs to shovel his/her coal just that little bit faster. It's really a good feeling, you've just loaded into this brilliant game, with friendly players on both sides, and you get ready to pick. This however is where it all breaks down, this is where you find out your parents never loved you, they're not actually your parents, your not so much mom has slept with almost every player in the server and you miraculously recieve a new age and mental health rating from your team mates (FREE OF CHARGE!). Once the picking phase is over, you move onto the playing the actual game, and this is the part where you truly learn to multi-task, no other game teaches you to cry, rage, swear, click/ping 6000 times/second, attempt suicide, question all humanity, question your own intelligence as well as others, all while controlling your pretty little faerie dragon at the exact same time! All in all, 9/10. I would ;)
EzraFitch;-;Free 2 Play if you get accepted to beta ~ apply here. Super addicting, and great game with friends. {LINK REMOVED} http://.com/3skfrs4
Doma;-;10/10 would sell my soul again.
Jenko;-;EVERYTHING IS AWESOME IN THIS GAME .....
Bullshat;-;This game is really great if you like taking  in your
spanky;-;This game is really painful.
Aurora;-;I wanted to learn Russian, so instead of buying a video to help me progress in the language, I played Dota 2. I would rate this game:   / 10 Love from,  . (Or Putin Vodka)
Merktality;-;This game ruined my life! Give it a try!
Dominic;-;yeah i think it is great game for teenager
JJ;-;It takes a while to get in to, but once you're in, you will never get out. A great game once you know the basics and has a huge range of what you can do to get better at in the game, it is very deep. The back stories of the hero's are very interesting and it is very good on the game mechanics side, and the story side. Some heros are however quite fustrating to play against, but it seems that Vale and the developers are still definitely updatimg the game and trying to make everything balanced. Also I have never tried Dota's competitor Leauge of Ledgends so I cannot say wether I think it is better.
YukiNukiSuzuki;-;It's ok I guess
Meet The President;-;A game that cause addict at high level and sometime can bring happiness and sorrow as its opposite.
Level 52 Hat Inspector;-;Fiddlesticks sucks Fiddledicks. Worst character in the game. 7/10 it's alright
xDarkGenesis;-;Great Game. I can never have a day playing this game!
thiendinh;-;I think Dota 2 need to be added in a list " Top game you must play in your life ". 10/10
Queef of Pain;-;Sells your soul to Gaben If given the chance to start over would download again 10/10
Mits;-;The most challenging strategic multiplayer game that i have ever played, that tests your discipline, continence, cooperation, communication and agile responces among the other 4 teammates, by finding new strategies to beat the opponents and destroying their base (as known, the Ancient). The only requirement is that you should know the roles of the heroes and the items that they use, mostly by reading the dota 2 wiki [dota2.gamepedia.com] or watching videos of experienced players like from Youtube or Twitch. In order to enjoy the full potential of the game you should form a team with family or friends instead random people if that's possible. Free to play, with amazing graphics, music, sounds, voice acting and reqular updates, pretty balanced and with a big hero pool to choose from and more heroes to come in future. Also, like other Valve games, cosmetic items make their presence, giving you the ability to customize your heroes, by buying them (optionally) in order to support the community contributors and creators, or simply finding them from ingame free drops and trading with other players, or you can even create your own. 10/10 would defend my Ancient again (and destroy my enemie's).
ezekiel_49;-;It's time for a serious review. I ing hate this game. I have lost a countless number of braincells arguing in three different language not stop in this ing game. I hate noobs wrecking the game toward the point of no return. I hate going for a  and coming back to notice that I have now 0 gold left because my teammates are victims of aids and alzheimers that have disabled their basic cognitive behaviour of reading. But I love it. I love coming back from  &  circumstances and winning with 25 deaths and 2 kills. I enjoy a good game with good people who can communicate like a grown human being that has a decent brain capability. I love to come from my lesson and just to find out that icefrog ed it even more. I love it. I love it!
Limondov Joe;-;First lie in Dota2: "All heroes are balanced"
gorillaCHEEZ;-;this game will make you racist
Caped Badly;-;Well for starters let me just say that for all the LoL fans out there who keep saying ''Dota 2 is a copy of league and it sucks'' this review's goal is to get you to actually try it out and say that it isn't like LoL or any other moba that you've ever played. Alright lets start with the gameplay, Dota 2 has fairly simple/complex (depending on how much you've played) system in which were one team has to destroy the other teams Ancient. In terms of goals it's pretty simple, but in terms of achieving that goal that's a complete different story. Alright now to next phase the Heroes. The heroes in dota 2 are quite original and each one has many different roles when it comes to achieving a team win, but the issue with heroes as of now is, some are just plain stupid and OP like for ex: Riki, actually it's just Riki. Alright now for the third part of our review in which we discuss graphics, Dota 2 compared to Dota 1 has much better graphics and the level of detail on certain characters is just amazing. The main issue tough well it ain't really an issue but it's more of a technical problem is if you have a really crappy computer in which you can't run these type of games on high so you won't be able to enjoy them. (SADFAIS :( :() Last but not least is the conclusion and personal toughts on the game (this review actually was my personal tought but heck I'll just summarize everything then). The game really is good and the faults are all quite minor but the thing that dota 2 that i think executes most wonderfully is just the plain heroes and their backgrounds and such. Its just to amazing.
///////////;-;A few months ago I was playing Dota 2 with my friends. my frist hero is BH also known as BOUNTY HUNTER. it was fun but still having a frist time player like me it was "suck's". dota2 is one of my favorite game, also the graphics of the game, clash of hero ..and also how you play it right. you may know what i am talking about, it's all about how awsome dota2 is. like i said one of my favorite game, valve make such a wonderful game like this. i can't wait to see the other hero.
<b><i>Tobias Bot;-;This game is cool, and I don't think so that this game will aged soon. Just try, it's free :)
AANG;-;I played Dota since 2006 until now.. Dota still kick some butts ^__~
Rat Colony Mastermind;-;DoTA 2 is the premier language software for learning Portuguese, Russian, and a myriad of other languages! Pros: You can play an enraging engaging top-down Multiplayer Online Battle Arena with all your friends! Lose said friends after a match! Cry for five minutes, then play more DoTA! Pick Weaver. Cry to Gaben and Icefrog to nerf Phantom Lancer! (P.S. They'll never actually do it. Ever.) Quit this game to play League of Legends, Smite, or Dawngate! Who cares, you'll come back anyway. Dumbass... Cons: Genuine lack of xXx360NOSCOPE420BL4Z31T4JESUZxXx, go play Call of Duty Children's Online Daycare for that. NOT HEROES OF NEWERTH. -5/69 on Metacritic, Game Informer and your local parliament/government/dictatorship/village chieftain/multi-celled organism to your single cell. Final Recommendations: Gr8 B8 I R8 8/8 M8 Don't feel ir8 evn tho she was l8 for the d8 m80. (I'm a pirate, bro.)
@kimso_;-;A very good strategic team game which gives a good overview for new players like myself :) Provides good amount of data for beginners to learn the basics. NICE GAME VALVE <3 PS. i hope some players don't rage too much for the new players. Hope they learn to understand and instead try to help them
arteezy;-;nice game for everyone
BARTHOLMEW.;-;its cool but i hate russians
Retired.;-;Let me tell you something about dota......its not really that fun, but when u start playing it theres no stoppin you.....you start your first match by killing evrybody and going rampage and godlike sprees.......then u think the second match would be the same......but then the game starts......and someone in ur team say PUTANG INA BOBO...and u know that, that game is a lost and u be talkin smack at the enemy team sayin u got a pinoy team....and u lost. and at the end of the game. you be sayin..gg, easy hero, noob team, **** PInoy....but even with that u still wanna play.......and thats why dota is fun.
XAXAXAXAXAXAXAXAXAXAXAXAXAXAXAXA;-;best game ever even my family will play thisss <3
SLiPerino add the other acc;-;awsome game , i really recommend my friends to try it !
Oliver Queen;-;I highly recommend this game to everyone who loves MOBA's .. it's my favorite game of all time and the reason i like it the most it's because i'm a team player and this is a team game <3
Mengejar Cinta Nay;-;try this game mate
A Rather Sneaky Bastard;-;I remember when I begun my very first journey in playing this game. It was around the early part of my first trimester during my Junior year in high school. A very close friend of mine who I regard as a younger brother presented to me the idea of playing DotA 2. In order to strengthen our bonds and to give myself something else to do in my spare time I willingly decided that it would be a good idea to play. My first game went like this: if Hell could be virtually contained, then DotA 2 surely is the closest thing one can get to gates of Hell. Fortunately, there is hope for those who enter: not continuing to play. My first game was played as Nyx Assassin, a hero that I picked PURELY out of his latter namesake in my juvenile adoration and understanding of the stealthy playstyle in the days of my adolescent youth. What had begun as an attempt to become closer to my friend became a gnashing, foaming, teeth-grinding session of psychological torment that flayed away my ideas of what is good and what is bad in this world. My descent into this game only proved my avarice for failure as the level of suck I displayed went well beyond the expectations of a five year old attempting to play any video game with alluring colors and noises. Creeps mocked me, the courier was an ally I seldom knew, gold was a luxury to obtain, the jungle was a nightmarish land of prison strongmen that held me down when their amusement at my attempt to challenge their authority would finally cease, and those that played amongst regarded me as an abomination of wicked biology that combined nearly every terrible epidemic of human history finally fused with a bubbling carcenogentic tumor that only lived to spread its filth across the playerbase, further soiling what little health was there to maintain. Depression quickly ensued...and I fell to the depths of despair. "Forever bad," I would declare to myself..."Forever bad." Years later...I have become what most dread. A vindictive young man whose only desire in solo public matchmaking is to preserve and defend the dregs of my cancer by picking supports and buying wards and couriers only to see a swift decrease in awareness and reckless use of the courier, who meets its end by the hand of a five-death squad that originally intended to end the life of the useless carry that fell victim to the folly of buying boots first and declared my incompetency for not providing him with shared tangos. DotA 2 is a curse, my friend. Do not fall victim as many others have. Please...reconsider...I beseech thee...re...consider...
Drag Me Hotel-;-;When I first started DOTA2 I was a little overwhelmed, as my first ARTS / MOBA game it was pretty complicated. I soon started to pick up the mechanics like last hitting and denying. Before I knew it, I was performing better and better. I stopped making silly mistakes and I got vastly better at not feeding the enemy team. For the most part, everyone I've met was very helpful and nice, there have sometimes the jerk however. As I continue to play DOTA2 more and more, I'm sure I'll continue to improve. I recommend this game for all. :)
SouthernGirl1997;-;I love this game. Ive learned alot nd made alot of friends. It teaches you hand eye coordination. Takes a while to learn when u first start it but once u get the hang of it, its pretty easy.
RuynMp;-;i plpay dota 1 4 year now im start play dota 2 fisrt time so hard to understand because dota2 supper nice effect. But now i love it because when i play look like i watching a movie pro
Iced Tizzle;-;We were at the CLG House, preparing for our match against TSM. It was long and exhausting, as a gentle sweat rolled down my cheek, i sighed. Link had left his desk and was watching anime in his room, Dexter and Seraph were slowly gazing into each others eyes and i knew that a steady make-out session would occur. I gazed slowly at the black hunk of a man sitting near me. Aphromoo was laughing, I always loved his laugh. I pictured a naked Aphro pleasuring me, supporting me until the end. I sighed realizing that would never happen. Hey Peter Aphro said to me casually. I smiled at him and he smiled back. He asked if I wanted to duo and I said i was tired and was going to bed. Secretly I wanted Aphro. I layed my head down and was out like a light. When I awoke, it was 8:00 PM. Suddenly, I heard a knock on the door. Ummm, Peter, may I come in? It was Aphro. Y-yeah, the door is unlocked, I said feeling my heart skip a beat. He entered wearing his CLG Uniform, only his CLG Uniform. He covered himself embarrassed, P-Peter, Ive liked you for a while now, a-and I stood up embracing Aphro, Its okay Zaqu, I feel the same way. I slowly pulled his hands away as I gazed upon his Needlessly Large Rod. Aphro, I said confidently, W-will you support me now, and forever? He didnt respond, but he answered with his body. He pushed me onto the bed mounting me, placing his hands next to my head, and leaning in for a kiss. I met him halfway, as our lips touched I thought of all our years together and thought that I would be happy to give him my first time. He slid his tongue inside my mouth moving it around as I did the same. Our kiss lasted what seemed liked a lifetime, as our lips parted I gazed into his eyes and I could tell from his raging boner, he couldnt hold back anymore. He flipped me over onto my back as he unzipped his pants. His Rod Of Ages was in full view as I took off my pants revealing my . He Pulverized my  with his Black Cleaver. He must be stacking armor pen, I thought to myself. He was close to releasing his Void Ooze, I-its okay Aphro, you can gank my insides, Dont be afraid to Spray and Pray. His pleasured moans satisfied me as he shot his Dark Binding into me. I felt useless just laying there on my back, Aphro had carried me in the past, but this time I would carry him. I quickly used Hyper-Kinetic Position Reverser to force myself on top of Aphro. Just then I got excited. I stuck my Infinity Edge into his Dorans Ring. He moaned with delight, so to pleasure him fuller I wrapped my hands around his nipples as he screamed YOU CANT MILK THOSE. As I felt a Surging Tide being released into Aphro, I exclaimed Its all skill. Aphro had still not shot his Exploding Cask, so I Powerfisted him. None will escape my grasp. I said sexually. To further please him I got out my Chains of Corruption, tying up Aphro to the bed. I wrapped my Quicksilver Sash around his eyes and continued my Void Assault. P-peter I-im about t-to c-cu Aphro said quivering. Say no more, I said putting my finger over his lips. I wrapped my mouth around his Deathcap as he shot his Ebb and Flow into my mouth. That tasted purple, I thought to myself. As we lay there in our Caustic Spittle, together, I felt finally happy. Every day past that fateful day Aphro has had my back (sometimes literally) and we are truly synergized. TSM best be afraid for we are Rush Hour.
Kurokoy;-;It's an amazing game - technically outstanding, especially in the all-important multiplayer aspects. The continual balance tweaks and new heroes combined with the vast amount of content in the game offer countless hours of enjoyment. It's hard to master but good wins with your teammates are incredibly satisfying. It took me a long time to warm up to, but I'm helplessly addicted and every day look forward to getting my hands on my laptop to play. I also love the cosmetics applied to every hero. That is why I love collecting sets and trading with other people. This gives me an opportunity to communicate with other races around the globe. If you can spare the time - play it!
Yizarak;-;The only way to enjoy this game is to not care for MMR. On the other hand you can learn a lot of new languages like russian, turkish, spanish and many more. Give this game a try if you like learning new vocabularies.
Yondaime[ ];-;Need to learn more to become Pro Gamers . Thank you for advice everybody . GoodLuck Have Fun :)
w4ndeRz;-;Please describe what you liked or disliked about this game and whether you recommend it to others. Please remember to be polite and follow the Rules and Guidelines.
G$$"::";-;I LIKE dota 2 beacause its more fun while playing and i dislike dota 2 when time i entered on my profile, i cant play because of the connecting to dota 2 network.
Awenggg_Dota2_Store;-;I like the game items so cool but to expensive :)
anonymous;-;best game on steam is dota2
What am I doing with my life;-;Very good to learn Russian and Spanish 10/10 Would bang again
MissJasmineBaby;-;This game is addictive, will waste your time and will make you hate everyone. Recommended!
Eto;-;Was supposed to do my project after I played this game...a week has already passed and I haven't gotten any good rares yet. 5 stars!
I kiss Goats;-;The game is good, but the community is trash. Give it a try if you like MOBA and teamplay but find friends to play with, use a third party voice-chat and never, ever look at the ingame chat log, otherwise you will get verbally assaulted by a horde of 9 years old keyboard warriors discovering human interaction for the first time...
Paaskehare;-;In this game you steal kills, deny runes/items/aegis/etc... Flame your team and force staff your teammates when diving fountain. Good Game (Y)
slime girl;-;i hate this game and i hate me
Multichrome;-;Standing good game.. the report system must be given full attention for further rule implementation.
Chaosmango;-;I only played a little but it was fun.
cluck cluck gib crimea;-;Never before have I had such a profound hatred for other human beings. You can't leave. I've tried, and will most likely try again soon. Mostly what this game has taught me is this- I am a racist bigot. Everyone I know is a racist bigot. Even the peruvians and russians are racist bigots. Everyone is stupid. Teamwork, like sleep, is a false promise. Don't queue in groups of people less than 5 Never go alone. Seriously it's that important. You will not have fun. Angsty narcissistic 10 year olds exist everywhere. Everyone is a noob. Even you. Don't delude yourself. Search your feelings, you know it to be true. Run.
The Great Brown Shark;-;The community is getting better. My reccommendation is to do at least 2 hours of internet research before you start playing.
King Thomas;-;It's like the Battle of the Five Armies, but with two.
Jake from State Farm;-;A game where a feeder calls his teammates n00bz
<font face="impact">SmallDaddy;-;It is a very nice game that is very dynamic and strategic. It requires a lot of skills to get a complete nice game else the game will be really boring getting one-sided.
December.7.1941.7:55.Sunday;-;Couldnt get pass settings. Thank you Dota 2.
Makbex!;-;NIce game..
Symbiote;-;Absolutely fantastic, fun and addictive. One of the best games ever made. If you get this game though, make sure you do the tutorials and some bot matches before you play pvp matches, otherwise you will get anhilliated, and won't want to play the game again
MS_KiNKi RYUSAKI;-;how to trade the item ... some one tell me
Blanc;-;better than LOL
ReveL3D's;-;You can possess a tree You can eat a tree to gain hp You can exorcise a tree this game is op
BnnbDD;-;this is great game. go on and play it, great community (sometimes)
GMbeR;-;Play with your friends and you will definitely enjoy.
Daekir;-;Excellent game, highly strategict and fun!
Feil Fitler!;-;I like the Dota2 Community, but the matchmaking is very unfair.
Whewshie;-;Leauge of legends without the baby stuff. 10/10
peru;-;i have beat campaign mode 7 times, and na'vi still hasn't recruited me.
Crixus;-;really interesting game
<i><u><b>Blank;-;i like this game because you can earn a real money at the sametime you can play :)
TRAPWOLF;-;Heard of Dota 2 all my life from friends around me.....and now I see why xD Its.. 1) Addictive 2) Fun 3) Competitive 4) Challenging 5) Teaches something that's not only important 'in game' but also in the real life which is TEAMWORK! 6) This point may sound awkward/weird to people to be a PROS instead of a CONS...but! its the 'LEARNING CURVE'. Wut!? how is this PROS instead of CONS you say!? Let me explain... Every game you play you either win or lose. Now not all games are meant to be won ;) Cause its when you lose you learn something and even when you think you havn't learnt a thing from a game of loss? You just did. You learn't that you did something wrong to have achived that loss and should try to improve in that missing element. Knowing the fact that no ones perfect. This is what makes Dota 2 fun and keeps you playing over and over, day after day so its hard to get even close to 1% of being bored. Plus in top of that there are 100+ Heroes, that makes getting bored of this game dead impossible :') and that gives us point #1 ;) So I recommend everyone to play this game, even if you're a cat...... cause cats are awesome.......so is Dota 2 ;) Happy Gaming! -Arafat / TRAPWOLF
PrefecT Is Shit;-;this is a really good game but it takes so long to be a professional on this game ! but im telling to play this game. its awesome
QQ_me;-;never get boring with dota 2...get to play with different player all the times...:)
Call me Ginny;-;better than LoL
4899slayer;-;The learning curve is large but once you get to the top it is really fun to stomp the lesser players under your iron boot
<font face="ravie">Haat Jao;-;Awesome game. Great game for multiplayer and online gaming
ArcGIS;-;Basically a pay2bling game, Been playing this game since 6.48b days, and i can say for sure, hate it or love it, its here to change. And valve's primary cash cow. Everythings right with the execution of the game, except the mechanics carry over from DotA, to which i think valve says, "F**k this complicated wc3 orb s**ts, lets make it our own 'Attack Modifiers'".  Matchmaking and awaits you both public and ranked matches, but as you learn to enjoy this game (requires some amount of patience [not from the game, but from the players], it gets better. Dont fall for the pay2bling and go on spending spree. It just shows to other how much you need to get a real life. Enjoy the game, not your allies screaming how n00b you are, Learn russian, so you can help that random russian player in every server how to play. Definitely a recommend, PROS -DotA universe (meaning DotA players will feel at home after 30-40 hours of gameplay) -Valves main attention right now (forget HL3, let alone HL2ep3) -The defining MOBA game at the moment CONS -Steep learning curve (unless you played Wc3 DotA, the tutorials aren't much to write home about) -Not a Pay2Win game -Frequent Updates
Racezing;-;This is game that not all people will enjoy, but if you do then prepare to dedicate the game lots of time because of the depth of the learning that needs to be done in order to take out the most from the game. During your time playing the game you will find lots of people that treatly you quite badly, but luckily there is a button for ignoring them. Overall, I think this game would be for people who love and enjoy playing RTS games.
Jmspammer;-;One of the best MOBA around...anyway League of Legends is far better
Phoenix;-;game's free and fun check it out
CL.OutLaw TGN;-;that a good game lol
Watch this space;-;A good way to improve your multi tasking ability in real life. Mostly, when you're using Invoker huhuhu xD
F R E E M A N;-;Sometimes still find some bug but is ok
DuckstyLe;-;Very good. Only hindered my future. Nothing else. Great game. Recommended for all who needs a distraction.
Totengott;-;nothing more nothing less thana good moba
MJay;-;It's really good and fun c:
exjason;-;Honestly, One of the best MOBAs out there, It may be overwhelming and ridiculous at first, But I quickly realized once I found out about my favorite hero, In this cave, Sven, The Rogue Knight, Lyralei, The Windrunner, And Lina, The Slayer, To name a few, But the game in itself is amazingly well rounded, With even supports having fun roles in the game and even having the potential to take over the game, The PVP community is a lot better than my First arguement about it, And rarely do I find any terrible people in the game who have a terrible attitude. The Best MOBA I have seen and played besides maybe Smite, I would recommend this to anyone with a good group of friends who like to have fun and play Video games like it.
Eric Clapton;-;it's hard to move on from dota 1.. after i try 2-3 games on this game, i'm so regret, why i'm not move on to dota 2 from long ago..
the Walrus;-;I dont like it I promised myself Id never play it, but now I cant stop playing it. Very addictive and makes you very competitive even if your not the "competitive easily addicted to a game" type of person. Edit (*12/28/14): The game and the community is full of trolls and intentional feeders. The only hope for a goodgame is now only in the ranked playlist, and even there you'll get your trolls from time to time. If you're going to play, bring some friends to have a team, or dont even bother at all. It used to be fun and you could search an all pick and actually encounter people who want to win and play but now it seems that all the CoD casuals have drifted over to DOTA 2.
Cengceremet;-;wow i like this game
Kappa;-;Very fun game, I suggest it to everyone.
Whoyomych;-;Wasting of time!
tRUST;-;Joined game, learned russian, learned how not to be friendly. Thanks valve
Black Elsa;-;Welcome to the game of English majors, Russians, Peruvians, and this; "GG report riki ez mid" This game is like your abusive father. You sorta kinda hate it, you know its' not good for your life, but you still come back to it at one point or another because this is some kind of forced relationship that you know that you will get beaten or yelled at if you try to escape it Also, Gaben.
[TF9L]Centurion;-;I played a little and it was fun.
DT-hendripottersix;-;hope can become to strong
Twitch.tv/Merlindima;-;Ok so its dota 2, The larges and most popular game on steam at the time of writing, If you dont have this game and you are an avid gamer. You will most likely pick up this game at some point, due to the fact that it is free, and well why not? From a Graphics point of view at maxed out on a GTX 660 easily it looks fantastic and that isnt even the best graphics card so the requirements arnt huge but much lower than that on budget PC with the worst graphics card ever and you might get a few people compaining about your *Wooden PC* increasing the time to load up into the game, and if worst comes to worse you can turn it to complete minium and I bet you that even if you laptop has one of the worst GPU's on the market you can eventually get it to run at a playable pace. From a gameplay point of view, as you can see I have spent well over 500 hours on this game so it must be pretty good and some other reviewers have spent from 1000 hours and above, the reason? Well there is 1 map that has a few variables that can change the game such as the runes, weather you get a good creep from the jungle to control and take on your enemies with. So 1 map you think hummm that must be pretty limited, well yes i would kind of agree with you but the fact is that becuase of the 100+ heros and many hero combinations and counters no game is the same with each game changing the way you play slightly depending the character you play, how you play it and who you are against and how they play it so the game does take a while to get old and even then having the same map means that you can really know it, like REALLY know it. How to do specific techneques and pulling creeps, where the enemy heros can see you and how to position yourself. So in that term the gameplay remains fun and interesting while still for players like me challenging. The Community: This is the one issue you get with this game some people are not very forgiving for your mistakes and there is a lot of anti-russian stuff, mainly because when you go to play on an English or US server and you get strange man shouting at you and your team in a strange language that no one on your team but him can understand, people get a little (to say the least) annoyed. Althrough the higher your battle rank and mmr (I will talk about that later) means that eventually you will get players who actually make an effort to co-ordinate with you. The Ranking system and how valve makes its money: So the game is free and so how does valve make its money? Well first let me explain the ranking system: Basicaly after each game you will recieve an ammount of battle points for you to increase your battle point level, each level you will recieve an item (I think) and acasionally you will be able to open a present to get free items, these items can also be dropped through luck randomaly to people at the end of the game. Valve also sells hero costumes in the dota store/in game shop these items will only change the look of your character and will not actualy affect the gameplay which I find very unique and means that there arnt huge pay to wins in the game which annoys me hugely when people make a good game and then make it pay to win. These costume items are very effective with the steam market allowing players to sell their items cheaply to other players but valve still profits of that by taking a transaction fee. Also due to the popular steam workshop players can submit their item designs to be avaliable in game and they will also get a cut of the money made which is a nice thing for new artists to make some money while having something to potentially put on a CV. Also when you reach a battle point rank of 13 you will unlock ranked matchmaking which will allow you to play games with other people of that level 13 and higher to increase your MMR with the top MMR being 7500 and bottom 0 (You really have to be bad to get 0) with 5000+ mmr being very high. MMR is for more serious players that want to really test their skills with others of that level, but on a down side note, 2000-2700 mmr is very hard to get past as there are people from all different abilities so that can be a little dificult to get past. but eventually with experience and a little luck you will get past and eventually be on the climb you your ability level. This concludes my review for dota with a few 10/10 statistics Also please consider taking a look at my youtube channel where there is some dota content and some help videos for new players: https://www.youtube.com/user/MerlinICVideos Graphics: 8.5/10 Gameplay: 9/10 Community: 6/10 As it gets better later on Ranking/Progression System: 9/10
Hyooo;-;this is a really good game from valve in which a competitive MObA game. DOTA 2 is a MOBA game involving 10 people and 5 member on each team. each team called radiant and dire defending the ancient (core of their life). members of the team choose one of 100++ heroes. there are 3 basic stats ability, which are strength, intellegent, and agility. both team fight each other have the purpose to protect their ancient and destroy the enemy ancient. to sum up, this game is really recommended, though for new player it is needed to follow the training, not all of players are friendly to new player, make sure to understand the system of the game and be polite to each other. Dont forget to commend a player that you assume is well worth commend and report those player who you assume as a ruiner.
jaSPERM;-;Dota is mother of all MOBA games
Beacon of Knowledge;-;This game requires logical thinking. It's fun when you have a team that knows what they're doing. Prefer this over League of Legends. DotA 2 = Chess. LoL= Checkers. That pretty much sums it up. Pros- -Fun. -Well balanced. -Every hero is and has a counter-hero. -Meet different people. -More strategic depth. -You don't have to buy your Heroes or characters, this disables in-game advantage to people who use real money. -Wider Hero diversity. No gap closer, slow, utility spell on everyone unlike LoL. Every Hero is unique. Cons- -Tutorial isn't done yet. Pretty hard for people who are new to MOBA. -The learning curve is very, very, very steep. -LoL also has outside factors affecting the game, such as runes you can unlock and equip outside of the game, to affect every match in some way. DotA doesn't have any idiocy like that. Your win or loss is completely unaffected outside of the current match you are in. This is coming from someone who hasn't played a lot of videogames. I have compared it with LoL and that is my opinion. This is affected my academics significantly. My family doesn't like me anymore because I'm addicted to this game a lot, to be honest. Also, this game needs some changes on its MMR system, because of which I had to create this account to start DotA all over again to improve my stats. I hope something would be done about it in the future, and new servers would be opened up in countries where people get terrible ping such as India. I would definitely recommend this to people who are capable of logical thinking. Decisions need to be made much faster and people who would love such games and not easy ones such as LoL should definitely give this game a try. This ruined my life. My social life is pathetic, my parents don't like me, and I'm terrible at academics as I mentioned earlier. At home, people made sure I don't play DotA 2. So, I secretly game at a gaming parlor almost everyday. I spent half or all of my college fund on DotA 2 and other games on Steam. My parents are unaware of this. Addicted so much, and I'm just in high school. Good game life. Reason - DotA 2. 5 out of 5. Definitely would recommend.
NoLimits;-;One of the best, most difficult and truly competitive games I've ever played. It is free and doesn't have any pay-to-win, all heroes are free, the only paid content are cosmetical items that DO NOT change gameplay.
D'Kid;-;try this game
[BusyBees] Ted!;-;This game is free. The community might ruin this game for most players.
George W. Pudge;-;-too many russians -very competitive -noobs gonna have a hard time(ing much flaming in the first weeks... well kinda always xD) -you will learn most swears in russian -you gonna be a russian racist after literally 1-3months -its pretty much about tactics,roles and strategy -free 2 play -10million Players -100+ Heros and 100+ different Items make this game very complex -Noobs might need like 1-3 months to get along with the game (hard mechanics,tower/creep aggro,lasthitting,day/night sight, juking, skillshots and so on) well all in all i have to say its not the Best game for beginners id say that might be his younger brother LoL. Though if you have time to get along with it. Then my friend you gonna have so much fun, for literally endless hours of playing. As i said awesome game go and DL gl hf :D
Murthles;-;Keep playing Dota 2 and you'll eventually learn russian, or romanian. Yes, I highly recommend it.
Fumey;-;Honestly the most intense, competetive game I've played since back in the days of CoD:WaW! Bad example, but especially for being free and the huge following...I've drowned more time that I'd like to admit on this game. So addictive and fun when you actually get past the learning curve and start to get good. Always something to learn, and mostly every patch adds something cool or refreshing to the game i.e a new hero or changes to the map or something of the sort! Download, and enjoy kicking  with your friends!
Ak9199;-;what i dislike about this game is some noobs who doesnt listen to teammates and dont support in the game that whay i really dislike other then that its a great game if you play as a team its victory all the way and its fun
Stryfaar;-;I love the game! It really gets addicting, which explains my playtime, lol. You might not like it at first, but I bet it will really turn into your close-to-everyday hobby after a while, once you have gotten the hang of it. It has a huge variety of heroes to choose from, enjoy, experiment, and master. Though there are still a few missing heroes from the original Defense of the Ancients, like Arc Warden, Winter Wyvern, and Abyssal Underlord, the constant updates on the game which balances heroes, and adds more content will still make you have fun and be strategic on the game. Hero sets, and other custom items like HUDs, Loading Screens, etc. are present in the game. Hero sets are a handful of items which customizes the whole hero. From head to toe. And I guess I don't have to explain the custom HUDs and stuff, right? There are a few yearly events to look upon on as well. Like New Bloom (Chinese New Year), Diretide (Halloween), Frostivus (Christmas), some random events like the recent Foreseer's Contract event which gives you and possibly quite a few more that I have missed since I have not played the game for long. Each of the first three events offers a new map as well as new content, as I have mentioned earlier. Map changes may also vary on future game updates. But like all other games, there are flaws, the #1 flaw would be the really bad community. Only rarely you see friendly, good players who will actually help newbies learn. Most people in the game are rather stupid in the sense that they insult people who are new to the game, blames others for their own mistakes, and those who trashtalks for no reason. There are players which does not know how to wait for someone too, causing them to receive an abandon and gets them into the low prioprity punishment pool. Gets really really annoying. No justice done, really. There are some people who ruins games too, which can be explained in one word - "troll". They feed the enemy team intentionally. Worst part is that, reporting them never does anything. The reports need better management. No, Valve, the low priority pool isn't that good of a punishment either. Some players just report other users with no apparent reason, and I think causing them an LP would not do any justice. At least examine the reports before taking action? Another thing is the servers. Some users has gotten problems where the server would just kick them out for no reason which yet again causes them an abandon. There are instances where the servers would actually crash due to an update during a really good game. Really. Happened to me once, was not happy. Especially when the game is already over an hour long and you were winning a hardly fought match. Seriously. This is just based on my own experiences and my opinion, you might disagree on some stuff I have uttered, but overall I like this game. It gets even better when you get to know the right people, and I think I'll give it an 8/10. I have met a lot of really good friends from this game, I hope you try it out and find your own. Have fun!
Solitude;-;I only played a little ! :)
mr skeltal;-;i've only played for a little bit but i think it's great! definitely better than lol too
Cas;-;Very competitive game. Players inside very toxic
Buc Nasty;-;Dota 2, arguably the steepest learning curve strategy game you will ever play, yet none more rewarding. A highly competitive game that is now played by millions (for millions, TI4 winners took ~5million USD), that is hugely satisfying. Pros: * Variety in hero builds and teams * High replay ability * Real-time mixture of RTS and MOBA elements Cons: * Brutal learning curve and impossible to master * Demanding community and poor tolerance thresholds * Huge, huge, huge, occupier of your time! (Some games last more than 60 minutes) Otherwise, what are you waiting for... At 805 hours total, I am beginner/intermediate level, and have no plans on stopping now...
cRss;-;this is so challenging and adventurous, adrenaline rush.. so sad when steam update i always experience so lag
PactFox;-;Riot fix your broken game. 10/10
<font face="ravie"> B@L$!NG;-;I liked the game played what i disliked about this game is to expensive
BANNED;-;Nice Game ever. i like spent my free time in this game.
udieigotpaid;-;Awesome game, not only because it's awesome, but because it's free.
BreD;-;Great game just one thing volvo pls fix space jumping i press space and nothing hapens im cod fan so pls :(
Shaky Pop;-;Spawn, Pick Invoker call "mid or feed", watch all the russians be angry that you picked Invoker. Win
Rigel;-;This game taught how to insult in almost every european and asian culture. +1.  bobo
TR3V0R PH!LL!P5;-;What does a hero truely means?...........That is for you to decide!
Red Queen;-;better than LOL
mem;-;it makes stephen mad so it's good
That's So Daven;-;Who needs OKCupid when you can memorize 100 heroes skills and last hit/deny like a pro? Just tell women in bars that your CS was 40 at 5 minutes and they'll be buying you drinks in no time.
Chandler Bing;-;Learn languages quickly with this beautiful language simulator! You can learn everything from Russian to Spanish and even French!! All this for the exclusively low prince of your social life and self-esteem!!!!
Synonymous;-;The latest in rage simulation technology. Dota 2 is supposed to be a team game but plays like call of duty where your team is full of little kids, non-english speaking players and people who play like they are using a trackpad. What is supposed to be a objective based game turns into a team deathmatch if you get matched with russians. Valve constantly releases patches to try and balance the handicap that peruvians give you but its not working, what seems like a 5v5 match in reality is a 8v2 or 9v1. I do not recommend this game unless you like getting angry at yourself for not being able to win a 9v1
AlphaRage;-;Though DotA 2 is not beginner/noob friendly at all everyone is able to play it. There is nothing much to say about why you should try it or not, but the sheer number of players and year-thousands of cumulative playing time spent on this game should make you giving this a try. Be aware that the learning curve however is exponential. This means that you will most likely be bashed down by the complex mechanics of this game for like the first 300 hours, depending on how eager you try and how naturally skilled you are. After you are in it and got some friends to play, you will be able to have a thousand (or more thousands) of hours of gaming time in which there is variety and fun. Also, for the big and free game like this is you have to expect by a 50/50 chance to find games with 'bad communication', meaning that either your teammates or the enemies are not friendly/helping etc. You just have to deal with it. But on the other hand you will get to learn some russian, french, spanish, korean etc. curses you did not knew before. Also this is F2P, but there are only smaller cosmetic items. Nothing involving the gameplay. Just for your information: If you played LoL or HoN before you will not have an easy going here as this game takes the genre some steps higher.
Scythe | V3n0m;-;Free Russian Language and Culture lesson!
Alex "No Farm" James;-;The greatest game ever made. At face value it's just another top-down video game, however once surpassing the initial learning curve the depth of this game is second to none. The animation is perfect, the voices are pristine... however every game has its flaws. The community is horrible, there are numerous bugs and that's just grazing the surface. That being said, I never recommend this game to friends as once you pass that learning curve you won't be doing anything else once it latches on.
Thomas1st2;-;Great game, it's essientally a language simulator mixed in with a Moba. Honestly within 10 hours of gametime, I was a natural speaker in Russian a language of which I had never had prior knowledge to before. This game is great for racism as you learn to hate the Russian people despite how much they love or hate gays. It's a great team building exercise as you learn to love those that you do not know despite how well they're playing, because after all God taught us to love each other. Apart from Russian;  the Russians. Overall;   ,            ,     ;              .
Standin.Azwraith;-;My most favourite game upto now.. Highly recommended..
Chally;-;DO NOT PLAY THIS GAME. THIS GAME IS CANCER.
F(x)JaegeR;-;very attractive game in my mind
pretty boy stylin on u;-;i used to have friends but now all i have is body odour, a poor sense of self-worth, and racism 9/10
{WNNA} Bolbi;-;This game is a tutorial for how to hate Peruvians.
BEYBUH EETUH;-;pretty good
Flaming Bag of Shit;-;Dota 2 (Defence of the Ancients) is an online Battle Arena video game, it requires strategy, concentration and determination for the whole team to win a game. The only problem is it relies WAY too much on your teamwork. To win a game you have to destroy the opponents Ancient after you level up and become powerful. Killing the enemy heroes levels you up faster and gives you more gold than the creeps. Because of the teamwork thing I would rate it 9/10, but yes I seriously recommend this game to everyone because it is addictive and really fun.
R 3 D J O K 3 R 1;-;IT LIKE DRUGS YOU CAN'T GET ENOUGH
Timvus;-;Dota 2 is the best competitive MOBA yet. Has a bit of a learning curve due to its complexity. But once you get the hang of it - you can do some really unique stuff during any match (unlike other MOBAs out there.) Dota 2 allows you to step out of the metagame so you can make up your own builds, drafts and playstyles. It is frequently updated and has a very passionate community. It's also just as fun watching as playing.
BlueSHARK;-;Y , sure! Good luck!
transgresija;-;endless replayability, you will forget about any other games. for some people it takes years to learn how to play with all the heroes. this game is for decade or more. very complex gameplay, mindblowing opportunities to meet nice russian guys. The best part - its free and made by best company Valve.
[] Thuzann;-;it"s the best game ever.
KAWAII DUCK;-;Dota. The easiest way to learn russian. 10/10
Schexet;-;Dota is love. Dota is life. Doto<3
Lux;-;When I first played it I thought I would never understand it, but slowly but surely things make more sense and it continues to become more and more exciting. I recommend it to everyone I speak to about gaming, it's such a popular game everyone either playes it already or has heard of it at least. Great topic of conversation too. Love it to bits, thanks for making it.
Gameranand;-;I haven't played this game that much but from what I have played, this game is really good. Game is a MOBA ARPG game. The objective is simple enough, destroy the opponent's Ancient which lies deep within their territory. Graphically speaking, the game is best in all the games out there for sure, very nice animations, looks of the heroes can be improved though, to me they look more like cartoons and I would like a realistic approach for them. Voice acting is nice as well, soundtrack can be improved. The best part of this game is that its not pay to win, all the items that you can get only alters your look in some way and not your performance in the game so no matter what weapon you are using. Be it vanilla or $10 weapon for a hero, it will do same damage to the opponent in all cases. I for one don't care much about Hero looks so its a big plus for me. All in all a very good and polished game. It also updates very frequently which is good and bad depending on your bandwidth. Must play for sure. :)
suk it nurd;-;I can now speak fluent russian. THANKS DOTA 2 C y k a Blyat
tomorrow;-;This game is ruining my life. Plz, call the amberlamps......whats the number for 911.....halp -ded-
croutons5;-;This game can either be really fun with friends, or can destroy relationships with your friends. It's definitely not fun playing alone though.
[AG]Doraemon;-;dota 2 is really really fun and pretty cool,, u can killing as much as u want!! and colaborate with ur party to make good tactic and awesome game!!
Loco;-;At the time of writing this I have logged 1500 hours playing Dota 2. In that time I could have pursued paid work, I could have exercised and improved my body or I could have learned any number of real-world skills. Instead I have sat at my computer and faced a tirade of abuse, often pertaining to my skills, my family or my sexuality. The Dota 2 community is probably the most toxic I have ever experienced, racism, homophobia and misogyny run rife. I attribute this to the standard internet algorithm; NORMAL PERSON + INTERNET ANONYMITY = RAVING  From the whiny gimp who calls 'gg' after first blood to the gobby simpleton who first picked Phantom Assassin and decides you are all 'f**kinnoobs!!11!' for not baby-sitting him, you will find that most problems in Dota 2 are someone else's fault, and they will tell them so, a lot. Regarding the game itself. There are endless combinations of heroes, items and spells that you can use to your advantage which explains why one needs to accrue over a thousand hours before they can even class themselves as competent. The learning curve is steep, and to even become skilled with one hero takes a long time, so is it worth it? The game itself is beautiful, each individual hero is a work of art, as is the battle arena itself. The customisations are a delight to view and the thriving community of modders continue to capitalise on the tools available to them. Dota 2 is wonderfully balanced, despite regular cries of '***** is OP!' all the heroes have exploitable weaknesses and no hero is markedly stronger than any other, save in specific situations. This is why Dota 2 is played competitively to the highest levels of E-sports for serious prize pools. When Dota 2 is at it's most fun it is an exceptional experience, like when a team artfully chains their stuns to annihilate the enemy carry and turn a game. These moments don't come often enough, but maybe they are all the more glorious because of that. So would I recommend Dota 2? Of course, I have sank a preposterous amount of time into playing it, I've even enjoyed some of that time. I'd encourage you to find some friends then play and learn together. The first time someone says anything that bothers you, mute them straight away, it only takes two mouse clicks. As you get better remember that you were not always competent and consider that when you interact with others. Try and treat other members of the community with the respect you would want them to offer you. Lose some hours and have some fun. Regards, Loco P.S. All those guys you think are Russian, they're usually Serbian or Ukrainian, and they don't give a damn what you think about Putin.
SpaceCat;-;This is literally the best applictaion to become fluent in russian. 10/10 would have sex with this game and then do it again every night for the next 80 years...kinda like marriage. League of legends is basically a game where in a marraige the couple are about to get a divorce but one of them end up murdering each other.
EBOSHER;-;BLYAD GDE CC IDI NAHUI MAMU EBAL reported.
iX;-;What is Dota 2? Dota 2 is the most fun, the most annoying, the most tearful and the most stressful game you will ever play. You get to experience being sweared at in a multitude of languages; it has taught how to manage my investments due to knowing when to report and when not to report. Dota also adds in event styled gamemodes; the latest being a full fledged Pay to Win; thank you Gaben 9/8 gr8 b8 m8.
obidaimest-_-;-;simply perfect!
It is in the Bag!;-;I love this
Codelion;-;A couple of years ago, a friend of mine started me on this game, and, boy, what a ride. I won't get into the details of the game, but there are always a few tournaments going on that you can watch as well as the Free To Play documentary (on the first edition of The International Dota 2 tournament, look it up on Youtube), to get a good feel on the game. If you're still interested after that, if you have friends to play with, if you have patience to learn, and if you have time to spare (each game lasts 40 minutes on average), I wholeheartedly recommend you try it. This is what competitive video games are all about. It is daunting at first, has a steep learning curve, but every day I'm playing I'm learning something new and that is rewarding by itself. It is a team-based game so you'll get your fair share of frustrations, but as long as you be smart about your decisions, salvage every mistake as a learning experience, and most importantly have fun doing so, this is your game of the forever.
JustAway!;-;Learn Russian quicker this way
ICE TIME;-;. (I have a complicated relationship with dota.)     ,  ,      ,   -  . (Good game, well made.) Valar morghulis
Hunter Seeker;-;I would avoid playing this game for two reasons. The community is absolutely horrible; probably the most toxic community in any game I've ever played. The second reason is Valve hasn't helped to make the community any better, but actually helped to make it worse (by not adding a surrender feature). Do not waste your time with this game.
Ling Ling;-;This game is quite addictive. I've spent some times trying out all 100+ characters from A-Z >.< My favorite is Viper :D If you have time to try this game out, try all the heros and pick which one you like and develop it with many builds offense/defense. In multiplayers, people can be rude, aggressive, beginner, professional which can be quite frustrating but if you play with your friends, it's going to be great.
inv@sion;-;DotA 2 can be a game for casual gamers or people looking to get more competive. There is a very wide variety of heroes to play (over 100) and they all have their own playstyle. This game is extremely fun after you get past the pretty steep learning curve. I must mention that this is a STRATEGY game, so if you only like FPS's then you might not like this. Once you start understanding the game more it is a LOT of fun. Please don't compare this game to LoL because both games were created differently and are meant to serve a different experience.
Renoya;-;get rekt m8 10/10 sea server put tank in a mall every match.
{GOM} BashLord;-;Destroyed my social life, destroyed my bank balance, got a few sets, worth it 11/10
Beardzinga;-;Ever been yelled at by Peruvians? If no, then this is the game for you If yes, then you already play this game
aLLkiss;-;First you have to learn the language of the russians, urn there trust. Then breed with their women, and in time, our differences will be forgotten
Horse Head;-;Played around 3k hours and still suck)))
JakeAru;-;I've become chronically depressesed since I began playing and now I get medical weed.
GA. Luigi;-;This game is boring as all hell. Don't waste your time playing this game.
Vallenstein;-;really nice game play!!
TRIGUND;-;Hide your wife, hide your children, hell hide your dog to because DOTA2 is going to get you =)
Raeeeee;-;I love this game :)
Captain Cornhole;-;It sucks! ;)
Serbian Leader;-;This game sucks you can't even jump 4/20
moogle;-;most ever good game in the world. recommend to play this game.. :D
Madao;-;Game made me realise my mother wanted to repick me as a child...
Sesshomaru;-;Most Competitive and Best MOBA till now.
Foxman8472;-;DotA 2 is an anger management game in which the protagonist is challenged by being forced to withstand increasing levels of psychological torture. The torture part has not yet been translated into English, so it's compelling narrative is still in Russian, but don't let that fool you - it still delivers the full payload. For managing to resist an entire session of torture, the protagonist is awarded new hats.
Lynx;-;This review is long. So don't read if you're not interested enough. My history in Dota The year of 2012. I found this game very popular in steam. Why'd not give a try? The game was hard to understand first time (haven't played any MOBA games earlier). I've played only 3-4 heroes and used the same build. Sometimes it was just boring. Then, I've opened for myself Single Draft mode . It helped me to study another heroes in Dota(whose number is above 100 ). I've discovered the most interesting cyber-sportive side of Dota later. I wish I would see The International 2013 in that time! Now I'm praying to see all the TI 2014 matches online. My favourite teams are Na'Vi, Empire and EG . Their replays and mathes helped me a lot to study a professional Dota scene a bit. Game mechanics Game mechanics in Dota is about to be ideal, despite lots of minor bugs. Some bugs makes the game even more interesting(trying to abuse something with your friends, etc.). Dota has very many useful tricks, which you can study from Youtube videos or pro-scene replays. The main target is the same in all MOBA games - to destroy opponent's main building. The process is very interesting and even addicting. Dota 2 has lots of tactics, heroes, builds, skillbuilds. Also, you can buy skins in the Dota store for heroes, couriers, etc. Conclusion is you can customize your gaming process as you want or as your team wants. Dota 2 doesn't have a donate advantages - it's a big plus. To compare with League of Legends, Dota's better in this way. Teammates The pubs in Dota are very popular, of course. In Dota, you can play with people round the world on many languages. The people you meet can be aggresive, can be calm, can be skillful, can be useless. Every game you expect something new. And, to win many Dota pubs, you need to learn how to communicate with your teammates effectively and politely. Russians in Dota 2 Guys, this part of review is for the people, who played Dota. I think now every European says that Russians completely suck at Dota and always can't talk with the teammates in English. I'm Russian. What's next? Am I a complete noob, am I aggresive, unpolite? I'm trying to be. I can't understand people, who see my mistakes and tell "Oh, he's Russian, mute him, he's noob!". Everyone does mistakes, by the way, it's just a game. But, I wanna say one thing: I'm sorry. Sorry for my compatriots. I know there are many of them trolling the pubs, abusing communication, etc. Just sorry. Free to Play Free to Play is the film about Dota cybersport, made by Valve. I advice everyone to see it. Great film about great game, which is played by great people. The International 2014 The biggest Dota tournament is International. It is organised by Valve and goes every year. I expect from TI4 pretty much. Conclusion So, Dota 2 is a good and interesting game. 9/10. It is a mix of teamplay, timings, strategy, communication. Recommended to try, but don't get addicted:) Thanks who survived during reading all this long review. I haven't told much, but it is ok. So, thanks for reading, see you at Dota 2 battle fields :) And, to end this review traditional Russian .
Hot JuJu;-;I like this game because it is very addicting. I dont like peenoise playing in sea server :3
Robiculus;-;This game is a love/hate relationship. I love it. See my hours? That's how much I love it. Still play it daily. About 40 hours evrey two weeks. Bam. Different way to play everytime due to friends feeding and dying or the enemy dying. It's great. I hate it. Because sometimes you just want to do something else in life. See my hours? Could have spent it doing something better in life. Coulda learned a new language (You will become fluent in Russian after a while). I play 40 hours every two weeks, I coulda done something else like read a book or make arts and crafts out of Mac n Cheese. I love to hate this relationship.
SwiTchelele;-;Dota 2 is an AWESOME game that has achieved fame through its wide fan-base and extremly good graphics and ease of use. Many people enjoy the game and it has ways of reaching people that haven't heard about it. Being a all round good, easy to use, and free game, i recommend it.
symsym;-;Better than LoL.
Xander Puh;-;i took a big sh*it and my pants were still on
Deez Nutz|Heat;-;Yet another stand alone sequel to popular Mod by valve. & I must say! It has stood up to expectations just like others. Easy to learn, hard to master mechanics. Balanced roster of 108 heroes & addictive gameplay. This game has everything a free-to-play has to offer! Awesome game indeed! Thumbs up!
Corporate Taxation;-;I sometimes think back to better times when I played games that weren't DOTA2. When I knew no words of Russian or infact held a hatred of people who didn't speak my language. I quickly repress those thoughts by diving back into EUW and being greeted by "S" every time. Home is where the hate is.
Hestia||Chan^^;-;Dota 2 ruin my life ...... Everybody look down on me Its a drug Once u start playing u cant stop which explains the vavle dude with a pipe when we switch on dota in the beginning According to me it means that if you play this game its gonna suck every thing from your brain and replace it with dota 2 and there will be nothing inside your head besides dota 2 And this my fellow strangers is true ...whereveer u go ..u think of dota ...u eat ..think of dota...sleep ...think of new combos and ....exam hall ...dota EVERYTHING IS ABOUT DOTA!!!! Therefore this is a message to all you pure souls out there ...never play this game ever in your entire life ....its for the best If someone asks you to play because its fun ...STAB HIM IN THE MODAING CHEST LIKE RIKI BACKSTAB!!  !!! You See? even just now !!! ...DOTA IS IN MY MIND! BECAREFUL!!! DONT LET DOTA INTO YOURLIFE!
CrowN.;-;Fun game, never got boring! DoTa is illumanti confirmed.
VanillaBean;-;Dota 2 - Say goodbye to your friends and loved ones. Its gonna drain your life, and sap every energy you have inside you. Pray hard cause its gonna be stuck in your life, even if you hate some patches, or move away, you will always come back to it.
Kukrengringsmaskin;-;Do you like being matched with non-English speakers on English servers and losing to "right click to win" heroes? Do you love lack of communication between team members in a team game? THEN YOU'VE COME TO THE RIGHT PLACE! Introducing Dota 2, the most innovative method of mental self-harm known to man. Some games are so "fun" (ed), you'll want to commit seppuku to end the miserable experience. The best part about Dota is when you make the life of the other team miserable. Then you're in for a world of fun. PS. Always, always, always bring along some friends. Dota may be agonizing otherwise. The more friends you play with, the better.
[T]ricky;-;I like the facts that Dota 2 is for everyone and the heroes are balanced. The fact that you have to strategically plan your game makes it more interesting than go there and just shoot.
aLLkiss;-;First you have to learn the language of the russians, urn there trust. Then breed with their women, and in time, our differences will be forgotten
Beardzinga;-;Ever been yelled at by Peruvians? If no, then this is the game for you If yes, then you already play this game
Captain Cornhole;-;It sucks! ;)
GA. Luigi;-;This game is boring as all hell. Don't waste your time playing this game.
JakeAru;-;I've become chronically depressesed since I began playing and now I get medical weed.
Vallenstein;-;really nice game play!!
Raeeeee;-;I love this game :)
ThuG LifE;-;Play this game and you will get addicted
Fianski;-;how to win the game = war < tower but oh well human are naturally greedy.
BonJoviFan;-;If Carlsberg Did Mobas --- Best Game EVER Ok first off a sortof mixed review. I love and hate this game. I first started playing dota just after the international 2013. I moved into a house where the housemates were hell bent on this game and had friends over every day to play it. It was the 1st MOBA i had ever played, infact i had never even heard of the term MOBA before, (and for those who dont know it stands for Multiplayer Online Battle Arena) First of all i was LUCKY i had friends who played this, and watched and got help from them as they played before even starting the game, as when landed into the thick of it, it is quite daunting. The tutorials are BLAH... until you actually get to the main gameplay tutorials, but no mention of custom build selection??? , this is another reason why some of my friends have just given up. From my experience, if you are a keen gamer STICK WITH IT. However if you value your life then give up now because it is very addictive, stressful and fun in the same sentence. DOTA is a very tactical game, which is extremely fun, overwhelmingly addictive too and by knowing the basic fundamentals and working as a team and not being arrogant or being able to take advice you can have a great game. You dont have to be an absolute strategist to win, although it does help The problem with this game is the community, and that is not the communitys problem, infact i blame the creators VALVE for not putting enough restrictions in place, and the restrictions they do put in place are ridiculous. First of all you have to have a half decent machine to play this on standard settings ( i sometimes even have problems on lowest settings on this machine and my machine lives up to their MINIUMUM SPECS. That saying that the game is quite playable for the most time on their minimum specs, but it seems bugs do keep popping up that they just wont sort out Also take the game as it is... free to play... and if anything happens just suck your gut in and relax. VALVE support absolutely sucks, so if anything goes wrong and you have any problems dont go running to valve for help because i have done this on more than 3 occasions, with a 2 day + response of just "sorry we cannot help you with this issue". And my last email getting the response "We will ignore any future emails about this issue from you" Back to the community... Dont take ranked too personally. DOTA is a TEAM game, however many times you will get landed with players who cannot play as a team, don't get the essence of DOTA in the same way you do, are absolutely rude and ignorant and arrogant. My advice after lots of headaches.... sod them, you are playing because you like to play, if you suck they dont help by screaming at you, and if you are dieing too often (and not intentionally feeding) then it is their fault for not working as a team and protecting you. Also matchmaking, you will find when you get into the game servers.... english speakers take off everything except us east, west and europe west and set language preference as english. This wont stop you being annoyingly teamed with people who dont speak english, but it sure helps... for some reason people dont understand communication is fundamental for a team game and selfishly pick servers where the know they will be teamed up with people who dont speak their languages. YES I AM SPEAKING TO ALL YOU RUSSIANS WHO SELECT EVERYTHING OTHER THAN RUSSIA. Other problems are that with the report system or restrictions. Now people with low end computer who get annoying bugs ingame which randomly kick them off suffer most. However it goes for everyone on the report system. I rarely use it anymore because it does jack  unless you are with a group of people you know will report the same person for the same actions. You get 3 a week no matter how much you play, which is dreadful, and you only get a report back if action is taken against someone, which seems to me it doesnt matter what they have done, if noone else reports it there is no check and they get away scott free. Unfortunately if you are in a game and the rest of your team is a party, and they dont like you for some reason... excpect a 6 game ban in low priority. Also a new bug bear that has come out is this "Failed to load" Scenario.. My games usualy load up, with some slow lagging problems at the start but manage to settle itself out. When the games didnt load it was a pain in the  and you may have to search another 3 - 10 mins for a game, but that was an annoyance i could live with. Now on the odd occasion i fail to load i get penalised for half an hour from finding ANY game, except ones with bots, remember failing to load does not effect the game as the game hasnt currently started, and it is annoying but getting a ban from finding a match for 30 mins (i even got an hour at one instance) is ridiculous, taking in account that a game lasts between 30 and 60 mins on average. that means sometimes when you only have a set ammount of time to play you are screwed. [Bugs ive experienced taken out since they dont appear anymore on new laptop upgrade] Other than that this game is the most fun game i've ever played, and so rewarding so no matter how crap valve are, or no matter how annoying the game can be at times, i alway come back for more. Even if it means playing out my low priority ban matches with complete s
Zeriety;-;What DOTA gave me -Repetitive strain injury (RSI) -Anger problems -Hate for Russians -
Sam;-;Dota is very informative and fun game. when I started it, I was not so sure about it but as I went on playing it. I became so in grossed that now once in a day Dota is important for me. I recommend this game to all my friends. The thrill, adventure, action and friendship involved is way better then bidding your time sitting idle. Thanks Dota :)
JettaTura;-;Brilliantly addictive.
Lord Ehk <3;-;I suggest to push the option of kicking someone on the game like those who are just ruining the game such intetional feeding or Throwing the game.
ZuPaG;-;Cool Game!
Joshy;-;A great free to play MOBA based game that anyone can enjoy, no matter what genre you favour. The frequent updates and patches will keep you playing for endless hours. Plus you dont have to pay for anything to experience the game's full potential, unlike some other MOBA's. 9/10
[ULTRA]stalker;-;lost my life and my family got kicked out of uni , but dam it's good game xD
Kryptis3;-;A very fun and interesting game that involves a high level of quick thinking and strategy.
Gardrop Fuat;-;MOBA game created by Valve and uses Source Engine. How could it be better then this?
Zeratul;-;God of MOBA
BatFolkye;-;Overdose is dangerous for life!
Clop;-;Promotes racism towards Russians. 01/01
Rain;-;thsi game is  dont play it
ThuG LifE;-;Play this game and you will get addicted
[ULTRA]stalker;-;lost my life and my family got kicked out of uni , but dam it's good game xD
Fianski;-;how to win the game = war < tower but oh well human are naturally greedy.
THS.Matt@[-DG-];-;I haven't played this game that much but.. Its fun.
Fangorn;-;this is a good game if you are hoping to learn spanish and purtoguese at the same time. much cheaper than rosetta stone dvds
Gorge Express;-;it's ok
Qliphort Monolith;-;This game ruined my social life.
Martoto;-;Don't play this, LoL is way better and complex.
Im Not Alex;-;I recently contracted ebolAIDS and my doctor said it was because of the doto. gg volvo, well played my friend.
Din Pappa;-;don't play this game.
Dali Llama;-;DotA 2 is a beautiful sequal to DotA, a Warcraft 3 mod. VALvE does what they do best yet again with a amazing F2P game that has won over my heart and soul. Gabe Bless you all
AzureCorpse;-;It's okay game I guess.
[Exp]ProProtuva;-;Just the best moba you will ever play!!!
Peka;-;Once upon a time a russian in the other team told me 'peka you good'. 10/10 vodkas would play again.
Fredda;-;This game taught me about the diversity of cultures that our small little corner of the universe offers. Then it taught me to hate them all.
Chrome;-;Side effects include: -Hatred of other humans -Lack of trust in others -Carpal Tunnel -Improved hand eye coordination -A large ego -Weight gain -Weight loss -Confidence -Despression -Extreme Racism -EXTREME RACISM -Increased strategic thinking capabilities -Mushy-brain syndrome -Subconsciously learning a new language -Subconsciously learning to hate the culture of said language -Literally every ailment that is not a transmitable disease 9/10 Doctors accepted this game on their recommendation list, but the tenth was afk
Grizzt;-;It's like roulette; fun until it turns into Russian.
psych0tic;-;Causes anxiety problems, low self esteem, Tourette's syndrome, mood swings, Bipolar disorder, breakdown of relationships, raging erections, racism. Would definitely recommend.
Sentimental Oriental;-;In Dota 2, Not many people speak your language. Not many people play well. Not many people talk nicely. Not many people work as a team. But if you find people that do... You'll have the most fun you've ever had.
Kyubashi;-;And you thought real life was a struggle.
ephir;-;I only played a little but it was fun.
Captain Obvious;-;Things I gave to DotA: 1. Money 2. Time 3. Love Things DotA gave me: 1. Arthritis 2. Carpal tunnel syndrome 3, Hatred of Russians, Mexicans, Spanish, Finnish, and Russians 4. Broken keyboard 5. Broken mouse 6. 9/10 ready 7. Server crashes 8. 4 stacks of Russians in EUW servers on English prefrence settings 9. Ranked matches 10. Free to play but Pay to win games (I.E. - Foreseer's contract, New Bloom 2015) 11. "It's in the bag" spam (especially Skywrath) 12. Multilingual cursing - I guess this is a good thing? 13. Split second math - Reliable/Unreliable gold and gold loss on death vs. Buyback availability - This is good too Essentially - DotA is a greedy woman, but I love her all the same. 11 / 10 would play again
HekaDooM;-;"THE PUB SUPPORT" "Where are wards?" The pub Carry demanded. "I placed them and they were countered" the Support began, "I am trying to juggle giving you complete lane farm, protecting you and harrassing the enemy while saving to buy more, also possibly sentries to remove their-" "UP COUR PLS" the mid hero politely added. "Give Savle" The Carry demanded. "Certainly." replies the support, using the salve on the Carry who subsequently ran headlong into an enemy creepwave. "So where is mek?" the Carry said, after he was ganked due to overextending. The Support died saving him and was treated to a rather enthusiastic series of map pings on his corpse. "Again, having not even enough to buy boots as well as wards, I don't think a 7 minute Mek is viable." The Support replies. "Haha look your level, so low, noob" the Carry retorted. "U have no item xaxa". "Well, jungle gold and experience through stacking and pulling with blocked camps is nowhere near as much as on lane which I attempted to give you, the carry, the priority over." The Carry is subsequently ganked again at the enemy tower, oblivious to the enemy tp that the Support moved away from. "Report Support, usless" The carry cried in allchat, in between mentioning various aspects of the Support's Mother's anatomy. "Instead of reporting and acting like that, why don't you try supporting for randoms sometime instead of instapicking a carry?" the Support asked, as he watched the Carry return to afk-lasthitting lane creeps. "HAH, support is for noskill noobs like you!"
flanadlivv;-;One day, a wise man intoduce me into this game. "it shall protect your virginity, my lad" he said.
ECTM. Marusky # Legendary;-;pls help i dont wanna die this thing kills you 10/10
HereInMyGarage.;-;They ask me. Do I reccomend this game? Yes or No. But choosing like or dislike is nigh impossible if I cannot see. I cannot find the answere I am looking for. I cannot locate the truth. I cannot identify the abstracted certainty. I cannot discover the facts. Because I cannot see. And why? I hear you asking. Why can't I envision the light or seek the truth? Ney I am not blind nor do I have illminded thoughts. but we lack one thing One thing that is so simple yet forgotten so often. One thing that seems so obvious yet is so hidden. One thing that allows me to anwere this question. Do I reccomend this game? You ask. I respond. We need wards!
Astrobastard;-;You might see this  installed in my friends list and go "Wow, you really have a MOBA installed?" No I don't you ing weebs. I don't play this nerd  so just stop right in your  tracks if you were gonna ask me to help you get some  360 noskill points or climb out of your "cardboard-cloud-9-tier" whatever that you dorks do. I won't have that . I installed this "Dot A" game because some disgusting ski-mask-wearing cockbiting chuckle put a gun to my head and said if I didn't install it then he would suicide bomb every bald eagle. We all know I don't  around when it comes to the greatest symbol of freedom on Earth so I installed this dumb spaz  before punching that  in the throat and breaking his  neck and promptly washing my hard drive in bleach. Because Corporal Jace Stryker once told me "I don't negotiate with Cyber Terrorists" and I don't either god dammit. #SemperFidelis
Cieo;-;This geam makes you loose elfestem, zkill, and luck. also can mak u lern new language ez. just go in russian server. 12/10 would pley agin
(* _* );-;Must have !
p(.)(.)ntangking;-;play dota! helps you take out frustation on others ! it is epic !
HoneyMustard;-;Ahh, Dota 2. It's basically a drug. Once you start, you can't stop.
Garfunkle;-;Best free game i ever played!
MrTopKek;-;Just finished the tutorial. Pretty fun game.
Dawson;-;HORRY SHEET. DEES GAIM IS SO INTEWESTING, MY HEWITAGE CAN BE SEEEN IN THE PHEONIX - I WWAS ONCE TOLD I COOLD NOT BE A MISTIKAL FIER DRAGEN, BUT NOW I AM EWERY GAME. YOU CAN EVEN ROAL PLAI AS THE DRAGEN, I PLAI AS THO I AM LERNING CHINESE FIGHTING STYLE, IT SO GOOD THAT PEOPLE SCREAM IN CHAT AT ME, WISHING ME LUCK. AND IF THE HEREOS ON THE ENEMY TEEEM WANT TO HIT ME? I ALOW EET - CWEAWY I DESErVE EET. FOR I AM THE JUGGERNAUT, .
SuddenlyPandas;-;This game is the reason why I'm single 10/10
ScorcherKnows;-;Great game! Much strategy, and fun!
KoKO;-;This game is very awesome, you need tactics, plan to win on it.
Pink Guy;-;Ruined my life. 10/10
[GM]TrueWOPR;-;"Actually DotA HD" I came into this game a little uneasy, my past with DotA1 not being the brightest in the world; but seeing something named "DotA2" I excepted new features, characters, etc etc. I COULDN'T HAVE BEEN MORE WRONG! Valve honestly didn't add a single thing (except one thing we'll get to later) the shop interface is still more unfriendly than a rabid bear in heat, mages are still completely useless in late game are are the least used class of character, the balance is still horribly out of whack leaving a single fed agility hero to be able to take an entire team by himself *cough* Antimage *cough* and it just feels lazy. Even the characters were lifted straight from the WarCraft III modles. Now back to what valve actually DID add... Hats. Not even joking. This is a shameless cash grab by Valve, do not spend money on this game. If you want the REAL "DotA2" play "League of Legends" it was an upgrade from the orignal BY the original creators, there's a reason LoL is #1.
Sogeking;-;This game, in which you need to think.The whole game depends on teamwork
Sacrilege;-;A very good follow-up to the original, which brings DOTA out of WarCraft mand into its own. I've played both DOTA and League of Legends -- DOTA 2 is superior in my book. Two thumbs up. Up the butt.
CaliberGensou;-;If you want some serious teamwork and intense battles, you gotta play Dota 2. But if you don't have time to train like a madman, just play LoL. Its more casual and less time consuming in my opinion.
Garfunkle;-;Best free game i ever played!
ECTM. Marusky # Legendary;-;pls help i dont wanna die this thing kills you 10/10
itsdad;-;although the pvp can be challenging at first, this game will hook u like no other.. gotta be one of the best games ive ever played
juanbartolo not so freeman;-;so awesome. nice gameplay ,graphics, characters another great valve creation!!!!!
HereInMyGarage.;-;They ask me. Do I reccomend this game? Yes or No. But choosing like or dislike is nigh impossible if I cannot see. I cannot find the answere I am looking for. I cannot locate the truth. I cannot identify the abstracted certainty. I cannot discover the facts. Because I cannot see. And why? I hear you asking. Why can't I envision the light or seek the truth? Ney I am not blind nor do I have illminded thoughts. but we lack one thing One thing that is so simple yet forgotten so often. One thing that seems so obvious yet is so hidden. One thing that allows me to anwere this question. Do I reccomend this game? You ask. I respond. We need wards!
Ge'Ga GiO;-;this is a game
DamnNoHtml;-;Fantastic game; terrible community. Nothing you can do about that, though,
Pickle  #Trading;-;9/10 players ready
OA.LoGix;-;It's alright.
Fluro Orange;-;my mum said she would by me a ps4 if i would stop playing dota now i live with my dad
Mezekesh;-;Played since Beta, always a good game to try... ;)
hayleybear;-;Dear Dota 2, I am drifting over the positive button, knowing it's the best gaming experience of my life. I am drifting over the negative button, knowing it's the worst gaming experience of my life. I am truly torn, abusive love of my life. I will ALWAYS love you, and never stopped, in the painful hard times. I always knew I would be with you forever. It broke my heart, whenever we were apart. Forever fell short. I will NEVER forget you, significant part of my young life. I hope you will always be there somewhere, with me, Your beautiful graphics always impressed me, made me feel at home and comfortable. You were a challenge to understand at first, but after a while, you uncovered your wonderful colours. I have never felt so mad, so sad, so anxious, so happy in my life. You really did awaken me, to new feelings and abilities. I am better at talking to people, because you pushed me to do so. I am keen to help anyone who needs it, because of your example. Your friends, the community are weird, mad, friendly and crazy. I thank you for your time, and know that it will never be too late to replay you. Because I love you so damn much. Because I hate you so damn much. I hope you read this, Dota 2. Your's sincerly, Hayley
322 is real;-;This game is not only good for learning russian, peruvian, or other languages, it teached me that i should trust my team even if i dont know them. Also it teached me some things that i never thought i would learn in this game, trust, dissapointing and friendship. Everyone should bring their friends and play, playing solo is boring and the most of time loosing. I rate this game 10/10.
TrollAzz;-;This game made me lose my virgin again. 9\10.
Shato_DxD;-;Fairly Balanced Map Design -- Several Game Mode -- Which Can Fill in Your Desire. Varities of Large Hero Poll -- Which Can Easily Fit in What You Might Like to Play -- Over all 8/10 Just Need a few changes in Low Priority -- Power Cut / Net Cut are not in our hand. Still get LP which is not Cool.
a4u;-;very nice game for me
ikramOF I;-;This game managed to teach me that many cultures can enjoy a single game as well as enjoy a good cooperative experience. Then it falcon punched that lesson out of me and taught me such ideal fantasies never exist. Oh, and also new languages....mainly curses. I'm not complaining.
The Almighty Loaf;-;Want to play a nice, simple game? One with a friendly community? Maybe some balance? Well, too bad, because this is DotA.
Minthus;-;Dota 2 is a very competetive game in the MOBA genre as it is my 2nd Moba i have played, i have truly enjoyed all these hours on here defending ancients and trying to raise my mmr... overall i'd suggest everyone to try it!!!
Terrible Scouter (Assist Master);-;I hate this game and my life.
Little Bill;-;in turk loves this game and it's
siamak.gholami;-;ID buyer everywhere, SEA dota no hope, too obsessed with the mmr number. use 350 usd to buy 6k and drop until 3k play like 1 mmr those guy are proud and rich. 350 usd to buy a number why don't just give me the money to buy food.
thelonetaquito;-;omg this game is MAHH LAIIIFFFF
SirNubsAlot;-;do not like I am a scrubby scrub scrub. I am such a  please send me  love.
m9meister;-;that ing assasin  man
Oculus Animi Index;-;Volvo is just f***ing trolling with this game. Literally pisses on your face if you happen to have problems from your internet providor. And the client is laggy AF from time to time and volvo still can't keep it up when there's events. Every time, even though they have to, at this point, already know that the servers are going to be filled with nerds. Also, pls fix your sh*tty pathing bugs on direside etc. everywhere else there is. But mostly dire. And still they can't provide us with russian, belarussian, greek, romanian, mongolian, peruvian etc. free -server. Not even a single one. 0/5 volvo pls try harded. Can't taste the salami.
Hyakkihei;-;this is a realy nice game but it will ruin your real life :P dont play it !
NotBulbasaur;-;Learn russian in under 3000 hours
Stun.Kist;-;After over 3000 hours of gameplay, I can safely sum Dota 2 up in two words: THE TRENCH (aka Forced Fifty) You will win. You will lose. You will improve your skill, but you will never improve your score. --wait for it-- No. Matter. What. Why? Because of THE TRENCH / ForcedFifty. -The better you get at this game, the worse your teammates will be. This is not a paradigm, it is mechanically programmed into the game. -If you can carry 1 idiot on your team, the game will handicap you with 2. Skilled enough to carry 2? After a few games you will get 3. Hardcore enough for 3? Now you get FOUR-ever. -Your teammates will -- i  you not go out of their way to lose on purpose. You picked another carry because it seemed logical? Well guess what, I got a few replays that will show crybabies throwing the game so you cant compete for thier spotlight. This is the only game where teammates ENJOY LOSING because it means they can bring you down to their garbage level. -People literally buy and sell accounts off MMR because of  teammates and you will be a guinea pig in their money making ponzi schemes. Have fun wasting hours of your time on 4k MMR (the alleged decent tier) while you witness first hand feeders lose you the game minute by minute. I could have been a doctor with those 3000 hours.
AlphaBetaGammaDelta;-;Tutorial lasts over 20 missions. Boring. At least Alt-Tab's working. Music: 5/10 Graphics: source/10 Alt-Tab: 10/10
YEEEE;-;Lost my social life and any chance of losing my virginity. 11/10 would bang.
@pirs;-;This game will ruin your life.
K@k@$Hi;-;nice and crazy game i like the !!!!!
Tool;-;This game is a good game. If you like games, or games that are good, then you should get this good game, made for good gamers, such as yourself.
ISAMARU;-;Nice. Nice. Nice. NO. Very Nice.
OKVVDR;-;don't. only tears await.
RMGTheBanisher;-;DotA 2 is an amazing game I have been playing for almost a year, I already have 800 hours logged on it. It is a great way to interact with the community and spend some free time. I would definitly recommend this to anyone that likes MOBA games or is interested in trying somthing new. NEW NOTE: It has been 1300 hours now. I have no life. SAVE ME!
Geralt of Rivia;-;Rest in Peace Shaan Never forget Pls Come Back
**TG** | Goose | Road to knife;-;This game is truly amazing! You will have to stick with it for about 10 games before you begin to like it but afterwards it is a hardcore stratergy game, where you will have to work with your team if you have any hope for victory. I know from personal experience that once you have gotten into the game you just want to play more and with the new updates dota has really progressed and delivered a full fun game for everyone to play.
Chiyo;-;Doto is a game where you sit down with your kappachino mute the cykas and procede to feed until you flame you noob team who are obviously below the reddit average of 9k mmr. MORE SERIOUSLY : dota is a game where each team consisting of 5 different hero picks battle against each other with the ultimate goal of destroying the others base. There are 3 routes to the base each of which is protected by several towers which along with the help of your team and creep waves can be destroyed. Each hero can buy different items and has various different skills to provide entertaining replayable games to all levels of players. WOULD RECOMMEND 10/10
LeoNatoS;-;good team play game
[TR]James;-;Help me.. This thing is sucking me up slowly..
Lewtis_The_Turtle;-;Wow this is one of the best games ive played if you like strategic games this is definetly one for you im only a beginner at this game but wow so far this game is awsome and ive played my far share of games .
Minions are responsible for 9/11;-;The most realistic anti-russian simulator out there.
Secret Muffin;-;I liked this game because it's sociable and interesting, but sometimes I hate it because there are many idiots playing it.
Kn`K.Drip;-;-Lost my family, -Lost my brain, -Lost my money, But I get 1.8k mmr ez, good game to rage, learn new languages, watch some porn during the queque
Your Father;-;A great game if you really love MOBA's. It has a steep learning curve, a mean community and a lot of delay; but for some reason, i like it! It's fun, addictive, and challenging. But i'd still choose Heroes of Newerth over this.
Cloud;-;DOTA 2 is the best online multiplayer game ever. But beware, the community is cancerous...
assailant;-;Edited for 2015: Dota 2 is a MOBA, and quite possibly my favourite game of all time. Dota, meaning Defence of the Ancients quite accurately describes the goal and purpose of what this game is. You have to defend your ancient, and to make it easier, destroy your adversaries ancient - being the radiant's or dire's - to win the game. Dota is a game of momentum. The more momentum you have, the easier it becomes to play. You kill creeps, heroes and towers to gain momentum and collect gold to purchase items of high value, which can make it easier to gain momentum by killing creeps, towers and heroes, and the cycle will continue until you overpower the enemy and destroy their ancient. I believe it is superior to other games, most notably LoL. My belief, which I'd rather not go to discuss, is based off of mechanics, including creep blocking, stacking, and denying, and in some cases the graphical standpoint. Why is it good? Because it's good. If you truely want to find out why it's so good, soak about 300 hours in, and as soon as you know... you'll know.
Potato With Boobs;-;IDK i just the best game i've ever played
Racer07;-;this game theft my friends, we used to play a lot of video games, now they only play dota 2
Killer3000PL;-;Best way to learn russian language
1000boa;-;The best game in the whole world!
Your Father;-;A great game if you really love MOBA's. It has a steep learning curve, a mean community and a lot of delay; but for some reason, i like it! It's fun, addictive, and challenging. But i'd still choose Heroes of Newerth over this.
**TG** | Goose | Road to knife;-;This game is truly amazing! You will have to stick with it for about 10 games before you begin to like it but afterwards it is a hardcore stratergy game, where you will have to work with your team if you have any hope for victory. I know from personal experience that once you have gotten into the game you just want to play more and with the new updates dota has really progressed and delivered a full fun game for everyone to play.
Chiyo;-;Doto is a game where you sit down with your kappachino mute the cykas and procede to feed until you flame you noob team who are obviously below the reddit average of 9k mmr. MORE SERIOUSLY : dota is a game where each team consisting of 5 different hero picks battle against each other with the ultimate goal of destroying the others base. There are 3 routes to the base each of which is protected by several towers which along with the help of your team and creep waves can be destroyed. Each hero can buy different items and has various different skills to provide entertaining replayable games to all levels of players. WOULD RECOMMEND 10/10
Cloud;-;DOTA 2 is the best online multiplayer game ever. But beware, the community is cancerous...
<FeG>Space Created Boys (MNI)...;-;is a great game to play and deserve great reviews and hope moar amazing featres keep coming out valve keep up the good work
OD.Poseidon;-;This makes me angry. Dota 2 is not updating. It tells me it's out of date while in-game and when I'm in my library, it says it doesn't need an update. Help me...
Office Llama;-;Well first off, the game is a brilliant, complicated mix of stra- Made me a racist 10/10
Majestic;-;Very crappy matchmaking. Opponents too OP. Bad graphics. No first person view. Long loading screens. Unpolite and awfuly rude teammates that call you in many bad names. Even my grandma's toaster has a better frame rate and It also makes you crunchy bread. Heroe's are called just like pornstars, for example - Queen of pain, Crystal maiden, Bounty hunter, Silencer, Witch doctor. Or just sounds a little bit too homosexual - Lone druid, Razor, Batrider, Nature's prophet, Beastmaster and Tiny. Last, but not least is MAGNUS. This hero does not only wield a name that`s destined for a huge , but his horn also looks like one too. Sadly, heroes appearance is also poor. Meepo looks lika a rabbit that smokes weed before every round. IO is just a light bulb. Kunkka is the Heihachi Mishima from Tekken. Morphiling is just water. I think Sven and Juggernaut are twins. Storm spirit looks like an avarage asian man, only he loves drinking energy drinks and watching tentacle porn too often. Nature's prophet cannot even smell flowers because he has no possesion of a nose. Ogre magi has the nicest . He/they beat even cuties like Mirana and Windranger. Faceless void? Let's just call him Eyeless d*ckhead. All females look... let's just say - pretty bangable. Annddddd..... Magnus. Name says It all. Lastly I`d like to say that all maps are identical which makes game boring after a while and game's ending is too predictable. All items that I buy always disappear starting the next round and I hate when games don't have easter eggs or other skins for characters. If you have read this until the end, listen to me, listen to the voice of reason, turn off the computer, go outside and discover all the things the world can give to you. If you don't, well, welcome to the dota nation.
1000boa;-;The best game in the whole world!
Hollow;-;The most addicting game you will ever play. 9.0/10
[OKW] Fegelein;-;It have the worst Community, avoid at all cost also latin americans are everywhere even if you set your language preference to english. 0/10 would end up hearing a Latin american ing about how do i play.
Claudiu;-;much russians.
Po;-;Great Game!
Potato With Boobs;-;IDK i just the best game i've ever played
Killer3000PL;-;Best way to learn russian language
Dragonborn Z;-;Find a new reason to use google translate such as, telling a sniper to sell his helm in pinoy. 10/10
Racer07;-;this game theft my friends, we used to play a lot of video games, now they only play dota 2
Silly Bear;-;Possibly the deepest game in existence. Knowledge is power.
Fabian De Mourinho Pepe;-;Literally ruined my life. 5 stars.
Darr;-;Yes. Awsome game that gonna bring us all down one day.
WonderKidBilly;-;Made me extremely racist, ruined my school life by causes me to play Dota and not do my homework, ruined my social life, my girlfriend broke up with me because of not texting her (due to Dota), and my parents think I cut myself in my room because I am up in my room playing Dota to often. 10/10.
moot;-;Dota 2 is a very intensive video game that is just as good as League of Legends, although it is somewhat lacking in it's misogynistic protrayal of women, where all the female heroes are highly sexualized and often oppressed by the patriarchal standards of the game. There is only one strong female character (both metaphorically and literally), named "Legion Commander", and even she is highly sexualized and often the target of pornographic parodies. Although they are perfectly equal in the terms of gameplay, Valve has quite a ways to go before they reach the same plethora of well-characterized and non-sexualized female characters as Riot Games managed to do in League of Legends. Therefore, although the game is reasonably fun, I cannot honestly recommend it to any mature gamers out there.
P Bin Tin Sinh;-;EPIC ! That's all !
Julian Assange;-;I shouted at my screen and broke it and now I can't play
Zz-Vanguard-zZ;-;DO NOT PLAY THIS GAME It WILL Ruin Your Life 9/10
SirRon;-;25 hours/day wasnt enough for me to play this game!
Inside Job;-;If you wish to learn russian quickly, turn to no other programme than Dota 2. Unintentionally valve have came up with a brilliant tool to comprehend the angry sort of russian language for example ''. Before trying a michael thomas or rossetta stone course consider dota for your soviet language learning experience. 'Thanks, and have fun' ~Gabe Newell Now to be serious... Dota is extremely difficult to get your head around. To start, if you are new to moba's, you will be lost and somewhat overwhelmed by the gameplay. But as you advance in skill level and playing against rivals similar levels to you, you then realise how fun the game is. You will get raged at and you will fail, but that is whole point of improving. Dota is brilliant.
America is good!;-;If you don't have it you are an idiot
aNeR`EnAj;-;Frankly and honestly !! Dota 2 is awesome and great to play but one thing i disliked is about the steam wallet , i already add a minimum fund to my steam wallet and purchased a item on market , the thing i disliked is that you can`t withdraw your steam wallet money back to your paypal account or credit card , i think its unfair .. what will happen if i got a big steam wallet fund in the future by selling some items i get from a game that i played hard ? how can i withdraw my money to my paypal or credit card ?
Inazuma;-;DotA 2 has a huge fan base. It is a great game with many customize features to heroes in-game. Ever since the original DotA map from Warcraft 3; it has made a huge come back in terms of graphics, and gameplay in DotA 2. I'd recommend this game in a heartbeat to those who love moba games.
Mark;-;Play 5 games, and you'll love it forever. Complex and challenging, you'll never feel like you have mastered this game. The attention to detail is also great, the graphics or heroe talk line makes the game so much more immersive. On of the best multiplayer games I have ever played.
Wha??;-;An Educational game that teaches and develops the required skills that was needed during much earlier times. Based on true historical facts Dota 2 has given the player unique heroes throughout history so that the player is able to get an understanding of life in the early 1900's. Dota 2 also allows player to see the true horrors of war and allows them to get deep into the bloodshed so that they are able to learn about the true terrors when facing war, it also helps the player develop their own strategies when in combat so that when the day comes they are battle ready and won't go down without a fight. Not only is Dota 2 a historical game about combat but it also shows an indepth field of dedication. This allows the player to not just learn about dedication whilst seeing their characters dedicated to their job so much so that they will kill themselves many times for a kill, but also the player may also himself use his new skill of dedication upon the game itself. After many years of dedication he may enter tournaments within the game and develop new skills like; Teamwork, Compassion, Bravery and even Empathy. So not only is Dota 2 a historical game but it teaches the player unique skills for living day by day. This is trully a master game and it cannot be compared against any other games of its Genre. #Dota2 #History #LifeSkills #10/10
TREX 3000;-;yeah this game is in wild aye so many nights played whilst coned. would recomend to all me mates like so ing good aye. keep it real dota
DickPunchDark;-;One of my favorite games ever!
TomKu$h /~/;-;Dota 2 Is literally one of the best games I have ever played! I give the game 8/10 because It can be really hard at the beginning If you dont have anyone telling you how to play it. Dota 2 has about the same type of game as League of Legends, but I like Dota 2 much better because its more real-life. LoL (League of Legends) Is almost the same just with comic book look alike textures and more champions.. If you dont agree with me, then thumbs down. Your choice! If you want to play a mmo/rpg game, that has AWESOME and AMAZING textures you should definately download this game right now! Be sure to thumbs up if you agree or this made you wanna play it!
LON;-;yes i definetly recommend this game so much
emphatiK;-;Much better then League of Legends. This is coming from someone who played LoL since beta up until 6 months ago. Dota 2 shines above other games in the genre for these reasons; 1. Hero versatility 2. Learning curve is steeper but more rewarding 3. Games snowball less, but if they do its for the RIGHT reasons. 4. Games are less likely to be decided early therefore there is always plenty of time for a comeback. Overall, the game is much more rewarding for someone who is starting out in this genre, HIGHLY RECOMMENDED!
ted the hat;-;I dont like the Russian People and the Spanish People, but the game is fine!
J@CksTyLe;-;Dota 2 is a Moba (Multiplayer online battle arena) game from Valve, in which you control one hero in an online 5vs5 game. Dota had its beginning in the beloved Game "Warcraft3" as a modificated Map. Dota 2 is hard to understand, especially at the beginning u have much to learn. But when you play a few matches and you start understanding the heroes and game mechanics, you will fall in love with this game. It's also free to play, so just try it. :)
Whiskey Dingo;-;This game focuses on the diverse relationships between different cultures and nationalities in a way that no other game can can. After playing DOTA 2, you should understand the following: - Every other country is a  - If you don't speak english you're a  - If you speak english you're a  - Your country is a  After you understand these concepts you should fully realize the complex nature of this game and learn to hate 99% of the world's population. 8/10 better than LoL
arn #RattPack;-;This is one of the most educational games in my life it thought so many languages i have recently learned this word called  and tang inamo
.|Gambit.._;-;Nice Game ... Friendly Team
Dazzle, The Priest;-;the best game ever :)
UnknownKnown;-;Dota is strategy game where 10 players pick a hero and fight. Fight to win and make other 9 players lose. Ironically there are only two sides of conflict, but you will have to mange- it's all out war there and war don't take prisioners. At the end of day, after games full of hate, rage, feed, brain scarcity, RUSSIA SUPREMACY, birth defects and your own shortcomings, you will notice no one is a winner and text at the end of the game "RADIANT/DIRE VICTORY" give you only as much as few points of MMR, a hollow rating feeding only your ego. For that Dota2 would be perfect for any anti-war commercials, pointing at the end that "In war, there is no winner". But for nolives like us it doesn't matter, all we need is our own ego and MMR so we fight, fight those other 9 players and hope, hope we will see that side we are with wins, hope that our MMR will reach as high as our ego, hope that other 9 players will die from cancer or other painfull diseases. Every match. Every day. Ruins life and everything else. 10/10
~juragan PENTOL~;-;best game ever in my life
l.hiver;-;100% LEGITIMATE SPORT!
cunt;-;9/10 brity gud
Antiskie;-;Years playing good (Y)
KeZz;-;10 out of 10 , but u can't see the sky :((
May Tha Cage Be With Ya!;-;Dota 2 is a great MOBA game just like HoN or LoL. It is not easy to master as LoL and not hard as HoN. In the game you dont buy skins like in the other 2 instead you buy and get items to complete sets to the different heroes. There is 2 different sides (Radiant and Dire) and 3 classes of heroes (Strength, Agility and Intellegens) but the system to get attackdamage is different in Dota2. Strength-Heroes get AD from having Strength and Agility from Agility and so on. But afterall is Dota 2 a great game 10/10!
Super Hentai Grab Bag;-;don't ever play this game
Jon Snow;-;One of the best games :D
MALCOM XXX;-;This game is the reason why my family is still alive today.
xKr;-;Causes depression and suicide thoughts. 10/10.
brazila;-;Clssico, pico. Best game of my life.
M;-;A game that deserves the greatness that it has reached.
Archer762;-;Better russian teacher then any school has to offer
Majigly (2+2);-;Not the friendliest community, because it is expected that you learn quick or have some experience from doing a pre-homework before playing. It is not p2w, which I like, and you have a lot of heroes to choose from to play, not needing to unlock them as they all are unlocked already from the start. Recommended to play with a pre-made team.
Starlight DPS;-;if ur life boring.. just play dota 2..
Abiji;-;UNBALANCED AS HELL ... DO NOT PLAY IT
No Russian;-;game. Don't play or your life will be crashed.
shin_velcro;-;Would be great with out the asshat's of a rubbish community.
fmg;-;This game is good, but the community is bad. Trashtalker, bad-mouth, so much hate to beginner, and everyone seems eager to report other player for just misclick. You can report trashtalker and bad-mouth anytime, but it seems not everyone care about that. There is no age-restriction too(as far as i know). I think valve should do something about age restriction, so a children will not have his mind poisoned by bad community of dota2. I am not generalizing, and i admit there is also good player with good manner and nice people who play dota2. But still, the number of bad player overwhelmingly outnumbered good player. In summary, this game is good but the community is roughly bad.
Yoke;-;Full of kids.
Derp Derp;-;Worst gaming community in all of the gaming industry
Udderly;-;Caused me to stay up til 1:30 so I was starving, So I made cookies. but fell asleep and they turned into charcoal and stunk up the house. 10/10 EDIT: I now ask for tangos at resturaunts. 11/10 EDIT 2: Trees dont taste good, but I started  leaves. Thats a plus. 11+/10
LoLiPoP;-;my favourite game....
junior_painkiller;-;give me my life back
b0ss Punucapa;-;Puros weones jugando dota. Wena men Steve Gomez. New york Times 2013
synergy-hf-;-;Ruined my life. 9/10
Delak;-;A terrible game that will ruin your life.
Mojo;-;Way too many Russians and Chests. Also I don't think it'll mattress what I say in this review. I only want to complete the steam task anyway. Don't play DotA. It's addictive.
Big Dick Alert;-;This game makes me want to live in Bangladesh
Raspberry;-;The best game ever!!!
back this weekend;-;Makes you realize most of your friends weaknesses and strengths, and how to work with that. Also teaches you valuable life skills as you play a game about russians and peruvians. 10/10 Made me say "Praise Charles Barkley"
Jasem;-;Really nice game with good graphics. You're going to like this if you like strategy games and DotA 1
SE SASA SE SASA;-;Ruin my life and studies. 10/10 best game
blaze;-;MOTHERIN IG LOST NO NO INGINGTTT IG MOTHERING LOST NO DONT TOUCH THIS GAME ING EVER DOUCHENOZZLE  CUNTASS
Flare;-;Dota 2, where we have horrible communication with Russians on the US East servers
Dustyfoxbob;-;This game may cause severe Electric-Boogaloos.
TypowyIwan [Zawada];-;Watching russians trying to comunicate with other nations are just f****** hilarious 10/10
Miranda TRD;-;It's fun and Interesting game. All gamers should playing this DOTA 2
-Arx-;-;10/10 - Don't waste money on that Rosetta Stone software if you want to learn Russian - just play Dota.
Yukinoshita;-;this game is best and interesting
kryptosss;-;this is the best game i ever played
Crescent;-;Nice game
DoCTor;-;Epic game.. But need to Divide SE Asia region please to many people in 6 servers in SEasia... And Pillipines should be given a server please can't handle this pinoy kids...... Sorry But Its the Truth......
V;-;pit of hell, once u fell on it there is no exit
WASDragon;-;PLUSES: + A lot of kinds of heroes + Very interesting game, if your teammates and enemies are normal people MINUSES: - There is only 1 map - Players with abusive nicknames (often russian,turkish and a few american players' nicknames) - I like Demigod more than DotA 2. Because, this game type used by Demigod at first time. - There are not achievements! Reason: Everyone speak about this game and I bored and tried this game.
Bunion;-;Look at my in game hours. Yes, it's good.
TheCarrotGuy;-;Awesome. This ing game is so damn ing perfect. TY VOLVO
Bassachii -Travelling Japon-;-;As much as I only have 20 hours on this game, There isnt much to talk about. The game is addicting as  and can ruin your life if you dont control it. Its the same game over and over again. Two sides, the same map, same defences and ancients. The sounds, graphics, and game play is just awsome. However, I do find the community to suck alot. I do not have a problem with the Russians but my problem is most of the people who do speak English are the most whiny  people and report if you dont do as they say. Then theres the unfair system of the penalty pool. The fact that one can get reported with no evidence and suffer longer waiting times and ier . In conclusion, I recomend people to play this game with a group of friends, maybe time to time random servers but be careful that this game wont ruin your life.
Kousei Arima;-;Its addicting.
ChLoe;-;h e CAl LED me 'BRO" and thEn SaiD " RE KT"
Rainbows;-;This game is really only fun when you know how to play but I like :)
Kizoky;-;Dota 2. The sequel to the great dotA. I highly recommend this if you are a big MOBA fan. Fantastic music, voice acting, game balance, and much more. If you are new to MOBA, I'm not gonna say it to not play it, but you could give it a try. Bad things: Russians are everywhere. Even in Europe West, East, US East, West, they are everywhere, even if they have their own matchmaking server. They will call you a  for feeding, which is not exactly true, because they are not defending you. "pls report *insert hero name here*" The report system. It is so bad, they can even report you for nothing. For example, if you didn't said anything in the game, nor said bad words, they can report you for nothing. They can even report you if you have truth about "this" and "that, they will still report you, unfairly. And VALVe, unfortunatly, will NEVER check the Replay. Good things: They changed the abandon system. Instead of hours and days, they will give you games to finish it, to be removen from the abandon pool. Customizable heroes. You can give em' hats, wards, weapons, just like in Team Fortress 2. Game events. Frostivus, Greeviling, Diretide, Wraith-Night.... You HAVE to try this game. It has daily 500k people playing this game.
Pickle the Super Saying;-;Many Beandips and other minorities 6/10 might play again
Annoying Game Player;-;Family, Dota, Honor House Tusk
OHDAE-SU;-;the community is sick u got all the players -dark seer shouting in vc scared of getting fingered by lion -visage's voice breaking, singing while accidentally dominating lane -lich laughing in vc while she saves for divine -witchdoctor impersonating his hero -in feeder -PUTANG INA BOBO -  - community sick
________;-;Community with toxicity levels rivaling the other horrible competitive games out there. Avoid it unless your Warcraft 3 nostalgia is a large as your tolerance for Humanity's pettiest of creatures. Nice people do play the game, but they are overshadowed by the far-larger "variety of unmedicated disorders" that plague the gamer community as a whole. What's worse is Valve has three cash cow micropayment fests now, and they don't look to be dissuaded from that. They've hidden it so well since they're price-tagging "holier than thou satisfaction" (percieved social status through cosmetics) rather than skill-removing or advantage giving items. it's holding art assets to ransom instead of code. I don't want to have to pay USD$2.49 to unlock the orange HEV suit skin or "classic" crowbar reskin some day.
Zubub;-;Very good for a Free to Play MOBA. They semi recently they added a training mode that will cover some of the important basics (wish they would add more to it) which will give you a great starting point for this game when playing real people. While MOBA's are known to be populated with toxic players, I've only met a tiny portion of players that would fit this description. Give it a go it won't cost you anything but a bit of time.
DFM;-;Initially I more often play other games. I was a bit dubious call my friend to play DOTA 2, because I have never played before battle arena game strategy. but never expected to play DOTA 2 so fun. unity, cooperation, caring, etc with graphics that support and animation that is not inferior to other games make DOTA 2 is better than the first game ( Defend of the Ancient by BLIZZARD ENTERTAIMENT )
NoGood;-;Best MOBA ever. Since Valve took Dota from Blizzard and WC3 and turned it to something brand new, it reached new heights and it keeps on climbing.
Coldmon;-;Not for noobs
Mladen;-;It is an evil game.
You&The6;-;Extremely fun game! The try hard Russians are a pain but still fun
Archer762;-;Better russian teacher then any school has to offer
aNeR`EnAj;-;Frankly and honestly !! Dota 2 is awesome and great to play but one thing i disliked is about the steam wallet , i already add a minimum fund to my steam wallet and purchased a item on market , the thing i disliked is that you can`t withdraw your steam wallet money back to your paypal account or credit card , i think its unfair .. what will happen if i got a big steam wallet fund in the future by selling some items i get from a game that i played hard ? how can i withdraw my money to my paypal or credit card ?
Inazuma;-;DotA 2 has a huge fan base. It is a great game with many customize features to heroes in-game. Ever since the original DotA map from Warcraft 3; it has made a huge come back in terms of graphics, and gameplay in DotA 2. I'd recommend this game in a heartbeat to those who love moba games.
Wha??;-;An Educational game that teaches and develops the required skills that was needed during much earlier times. Based on true historical facts Dota 2 has given the player unique heroes throughout history so that the player is able to get an understanding of life in the early 1900's. Dota 2 also allows player to see the true horrors of war and allows them to get deep into the bloodshed so that they are able to learn about the true terrors when facing war, it also helps the player develop their own strategies when in combat so that when the day comes they are battle ready and won't go down without a fight. Not only is Dota 2 a historical game about combat but it also shows an indepth field of dedication. This allows the player to not just learn about dedication whilst seeing their characters dedicated to their job so much so that they will kill themselves many times for a kill, but also the player may also himself use his new skill of dedication upon the game itself. After many years of dedication he may enter tournaments within the game and develop new skills like; Teamwork, Compassion, Bravery and even Empathy. So not only is Dota 2 a historical game but it teaches the player unique skills for living day by day. This is trully a master game and it cannot be compared against any other games of its Genre. #Dota2 #History #LifeSkills #10/10
SirRon;-;25 hours/day wasnt enough for me to play this game!
emphatiK;-;Much better then League of Legends. This is coming from someone who played LoL since beta up until 6 months ago. Dota 2 shines above other games in the genre for these reasons; 1. Hero versatility 2. Learning curve is steeper but more rewarding 3. Games snowball less, but if they do its for the RIGHT reasons. 4. Games are less likely to be decided early therefore there is always plenty of time for a comeback. Overall, the game is much more rewarding for someone who is starting out in this genre, HIGHLY RECOMMENDED!
Yukinoshita;-;this game is best and interesting
kryptosss;-;this is the best game i ever played
-Arx-;-;10/10 - Don't waste money on that Rosetta Stone software if you want to learn Russian - just play Dota.
Rainbows;-;This game is really only fun when you know how to play but I like :)
TomKu$h /~/;-;Dota 2 Is literally one of the best games I have ever played! I give the game 8/10 because It can be really hard at the beginning If you dont have anyone telling you how to play it. Dota 2 has about the same type of game as League of Legends, but I like Dota 2 much better because its more real-life. LoL (League of Legends) Is almost the same just with comic book look alike textures and more champions.. If you dont agree with me, then thumbs down. Your choice! If you want to play a mmo/rpg game, that has AWESOME and AMAZING textures you should definately download this game right now! Be sure to thumbs up if you agree or this made you wanna play it!
Plausibly;-;It's okay. I accidentally some hours on it
CappyDH;-;I played a little bit it. I enjoyed. 10/10 will play again.
Toto;-;this game ruined my life... 10/10
Kio;-;Don't ever play this game. You will be addicted
et3rnalsunshine;-;Don't play this game!
SNF.LeFantabulouso;-;Pudge is too ing OP. Valve plz nerf.
Alex Martini M A L E X;-;Dota2 is Good But if u like this kind of game go and play "Warcraft III The Frozen Throne " or World Of Warcraft. :D
2849/3417;-;Ruins my life 25/10
Taeyon;-;wow this game very2 good
go.Ez";-;Free To PLay
[MLG] Yu-gi-oh;-;Report Riki, Invi and Backstab are Op. Report Crystal Maiden, She is not warding, and this is not OP Report Pugna ,Wards are Op , Report Queen of Pain, Boobs are Op Report Pudge , Rot is Op , Report Tinker, Lazors are Op Report Kunkka , TideBringer is Op, Report Enigma, Black Hole is Op Report Juggernaut, Ulti is Op, Report Shopkeeper, Prices are Op Report Doom, Doom is Op, Report Roshan, Cheese and Aegis are Op Report Andy Mage, magic suxs Doto 2, The Best Report/Rage/Feed Simulator in the Game market. Also, Don't forget the russians, They are everywhere
Cocomunches;-;Clearly a poor attempt at marketing towards the LoL consumers, this game copies every aspect of LoL, along with adding crappy new elements such as killing your own minions and towers which is dumb, stupid donkeys (obvious videogamedunkey refrence towards LoL players to better suit them) instead of recall, and is super hard. This game sucks because you automatically get every champion and they are all confusing other than sniper which has to be the most skilled champion in this copy cat of a game. Do not play this game, play LoL 11/10
DOGEL;-;wow you can't even jump in this game, i dont understand people tell me  and jaja
Howdy!;-;10/10 Best Game of The Decade would  a chicken to have  in watermelon and the  obama's grandmother to actully be able to play more dota2 in the afternoon right after #4:20 blaze it time... I would recommend this game to all porn stars incloding the tree in-front of my house. If you are dog, i recommend not to you and if you are cat eat a potatoe. This gmae is for MLG quickscopers who like to maturbate with a bucket. If you cannot suck a  the size of a walnut go eat more tomatoes, beause china does not exist... Playing dota2 is like eating a raw egg. tasty but you will get salmonella. So please play this game... i need more people to be noobs so i can ing  on face. If you do not like  on face go home to your weed. from dear friend, Morgan Freeman
VITAS;-;,    ,     . Please raise money for my new charity that helps poor Russians find the way to server they have been looking for.
The AIDS Giraffe;-;this game is for nerds
Artyom <3 Jazz;-;Playing dota 6 years, played in one bunker, and I am pleased with this game, I recommend to everyone.
Charmeleon;-;Only get it if you have friends to play it, if you don't. Don't get it.
xXx$CUB_D3$TROY3RxXx;-;govno suka blyad' 10/10 2k hours worth it
Over the rainbow;-;Dota2 made me addicted =x=~ i cant stop playing it T^T
Pryke;-;learned Russian , English language in 1000 hours . 10/10
VeCo;-;i LOVE this game.. ^^
Xetas;-;Best Russian Simulator out there, best way to learn basic and advanced russian. 11/10 would learn again!
Jean-Luc Bernard;-;Putin approves!
Pattydahmer;-;It is a very funny game
Kocyra;-;If you want to learn Russian, play this game.  !
Mystogan;-;Truly great
Throne;-;i really enjoyed this game. make sure you all play this!:)
Blitz;-;"gg ff report team" But seriously, pretty fun game if you have a party of friends.
9u34L4Y63uTD;-;Thank you for playing !!
Gilgamesh;-;I recommend Dota 2 because its fun and its the originator of the MOBA genre. Still, there are some bugs that need to be fixed desperately but its a really fun game to play with your friends.
KennyL(uki);-;Graphics: + detailed heroes + nice animation and effects + living setting - blured textures Balance: + very good hero balance + video tutorials for beginners + train with KI - very hard for beginners Game Size: + currently 108 heroes + over 120 items + many tactics - only 1 map Sound: + diverse hero sounds + nice music + nice battle sounds + 7.1 surround Language: + learn easy different languages (russian, spain etc.) :) Welcome to Dota 2! They say, before concluding with, You suck. They're not wrong: for the first dozen hours or so, you'll be bombarded with too much information and an often unforgiving community of extremely competitive players. But if you persevere, Dota 2 becomes one of the most rewarding and tense team-based multiplayer experiences anywhere in gaming. A fantastic free-to-play model. Dota 2 has become notorious even among its MOBA peers for its difficulty  and thats totally justified. Its a double-edged sword that leads to both a terrifying introduction and a world-class game at the highest levels. You should not expect to have fun your first day playing... or even your first week, maybe months. Dota 2 is a deeply layered construct of systems, and to survive you need to understand every single one and how they interact with one another. Everything from learning to work as a member of a coordinated team to the counter-intuitive practice of killing your own AI units to deny the enemy experience points and gold theyd get from doing it themselves, and understanding the effects of hundreds of abilities like Bloodseekers Rupture (which deals huge damage with every step you take) is a big barrier to entry. Even figuring out which of the 108 heroes fits you best is a time-consuming challenge. Your learning has just begun when you've settled on what roles, heroes, and builds suit you best  you also have to adapt based on what other players choose. If the other team plays a Riki, you need to compensate with an emphasis on detection. Go up against Bloodseeker and his hideously powerful Rupture will force you to carry around a Town Portal Scroll to get home. Shop System: Only cosmetic enhancements, almost all of which are created by the community. Tournament goodies (such as tickets for viewing live events) are for sale. Theres not a single paid on the in-game balance, and thats great! In short words: Dota 2 pits two teams of five players against each other. mix of strategy and RPG, skill management and tactical gameplay. 108 heroes, each with their own style and combat abilities. most heroes have 4 skills that can be increased in power by levelling up by killing enemys. there are over 120 items to choose from within each game, each with their own ways to power up your stats and active abilities. creeps that charge down the game's three lanes, and the player controlled heroes on the opposite team. Theres a huge time investment before you can enjoy a game. it creates a playing field where skill and teamplay is top priority. the best DotA game. many heroes, items and a great balance. Thanks for reading! If you Like my Review, give me a Thumbs up in Steam (not the youtube video). I make this for the Community and your help is greatly appreciated :)
Zip Zap;-;it's nice. i like this game. it's interesting
Reid;-;Nice graphic and high quality visual Teamwork Strategy Game.
Melvins;-;If you wanna call into work and wonder why your paycheck is so short, lose friends, get smelly, get fat off of all of the pizza you'll order, and reek of addiction and frustration, download this game! It wouldn't be your first dumb choice in life other than reading this review.
winging Pendulum;-;One of the best MOBA games. Just check my hours :P
nubieabadi;-;Well, i rarely play this game but it's good so far. Gotta get more play time to fully review this game.
527;-;This game is the greatest thing that happened to me. It takes 5-10hrs of my time everyday, I can say that playing dota 2 changed my life in a way that I kinda lost my social life but that good thing about it is I get to meet alot of new friends online. I dont know what will happen to my 2-3 years from now because I'm already wasted almost a year of my life. Thanks Dota2
STIFLeR;-;This game is awesome. This game will develop your talent on how to involve in making a teamwork. This game will also help you to how to be friendly and this game is enjoyable.
ANNE;-;I like everything in this game, cant say a thing. I recommend this game for all Dota players, this is more enjoying than playing Dota 1 online. I love this game so much.
IHateThatILoveYOu;-;it is very nice game
[RoN]Deaddex35;-;This game is a hit or miss you love it or you dont if you love this game awesome lets play if not there is always league.
NotInLoveJustOnDrugs.;-;Better than LoL that is for nooby 10 yr olds. Great graphics, quite hard but really fun to play.
The New Age;-;I used to play this game in order to clear my mind and relax from playing League of Legends but now it's exactly the opposite. Very addictive game, loads of fun, coming from someone with a fair amount of experience in MOBAs. Loads of heroes to choose from (all free to use with purchasable skins), tons of items and possible item builds, some nice workshop content and a lot of support from the community. Community overall is not perfect but you will never find a "perfect" gaming community. I recommend this game to people who enjoy playing battle arena games and remember: you're playing for fun, not to win.
Diana.Nova;-;DONT PLAY THIS GAME EVER.  BLYAT DAVAI HARUSH TANGINA BOBO 11/10. would abandon again.
Colebalt;-;Great game but there is a huge learning curve. If you want to play this game I highly suggest you do it with friends, but if you want to do it solo make sure to have a thick skin cause the comunity is about as friendly to newcomers as a cactus. Still, if you get past the learning curve and the prickly community be ready to enjoy hundreds of hours of the best multiplayer experience you will ever have.
`4yb;-;This is just super game.
ZA WARUDO;-;i hate this game like seriously i hate all of this like i have learned to hate things i cannot understand, peoples i have never met, and emotions ive never know to feel before i playd this game. its like learning just to fail. it tests the limits of humanity in a philosphical way that degrades the mind, and stamps on the soul. why did i ever play this? why did i particpate and ignore the warnings of others and sink all this time into this madness? This game is like your crush continuosly telling you she doesnt like you and slowly pushing you out of his or her life. This review says i have around 400 hours of gameplay. But you dont understand, every one hour of stress is about 5 more hours and self hate, loathing, and mass sprits of depression man this stinks
Aedando;-;BETTER THAN ROSETTA STONE AND DRAGON COMBINED. THE PREMIER LANGUAGE LEARNING GAME OUT THERE. LEARN SPANISH, PORTUGUESE, CHINESE, KOREAN, RUSSIAN, AND FILIPINO FOR THE LOW PRICE OF FREE*. *AND YOUR SANITY
Guts;-;This is a game where you can  your pants in the middle of a game and continue playing without noticing 11/10
ThomasDaCat>;-;play in EU servers? prepare for those guys that came JUST TO HAVE FUN, but not to win play in RU servers? do you know where is your mom now? hey you! dont play this game. make DOTA community cleaner.
Get REKT!;-;dota is good game and its free
theoretical kat;-;please don't ever play this
Schavlik;-;This game sucks. Don't play
Phantom;-;DOTA 2 is amazing. One of the best MOBA around. It needs a lot of practice to be mastered, but if you play MOBAs, then it is for you. 8.5/10
[TCUP!];-;Really awesome. Totally addictive. A little strange at first from DOTA 1, But well worth it. ICEFROG has done a great job with keeping DOTA 1 up to scratch with DOTA 2, so was an easier transition than would have otherwise been. Great job DOTA 2 and VALVE team. Love it. Keep up the great work.
theconjuring;-;addiction
kler;-;i really like dota :) but dont like the new updates -_-
Zico_Odeh;-;It's Amazing And Great Game ,.,.,. If U Try It U Will Never Leave It ,.,..........
Anarchist;-;After 3k hours of headaches and constant complaining. After a 11 game losing streak. After thousands of 1 week communication bans. After millions of false reports for not being able to talk and aquiring low priority. After constant harrassment from teamates. I recommend you uninstall this  game already. Thanks.
Exorcism;-;I played for 2000Hours.I learned so much language from SEA country like phil,spore etc.
toasted rye bread;-;game full of nerds with asberger's
Fishenkko;-;ing carries asking me to buy wards and  when they dont even give me last hits. 10/10
ez katka #HappyEid;-;The best RTS game ever !! U GUYS SHOULD HAVE IT !!!!!
Pur3 B4nts;-;A game with an amazing community which never fails to blame everybody else when they make mistakes. Dota teaches a variety of different languages including the infamous Russian, which teaches players to despise anybody who does not speak English as their first language. As well as being multicultural, the dota 2 matchmaking is just phenomenal. It always ensures you are put with first class Russian feeders, which really improves the gameplay as it allows you to be unable to play a game of dota without experiencing the variety of different 'styles of play' that this game offers to the community. As a whole this game encourages suicidal thoughts, rage and possible brain hemorrhages and/or heart attacks. 10/10 would uninstal, then reinstal. 11 vodkas  cyka blyat mid or fid
Chiablo;-;This game will consume you and ruin your life. 10 out of 10.
Anaalisankari;-;When i started playing, i noticed there is a lot of russians... Bit by bit those monsters started to  my brains. After a while  got used to . They started calling me   . I think  . Then i started to    . Now   . I        .. Please  ..
Zippy01;-;Very addictive. But is very stressful. 7/10
AnalCentipede;-;I don't think I'm having fun, but I keep playing anyway. Help me.
ENND;-;One of Best Game in the World | DOTA. Thanks Valve, Thanks Steam
Tonto;-;This game is like an abusive spouse. " BLYAT!" It screams at you as it beats you over the head with a 7 loss streak. But then it gives you the best experience ever as you go 27/0 in your next game. You play for thos games. Even though ninety percent of the time all it gives you is the beating and the screaming in the foreign language, and you swear you'll leave forever. But then you go back and look at the game, think of all the fun times you had, your inventory filled with rares, and the glorious games where you frickin' stomp. Then you think, "Awww I could never leave you," and you're back with the scary screaming like the little  you are. And the cycle repeats itself. I ing hate this game. 10/10 would recommend every day.
Giantyogurt;-;I don't know how to play this game due to the longer than average (that's what she....) learning curve, but if you get past that this game is a heck of a lot of fun
Thomas the Dank Engine;-;I've lost all my friends, my family has abandoned me and I am highly overweight. All because of a Free to Play game called Dota 2. Dota 2 is filled with angry Russians and nobody seems to speak English. I have wasted my life on this game and....I regret nothing. 10/10!!!!
Nightmare Foxy;-;This game sucks.
Qynchou;-;A freshly released new MOBA game thats currently the most played game on steam- Dota 2. A sequel to its great successor - Defense of the Ancients. A wide variety of dedicated server selection by regions will merely make a difference as the game is flooded with russians. Oh, you thought you had it bad at HoN or LoL? Prepare to rip your balls off when you realize that on US servers 3 of your teammates are from russia. PRIVET. While you rage at your teammates youll constantly have this feeling at the back of your head - if russians run from russian servers how bad is it there? Pretty god damn bad I assume. If you manage to team up with 4 of your friends the game is quite enjoyable. Wide variety of heroes will constantly keep you entertained aswell as interesting additions to the droppable item pool that allow stat tracking and changing appearances of heroes of your choice in game. A splendid graphics and physics engine makes Dota 2 currently the best game of its genre. 9/10.
Vogiir;-;Ruined my life. Five stars.
Hitlerphant;-;At first the game was ok,a little bit .The community wasn't bad either,I had a lot of  while  with my russian friends.Then it became sort of an ,and I was playing like a mad man.Then it      ,and I was playing with even more  .They aren't as ,   ,but they can ruin the matches .  ,   language,which might ,   ,   .  ,   ,      ,  .
LEE;-;This is all my love! Love u Doto
ArpiZ;-;its more than just addiction
naspooTV;-;Perfect Game :)
Good Serbian Guy;-;Most people think that Dota 2 is about victory, if you ask me it is about FUN. Sometimes it is just vulgar, combative and contradictory. Overflowing with perversion and stupidity, that makes Dota 2 not only the game, but way of life.
Tonto;-;This game is like an abusive spouse. " BLYAT!" It screams at you as it beats you over the head with a 7 loss streak. But then it gives you the best experience ever as you go 27/0 in your next game. You play for thos games. Even though ninety percent of the time all it gives you is the beating and the screaming in the foreign language, and you swear you'll leave forever. But then you go back and look at the game, think of all the fun times you had, your inventory filled with rares, and the glorious games where you frickin' stomp. Then you think, "Awww I could never leave you," and you're back with the scary screaming like the little  you are. And the cycle repeats itself. I ing hate this game. 10/10 would recommend every day.
Qynchou;-;A freshly released new MOBA game thats currently the most played game on steam- Dota 2. A sequel to its great successor - Defense of the Ancients. A wide variety of dedicated server selection by regions will merely make a difference as the game is flooded with russians. Oh, you thought you had it bad at HoN or LoL? Prepare to rip your balls off when you realize that on US servers 3 of your teammates are from russia. PRIVET. While you rage at your teammates youll constantly have this feeling at the back of your head - if russians run from russian servers how bad is it there? Pretty god damn bad I assume. If you manage to team up with 4 of your friends the game is quite enjoyable. Wide variety of heroes will constantly keep you entertained aswell as interesting additions to the droppable item pool that allow stat tracking and changing appearances of heroes of your choice in game. A splendid graphics and physics engine makes Dota 2 currently the best game of its genre. 9/10.
Vogiir;-;Ruined my life. Five stars.
LEE;-;This is all my love! Love u Doto
naspooTV;-;Perfect Game :)
Hitlerphant;-;At first the game was ok,a little bit .The community wasn't bad either,I had a lot of  while  with my russian friends.Then it became sort of an ,and I was playing like a mad man.Then it      ,and I was playing with even more  .They aren't as ,   ,but they can ruin the matches .  ,   language,which might ,   ,   .  ,   ,      ,  .
ArpiZ;-;its more than just addiction
StkE;-;Lost girlfriend, friends, family 10/10
Fraunhofer Diffraction;-;I hope that guys from Valve will burn in hell because of realization of allies and enemies matchmaking
Vladimir Vladimirovich Putin;-;dis gem so bed like not even hon is bad as this game 0/10 go away doota leg of legond 4 liaef
ATA47;-;Exit button? What exit button?
.CoKy Gaming Shop;-;Epic.. Remake From The Best Game By Ice Frog.. LONG LIVE DOTO!!! LONG LIVE VALVE!!! Thx..
[LT] Eagle of Freedom;-;The only thing that can make this game better is an arcana that made Phoenix purple. As Patrick Star once claimed, "I love being purple!"
TheKingPoop;-;After 4 years of playing dota 2...... Pinoys are just the worst.....
-=CG=- Mik;-;The name of the game is Defense Of The Ancients. From every game I played, no one ever defended the ancients. They just sit at the fountain or farm in the jungles. The game's name is very misleading. 0/10 Would not defend ancients.
saran7681;-;first 100 hours......get called noob,feeder and useless after 300 hours.... started to call them noob,feeder and useless great game!!!!
Green_Fanta;-;This game simulates real life. Everyone hates you because you're not sure what's going on and by the time you are able to realize what is, infact, going on, you hate everyone else.
mattjmal9;-;I have played this game for roughly 7-8 hours so i am definitly no pro but from a new persons perspective (noob) i can tell you that Dota 2 is possibly the most addictive and rewarding games you could possibly play, but it can be very rage enducing especially when you are not winning or lose but at the end all of this is what makes it a great game it compells you to get better and want to get better and improve your game and skills to eventually play against human players rather than A.I controlled bots.
RacheLL Bee;-;strategy game that is very full.
WeebJ;-;Review for : Dota 2 Review by : WeebJ Dota 2 is the remake of a MOBA mod that was applied to warcraft 3 frozen throne, it is a mind-challenging teamplay game, that require skills and teamwork. Most of my experience from this game is positive, I prefer to play carry or initiator. As I have played alot of hours on smurf accounts, I have a bit of experience on the ranked and experienced side of the game. The thing that bothers me with ranked match making is that after your calibrating games, you either get into the best mmr possible, or the worst you could ever imagine. Anyways. The best thing with dota is that it always evolves, which means that updates and patches are frequently released to balance the game and the players experience, there are also cosmetic items that are often added with the patch updates. Gameplay consists of different roles in a 5-man team, either you start in the Radiant or Dire team. Support, Offlane, Mid and Carry are a few roles that I recommend you having in almost every dota game. The game itself is about destroying the enemy team's ''Ancient'' which is a giant building located above/below your spawn. The easiest tactic to making you and your team win the match is to make sure your carry gets farm, kills and his/her core items. This is crucial, because if your carry can't farm or has bad farm, it will cripple your team. Without a good carry your team will succumb to the enemies carry, which hopefully in their favor has farmed better or has already completed his/her core items. The offlane role is all about going alone to get experience in the lane which is located at the TOP lane on both sides of the team. This will gain your offlaner early levels and the hero of choice should always have an escape/invisibility ability in his/her ability pool. Having an escape mechanism will keep him/her from panicking and boosting their self-confidence of commiting to their own team and gameplay. The mid-laner is often a ranged hero (but it's normal with melee heroes) or a high damage nuker that is going alone on the middle lane. The mid-laner will be facing a hero of the enemy's choice that will participate in trying to take control of the midlane from you. Popular mid heroes are: Storm Spirit, Ember Spirit, Sniper, Dragon Knight, Lina, Pudge, Death Prophet, Night Stalker, Huskar, Necrophos and more. Heroes like Necrophos, Death Prophet, Storm Spirit and Lina are nukers, which have low-cooldown high-damaging spells in their ability pool. These heroes are the easiest heroes of taking control in the midlane. By using your high-damage low-cooldown spells, the enemy will often retreat from the midlane to seek health and mana regen in their fountain. The midlaner also plays an important role in the ganking scene. Pudge, Storm Spirit, Huskar, Sniper, Ember spirit, Dragon Knight and Lina are gankers, which can sneak away from the midlane to other lanes, where they can help the other laners to gain kills, which will result in an experience and gold boost to your carry/offlaner. The mid-laner should also get a bottle, which they can store important runes in. Runes are special abilities that spawn in form of orbs in the bottom and top of the river in small areas of light. These runes have abilities such as: Haste (Max Movement Speed), Regeneration (Fully Regenerates your HP and Mana), Invisibility (Makes you Invisibile for some time) and Bounty runes, which gives you experience and gold. Runes spawn every 2 minutes of the game and there's a 100 percent chance ONE of them will be a bounty rune. The Carry will often going to lane on the safe lane, which on the radiant side is BOT LANE, and the TOP LANE on the dire side. The Carry should always have a support with him/her, which is a hero that is going to support the Carry through the lane-phase. The Carry needs last hits on creeps (enemy units that spawn every 30th second). With those last hits he will gain gold, ranging from 38-49 gold per last hit. The Carry is a crucial role, and is needed to play with ease and care, mistakes usually result in a permanent mark for your team. If your Carry has succeeded with his farming he is often going to finish his core items in the lategame. Being a support is also a crucial role in the game, as the support is standing for all the wards and the courier in the game. A ward is an item that gives vision of an area where it was placed. If the ward was placed on a higher ground (hilltop or all seeying eyespots) It will gain unobstructed vision, which is also a great thing for your team as you can see the enemy advance or preparing for a gank. The supports ability pool often consists of a stun/disable which is casted upon the enemy. The enemy will then be disabled and cannot move/cast spells during the disable duration. This is an easy way to set up ganks and kills for your Carry. Supports are very squishy, but masters in the teamfights. No crucial items is needed for a support, but I recommend: Force staff, Blink dagger, Wards, Tranquil Boots/Arcane boots, Pipe of Insight and Mekansm. Dota is a game that once again, requires teamplay, tactics and good planning. Always look up a guide on how to play the game correctly, or how to play the current hero you are playing, it always helps. Pros: - Game never gets boring, even though you loose a match, you always get that great sense of ''TODAY I'M GONNA WIN THIS MATCH''. - You can play with your friends in parties up to five. - Combinations of hero picks and playstyle is unending. Cons: - Russians. - Feeders. - Supports without any wards. - Carry players that can't carry. - The feeling of a lost game. When it comes to Russians, the only thing I hate with them is that they believe that everyone in their game speaks Russian. If you don't speak Russian you are a ''gamburger'' which they are referring to you as an American (EVEN THOUGH YOU ARE PLAYING ON EU WEST ETC). They queue on all of the servers, their language preference is all of the languages (chinese, english, russian etc..). They barely listen to their teammates, they believe they are superior to everyone else in the game and if they don't get what they want, they will usually feed or get extremely mad at everyone. A tip from me: Always be nice. Never say a bad word. If someone is flaming, mute them. Keep playing to help your team. And remember to NEVER FLAME BACK. It will usually result in loss of a match, and people are most likely not to listen to flamers, and will just mute you, which results you in being isolated from all communication with your team. Developer : Valve Publisher : Valve Genre : Action, Free to Play, Strategy Released on Steam on 9 jun 2013 I recommend Dota 2 because it is an addictive and fun game to fuel your MOBA needs.
Railfe;-;EPIC! Fastest way to get stress and learn curses in different language. :D
HsNL;-;I can speak russian now :D
Anima Libera (Gone until 21st);-;Why would anyone pay for Rosetta stone when you can just play dota to learn Russian?
grim ricker;-;if u wanna know what it's like to explore the inside of a flaccid , this is the game for u
wolffie;-;This is my second favorite League of Legends I've ever played. Upthumbered.
fugue;-;DotA 2 is your ordinary high school classroom. It has affluent kids who have all the latest hats thinking that pre-cal subjects can be passed with these. Most of the time, they only want to show-off and has no real understanding of the subject. It has absurdly-gifted students (those with high match ratings) who turn into snobs when forced to work with members 'inferior' to them. Little did they know that it is they who serve as role models to their less intelligent mates. A class clown happens to be in the same subject some of the time. These people are so funny that you wish they do not get grouped with you. Air heads who do things repetitively and who seem not to get on the team's conversations. Farm - get killed - respawn (rinse and repeat). Then, the average reasonable dudes. Some of them think too highly of themselves while others have the potential of being your friends. Did i mention ladies? They are not myths. They exist; however, they are as rare as women in engineering classes. If you survived high school, this game is for you. P.S. Ironically, the average age for people playing this game is less than seven. 10/10
Acedia;-;This is a good strategy game which you can have teamwork with someone you don't know!!!
Safety First;-;I got on this game from a professional blind gamer prospective. this game has been hyped by me and it took me a while to get it because my computer was ruined in 9/11. after being  by my doctor my dog drove me to a warehouse where i got get my proper drug supply from the local blacks. upon loading the game up for the first time a ping pong ball fired from Kelly Littlehales steaming  cracked the screen i got covered with gay. 6 months and 9 murder victims later i cockinyourass prayed the gay out and was on my way to master dota. my first game i laid down the law and killed isis i was called by Gabe Newell to star in his upcoming porno, i of course accepted and with my 18 pound walrus  made a name for myself in the porn industry. 9 out of 11 worst part is that i cant jerk off teemo's rat
Seven;-;nice game for all
| JDept.| Zenus *KingGuin;-;Played it once and now i can speak fluent russian. also been converted to communism. IGN 10/10 would play again
Greygrey7;-;I played a match in Us West, I learned russian very quickly 10/10 the new version of rossetta is super effective
Benjamin!;-;to play dota 2 you will need : OS: Windows 7 Processor: Dual core from Intel or AMD at 2.8 GHz Memory: 4 GB RAM Graphics: nVidia GeForce 8600/9600GT, ATI/AMD Radeon HD2600/3600 + ( Russian dictionary )
Raju Rastogi;-;I think its about damn time I wrote a review about my favourite game ever, 1600+ hours in it and here it is. This Game is dope as hell. Never have I spent close to this amount of time in a game before. Brings back some good memories of Warcraft 3 and I feel that I have a special connection to this game. I'm sure anyone else who has tried any of the games in the Warcraft Series would have the same nostalgic feeling that I too have when I play the game. Has a really unique hero collection in which none are OP and every hero counters and gets countered by another hero, making the game much more fair. Furthermore all the characters are free and the only thing you can buy is sets and items to make your hero look much cooler, purchases don't affect the actual hero's stats, thus the game is very fair as compared to other games that I know{Yes I'm talking about LoL(The name says it all, the game is a joke :P)}. I definitely recommend this game to anyone who is perseverant and doesn't quit after getting rekt by Riki, haha. Dota is all about practice and you'll make it there eventually. I know the Dota community can sometimes be very rude and harsh but instead of looking your teammate's comments about you as insults, learn to take it as advice that you can follow in the future, unless he's just a raging kid in which case you just mute him. I hope this review will encourage potential Dota players to try the best game ever created and create your own legacy :3.
Artist-,-;-;Very nyc in playing
Noodle;-;Dota 2 One can only describe the unimaginable complexity that is Dota 2 as you would describe a painful Stitch you sometimes get when exercising for a while. Just like a stitch, Dota 2 only gets better if you keep going and never stop. you musn't stop, you know you cant stop. you may try to stop but you know that if you do you will be forever consume by the inevitable pain and fatigue. You see Dota 2 is not simply a mere game for your enjoyment. Dota 2 is a endless path once you step foot on, will forever lead you to a freight train that delivers false emotion and hope. Crushing dreams and desire. Im afraid your already too late... No turning back now. Dota 2 is a part of you now, sure enough though it will consume you entirely 10/10 would Dota again (help me)
PhixFeiss;-;I do not want to be an anti-Semite but    .
TheBushTickler;-;10/10 Learned Russian in 1 Low Priority match.
Alex Mercer;-;look at my hours played...that shows how much i suffer in this game .I can accept lose but the community is like , not friendly to new players , very hostile ( forgive me for bad english because i type this in rage )
Gamer3214;-;I'll just say no for now. Not too many good first impressions. I'll give it a chance later.
im zack and im back;-;this gayum suxs like my mom on a wendesday aftur nuun with grandmoos  i waste su time much on game that my dad ran away and the libyans took my uranium. Also Russian hurt my slef esteem
Gnomonas;-;Nothing has improved (gameplay wise) from the original Dota while some heroes have changed a lot. Visual artwork is garbage, worst colour palette I've ever seen, and Hero models are so generic that you cant distinguish them from lane minions. Community is more toxic and hostile than ever before. Leavers/AFKers/Quiters run rampant. I mean seriously, how is it possible not to have a decent report system in 2015 that can handle these players. My advice, if you are a true fan of Dota, just play the original warcraft 3 custom map. Either that or move to LoL/HoN/Smite. This game is a disgrace...really shame
Dendi's Waifu;-;I have played a game that has similarities to this one. It is called League of Legends. I can tell you this: "If you are one of those sub-humans that think L.O.L. is a decent game, I feel for you. I pray to valve gods that RIOT sinks into the sea, and you all are saved from the horrors that lie deep within the L.O.L." George to the Apostles 2:16 DOTA is the game to go with. If you are a male in your 30s and you love to hit it off with actual humans then play DOTA, but I suggest being part of the PC master race before playing. If one plays on a Mac, You will find it hard to be liked. People will ask "why you are playing on a toaster?", or "What is this 'Mac' you speak of?" On the third day Gaben had cometh and said to all the sub-humans in conjuction to himself, "Illumanati...I belive that is how you spell it...Wait I mean the 'Orange box 2.0' will include HL3, LSD, Cocaine and Cocaine accesories." GABEN- Illumanati 2019 Pretty much, DOTA 2 is good. Unless you are a dingo baby-eating, coco puff-sniffing turtle soup . -A loyal RITO Consumer
StkE;-;Lost girlfriend, friends, family 10/10
Fraunhofer Diffraction;-;I hope that guys from Valve will burn in hell because of realization of allies and enemies matchmaking
Good Serbian Guy;-;Most people think that Dota 2 is about victory, if you ask me it is about FUN. Sometimes it is just vulgar, combative and contradictory. Overflowing with perversion and stupidity, that makes Dota 2 not only the game, but way of life.
VigilanceVT;-;still the best moba games.. better than HoN and LoL
Tinkerman;-;better than league.
Ace-Hardlight;-;After 1000 hours in dota... I can finally add "fluent in Russian" down to my resume.
Trimeme;-;Tired of not being able to speak to those Russians you encounter on a daily basis? This game is far better than Rosetta Stone or duolingo and is completely free! You can learn all those useful phrases like    , or     or even ! This game also destroys your self-esteem and all relationships! 10/10
Pigeon Queen;-;Mr. wit giff me this game when its still in beta. "You aren't a cool lad until you play this game" he says. First hour in this game: isn't this just a tower defence game like Anomoly??? 10 hours into the game: this game is for wits, viper too op. 100 hours into the game: vanguard too op, im literally invincible. 6 vanguard ftw. 500 hours into the game: shadow blade is too ing op, they will never catch you. 1000 hours into the game: lets pick phantom lancer and rush radiance, that will totally win us the game 2000 hours into the game: support will u buy wards and pull that ing jungle creeps???? 3000 hours into the game: ok, let's go get the bounty rune, go back to lane and block creeps. Bottle up push lanes and stack up some jungle creeps. BOOM!!!!!!!! oh  they have TECHIES in their team??? GG out, Terror risers too op. Thank you Mr.wit, I will never forgive you for ruining my lyfe with Dotan 2 PC MEME limited edition. Edit: The brand new dota2 reborn ed me up hard, not recommend to getting it unless you are a memeless wit.
Noble Wolfy;-;DOTA 2 like any game has Pros and Cons. Pros: > free to play (Not Pay to win) > The graphics are great > complex gameplay and mechanics > A lot of Characters to to choose from. > Your heroes are Customize-able (cosmetical items) > DOTA 2 has a thriving, international competitive scene > never gets boring > constant updates Cons: > constant updates > Peole only seem to play the same "try hard heroes" every game. > DOTA 2 has a Bad community (Not everyone but most of the community is really unsupportive and not beginner-friendly > Bad matchmaking (You get matchmade with players who are either too inexperienced for your level or have too much experience) > unbalanced Characters (Some of these "try hard heroes" are just too over powered and others very weak) DOTA 2 is a game of strategy, skill and TEAMWORK (do not forget TEAMWORK) far superior to any free 2 play game i have tried so far I recomend it. But try not to choose the same "try hard heroes" over and over then think you are good at dota.
Syrian killer;-;best game ever if this game is for money i would spend more than $50 to buy it :D Great game
yamato___;-;It's ok.
OmniNerd;-;Getting shouted at in Spanish about something you did wrong never gets old.
swoopy;-;garbage game ruined my life. community full of muslim fudge packers that use op heroes like silencer and scream gibberish to the chat lmao hope they die im the best
Janjjd;-;WARNING: Do not play if you want to have a social life ever again.
Arrakis is on Block Control;-;This game has taught me Russian, Spanish and that my mom AND dad are s who  11-year olds. Highly recommended!
ragingsheep;-;Aliens Colonial Marines is still better
Captain Steal Your Goal;-;This game is so great and addicting that I killed my wife because she took up too much of my time. 10/10
kubYik RoadToSilver;-;The best relaxing game for me ;)
daimyo;-;There's more Russian in this game than DayZ.
Fei Lian;-;this game is very interest
@MaestroDota;-;With the diverse amount of servers availible, when you start playing Dota 2 online, all it takes is a quick think about which Russia you want to play in! Learn new languages, such as Russian and Russian, and be taught awesome new words, like , which means pro! Have fun!
JamieBhoy;-;Merr it's okay i guess..
Yuno Gasai;-;Steals your life harder than Lifestealer. And ganks you faster than Ursa. Yup Dota 2 Ruined my Life :) . Although the servers maybe a Lil Poor And Matchmaking Complete Baloney Its worth trying. Theres nothing to lose... ( But your life... )
"Easy" Pete;-;I tried to kill a tower and i died. 9/11, would never forget.
Blairin;-;This game is just like real life. If you ain't white, you ain't right.
whipsandcreams;-;This game sux. I want my money back.
Manguo;-;Can't play because it keeps going to the tutorial again and again.
Arrakis is on Block Control;-;This game has taught me Russian, Spanish and that my mom AND dad are s who  11-year olds. Highly recommended!
Janjjd;-;WARNING: Do not play if you want to have a social life ever again.
ragingsheep;-;Aliens Colonial Marines is still better
Devil May Fry;-;This should be illegal.
Dean Force One;-;mobas are teh worst
Senbonmaru;-;best game in my life
Septum Sonus;-;gret shet. must play. tyme 2 wrek sum nubs. get readeh 2 beh wreketed dnt beh slow. I detect slowness play it and beh readeh to have teh time of ur lyfe. #dntbehslow #getwrekt #isuckatthisgame
vns;-;very nice game ^_^
Walking Absonite;-;It takes your time. Time takes your life. Strongly recomended for the lifeburners :D.
Yes, will play dota again <3;-;To amazing for words, this is my new life.
Elpolloloco;-;i like the part where i win and i dont like the part when i dont
/r/jailbait;-;What a piece of  game. I would rather lick Zeldas big toe from mario kart 64 on the playstation 2 than play this piece of  everyday. great game 3/2.5
Comissario Gordon;-;I never really liked DOTA. However, after spending some time with this version, I can see the appeal. However, it's not for me.
Sting Like A Sting;-;go to leauge this is a shity game
Odi;-;the best game ever <3
ManTel || Ezy Game;-;the best game in the world. good joob valve
Pand@;-;Strangely addictive after you've figure out one hero. Alternatively frustrating and exhilirating. Interesting events. Nice when you have a team or bunch of friends but also good to play solo. Love the hero items and effects. Agonizing to play when the internet connection is bad or when you have abusive teammates. Every game, even played with the same people, is different. Infinite combinations of heroes, items, usage and player skills. Takes some time to get the hang of any hero at first but some help always... helps... hahaha... =) Enjoy!!
Elpolloloco;-;i like the part where i win and i dont like the part when i dont
Senbonmaru;-;best game in my life
Septum Sonus;-;gret shet. must play. tyme 2 wrek sum nubs. get readeh 2 beh wreketed dnt beh slow. I detect slowness play it and beh readeh to have teh time of ur lyfe. #dntbehslow #getwrekt #isuckatthisgame
vns;-;very nice game ^_^
Zorjeff;-;it is a game
TaluWrath;-;this game ruins your life dont ing play it
@MaestroDota;-;With the diverse amount of servers availible, when you start playing Dota 2 online, all it takes is a quick think about which Russia you want to play in! Learn new languages, such as Russian and Russian, and be taught awesome new words, like , which means pro! Have fun!
kat;-;This is what it means to live
July_;-;Teaches you to dislike anyone who doesnt speak your language, 10/10 would play agian
@salva_salwa;-;matchmaking sucks, every game is lost. YOU CANNOT WIN ! EVER!
Renegade;-;League of peruvians 9/11 -IGN
Tanno;-;Do not EVER touch this!
Murphy's Law;-;People who play this game will betray you in the end.
Sir | L;-;Just an awesome Game! But we need Gaben as Hero!
datura;-;dont ing play this game ever jesus ing christ
just bought this new lamborghini;-;my friend said i can make money off of this game. my friend lied
Powerx;-;I never thought I will play a game such as Dota, the game is huge and fun.. the art and the voice acting are simply crazy, this game is totally strategic, you will hate it if you don't have friends to play it with you. The game also require a lot of team work, if you like to go solo in online games.. than Dota 2 is not for you.
Purple;-;I Want To Be In The Professional Teams Someday.This game Is Awsome
Summer;-;You either die a feeder, or live long enough to 322.
Rosenthal - Can Still Carry;-;DotA 2 RU Edition Now with 200% more hats! Select Server : -Russia -Russia -Russia -Brasil Choose Game Mode : PUB Pudge PUB Pudge "sutka" mode Shadowblade new meta Wuts support Enhanced c.y.k.a. experience Duo mid lost tower at 5:16 Select your Hero : " " picks Pudge "xXxHs460noscopexXx" picks Riki "Walter White" picks Lina "" picks Bounty Hunter Chat log: - :    -xXxHs460noscopexXx: xaxaxa -Walter White: i'm mid fock u i'm pro -xXxHs460noscopexXx: xaxaxa -:      -Walter White (Lina) Has disconncted from the game. Please wait for them to reconnect. Match is lost or disconnected: " (1/27/0)": Found an Arcane item "You (15/3/12)": Found a Treasure Chest "xXxHs460noscopexXx (5/18/3)": Found a Common item
ExiaRS #wengerout;-;If you want to learn Russian for free, play this game. If you want fast course in Russian, play in European and Russian servers. Satisfaction 100% guaranteed, and no money back as it's free to play anyway!
[MCCT] Small dick Big dreams;-;This game runied my life, took all my money and lost me my girlfriend, friends and the love and support of my family 10/10
Captain Steal Your Goal;-;This game is so great and addicting that I killed my wife because she took up too much of my time. 10/10
fizzgigg1;-;this game is the
SajeeL Niazi;-;AWersome game .. you will forgot age of empires and SId mier's civilization
Eeyore;-;dota is like porn, cant get enough of it.
Dirty Dan;-;ITS A ING LEAGUE RIPOFF MUTHER TRUCKER #LOL4LYFE TRUCKERS AND GOT DAMN WHERES THE PO RN IT AINT NO REAL MOBA IF THERE ISNT HENTIA RELEASED OF IT COME ONNNNNNNNNNNNNNNNN HENTAI ARTISTS GET ON DIS .
Alias;-;A timeless game which keeps evolving into a more entertaining and challenging. Addictive and irresistible. Highly recommended.
_tooslowtoknow_;-;Do you want to play tactically with your friends? then Dota 2 is made for you and your friends! Think about how you dominated the game and you destroy the enemy.
Ex0dle;-;One of the best MOBA in the world. But, 8/10. 'cause report system as bad as some players. ;)
Dispenz0r;-;this is the reason why SMNC died i dont understand anything in this game and i also hate it i couldnt play anything with my friends because they kept playing this  0/10
Ice Cream Marceline;-;Has a succubus with a nice set of racks, what more could you want from a game?
Ruuufff Le R0b0T;-;It is a very complex game and the community is very harsh and unforgiving if you are new to DotA 2.
Shronky Mclayers;-;Ok, a lot of "MLG PROS" and fanboys were butthurt at my original dota review, so here's my edit I guess. My main reason for hatred towards dota 2 is aside from it being Just another ing moba game Is this: Valve picked creating this game, over many, MANY others. Keep in mind Gabe Newell, and VALVE OVERALL. picked this game, over Stars of blood. They picked this game, over half life 3. They picked this game, over left 4 dead 3. And this is Just kinda spitballing BUT THEY PICKED THIS GAME, OVER MAYBE ING PORTAL AND TEAM FORTRESS 3. That's my honest reason on why I hate dota 2. It's Just a generic moba game when valve had TONS of other decisions. I expected more out of valve I expected more out of GABE NEWELL. When you FINALLY start working your fat  on said games instead of...this...I'll respect you again, but Even still, I will never forgive your ing decision.
Arcanine;-;It's a big deal, y'know?
RmX;-;When I first started DOTA2 I was a little overwhelmed, as my first ARTS/MOBA game it was pretty complicated. I soon started to pick up the mechanics like last hitting and denying. Before I knew it, I was performing  and better. I stopped making silly  and  got vastly better at not  the enemy . For the  part, everyone I've met was very helpful and , there  the   however. As  - play DOTA2    ,  ,     .      !
xXx_John_Duck_xXx;-;Do you hate money? Yes? Then this is a game for you. Because here you lose 500 gold for every death... Enjoy! But now seriously... Yes it's a great MOBA! The end
Tt_Viper;-;Totally Addicting *_*
anchorsmash;-;one of my favourite games. best of all: it's free. warning: when you download dota, you are signing up for an abusive relationship.
Hirther Harbinger de Behet;-;Solid evidence of extraterrestrial life controlling earth through media.
V;-;THE BEST GAME EVER !
Sealeo Green;-;If you want to no life a game and ruin all of your friendships and ruin your social life well here you go this is the perfect game. 10/10 would dotoski again.
Chop Suey!;-;Liked: + Boobs (try Templar Assassin, Crystal Maiden, Queen of Pain, or Lina for example) Disliked: -Pesky invisibles (really, these guys  me off. Maybe a lot of people thought the same. Ban it please!) Conclusion: I recommend it, because if I'm not, why should I bother?
Standin.Kim;-;Promotes teamwork and strategies
V;-;THE BEST GAME EVER !
Sealeo Green;-;If you want to no life a game and ruin all of your friendships and ruin your social life well here you go this is the perfect game. 10/10 would dotoski again.
Chop Suey!;-;Liked: + Boobs (try Templar Assassin, Crystal Maiden, Queen of Pain, or Lina for example) Disliked: -Pesky invisibles (really, these guys  me off. Maybe a lot of people thought the same. Ban it please!) Conclusion: I recommend it, because if I'm not, why should I bother?
Standin.Kim;-;Promotes teamwork and strategies
Hirther Harbinger de Behet;-;Solid evidence of extraterrestrial life controlling earth through media.
Slawa;-;Barely played it. It is still in beta.
blood_demon;-;Russian language learning simulator or Dota 2 for short! Learn Russian fast and easy with this game.
Y[A]bish;-;Steep learning curve but definately would recommend over any other MOBA. Best MOBA NA 10/10.
Ryan;-;Great game, really enjoyable. The character selection is fantastic. They still add in new heroes from time to time to keep it lively. They keep it updated to keep it lively as well. Great selection of community made skins, weapons, etc. alongside a fun selection of voiceovers that you can choose as the announcer. If you don't like buying DLC or add-on content, they allow it to be shared in games so it eleminates the hassle of never being able to see it in action and, for me, eleminates me having to ever buy the content =-). It's one of the top MOBA's out there. Only drawback would be the community that encompasses it. Sometimes it's not so bad depending on the group you get matched with. Obviously, the way to get around this problem is to play with a bunch of friends you know so you won't ever get "grouped" up with others. Nevertheless, the learning curve on the game can be harsh, as can the general rules of the game. I prefer the fact that it is punishing if you get killed frequently/on a regular basis.
wmwplayer;-;pay2win... the only way it can be redeemed at this point is with custom sprays a la cs
Celador;-;I hate competitive games. Especially moba's and starcraft. This one however managed to suck me in with "vs bots" game mode and cosmetic items store. I'm still not sure how or why it happened but i do enjoy playing Dota and sometimes i even play vs people, even though it makes me want to cry or yell in rage. There are few major issues with Dota 2 at the moment: 1) Absence of communication between developers and players. Dev forums seem to exist only for players, since thousands of bugs (especially cosmetic ones) and suggestions simply remain ignored. 2) Infrequent content updates and lack of features. They could've at least allowed us to play game modes from different events to diversify gameplay or added new maps, instead they keep focusing on adding new cosmetic items. 9 out of 10 updates only include "hats". Game folder keeps growing but nothing changes gameplay-wise. They even stopped adding new bots to my favourite game mode. 3) Constant server side issues which they can't fix. There are issues with downloading replays, reconnecting to games, watching matches, searching for games and even finishing matches without somebody getting crashes or disconnects. 4) A lot of racism, swearing and general anger towards other players. Especially Russians. Report system is completely inadequate and doesn't help at all. I would recommend Dota 2 because its cute and well-thought game, with amazing voice-overs and excellent replayability. I do advise however against spending money in their store since once your start you cannot stop. This is probably how drug addiction works - they pull you in with free stuff and then you just want to complete a set, buy new items because of the modified effects, gamble for a chance to get some common item which would later cost hundreds of dollars (valve deliberately removes some items to drive up prices), find some unusual courier which could easily compensate all of your spendings... or plunge yourself into poverty if you get unlucky with chests.
Venki;-;Play Dota 2 and you will learn russian language in a few days ! I recommend this game !  penopt 12/10
AXION.;-;This game ruined my life, from a good class to a normal class. But I liked the way it ruined my life!!!
Radiofoot;-;Ever wish you could pay a game with Brazillians, Puerto Ricans, and Russians all in one fell swoop?! Now you can, with this free to play game! Which will teach you to be racist, and then learn how to cope with your own racism! A must download!
peace_and_nox;-;This game makes me bleed internally. 10/10
Raginis Kan;-;1.       2.    3.      4.    5.  6.   7.   8.    9. 2    Good things that better than League of Legends 1. You can enjoy all heroes for free 2. In-game voice feature 3. You can get skins In your game playing 4. League betting available 5. Troll Systems 6. Difference in level of the terrain 7. Wood system 8. The diversity of the active item 9. Dota 2 heroes are generally leveling up  1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 92
Easley;-;Game too hard, going back to league of lesibans
Xeranthus;-;You want to ruin friendships or make new ones? This game. Want to say "mid or feed"? this game Want to shout at everybody because they didn't do what you said even though you said you would report them? this ing game
Boanak;-;Had a dream. Dota 2 change that. Ruined my life. 5stars
QuNi;-;This game steals your life literally.
FaultyPlayStation;-;if you wanna waste your time (life on this ) then this game is made for you
Scarzzypan;-;This game was good but got not good. 0/10 Put more Shrek in.
Degoya;-;Learn Russian for free. 10/10
Allien;-;Never occurs to me that time in life is too little, until DOTA 2 came along.
Notorious RNG;-;THIS ING GAME WILL MAKE YOU RETHINK THE TERMS HARDCORE, LEARNING CURVE, AND RUSSIANS. IT WILL TURN A TODDLER TO A FULLY GROWN MAN, EVEN IF THEY AREN'T A MALE. DON'T PLAY THIS GAME IF YOU AINT MAN ENOUGH. WOULD NOT RECOMMEND TO POO-BABBIES THAT CAN'T LEARN . WOULDN'T RECOMMEND TO THOSE WHO THINK THEY LIKE RUSSIA AND SOUTH AMERICA. IF YOU CAME HERE FROM ING LoL THEN GO BACK B4 YOU CRY YOURSELF TO SLEEP EVERYTIME SOMEONE YELLS AT YOU FOR BEING THE  PERSON YOU ARE. RECOMMEND TO THOSE WHO LIKE THE HYPER COMPETITIVE AND STRATEGIC GAMEPLAY OF RIGHTCLICKING EVERYWHERE AND EVERYTHING AND PRESSING YOUR Q, W, E, AND R KEYS FOR HOURS AND HOURS ON END. WOULDN'T RECOMMEND TO PEOPLE WHO HAVE A BETTER USE OF 1000+ HOURS. WOULDN'T RECOMMEND TO THOSE WHO ENJOY HAVING A LIFE. WOULDN'T RECOMMEND TO THOSE WHO LIKE ANY OTHER VIDEOGAME GENRE OR ANY GENRE OF ENTERTAINMENT ALTOGETHER. WOULDN'T RECOMMEND TO PEOPLE WHO OWN A STEAM CONTROLLER. WOULDN'T RECOMMEND TO THOSE THINK THEY CAN HAVE A LIFE WHILE PLAYING THIS GAME AT THE SAME TIME. WOULDN'T RECOMMEND IF YOU PLAN ON WINNING. WOULDN'T RECOMMEND TO YOU CAVEMEN THAT LIVE ALONE AND CAN'T EVEN MAKE FRIENDS WITH RAPISTS AND MURDERERS ON THE INTERNET. WOULDN'T RECOMMEND TO THE PEOPLE THAT LIVE IN REGIONS THAT SPEAK ENGLISH AND PLAN ON PLAYING ON SERVERS AIMED FOR THE ENGLISH-SPEAKING PEOPLE. WOULDN'T RECOMMEND TO PEOPLE WHO HAVE HAND-CRAFTED THEIR OWN COMPUTERS OUT OF WOOD AND HAVE TOASTERS FOR ROUTERS AND MODEMS. IF YOU SOMEHOW DON'T FIT THESE DESCRIPTIONS, GO THE  AHEAD AND DOWNLOAD IT. DOTA IS LOVE. DOTA IS LIFE. ALL CAPS. 10/10 The Perfect MOBA luv dis gaem srsly tho this game is pretty gud if u know how to play
Ryan;-;Great game, really enjoyable. The character selection is fantastic. They still add in new heroes from time to time to keep it lively. They keep it updated to keep it lively as well. Great selection of community made skins, weapons, etc. alongside a fun selection of voiceovers that you can choose as the announcer. If you don't like buying DLC or add-on content, they allow it to be shared in games so it eleminates the hassle of never being able to see it in action and, for me, eleminates me having to ever buy the content =-). It's one of the top MOBA's out there. Only drawback would be the community that encompasses it. Sometimes it's not so bad depending on the group you get matched with. Obviously, the way to get around this problem is to play with a bunch of friends you know so you won't ever get "grouped" up with others. Nevertheless, the learning curve on the game can be harsh, as can the general rules of the game. I prefer the fact that it is punishing if you get killed frequently/on a regular basis.
Watch out!;-;It is a complete waste of time. It will suck up all of your free-time and lower your self-esteem greatly. You should never get this game if you intend to ever have a life or friends. 11/10 game of the decade
Coco Jamboo;-;Slightly less harmful than a crack addiction. 10/10.
PC broken be back soon;-;This game. Is the best game ever. It has no flaws. The servers are great and I always meet nothing but nice people. I always learn new words in language. Apparently  and Blyat are common forms of greeting in Russian script. There is also  and stuff for Mexican. And I have just gone deep into the culture of other races. I love this game. No really.  the servers
OrangeJuicePanda;-;If I had to rate this game on a scale of one to ten, I would give it a "9/10 Ready".
Help;-;after a couple of hours i just realized that this game is a complete piece of
Grubn;-;Only for homos
Grubn;-;Only for homos
Ank;-;Dota 2 is a multiplayer online battle arena game from Valve. Dota 2 is the next installment from the previous game or mods Dota. Dota 2 has the same gameplay as Dota. You pick your heroes, and then battle them in one map against another player. In the arena, as you kill and progress you will get coins and the use them to buy items to enhance your heroes on your current battle in the arena. You need to pick the right items each time you play as it will decide you will win the game or not. Dota 2 introduce item drops each time you finish a match online. There are many items in Dota 2 that can enhance your favourite heroes looks. Each item has rarity, the more rare the items, the more expensive it will become. Most items can be sold in the Steam Marketplace. Dota 2 has far improved graphics from the previous game. Heroes are even more detailed and the arena has better view. All heroes ability effects are also improved, even the UI is better. Dota 2 has many tournaments that you can participate. The biggest is "The International" Dota 2 tournament. Most tournaments can reward players with some rare items just by watching the tournaments. Dota 2 is the best MOBA game yet. I recommend this. Rating 9/10
Rundas;-;It has taken over my life and my wallet. 10/10 wp valve
BOBONG;-;woman in black
mkyhao;-;This game helped me fail all my subjects 10/10 love it.
Baka-Kun;-;Dota 2 is great!
gphatt;-;This game ed up my financial life so bad... 15/10
Don't panic, it's organic!;-;Ahhh.... Dota 2. This game is severaly unbalanced since no matter how well you play, your team will always blame you for the loss. It is also insanely luck based because the team that gets most russians usually looses. A lot of functions in this game are completely broken as well. For example, even if you pick "English" in the language bar everyone still speaks Russian. Sometimes German or French, but never English. Playing this game I had a few mental breakdowns and smashed three windows in total. It sometimes feels like my life is fading away and I imagine life in prison with a really musculine in-mate would provide the same level of . To sum up, this is game is ing terrible. 10/10 would recommend.
DeepSpacePizza;-;Never gonna give you up (because it will count as an abandon) Never gonna let you down (because the community will kill me) Never gonna run around (because someone will insta-kill me) And hurt you (because I am never able to kill anyone!)
Joel V12;-;Arma 2 is an epic tale in which you play as a police man officer trying to stop world war 3.5. The game is really good except if I don't keep my eye on it, it hides within my many wank tissues, in which is tries to collect my  and make hitler MK2. Would vote this game a good 9/11. Merry Allah Akbar.
b0ss dont leave me ppls;-;will make you racists to russians ,africans and north americans 10/10
BlackLight;-;It's a very good game! No doubt! Have a lot of players. Have a lot of fun! Teamwork, timing, strategies! But, there's some mini bugs in Customization section for certain items. Due to it's a free game, there's many game spoilers as well.
farted;-;if your reading this your gay !
6626;-;The game is great, except for the russians
a gentle fish;-;someone in game showed me the video of the muslim ghost with the floating turban, i haven't been this scared since i was told there was a skeleton inside me. i doubt theres ever been a more aggressive assault on my mental well being. please stay clear of this game.
Sabu Takahashi;-;So basically what happened was I was talking to my drug dealer / grandma about addictive substances, and i was running low on crack so she told me to try out dota 2 since it was free. Long story short i tried to rob a bank so I could afford the Arcana set for Legion Commander and now my cell mate's name is Chester. He keeps asking me what his name rhymes with but I dont know. He always spanks me and calls me naughty boy. Anyways, play this game if you like screaming and waking up your neighbor with epilepsy.
Raziel01;-;DotA 2 is a hardcore MoBA game with the high production value of a Valve game, great graphics, animations and music. There are many heroes and items with interesting mechanics and many combinations between the two of them that can make the game enjoyable. Having a big studio behind it and loads of fans from Warcraft 3 times made it very easy for DotA 2 to become an competitive game and e-sport, but for me is not enough to hide one of the biggest flaws this game has which is: RNG. DotA 2 has loads of items and heroes based on procs and other random elements which leaves many fights in this game to chance, a thing that i dislike so much in PvP games. DotA 2 is a good game, but is not the PvP game i'm looking for.
Ice Tea!;-;I never used to like strategy games but,have to admit this is the best ing game ever ! EPIC!
Fernpeh;-;SOMETIMES BEING A HUGE ING  HELPS IN LIFE THIS GAME IS THE PURE DEFINITION OF THAT 9/11 WOULD REPORT EVERYONE I MEET AGAIN
niaiserie;-;This game has the most toxic community of any game I've ever played. I don't recommend ever playing this game unless you are in a party of five people who you know and enjoy playing video games with.
MP4/4;-;Instant Russian hate software.
Dexter;-;Ruined my friends life
ancelot Supersad @ Flying skins;-;God,this game is awful,really.You can't even jump,third person view doesnt give you that feel that you have when you play gta,it doesn't have any achievements either.Honestly, this game. 2\10,wouldnt play another 3k hours.
PerfectChaos97;-;This game is complete . Here are a few reasons why, 1. there is no creativity when it comes to them naming the champions (heroes for those of you who are butthurt), 2. the camera does not auto lock so you gotta keep moving the mouse to see where your character is going, 3. Half the map is all sunny but the other half is really dark and edgy that I get cuts while traversing through it, and 4. The items are , the casting is terrible, no summoner spells, and no b to recall. TL;DR if you're not a WoW  stay away from this game.
[PW]HyunLyang;-;First, all heroes are totally free so dota 2 is not a pay-to-win game. Second, each round is really dynamic and active so the player can make their chance to win when they're in a bad situation.
lootedcorpse;-;Stop playing LoL and WoW..... play a game that requires real skill. Just remember, you suck at DOTA2 til you have about 500 games won. Takes about 30-45 minutes per game..... and you're not winning a majority of your games. edit:wrote that review when I had played less than 30 hours of the game. Having played almost 1,000 hours on DOTA2 now, I stick by my previous assessment that DOTA ing sucks. I will  you in it though..... :D
P@CKO;-;I find it amusing because I'd actually say that DOTA2 is a bit easier. To deny, just right-click. League, you actually have to plan ahead and play significantly more cleverly to deny, predict your enemy's backing/roam more and be able to clear waves to use the tower instead. The mind games play a much larger role, as well as efficient use of skills, rather than just buying hard-counter items to match a given situation. The trouble is, it /looks/ simpler at first glance, while actually offering far more depth, strategy and complexity. So those who play at a low level never actually see anything more than 'simplified' gameplay, and quickly go back to D2 or HoN. And nothing of value was lost.
MaXBuRnZ(muted);-;Very addictive but very unfriendly for newbies.
[JDC] The Garden Lobster;-;Awful game, don't buy
rjtu fjrir;-;Worst coop game ever. You play support? Your carries feed. You play carry? You don't have any support. You play ganker/initiatior? Your whole team ignores you. Wanna get your blood boiling? This is the game for you. And the MMR sucks.
Bobby Lenny Hill;-;Screw every spanish country in the world and stab my balls with a Mexican named Ismeal. Grow a fourth  and  Obama. Eat the last of the spagetti in the room and shove the bowl up the broncos .  on a midget with a bit of vasaline. Best Game Ever! 10/10
Souls;-;This game is ing trash, don't get into it unless you're doing a study to see just how ing stupid and  people can be.
OldSkull;-;Its like chess .. only with 4 teammates i definitely recommend this to all who have a working brain .. cuz this game might not be for everyone
Torosa;-;Very good, has Lina, great gameplay. pls sory Richters i tolerate draven can we be friends pls
Torosa;-;Very good, has Lina, great gameplay. pls sory Richters i tolerate draven can we be friends pls
Bobby Lenny Hill;-;Screw every spanish country in the world and stab my balls with a Mexican named Ismeal. Grow a fourth  and  Obama. Eat the last of the spagetti in the room and shove the bowl up the broncos .  on a midget with a bit of vasaline. Best Game Ever! 10/10
Saladass;-;Awesome gameplay. Amazing graphics. Smooth animation. Definitely better than Dota itself. Valve had made one of the greatest decision in the world to remade Dota with awesome features, and better graphic. But, behind its awesomeness, there's something that Dota 2 lacks, and that's its Community. Selfish player, lots of flames and verbal abuse in-game definitely make the game worse. Well, despite that, there're also a lot of good player inside, and playing with friends should be the best solution avoiding verbal abusing people. So, grab your friends, and play. Little by little, you'll be better.
Jackabok;-;Matchmaking system sucks. Lost 400 MMR in 1 day
G.I.V.I;-;Coolest Game Ever !
DOnRiD;-;It's like caffeine...
Byron di Rivia;-;Best competitive game ever. Thanks Volvo.
Pinoy_Slayer;-;Nice game and community,, hope better in the next year,, :D
LatvianTanker;-;Boring,Non-enjoyable,un-interesing game,not surpsied why they made it free
Ivanero;-;Funny game, competitive, every match is different... and best support and innovation I've seen in a long time in a game... And all this for free. Yeah, I could say we are in front of the best MOBA game in the market, but I can say some things that are not that great though about Dota 2 at the end of this review. It's true that this game is bringing the best innovation I've seen in a long time in a videogame. This industry is a bit stuck in making money giving just enough for the clients and players and then adding more to pay via DLCs, some times they even launch a game that is a Beta at 50 bucks price or higher. When I talk about innovation I mean, for example, about the best support for watching games, replays and tournaments. But the bad side of this is that if you want to watch tournament games... ALL of them requires a ticket to be bought, except the only free yearly tournament that is The International, being the only exception. Also, the visual customization of the heroes is insane, you can customize by separated parts (helm, shoulders, arms, body, legs, weapon...) just like in a MMO, and even some animations or skills... and you can trade all of your items in the market or with friends. The great thing about this game compared to others like League of Legends is that paying money does not affect to gameplay, just visuals. In League of Legends paying money gave you the advantage of having more and better runes and more rune pages, for example, giving you a little advantage in a competitive scenario. Also you need to buy some heroes/characters or you can't play all of them when you feel the need to. Even when you can buy those things without money, it's almost impossible to get everything without paying, even if you play a lot. Big limitations to competitive gameplay. In Dota 2 there is no restriction: you play every hero, you play with every skill. Also there is a lot of other great things like user skill and item builds and guides that you can select and use in-game and rate up or down, you can customize your own for each hero and even the announcer if you have one, among other things. Then, what is the bad side of Dota 2? First of it, you ALWAYS need a team in order to play or get some fun. Solo matchmaking is not just bad, it's horrible. No matter how good you are and how long you've been playing this game you will end up with drunk players, idiots, trolls, bored players who are not focused on the game... And this is on both sides of the game, in your team or in the other. Report system doesn't work at all (maybe just a bit for excessive cases), and even if you play with friends in a full team... You won't find balanced games. The common issue here is either you roflstomp the other team or they roflstomp yours even if you played great. Of course, playing with a full party of friends can decrease the chances this happens, but even with that, playing a good balanced, funny and competitive game will be hard. This said, they need to implement some kind of public ranking system in order to maybe avoid that a little. And then, maybe the things could become really better. But overall this is a great game with a very good support from their developers, constantly adding content and not just focusing on getting your money, something rare to find nowadays in the industry.
sprt;-;The game, where all s gather. If you thought annoying COD kids were too much, then you haven't experienced dota2 yet. It's full of obnoxious, rude people, who have absolutely no idea what a co-op / team game is about, and constantly whine about stolen kills, like if this was some FPS. The following list contains the type of people you will meet in dota: 1. 12 year olds, thinking they know everything, and play dota for life, while skipping school 2. People who can't speak english at all, despite playing with the english language filter 3. Reporters, who do nothing but  about everyone else, and report them for everything 4. Multiple account 'pros' who constantly swear about how their team sucks 5. Idiots, who tell you to attack 1v5 / close range against long / ask you to help and then run away 6. Quitters 7. Mr. AFK who gives up at the start of the game and just hangs around spawn 8. New players who get talked down for not completely understanding the game after 2 seconds 9. Extremely rare, but nice and helpful people Worst. Community. Ever.
loikdfenid top dota 2 player;-;personeli i wuld rekomend dis gam3 cuz itz vary easi 2 meat foureners from rusha and spain!!!! xDDD i mak vari gud frends!!! xDDDDDDD 9/10 cuz grafics not as gud as cal of doty but datz okai cuz grafics not everyting!!!!!xD
Percenterino;-;I think this game is trying to eat my soul... I LOVE IT
Actual Cannibal Shia LeBeouf;-;Do you HATE having sex with women, and would rather spend your time in an angry haze of racism and nerdy rage bonars? Well i have the game for you pal. For only free dollars, you can harrass strangers online and forget to click "accept game" one time and be unable to play for 30 minutes as a punishment. Free disciprin for playing a game? Sign me up am i right?!? Deepest mechanics of any multiplayer game without only relying on twitch reflex skills, but thoughtful planning and careful execution. If youve ever been on the giving end of a perfect gank, you'll want to put a couple hundred hours in or so before you decide whether you can deal with the 10 year olds and south americans.
WiL;-;1st hour of this game : "Man this game is ing boring..." Rest : "This game is so addictive O_O" <3
();-;i am addicted to this game now. lol
Marcuz|-BuyingSkins/Knives;-;Definitely a MUST-PLAY game for all RTS gamers. A long history runs through dota, ever since its formation back in the early 2000's. I have loved the game for years now and the first time i played Dota 2 was back in 2012 while i was using my 1st steam account (that account is no longer working). Dota 2 is a game that rellies heavily on teamwork and such. Overall, just play the game. You wont regret it.
ManyaKiSS (_)(_)===D;-;how can i get the redemtion code here ?
CaSpeR;-;Dota 2 is awesome game. id like to play in my laptop but i have low specs hehe thats why i rent in a computer shop....
Skionn;-;Best MOBA out there. Good gameplay, decent graphics and tons of fun. This game will ruin your social life...if you have one!
Bacon..[DK | Newbee];-;Lots of fun, strategy, action, teamwork, and customization. However trying to coordinate with international players can be tedious at times. Don't take this game too seriously or it will own you and ruin your personality!
Ash Berry;-;2slow for me, and not nough hats
luf;-;This game seems to be a copycat of League of Legends. Very unoriginal. Valve is dead to me.
Captain Karen;-;omg gais fix dis pls roshan meks ma gem lag he keeps hiatting me and my gaem lags so i caynt move D;;;;;;; 1/10 - its okay
Get Higher;-;Dota 2 is a MOBA in which you don't need big bucks to be better than anyone else. A new player is just like an old player with the only differenece being the experience. The game is balanced to a very high degree and has a lot of tournements with stupidly large prize pools. The heroes are fun and unique, and the mechanics are great. In my opinion it is the best game in this genre so far.
HR.Motionless;-;Amzin game to loss time lol, its really coool try it
Lileta;-;This game rocks. You can choose between a variety of players and with 5v5, you can experience insanely awesome combat. Please take note that the animation might be different.
DIO;-;I have learned countless pinoy curse words throughout the game. 10/10 would learn curse words again
Candyman;-;This game, what can i say about it. It has a great selection of heroes, with an absolute perfect balance with each one. A excellent combat system that is as paramount as the original DEFENSE OF THE ANCIENT. A store that does not sell you items that will  off the opponent. A map design that doesen't have those ing bushes where people can hide and jsut ing ambush you when you walk by like in LOL. And a ingame item system that can actually effect the outcome of the game. But what i hate about this game, i quite a big list. First, there is no surrender button, therefore if you know you are going to lose, you would need to sit there for twenty minutes getting killed over and over again till your ancient falls. Also the community surronding the game is somewhat of a , first there are the racist comments, then there are the spanish and the russians that can't even speak a word of english. But overall, this game I find, is quite good. Why don't you come down to the SEA servers, where everyone shuts up and plays the game
RoadRunner;-;owning
ayy lmao;-;Want to develop a lifelong hate for all Eastern Europeans? Throw away your schooling so you can impress your friends and people you will never meet? Receive high levels of abuse? Learn Russian and Portuguese? Then this is the game for you! Dota 2 provides all of the above in a tight, free to play, package that will end up costing you hundreds as you try to keep up with the large quantities of cosmetics that come out daily.
Soliquidus Bosselot;-;This game is one of the worst games ever made
Hey, Cthul-Aid!;-;Before this game, I really enjoyed English as my first language but      . :/ 10/10 Better Than Rosetta Stone
meat sweats mcghee;-;It's like Skyrim with Guns 10/10 its ok would buy again
Snakes;-;This game is like the easier version of LoL. It also doesn't do sexy art for the females and has no lolis.
TommaLlama;-;I've only played this game a little, but so far it's pretty cool.
FluXr;-;DOTA 2 is DOTA on a new engine. If I was to compare it only to its predecessor it is the whole package. You get the game that you loved with the beauty of the Source engine. If you come from playing other newer MOBA style games this is the granddaddy of those games reborn. And hey, free to check out if it is for you or not. So there is that too.
BigBox o Prawns;-;This game is amazing to any kind of person. coming from someone who has spent 6+ years of fps this game is a real refresher, get the pun.... no.
Haven;-;NO ONE HAS EVER DONE THAT IN THE HISTORY OF DOTA
Bishop;-;Anyone who plays this game for more then 10 minutes a idiot.
RedKing;-;Lovely game :D
Si Chucky;-;nice game ever
P:;-;this game my life i ply dota in 2003 dota 1
Herb Bot;-;Nice and good game.
[SaS]Apila;-;Abusive and i would not wish upon mortal enemies 10/10
Sufferwell;-;I love the smell of Dota 2 in the morning
[R];-;Recommended game
Bot Paul;-;so much love this game
Bill Nye the counter-spy;-;10/10 would bang literally the best game you can ask for. Fun,addictive,rage-inducing, THIS GAME WILL MAKE YOU BECONE A RACIST HOW FUN IS THAT? :D
hunteroff'zo;-;best game ofc. Dota 2 4 life. <3
KochiSNSD;-;10/10 When I became 6 I fingered Lina
Flip;-;Really really really good strategy game!!
Shiner00;-;AMAZING needs to get somethings from the work shop though that people make 10/10
gravemore;-;wow best game ever
I feed your MOM;-;If you want to hate people, this is the game for you.
Theusmellthis;-;This game is the worst game in the world
L'ancia;-;better than LOL
Izz;-;awesome little  everyone is racist 11/10 recommended
Bender the Were-car;-;Trolling Sim 2013, best one out there. For best experiance call yourself a noob and report yourself, while you feed an insatiable hunger for cosmetic items.
Goose;-;Literally the worst game ever made, it is like League if League were even worse. Holy , who likes this crap? 2/10, it's okay.
KaptainKonvicted;-;about 900 hours in and i'm still the noob among my friends. 10/10 would play.
divinityLeeh;-;Ruined my life! 10/10 best game
Snakemon;-;One of the best games i have ever enjoyed. nuff said.
SavageOpress Diabolis Interium;-;Play it dont spray it! Join me or suffer my wrath!;)
WolfBane;-;Welcome to the game that will throw you into gameplay you will barely understand while your self-esteem and patience are worn down by people screaming at you in different languages for not understanding how the game works, creating the addictive relationship that just makes you keep coming back for more. 11/10.
Arn;-;DotA 2... It's going to be the same as DotA, right? HoN copied DotA, I liked HoN, so I like this too. Not when going alone though. Going to a queue alone is... blergh.
FoxGamer;-;The ancients aren't gonna defend themselves, PUSH NOW!!!
3ngelzu;-;Easiest game of my life
simple librarian;-;lackluster animal crossing-esque. the customization options are decent but there is almost 0 customization of your house exterior. most of the customization options are presets, which there are loads of (probably 200~) but the community gets super mad when i choose the "Mepo" option. would not recommend to fellow animists
sharp;-;Great if you want to improve your Russian.
Zabo;-;I am completely addicted to this amazing game. It requires immense strategy and total focus. Best game ever. 10/10 Would  Queen of Pain again.
AquaApple;-;YOU must try Dota 2
Babidee;-;Great game!
[LT3] Dave;-;Go big or go home son.
Ct d 'Fagin' Grumph;-;At first, really boring. But if you take your time to get to know the customs and controls, and you got some mates to play with you... It'll be the most epic game you have played in your life. Tip: Do NOT play alone, you will get in teams with russians who will basically  up 30-60min of your time and you can't leave because then you will be forced to play with russians :D
Futanari ; );-;Keeping you a virgin until you turn into a wizard.
Recky Reck;-;Perfect game, hope you enjoy
--Tan--;-;Awsome game where u learn to speak russian
Baker;-;Do not play this atrocious Russian Simulator. It is not fun. 9/10.
9+10=21;-;An awesome game.. High learning curb, but once you get the basics, you just can't stop playing! It's a challenging, but very rewarding game!
G6;-;This Game Is awsome anybody can play!!!
Teo;-;Heart<3
SixSix;-;Dota 2 is one of the best game now. game that use teamwork and individual skill. all of emotions fill in this game. but this game truly not for children. coz,this game need consentration,comunication,skill and controled emotions. For me this game suitable for teenagers to adult.
KEYSER SOZE;-;This game will take up your life, and spit it out in a chewy residue on the floor. Not that it's a bad thing, I suppose it depends on what floats your boat. Just make sure you remember that it's Pete's fault for not RNG'ing hard enough on Axe, and buyback is stupid. Get this game.
Cygne;-;The best game in the history of gaming, LoL can go suck a big, black d***.
CrazyRhian;-;Hell yeah!
Kamineyyy;-;A game for those who can afford to waste time
FR4K;-;recommend this game!
RAMPAGE;-;I happy :D
Spedychr1s2;-;DON'T DO IT MAN! JUST DON'T
The Good King;-;Discover how worthless you really are by downloading Dota 2 today!
-Rev-;-;This the best MOBA games i ever played :D
I E N N E;-;this is indeed the most played steam game i ever had ! :D
Mr.Grubbs;-;game is very much so fun.
Trouble Maker;-;The best game ever... ^_^
lost-diez;-;This game is not for everyone! Can bother one card, but that's the point, every time you run around the map 1 map, and the tactics are different actions, building, but with characters another story, a bunch of different weapons, clothes and so on, that you just do not get bored, I think this yoke ideal both boys and girls, but children to 14 years, I would not be allowed. A great game to blow off steam, to relax while playing you will not succeed! In this worth playing! All a nice game!
Miska;-;I never knew Mexico and Russia was in the US. This game really opened my eyes. Jajajaja noob vergin ... bobo
luo S;-;this game is amazing.. train u how to plan a strategy
rabbitszeeeeee;-;This is a game that like a game. lol
Don't Proceed;-;Nice game. Addicting
Ert;-;Nice one !!!
Trooper;-;I been playing it for 4 hours now and I can not stop it is that good. TOOK ME AWAY FROM GARRYS MOD, any close friend of mine would know that is Impossible. 10/10
xVeg_rhona;-;i like this game 'coz it shows so thrilling aside from it there is so much to learn from this game !!
PewPewMotherfucker;-;Well Played VOLVO
Hellonion;-;This is DotA 2. It is a moba genre of game that requires lots of knowledge and team skills. You WILL die (alot), you WILL be mad (alot) and thats the learning curve of the whole moba scene. When I say you suck, you DO SUCK (hell, I even suck). So unless you got the balls and time to learn the META GAEM, stay away, we don't want you. Welcome to Dota 2, YOU SUCK. read up on the game @ http://www.purgegamers.com/welcome-to-dota-you-suck This game is a 8/10 in my books. Try it when it comes out free.
devilhunterz;-;Dota 2 make me keep hard to understanding what to do and what to improve, very very nice game ! :) :P
Felix;-;like this game very much when im ing high and playing for the fun not to win its only a game  ruski bljad allahu akbar
Kaotyc;-;A thoroughly intricate game with massive emphasis put on both skills and knowledge, it is not recommended for casual gamers or for those seeking for some "easy enjoyment". With over a hundred heroes with their own unique abilities and ways to specifically build and play said heroes, as well as their weaknesses and strengths when paired with other heroes, it is arguably comparative to dynamic chess, if not more complicated. Coupled with the iconic map as well as over a hundred items, there is no possible hope of having a sense of deja vu in this game. Of course, it entails an extremely steep learning curve but those who are willing to plough through the enourmous amounts of literature on the game and develop the necessary skills to make them competent will be greatly rewarded, albeit at the cost of their social lives (which has sadly happened to me). Of course, there is no end to learning in Dota. It is said that only 50% of the time is spent in the game. The rest is spent on reading up skills, builds, and other playstyles as well as watching videos of professionals duking it out with each other. Whether one derives enjoyment in self improvement through reading and watching is another matter. On the other hand, the infamous Dota community is a force to be reckoned with, as they are not so forgiving as communities of other games such as Starcraft. A piece of advice for newcomers-don't let negative comments put you off the game, everybody has to start somewhere.
Fenix;-;Amazing gameplay yet with a huge learning curve. Definitely the best MOBA until this day. F2P, a fair game I'd say. There are 100+ heroes, and they're all balanced :) You can pay for hats/cosmetics, but they don't affect the game itself, but the game experience, as they only change the interface or your hero's outfit/animation/effect. "The workshop is strong with this one." -Yoda This game has a lot of attention, it is updated, fixed, balanced as fast as noticed necessary. There are also some cool events throughout the year. Englobes many different strategies and play styles that will widen your vision, clutch skills, teamwork and help you improve your prestidigitation. Requires training. If you want to play this game, you should be open-minded, willing to learn. You may play this for years and still be able to learn new stuff. All in all it's totally worth it. And yeah, we now have techies :D gg 10/10 Here's a good and detailed guide: http://steamcommunity.com/sharedfiles/filedetails/?id=237442680
Greed;-;doto is good, volvo giff techies please
-SS-Keegan651;-;awesome game, hard to play if you have bad wifi or a bad PC
Sahailion;-;Part of my life
BubbleScale;-;Strategy and Teamwork game that have so many random possibility that cant never be the same.
[FS] FireSnipe;-;Best game i have played in my whole life :D. never gets boring, if you havent already tried it, DO IT. you will not regret it!
notSoHot;-;1/10 This game gave me acute pulmonary hypertension with a dash of cancer. Would recommend if you can afford your court-ordered anger management.
W;-;Idiots, boring mini-games, worthless tutorials, Garena level matchmaking, in-game guides by the community, puns, low priority gaming, Well Played!, balance, "economy", 1000 bugs, ez rares, screwed up mechanics, , godlike distribution, creative voice acting, cats, frogs with cats, RNG, 322 bets, documentaries, Kappa, cards, vodka vodka Boris Yeltsin, hundreds of oil, couriers without dagons, A WONDEFUL STOAH, korabl, treasure chests, boobs and hats. This game has it all!
JuPPe [NTF];-;This game gave me cancer.
The Baest;-;A great family game for you and your russian family to play together. Learn new languages such as prtugese, spanish, french, english and peruvian. Because everything i list here is true now go enjoy some family time.
Yoshi;-;No matter how  off I get, I'll still find myself wanting to queue for another game. & I do. Omniknight OP
Ayy Almao;-;Terrible game, made me hate everyone and everything about life, 10/10 would play again.
92 is Half of 99;-;Before this I had: A girlfriend, good grades, money, a job and a good social life, now I'm single, have ok-ish grades, no money, no job and have shouted my "friends" away. 10/10 Would recomend *Side note* This game teaches you languages better than classes or rosetta stone. I mean, I speak Russian and Filipino, now.
SporKor #TheBest;-;Best competitive game ever.
Rare Jimbo;-;sucks
Hitlarious;-;Just like Mario Party, Monopoly, And Super Smash Brothers, This game makes you hate yourself and everyone around you. You will lose some friends, and most likely will meet some, erm, interesting people. -Side note, would not reccommend unless you're trilingual. Download if you don't like your friends and if you have self confidence that you want to get rid of!
Pete;-;It's pretty good game
F[A]ttest [P]hoenix [M]an;-;This is an amazing game with hundreds of hours of play time after an initial learning curve
Lake Man;-;Is for plebs play habo hotel if yo'u'r'e' not a pleb lol
purplexstain;-;Addictive game for a freebie...hours will be spent not only playing, but researching how to best equip and build your characters.
Zer0 Inverse;-;This game ruined my life. I am not even kidding. i give it 10 stars out of 5.
Perfect.Is.Shit(PIS);-;please remove this ing low priority
[MaB]Luckwaz;-;Great skillful and challenging game you should only play this game though if u are very patient like i but it is still such an magnificent game
Want3d.Initial-D;-;Dota 2 is so good game ever who i playing every day
Guirufow;-;Addictive game, never thought I'd end up playing Dota, I gave it a try and have spent hours on it. Probably one of my favourite games, it also has a cool community and all the events are amazing and fun to play. Suggest you give it a try.
Romeo Knight;-;Addictive.
forget bitches aquire frags;-;I used to enjoy social interactions, after playing DOTA 2 I'm now certain I'm the only person in the world who doesn't have a mental disability! Thanks Valve!
Mavis^^;-;this is a best game i have played.
Zilbeena;-;It is fun, for the first week of playing i feel like I'm in the best game in the world. Great job of creating this game.
InFectioN.;-;Use ur brain and balls :D
Umbra;-;It is a very fun game to play, not just the graphics are awesome, but the gameplay itself makes you stay. Not to mention the awesome heroes released every month or so, plus the cool items they add on the store. You should definitely give it a try. (Warning: It's a bit addictive)
HOLY FUCK RYAN;-;I dont Like team with no Team Work
Seor Frootie;-;Has caused me to have extreme trust issues and an overall hatred for those around me, 10/10
Judas Iscariot;-;Fun game and great to play with your friends, the gameplay is easy enough to pick up when you're learning and can get really intense when you get into matches with people who know what they're doing. 9/10
*****1987;-;The game is good, especially for a free to play game. No bought benefits other than some vanity items. The only bad part of the game . . . . are the russians.
Darklight_2501;-;The most played game on Steam. I tried to like it, I really did. Something about it puts me off. Too much micro? Too much reliance on random teammates? Too many characters to choose from? You should try this, millions of people can't be wrong? I just can't seem to get into it... 3/5
#Mapo;-;Awesome game lots of fun Reccomende for everyone!!!
ShinyGordanFreeman - Space Pope;-;Best game I have played to date. I would recommend, and since it is free, check it out.
--Ujian_Meja--;-;ty...:)
Ftouni;-;It ruined my life.10/10
Twitch.tv/Zombaggs;-;A great game if you have friend's who play it.....it also helps to have a few teachers that can teach you how to play and the mechanic's.
fr0ze -A- |;-;Very good game. Recomend it to everyone!
<f/>;-;ITSSSSS ADICTEDDDDDD CANTSTOP PLAYING THISSSSS
MoodyCake;-;I'm sorry I don't have the time to play this game to get good at it, and I don't like it. This is a opinion review, you might like it...
ihminen;-;Best russian simulator there is. 10/10
Verinagos;-;I killed a dude only with my ultimate, playing as Lion. I r8 8/8 m8.
-Ghost-;-;Dota 2 is a Very good game in the world
Jestescie Chujami;-;Keep Calm and  Blyat.This game teach you that there's Russian West, Russian North and Russian East instead of Europe oh and picking language is pointless prepare for cyrlica 11/10 (Even Russain Federation of Australia)
LOVE;-;A very decent game very similar to the orginal dota map and I love the connection is stable.
<.Golden_Jasper.>;-;This game is just cool. I recommend to all fans of DotA.
'"Nrdic`;-;I almost drowned in my own vomit. i r8 8/8 m8
Googers;-;i go with the blazes
Cookie's Wookie;-;WAHAHA, cool game im just doing this review for higher steam level for more steam friends don't read this WAHA. Play dota 2 good game
[CRT]SilentSense;-;Best MOBA game out there u might wanna try!
Substance;-;Ruined my life. 10/10.
Actually Satan in disguise #evil;-;Made me lose all hope in my countrymen, as well as humanity in general. Great game.
Muslim;-;This game is my Best online game ever!!! Especially DOTA 2 Version with too many extra features. But in Dota 1 there are some heroes whose appearances and outlooks are more good as compared to dota 2 and vice-versa... but the items and heroe's set these features are awesome and made this game very good and outclass..
.Arian(&)StyLe.;-;It's My Old love <3 The Best Game in The World
IronSoldierofDeath;-;The puns are real.
Doflamingo;-;HAVE YOU EVER WANTED TO RAGE AT SOMEONE TO YOUR BALLS EXPLODED WELL, I HAVE FOUND THE GAME FOR YOU WELCOME TO AUSTIM SIM, YOU WILL FIND YOUR SELF SEARCHING IN SOLO QUE HOPEING FOR A GOOD TIME WHEN YOU GET MATCH WITH A TARD WHO INSTA LOCKS TECHIES AND DIES 3 TIMES AND RAGE QUIT SAME WITH ING MEEPO MIRCO SKILLS MY  Over all 11/10 Ever wanted to learn russian here ya go Now go  yourself.
KickASS;-;this is the most game
^ All Noobs;-;very good game when you try it you wont be able to leave it :P
Malamute1993;-;Much better than DotA.
cahoots;-;How 2 review this thing? You will make friends from around the world. You will be blown away by people's ignorance, and by your own budding racism. You will discover subtleties and nuances that make you want to improve. You will throw your mouse across the room. You'll blow money on unnecessary cosmetic items. But each character and item is so highly distinctive; each set of voice responses so vast and amusing; non-exploitative character designs; an extremely attentive and crowdsourced development philosophy. In spite of having just one playing field Dota2 manages to feel like something that's constantly "happening" as you play it.
4Rapiers.EXeC;-;I finally understood why we went to war with Peru in 1932. Good job Valve! :D
TheFallenMushroom;-;I got shouted at 10/10 GOTY
brkus;-;Dotka is a good game, I feel like it ripped of the more superior League of Legends though but it's a good game nonetheless. Doesn't require any skill and is a good game.
Moustachitar;-;this game is very good fun, maybe a bit difficult to pick up at first, but stick with it and im sure that you'll get the hang of it! It has a great range of unique characters that are all very fun to use, its a bit of a shame that you are only given a small selection of them each round as it means that even if you have a favourite, you wont always be able to play as them. Still, I recommend this game for anybody who enjoys strategy and winning ;) *this game might be a bit laggy if you have a lot of other stean games, thats the one reason why I dont still have it or warframe*
[C.I.A]MURDERER;-;it 's awesome game!
Stormy;-;Rosetta Stone was a rip off compared to this! I learned Russian in a couple minutes after my first game! >Well Played 10/10
Rev;-;Good game, just 1 advice. Avoid pinoy players at all cost. Trust me. If you want to keep your sanity clean.
Archbishop of Banterbury;-;Amazing game, best Moba around at the moment, does free to play very well and the gameplay doesn't suffer for not spending. Worth a play if you got the time.
Exeruda;-;It's the worst game I've played. 10/10 - IGN
Nguyen --KAWAIIIIIIIIIIII;-;i have fun trolling around with this game <3
crelm toothpaste;-;Bend the spoon. Warm the spoon from underneath with a lighter. Pull the spoon's contents into a syringe. Inject directly into your veins. Repeat.
Requiem Of A Doge;-;For the love of God DO NOT GET THIS GAME. All of your time will be spent playing or wishing you were playing it. At first its just pretty cool, then you get good and you want to show off a little bit so you play a bit more, then all that is left in your life is Dota.
Bacon;-;Played it for 5 minutes, the champions sucked and there were no summoner spells. 2/10.
Jane Doe;-;An amazing game for everybody. Loads of fun stuff, updates, expansions and all for free! It's rare that a games offers such fun for no money!
Luneko;-;Best MOBA out there in my opinion. This game was love at first sight! We're in a serious relationship now. Update: We broke up :<
Gelo;-;best moba game in steam
Failed MID Noob CARRY;-;This game so addictive 9/10. You can be rich if selling items
Gorri;-;Nice game forever
IONE;-;Awesome game! You gotta try it! :D
THANOS;-;I hated pinoys after playing this
LethalBacon;-;Truly a game that gets you accomplished but angry at the same time.
*-=GIH =-*;-;Best way to experience the culture of Russia, without ever having to go to Russia. ,    ,    ,          . 10/10.   .
ASCA;-;BEst game in the world!
lilsmurf;-;Great game. Masssive learning curve and never gets boring
Go Hard from Meet The Goods;-;This Is a Good Game
justkatie;-;Game is hard. Mid or feed.
[] Corbin;-;neat game, not one of my favourites though
Who's That Boss;-;These Game is Asome
iixball;-;I am totally addicted to DOTA 2. long times ago, I didn't play Dota 1 because I think it sucks. But now, Dota 2 is totally different. The graphic is good. The game is smooth. The battle is fun. This game is awesome. But it has one flaw, the server is suck. We need more server on asia. Overall , on scale 1 to 10. I give 9.
Kn[i]ght__r[i]der...:P;-;its a very sexy game/..
nickass;-;DotA 2. You either love it or you hate it. Also has one of the most tastiest free to play models out there.
Musketeer;-;NIce game wid addictive atmosphere and international exposure of a player...... having frnds all over the world and fighting as a team really nice one..!! :-) love itt..!!
vk;-;racism conditioning simulator 2014
Magical Assassin Nipple Play;-;it's horrible sometimes. You get some guy on your team spewing spanish which you can't understand, and who endlessly feeds. Next thing you know, you tell the other team to report them, and they're all hispanic. Then you look in the mirror and find out that you're hispanic too.
The Art Guns`;-;Start Now !!
Noblezzz;-;One of the best games out there and it's Free, what more could you want?. Be warned though it can be tough and unforgiving to start with!.
BoomShakalaka;-;Such a piece of  game. This game induces rage, causes you to damage everything around you and turns you into a racist. If played for long periods of time or when you are tired it WILL CAUSE SUICIDAL THOUGHTS. ....but i cant live without it
AdmiralLuffy;-;this game is... WOW! :D
Badman;-;This game is just a ripoff of Call Of Duty
#Smurf-#YoLo;-;Old game with renewed life from the good old warcraft 3 days
Nezmeriz;-;Leavers nearly evey second game, Russians / Ukrainians ( with no english level at all ) on EU ( ENG speaking servers ), novice players ruining games in ranked match, limited amount of tickets so how can we normal players make this community better? ...like what the *..* is this Valve!!! VALVE please WAKE UP and do something with it.... I have 1760hrs played I was in closed beta so I know what I am writing about.
barely alive gag;-;"MAMKU EBAL" "DNO EBANOE" "REPORT MY TEAM PLS"  .
MeeRuu;-;Best MOA game. Everyone should play this game.
mztique;-;best game everrrr~~~ cured my insomnia XD
FleX'N;-;I can say that this game is kind a good. I really love it and i continue playing it. I think every gamer who like strategy and mmo rpg games will love this game. So many things to do and learn, so meany characters and items, so many item builds. However you can see a lot of awesome animations and effects. You can explore the map at day and night. Also this game is not pay to win like other games, You just pay for character appearance ( if you would like ). I was a LoL gamer but when i tryed Dota 2 i thought that i left 5 years of playing kiddy game. This is an EPIC game with a lot of PVP and PVE and TM ( TeamWork). My rate is 10/10
Bonkers the Sad;-;u cant even jump bad gaem rebort for noob
[DvG] R3$P3CT F0R MH370 !!!;-;This Game Is The best =)
Simpley Orange;-;I suck at it so you should too
Algameth;-;This will provide hours of strategic, action packed, multiplayer glory!
Sleep@holic;-;best game of the year
M O N A N D O B O Y;-;Ruined my life and killed my bank account. Tought me how to speak Russian and that screaming at people while insulting them is the best way to cover up your inaptitudes at everything. Overall, good clean fun.
Spa Sapping;-;A real competitive game, Valve did a very nice job bringing dota 2. A real strategy game, a challeging fun game. There is over 112 Heroes to try, each one is balanced, and no hero is the most powerfull or the most weak, every hero in the game is equal, every hero have his / her's high and lows. And that my friend is Dota 2.
adasd;-;having fun playing this game!
GAVR;-;This Game Really AMAZING...
LORD DAN;-;When I first tried to play Dota 2 - around the same time it came out - I made the mistake of jumping right on in thinking I knew exactly what I was doing; obviously failing, I gave up and left about ten-minutes later, and throughout the course of a few months, I did this about five-times, because I wanted to understand what the big deal was about it, and why people found and still find this game so addictive. Up until recently, I hated it with a passion - not only for being killed over-and-over - but also for the sheer complexity of it overall, but, now I know, I wasn't taking the time to actually appreciate that complexity and realise that the learning curve was so full of depth, that if you set your mind to it, you can seriously enjoy it. Considering it's all based around one map, with the same game-mode every time, it's evident you'd think it'd get boring quickly - but you'd be wrong. Even though this is the case, there's so many different heroes, with different abilities, and different play-styles, it just makes it more enticing. It's also extremely strategic and teammates count for everything, which means you'll be working together and maybe even making some more friends. In conclusion: This game is worth every hour you're willing to invest into it, and if you enjoy learning, teamwork and have an addictive personality like me, then those hours are going to be endless.
Bwahaulie;-;LEARN TO SWEAR IN LANGUAGE YOU HAVE NEVER EVEN LEARNED, WHAT MORE CAN YOU ASK FOR? GET THIS GAME NOW.
Jet Steel Can't Melt Fuel Beams;-;Really awesome game, especially since it's free. Once you get into it, it becomes your life. Dota. Is. Life.
#Hope.gif;-;Well that escalated quickly...
DeNo;-;This is the Best Ever Games in the world for Me ...
`Lym7`;-;the very good game)))*
Suzarn``;-;I recommend!
Mayin;-;They say this game is free. It isn't. Not only has it taken all of my money but it has also taken my soul. 10/10 could not think of a better way to go.
The Single Lettuce;-;Every Good Moba
Kish4life;-;This morning. I had the offer to either have sex or play Dota, I told her to wait until my game was done. Dota will make you turn down sex. You dont want an abandon and the possible Low priority hellish nightmare. Dont download this game. You'll say "Ill play one game and then go to bed" and then youll hear that spongebob voice say "9 hours later" and youll be like. Wtf where did my day go. Oh well I might as well stay up all day and play until tonight. Its a monster. A vicious circle. It awakens inside of you and makes you want to kick small children, beat your wife, masturbate and open every door in the house without washing your hands first. Save yourselves!@ You must look within! Have a life!
The Gentleman Penguin;-;This game is extremely fun to play. Very team-based, but it still involves a lot of player skill. Don't be discouraged if you play your first match and die 20 times. This game has a very large learning curve, and you will become a good player with practice. I recommend playing a game with bots before you play against players. This gives you an idea of the mechanics of the game, as well as some of the heros' abilities. Overall, a very great game...and free!
PTS.vojtafiluta;-;One of the best free 2 play games. Best f2p game on Steam. You should try it! But there is something, what I dont like on Dota 2. Over powered heroes. :( 97/100 9/10 4.8/5
Gerrta Gough Fest;-;Lol, Dota, dont play this game if you want social gaming
TobbRobb;-;You can't go wrong with free. And among free games, this is top of the tiers. Getting over the learning curve and getting into the meat of the game is one of the most satisying experienes in gaming.
Shot3x;-;not great but good
mlg420NoScopeEbola;-;best game for masochists 2014 tremble in ecstasy as youre ed on and abused by your team while getting  by the enemies also causes: coma,necrosis of brain,schizophrenia, alzheimers syndrom, tourettes syndrome, dissociative identity disorder,epileptic seizures, brain cancer, major depressive disorder, anxiety disorders, migraine, delirium, dementia, psychosis, dysentery and total organ failure enjoy 11/10
Skoke;-;This is such a good game, its tough to learn and get into but I love playing this
||||;-;I've been playing this game for many years now , the most strategic game to play for my opinion ,especially when you play it with your mates.
KentVejt;-;Im not liking it alot.Im not some fan of strategy games
NewbieGummi;-;good to spend 10-15 free minutes
Stilldeadly;-;Dota 2 for life \m/
.:M_ilchaK:.;-;This Is One Of The best Games In Online World but We Cant Win Any Games , Cuz This Russians ...
Roshgarroth #;-;More competitive then dota 1, but yet so hard to play. It was so hard for some players who were used to dota 1 mechanics to adapt to dota 2. Abstract game, the camera is too close to the players, is just a pure chaos in a teamfight. Dota 1 is better.
I still Love you;-;best game ever ...waste time of ur life ...meet a lot of ed up people all around the world ..dota suck ..but still sucking it
Koko;-;Addicted
LMR;-;Dota 2 is a game that you can play the entire life course with friends for added fun, the game you play longer peridon and we'll play on for a long time, my score 10/10. Great game.
Mouhammed;-;There's a hedgehog who snugs all his goo on you while hiting you with a stick. 10/10
Axurr;-;i am afraid of leaving my home because some russian said that he will do things to me and my family where should i call for help? gabe? :((( i'm only 11 please respond
MC QWATES;-;The game that promotes teamwork but also russia 11/10 Would Bang Again
Nanaki;-;Highly recommended. easy for new players to get into and great fun with friends.
Sp00ns;-;Awesome game I strongly recommend it,its a very balanced game and a lot of heroes to choose i recommend it to everyone who have a bit extra time or a lot of extra time.10/10 :D
[P&W] Dondo;-;YOU DON T LIKE THIS??? THAT MEAN YOU HATE YOUR ING LIFE!! DESTROYED MY LIFE AND MADE ME RACIST AGAINST RUSSIANS 10/10 A MUST ING PLAY I HAVE SEEN THE FUTURE; YOU RE NOT IN IT AXE SAY THANK YOU FOR READING THIS! (culled you)
Frank Booth;-;Like crack. Only worse. Please help me stop...
KiCK;-;A great game everyone should try, if they like League of Legends. Dota 2 is very similar to LoL in many ways, with the gameplay, shops, and graphics. Although, in LoL you have to buy items, and there is no way to trade or earn anything. Plus, in LoL you get skins. In Dota, you get sets, with individual pieces. You can mix and match to your heart's content, and get discounted items from the Steam Community Market. A must play game! 5 out of 5 stars! <3
Ziggy;-;Can confirm that this game is Dota 2.
Bean;-;The best ARTS game
Zoid;-;Fast-paced action, character development, deep mechanics, strategy-intensive, and incredibly competitive. I've never been able to play a game for this long without geting bored of it.
MD;-;i just want a steam badge
Cridar;-;This is a great game if you'd like to get in touch with Russian culture. Ten/
Symphonyy;-;very good horror game set in russia in an apocalyptic setting where autism has taken over the world i r8 8/8 game is very spooky i do not recommend for kids
Duckie;-;this is my rvampd rvew of dota 2, my favret gam. pros: EXCELINT GAMPLEY! FUN COMBIT! VERY FRENDLY COMUNITY! VERY GOO STARGETY! u will meet gud frens, play intsense combit, and startergize with complix stratergies with ur new bes frends. the gamply is non-tedious an ther ar lodes of unique area 2 explor!!! the combit is vary intensne. when u c a guy yu wil hav 2 pull of vary vary complix and respondive keystrokes 2 be the victr with this games hare raisin and reflex base combit. u wil fel like a god as you blaize thru enemy lins with intense magik combit and complex movment. comunity is vary frendly and wil trete u with respec an suppoert thru ur jurney as u explore all th lands dota 2 has 2 offer. lik all mobas, this gams community cars about ur fun mor than wining. stratergy is vary compelx and u wil hav 2 try vary hard 2 decide wher 2 go and wat 2 do ther, her are sum of my favrit startegys. -tel ppl whethr 2 go mid hi or lo -waolk behine sumbuddy and use ur imense skil 2 gonk them in in intense batel off waolking bak n forth. -tel ppl what 2 buy -tell ppl what turet 2 destry ik u r like "OMG THAT IS SO COMPELX OPTION! HOW AM I 2 REMEBER AND PUT 2 GUD USE?" but wen ur playeing im sur ur bes frend u meet will remine u politly. evry vicrtry is no big dele and u will feel acomplish an b treat with respect by ur frens. rlly is thare anythin this game doesent have?!!?
Eyre;-;the best moba, the one and only
<Harem.Sitout>;-;Ruins your life! Also, learn new languages because no one seems to speak English in game! Crushes your self-confidence and lowers your intelligence to the brink of insanity! Team up with random  strangers online! Totally ruined my life! Highly recommended if you have nothing else to live for.
TheQuaker;-;Test your respect to other cultures and language in this awesome game!
FL.int | FL.ame;-;A general fun experience, blend with the addictiveness of fast pace action. A thumbs up for me.
Dong Imba;-;extreme action..show ur moves!!
Vibe;-;Incredibly frustrating and rage inducing game with super unfriendly community and beyond toxic players. WHAT'S NOT TO LIKE
wipeD`;-;Awesome game though you need to get into it. It's so complex in what you can do in order to win! Newer edit: The game is pretty, it runs well, its kinda balanced (some stuff is unbalanced) and it is fun - if you play with the right people. These CAN be random guys, which is not very frequent BUT possible! Its overcrowded with .. well lets say  but if you dont feed their trollmouths, you will be okay. Have not played ranked in weeks, I am going to start very soon again. OLD EDIT, just letting this in for reasons: Dont ever ing play ranked though, I'm (at the point of writing) having 600 hrs of Dota on record and played a ranked match. I got matched with 4 greeks (nothing bad so far). They had a gametime range of 1000-2000hrs, my enemies had ranges from 2000-2500. Where is the fairness? I thought that if I'd play ranked alone I would not get matched with people that are premade. This was ing unfair and I do not like that.
HaveYou Ever Tried to Fuck a Box;-;Dota 2 is the kind of game that attracts hardcore gamers. With the combination of buying the right items that affects the if you win or loose. To the simple clicks you make to move your hero. This game Is one of the best free to play games. With all the content the developers bring you. Dota 2 is meant for people who are good at multitasking and strategy. In this game you have to make decisions to kill a hero only to be killed by another hero. Or destroying that building that will help win the game however you will die and the enemy team will get more money. Dota 2 is an exceptional 9.5/10 game.
christopher burton;-;in single draft i cud actually pick 3
Ma R v Z ^_^;-;this game is awesome!
<Gamer Culun>;-;dota 2 so funny game, and i add 5 star to this game
K E E P;-;Dota2 is ing awesome i play this game less then 9 months but i like this game. I learn more from Dota2 teammates etc, and the one was important is i meet many people are very kindly to me and special one in my heart :) btw ty valve ty Dota2 u make my life colorful.
Dagames;-;I remember the first time I played a MOBA; back in Starcraft, playing AoS which was later re-made in Warcraft. Aeon of Strife, AOS, that's how we came to know games of its like. Afterwards, Tides of Blood popularized the custom map variant and the original Dota and it's ilk *About 100 different or so versions of it* spammed the custom map channels. Until All Stars came in and swept the competitions. Now we see Dota 2 here, nearly a decade later and I have to say... It's even better than it was back then. The balance now is impeccable (Not withstanding popular competitive picks), the community is friendlier (Than LoL or HoN's to say the least) and although more complex than its competitors, the game gives you everything from the start. It's a difficult game to be sure, but as a RTS-RPG hybrid, it contains depths of strategy, tactical complexity, and split-second reflex gameplay that is sure to delight and impress any gamer. Dota 2 is a highly polished e-sport designed to draw in and awe. Is it perfect? No. Is it good? You bet. For those of you who don't know what Dota 2 is, Dota is a mobile online battle arena, otherwise known as MOBA. You control a singular hero and play in a team of five heroes, who's task is to protect their ancient (home base) all while laying siege to the enemy ancient. The team who destroys the opposing ancient, wins the game. In conclusion, I highly recommend anyone to check this game out. You won't be disappointed.
ParkerM6;-;Great game, not comparable to LoL at all, the entire play feels different. Good strategic game, nice heros, some OP, some not -- learn to counter. Russians are a problem, but you get over it eventually... and yeah, let's hope you have some strong friends because after this you'll be screaming their head off. But who am I kidding, if you're playing this, you don't have friends.
Maverick;-;if you rage quickly,i recomend getting a steel mouse and keyboard.
Chilsesitaaa is;-;It's an amazing game - technically outstanding, showing all of Valve's usual polish and attention to detail, especially in the all-important multiplayer aspects. The continual balance tweaks and new heroes combined with the vast amount of content in the game offer countless hours of enjoyment. It's hard to master but good wins with your teammates are incredibly satisfying. It took me a long time to warm up to, but I'm helplessly addicted and every day look forward to getting home to fire this up with my friends. If you can spare the time - play it.
(NNO);-;11/10 like skyrim with a money vacuum
Meepo;-;Pretty good; hoping for a sequel.
MOS DEAF;-;Well. Like every other new and popular game that your friends force you into joining, DotA2 is worth staying in. Very heavy focus on team play, stunning graphics, massive hero/heroine selection, and the only thing you actually need to pay for is cosmetics. Honestly, I don't care much for the flamewar between DotA and LoL. Seriously, shut up already - it's obvious DotA 2 is better.
[xNB] Jongikz ();-;No scheduled maintenance every week. A game that is always available 24 hours a day, 7 days a week.
rhym;-;A great PvP game that offers some of the most intriguing and nuanced team combat around.
cHimAmiRe nO tsUki;-;it's really fun and very stratigic
Hardcore;-;worth waiting for
Gracie *aim.ru;-;n1ce play xD
Ko Noob Gyi;-;I love this game.
DesperagoN;-;Well, Dota is gonna suck all the time you have to play other games, it will drain all your positive attitude and make you discover the well hidden dark side of yourself.... Darth is gonne be pleased after you start this game.. Say goodbye to your personal life, gf and hobbies.. From now on your soul belong to Dota 2.. in the other side is fun, go and play it ;) p.s. ignore the russians
SmellyCat;-;If you need to read this to decide whether you should download this or not you are insanely idiotic...
Standin.Ar;-;yeah i Love playing dota 2
The Rebel Taco;-;THE RUSSIANS....THE IN RUSSIANS.....THEY ARE EVERYWHERE......RUUUUUN.......*dies*
Plankton (AdolfKirby);-;It'll give you back your virginity
NoodleShield;-;A blast from the past and a major landmark for competitive gaming. DOTA was originally a Warcraft III mod which immediately became a crowd favorite. The deep learning curve provides a true strategic experience and will keep you on your feet. With the enormous pool of different Heroes to pick from along with the collection of items that you can build, you can create multiple ways of approaching a situation/fight. This game is not easy to pick up, however, the basic mechanics can be quickly picked up/taught. With the revision backed by Valve, DOTA 2 is sparking up the esports scene once again. It is providing another source of life to a game that was part of the few that started the whole competitive scene overall. Although the game might seem "over-competitive", it is definitely a great game to have fun with a group of friends and can provide numerous amounts of fun and laughter. Games of the same genre/basic mechanics (MOBAs) are : League of Legends (LoL), and Heroes of Newerth (HoN).
FarmvillePlayer;-;good game well played
Registeel;-;Excellent game, free to play. Great Graphics, Fun Gameplay. There is no reason to not play it. If you are a gamer and like MOBA platform games, then i recommended this game for you
Ya Boy, Yeezy;-;Doto of the ancients > LoLegend league of Legends 10/IV would play again, best fps in today's scientific community
AmanoGinji;-;Boom Panes
iamgnob;-;Nice Game...so addictive
JUST. DO IT.;-;Tough to grap, at first, but once you figure out how to play, you can't stop. Even if you're terrible at it, like I am.
W@rFre@Kz!!;-;i want more items and frrwnds
skeleton?;-;i like the part where the monkey man comes out of nowhere and oneshots you
zippo;-;Best Russian Language-Learning Software on the market.
Fallen Knight;-;Nice game.
Standin.EemCee.[HyperX];-;Its a Really Fun and Addictive game for a person like Me thank you so much :D
SmittyWeberJegerManJanson;-;learn trading
Ryuh;-;I wasted 700 hours, a good education, the better part of my youth, sacrificed my health and may or may not have lost my girlfriend to this game. This game gave me so much stress i broke my mouse. 3 times. Magnificent game abosolutely recommend it. I give it a 10 OUT OF 10.
Moodkill;-;Great game, bad community. If you want to try this without playing dota 1 I suggest reading guides first before going for pub games or prepare to get flamed really badly.
Oldman;-;Good game! Everyone should play! Need a lot of practice and learning. Only playing cannot help you play better. You need to do some research on your own to improve your gameplay Requires a great amount of cooperation.
All Star Requiem;-;Dota 2 its a game where people leave in the first 5 minutes and everyone else is Russian 11/10
Mitt Romniknight;-;My grades have hit rock bottom and I have no social life. 10/10
SAMI;-;when i type LOL my hero laughs!!!!!!!!!1
LABAL;-;great game enough said
Slothhs;-;Almost 200 hours logged, still no idea what I'm doing 10/10 greatest evar
Lurtz;-;just play dota and win TI. No homo, No LoL!
NaTTy_H;-;This game is like a ier version of League of Legends. Obviously copied all the champions from League of Legends and just called them a different name and put them in Dota. Can't believe no one has realised what a blatant copy Dota is of League of Legends. 0/10
Griffith;-;-Learned russian in 3 days (Y) -Birth control and protection against STDs -Got muted for 2 weeks once for -ing everyone - Got reported because i didnt pick a ''TANK'' by a LoL player 10/10 still havent finished the game
TheOriginalVoid;-;Be careful that it doesn't take over your life XD
MYSTERY_?;-;Sure. Yes, this game is popular. But in my opinion I'm not a big fan of these games. Sorry. Don't hate me or anything. 6.5/10 -
JUST A BOY;-;DOTA 2, the only game in which you can be charged by a space cow and get bashed in the face only to find out that a lifestealing zombie will explode out of the space cow and shoot a laser out of his chest right in your head. :3 best combo all the wombo 10/10
uPhoRiC;-;Just download it already.
j o k e r;-;Playing since 5 years .. never get bored of it .. lots of hero's to play with different skills .. give it a shot Dots 2 worth it .
M'ori Le Dead Meat;-;teammate's, fansy hats and so epic games that all Dota 2. Worth the wait.
Pj*;-;Hell yeah
WILLIAM;-;This game is so this with my friends... It's better to play with someone you know
huebert;-;dont play if you value your time or sanity
Byte Me;-;it's all about "TEAMWORK "
3L!TE;-;this is the best game in the steam (for me) 10/10 good game
Otto;-;Much Peruvian, very rage
BurstBurst^;-;Some say this game is overrated. But i say this game is ing addictive. Rate 100/10. DEAL WITH IT!
warkey27.loveFN;-;nice gameplay...love this strategy game well
Happy Birthday to Indie (Me :3);-;When i first saw DOTA as a map on warcraft III , i didnt like it and i almost hated it. it was so hard to play and it was hard to process the buying system and a tons of other things. Buy when dota 2 came out , it had better graphics , better gameplay , humor , faster shopping system and it was easier to play (i mean real easier) . so i recommend this game a lot. and this game is free . for a person like me that lives in a country that doesnt have acsess to an american credit card. this thing that the game is free was like the gates of heaven opening to me. i love this game so much. and its awesome.
gery;-;Better MOBA game then LoL, less ragers. A good improvement from Dota, but where does the vALVE part come from?
~Lovi;-;love this game :)
Flair;-;Awesome game very fair and very competitive
cAr0LiN3;-;playing for my boyfriend..:)
JigSaul;-;Really outstanding game. Definitely give it a try sometime. Outstanding how they managed to make such a big and difficult game `easy`, try to dont get confused and fight through it. Worth the time, practice by playing with friends, watching games on YouTube(I really like PurgeGamers) or just watch a random pub. All of that is really instructive and helps you become a better player. PS: Playing the tutorial really helps.
FRED.errY;-;Dota2 is awesome. Hope that other hero will available ASAP! :)
Cailee :D;-;THE BEST GAME
Revolver Octopus;-;Player #1: "Don't end the game. Keep trolling" Player #2 : "Yeah, I've played Dota before."
Do Not Disturb! (Playing Lanjiao;-;I like the game Dota 2, but I don't like other country people treat Philippines and other neighboring countries like that, I want them to be treated fairly.. I'm strongly affected by people wanting Filipinos to be gone in the Dota 2 world , Games are for everyone.. Please change..
MaxofPower;-;most challenging game i have ever played :)
RCXY;-;This is the best game.
Raydin;-;I was forced to play this game
Drkos Synicle TF:GO;-;75% of characters look like undead piles of crap and all the human females look like s... 10/10 In seriousnes, most of the charcters look pretty cool, even the undead ones, no hold backs on the female humans looking like s though. I'm not really a big fan of the game or any MOBA game as a matter of a fact, but when trying this game out I actually got pretty addicted to it for a while. I recommend trying this with friends though, makes the expirence better and gives less worries of meeting a stranger whom is gonna curse you out for eating his tree that one time... I recommend trying out the hero named "Sniper" if you're gonna play the game for the first time.
Ellie Phil;-;Dota has become one of the most popular games ever, being one of the Top 10 most played games on Steam. Here's why. The learning curve. Some might say this is the worst part of the game but almost no one can deny that it's what gets you addicted and stuck in this world of heroes, might and magic. Like any traditional MOBA, each hero has it's own distinctive role from support to carry and many other positions. Dota focuses mainly on building your character up in the beginning of a match and then through teamwork and strategy, going head to head with the other team and "pushing" (Destroying the enemy team's towers, creeps, etc.) all the way to their "ancient" leading to its destruction and victory. It might sound strange to someone who may be unfamiliar with MOBA style games but, it's an art and science within itself, with millions of diehard fans constantly urging themselves to become better and more efficient with their playing styles. With the inclusion of the 100+ available characters, there are at least five different ways to play each character meaning there is an insane amount of replayability already staked onto the stellar online multiplayer experience of both casual, experienced and professional Dota 2 players. The game's learning curve will take at least 40 hours of in-game time and potentially hours of research outside of the game (YouTube, Wikis, etc.) which can seem like a major turn off for a game such as this. However, there is an offline practice mode available for new players to hone their skills and find out what characters they enjoy playing the most. I've read the other reviews for Dota 2 and found that many people are upset with Russians and Chinese going on US servers, causing a language barrier and potentially losing games because of that. I will admit, this is a problem that will hopefully be fixed in the near future, as it is rather problematic and detrimental to emerging victorious in a Dota 2 match. In conclusion, Dota 2 is a great game and has become one of my personal favourite games of all time. The amazing diversity of every match, the fantastic community and the overall amount of content being added every month is astonishing. Plus, it's a free to play. Not a pay to win, it's legitamately a F2P game. What do you got to lose? Give Dota 2 and try and find out what everyone is talking about. You won't regret it.
FloggedOutAussie;-;200+ Hours and still craving more. This is Dota 2 People! Cmooooooon 5/5... Would Bang ;)
();-;dota 2 is the best game !!!! i love!!!! <3
Skye5;-;One of the best game in Steam.
OneMadCat;-;I AM RUSSIAN BOI REIN, DOTA IS MY FAVORITE GAME BECASUE IT HELPS ME FORGET ABOUT BRUTAL COMMUNIST REGIME. ME SISTER AND MA WERE SOLD TO BUY POTATOES, BUT LINA IS MY SISTER NOW AND MIRIANA IS ME MA. I LOVE DOTA SO MUCH. NO COPYPASTA PLZ.
INNOCENT;-;Nice game.
Standin.Eggscalibur;-;dota 2 is the best strategy game i'ever played but servers are mostlu unstable. If the developers actaully take action against this is issue, i would rate dota 2 as the best game in the world.
V i r T u a l ~ V i l l a N;-;One of My Favorite Game. I Really Like This Game.
Trust in Trent;-;If I've learned anything from this CoD clone, its that {LINK REMOVED} http://memeplatter.webs.com/ is a really good help for this game. IGN rates 2/2
DontYouThinkThatMyNameIsTooLong?;-;too much  to handle even if u're putin enough. 4/20 would trai again.
LafRu;-;I met my lost father here!
Lovepreet Singh;-;Difficult to learn, but very fun once you get the hang of it.
Chix_Head;-;sometimes you win. sometimes you lose.
Move Like a GOD <3;-;So very Good Game .. Enjoy Much ..
Aladeen Mother Fvcker;-;COOL
Nixi;-;Amazing, upgraded version of the original Warcraft 3 DotA. Probably one of the hardest MOBAs out there, but becouse of that, it is challenging and fun. If you like the genre and love to be tested in both your patience and skill, this is the game for you!
Sauron | Lord of Mordor;-;Fliping amazing, it is a very good game but the european servers are full of russians and ukrainians all using riki
BYE OLD PROFILE;-;Best way to learn anger management, or maybe worsen it. 420/10 would play.
Senpai Notice Me Please;-;Better graphics and in-game models than all other warcraft sequels. steam should host more games by valve. great work.
NEVER;-;Prodigious Game,I just forget my life temporarily when I press Accept Game button.
jakub;-;i really love this game, i spent 1000 hours on the game and its the bets i ever played. its tricky in start, but when u keep play it, its just gets funnier and funnier.
muhammad ali;-;ruined my life
BloodChicken;-;Very balenced game. If you fear racism, death, rage, constipation, mental shutdown, addiction, rampages, and smashed keyboards, this game is for you.
Prodigal Son;-;very exciting! as far as i played games this is the best for me :) hope u guys like it too
Rayna;-;Dota 2 is a wonderfully fun game! The game is bright and colorful and with a huge variety of characters to play and has easily become one of the biggest played multiplayer strategy games I've seen. As you play it rewards you with items you can use later and customizable items for your favorite characters in game. I recommend this game to anyone who enjoys a good strategy game.
DeAD PoOl >(0_0)<;-;just playing this dota 2 game for timepass :) and the game is really awesome !!!!!!
YUR|\|ER();-;Simply the best
SalwaBELLS;-;A RTS game which play by 10 players,divided by 2 teams ( Radiant and Dire) This game is so excited because of there are so many heroes which their skills are so variants,such as stun,kill,healing,disabling and so on. DoTA is the game like chess and soccer, because you must use strategy to defeat your enemy,not just kill,looking for gold. For amateurs this game can use build help if the amateurs dont know what item must they build. Remember,in this game you must be patient and cooperative when your teammates doing some fault because in this game there are winner and losser,the way you prove that you are pro is by cover up your teammates. I very reccomend this game not only just a guy can play this game,also a girl like me can also play too. End of my talk, I LOVE DoTA2
STEFAN;-;better than cancer
Dino (Medic in Training);-;Guys get this you can.......be turned into a pig 10/10
- Picker -;-;the greatest game online in the world !!!!
[UMCS]Wulfe;-;DOTA 2, this name needs no explanation, and yet, so much explanation. To say that this game has not changed my life would be a lie. DOTA 2 has proven that it can both create and destroy life, in term qualify itself as God. To speak lowly of DOTA 2 is heresy, but I am a heretic by default, a devil's advocate who speaks out against DOTA 2. DOTA, its predecessor, was an amazing map that I used to play with friends, DOTA 2 is just a target jokes nowadays. Boasting a lovely all Russian Matchmaking, with off-branches such as Turkey Matchmaking and Brazilian (HueHueHue) Matchmaking. If you wish to play DOTA 2, all I can say is go ahead. It's an amazing game that deserves so much more, a one man's story. It's you, and them, your team's just a meat shield. Don't let others coerce you into wasting your precious, hard-farmed gold on those pesky wards or, god forbid, support someone. Remember, chicks dig carries, so always pick them. Plz add VRZO, pokemonftw. 420SwagYOLO4EVER!
OneScrubDuck;-;Be prepared to lose your life on this one............
Akarin~~~~;-;Learn Russian and Spanish for free in Volvo's addition to it's games with 2 in it!
[VINITY] Buggy00;-;DotA all-Stars was the one that started the MOBA gaming genre. Pretenders to the throne such as HoN or LoL were no match of what the mighty Valve have done, rebooting the mod into an award winning game. To me each hero has a unique feels to them which gives them there own stregths and weakness, some heros do feel overpowerd in some aspects, but if you have a good team with different heros with different roles, your team is bound to win. The things i find annoying in game are the ammount of people that always leave a game because of rage quit, these people need to learn a lesson or to about good sportsmanship. Another is languages, make sure you read up on your: -Russian -Spanish -Indonesian language books for the best experiacne, so you don't have to stop and type to your team "ENGLISH" Overall, this game is a great a game with balanced mechanics in all aspects of the game, im glad i waste 45 minutes per match to play a great game. 9.2/10
Jerickohh;-;Well, I dislike some attitudes of players in this game but overall this game is fun and addictive.
vk;-;racism conditioning simulator 2014
Blanca Nieves;-;THE BEST GAME EVER. Iven if you dont know how to play good, you will always have fun
Xoneia;-;Brings back the old Dota feel but still more enjoyable and challenging. Still gives me the same satisfaction as the first one, only this time it's better with the skins, UI, etc.
Peek-A-Boo;-;the first time you play it will be like WAT TEH FAK IS DIS SHET??!?!?,Y TEI KEL MI SO FAST?!?!??!,but after some practice you will understand it and be like OH MAI GAD THE BEZT GAIM EVAH!! or hate it bcuz you dont like rpg like games,so totally recommend it C:
LoveYa ";D;-;Best MOBA ever :) Thats all :) 10/10
Alice Park;-;fun and competitive game.. addicted
Vroksnak;-;Best game since my friend introduce it too me
untitled;-;OMG NOOB TEAM REPORT REPORT
unny;-;Great game. I have been playing dota 1 in the old days and although the game is great, I found myself constantly complaining about the lag, network issues and lack of a community. However, dota 2 has solved all that and to my suprise, even improved on what I would have though would be the perfect game. However, becareful. Once you join Dota 2, there is no turning back. Be prepared to lose a bulk of your life.
Rev;-;Good game, just 1 advice. Avoid pinoy players at all cost. Trust me. If you want to keep your sanity clean.
Archbishop of Banterbury;-;Amazing game, best Moba around at the moment, does free to play very well and the gameplay doesn't suffer for not spending. Worth a play if you got the time.
Exeruda;-;It's the worst game I've played. 10/10 - IGN
Nguyen --KAWAIIIIIIIIIIII;-;i have fun trolling around with this game <3
crelm toothpaste;-;Bend the spoon. Warm the spoon from underneath with a lighter. Pull the spoon's contents into a syringe. Inject directly into your veins. Repeat.
Requiem Of A Doge;-;For the love of God DO NOT GET THIS GAME. All of your time will be spent playing or wishing you were playing it. At first its just pretty cool, then you get good and you want to show off a little bit so you play a bit more, then all that is left in your life is Dota.
Bacon;-;Played it for 5 minutes, the champions sucked and there were no summoner spells. 2/10.
Jane Doe;-;An amazing game for everybody. Loads of fun stuff, updates, expansions and all for free! It's rare that a games offers such fun for no money!
Na`Vi.DOClovesAnita;-;nice strategy base but seiously very addictive
Mr.cyclone;-;I Love D2 well play
SLAINE;-;this is the great game :D
Crazy Penguin;-;This is the most epic game ever
FeVeR;-;Often I am asked "What does a Good Game truly mean?" hue much depends upon the game (lets say dota) will you be a tryhard? then we have Heroes that are overpowered as  will you be a nooblord? then we can grant you matchmaking that puts you against even noobier players will you be wise? can you can PUBSTOMP NOOBLORDS TILL THEIR CHOCOLATEMILK EXPLODES ON THEIR MULTIPLE CHINS What does a good game truly mean? that is for you to decide.... theres also a talking tree and a fat cockney who hooks people
Zach;-;DRINK VODKA WIN DOTKA this game is SEXY AS  play it thats my REview
Smite Heathens;-;A universal language learner, learn Russian, Spanish, and English all at the low low cost of your self-esteem. However you won't be able to leave it alone, it consumes your life.
cbowes1;-;Difficult to get into at first, but once you do you'll love it, so don't feel discouraged if it's not fun to you at first.
[AWB]SNYMAN;-;The best game ever I recommend it ro everybody
unarmed.;-;A good strategy game. Enjoys playing.
Oppai;-;great game!
TheQuaker;-;Test your respect to other cultures and language in this awesome game!
FL.int | FL.ame;-;A general fun experience, blend with the addictiveness of fast pace action. A thumbs up for me.
Dong Imba;-;extreme action..show ur moves!!
Vibe;-;Incredibly frustrating and rage inducing game with super unfriendly community and beyond toxic players. WHAT'S NOT TO LIKE
Fredda;-;This game taught me about the diversity of cultures that our small little corner of the universe offers. Then it taught me to hate them all.
Chrome;-;Side effects include: -Hatred of other humans -Lack of trust in others -Carpal Tunnel -Improved hand eye coordination -A large ego -Weight gain -Weight loss -Confidence -Despression -Extreme Racism -EXTREME RACISM -Increased strategic thinking capabilities -Mushy-brain syndrome -Subconsciously learning a new language -Subconsciously learning to hate the culture of said language -Literally every ailment that is not a transmitable disease 9/10 Doctors accepted this game on their recommendation list, but the tenth was afk
Grizzt;-;It's like roulette; fun until it turns into Russian.
psych0tic;-;Causes anxiety problems, low self esteem, Tourette's syndrome, mood swings, Bipolar disorder, breakdown of relationships, raging erections, racism. Would definitely recommend.
Sentimental Oriental;-;In Dota 2, Not many people speak your language. Not many people play well. Not many people talk nicely. Not many people work as a team. But if you find people that do... You'll have the most fun you've ever had.
Kyubashi;-;And you thought real life was a struggle.
ephir;-;I only played a little but it was fun.
Captain Obvious;-;Things I gave to DotA: 1. Money 2. Time 3. Love Things DotA gave me: 1. Arthritis 2. Carpal tunnel syndrome 3, Hatred of Russians, Mexicans, Spanish, Finnish, and Russians 4. Broken keyboard 5. Broken mouse 6. 9/10 ready 7. Server crashes 8. 4 stacks of Russians in EUW servers on English prefrence settings 9. Ranked matches 10. Free to play but Pay to win games (I.E. - Foreseer's contract, New Bloom 2015) 11. "It's in the bag" spam (especially Skywrath) 12. Multilingual cursing - I guess this is a good thing? 13. Split second math - Reliable/Unreliable gold and gold loss on death vs. Buyback availability - This is good too Essentially - DotA is a greedy woman, but I love her all the same. 11 / 10 would play again
HekaDooM;-;"THE PUB SUPPORT" "Where are wards?" The pub Carry demanded. "I placed them and they were countered" the Support began, "I am trying to juggle giving you complete lane farm, protecting you and harrassing the enemy while saving to buy more, also possibly sentries to remove their-" "UP COUR PLS" the mid hero politely added. "Give Savle" The Carry demanded. "Certainly." replies the support, using the salve on the Carry who subsequently ran headlong into an enemy creepwave. "So where is mek?" the Carry said, after he was ganked due to overextending. The Support died saving him and was treated to a rather enthusiastic series of map pings on his corpse. "Again, having not even enough to buy boots as well as wards, I don't think a 7 minute Mek is viable." The Support replies. "Haha look your level, so low, noob" the Carry retorted. "U have no item xaxa". "Well, jungle gold and experience through stacking and pulling with blocked camps is nowhere near as much as on lane which I attempted to give you, the carry, the priority over." The Carry is subsequently ganked again at the enemy tower, oblivious to the enemy tp that the Support moved away from. "Report Support, usless" The carry cried in allchat, in between mentioning various aspects of the Support's Mother's anatomy. "Instead of reporting and acting like that, why don't you try supporting for randoms sometime instead of instapicking a carry?" the Support asked, as he watched the Carry return to afk-lasthitting lane creeps. "HAH, support is for noskill noobs like you!"
flanadlivv;-;One day, a wise man intoduce me into this game. "it shall protect your virginity, my lad" he said.
M.;-;The best part of my life. D2
Mozart;-;blah blah blah im only doing this for steam levels
VexonK;-;Truly an amazing game once u start to play it with ur friends or with other people. Although it might be confusing and difficult from the start, but once u start playing u just cant stop. And u get all that experience for FREE
<>;-;Better than LoL~
JRG.Deerstalker;-;Cool Cool Cool !
Mr. Zazu;-;This game has ruined my life. It's so great and I play it almost every day.
Carl;-;How do i use my legs?
Gorri;-;Nice game forever
[CK] MeatHammer;-;This is a game. It is harder than Obama's  when he first put on a pair of Jordans. I recommend it if you have a lot of time, and sperm on your hands. If you play this game you will hate children forever. Yours Truly- Rejekted
Tesserakt;-;Killing things is good
Exia;-;addictive...avoid at all cost!
Thorgrax;-;- Disclaimer - This review is for the Standard Edition of Batman: Arkham City, as of 08/08/2014 the review feature for said game has been disabled - This game is a bomb. I've never been deeply into the Batman franchise, never read any comics. Back in the day when it was on TV, "Batman - The Animated Series" gained my attention and never lost it. Batman:Arkham city is arguably the best, longest and most refined entry in this current series of games. It was thankfully developed by the Rocksteady studio under the guidance of Paul Dini, the main writer for the Animated Series. That whole thing plays like a Batman movie produced by Christopher Nolan. Talking about immersion. You will think you are batman. And that the events happening really occur TO YOU as the witnessing player. Stunning graphics, excellent sound design and a well rounded combat system give this game the edge it needs to turn you into a non lethal crime fighting combat machine. Comes with leaderboards,challenge maps and a multiplayer mode, nothing short of a single player campaign 30+ hours rich, set up in an open air prison this game shows, how deep the rabbit whole of human cruelty really goes. This is lore wise easyly one of the best games I've ever played in my whole life and I hope Rocksteady will soon deliver an Arkham City 2 after the letdown that was Arkham Origins. That what you get when you change a winning team, Eidos. If you like super heros, or punching based action games, or just good movies in general, pls do yourself a favour and buy this game. It'll be a sad story if you miss out on it.
Ninja_Beat;-;Real Time Strategy, micro one character, but strategize with bots, teammates, items, board features, and more! Replayability is like a physical sport, the game is different every time! One of the founders of the MOBA (Multiplayer Online Battle Arena) genre! One of my favorites obviously!
pilot;-;well played !!
Mga Chotoy !!!!!;-;Very Nice
Flankovic;-;Dis be my life
[LDT] Hardcore Bob;-;I'll admit it, I haven't played any of its competitors (LoL, HoN) enough to justify saying that it's the best of them all, but from what I've gathered: it is. At least graphically it's undeniably superior. Sure it's hard at first, but there's nothing more satisfying than seeing yourself climb up that learning curve! I recommend this game because I've had a buttload of fun with it!
Fayde;-;Great game!
Fred;-;Once you get past the not knowing anything stage, this game is really enjoyable! Just endure the first few games you play and be prepared to learn quickly!
Yetkatelina;-;Really ing Good
FluffyFish;-;A game that makes you both angry and happy. A game that makes you realize that most people are jerks.
F1004 Shoppa;-;Most popular strategic game in the world
<!-- /. Clicker -->;-;Probably the best game ever created. I recommend this game to everyone.
*LV*Harcciks;-;Realy intersting and cool game to play with friens and sometimes alone too!!!
Manly;-;Best MOBA game in this Era.
DJ_JESUS;-;very good please buy it is must be good very much
Treann;-;The best game that helps you to wheter decide if you have to kill yourself or not, it all depends If the other guy on your team that you don't even know in real life tell you that you should end your life if he says so. Just remember, NEVER play it without a 5 player party.
Hippothalamus;-;Dota 2 is one of the best Free 2 Play First Person Shooters of the Animated Cartoon Genre I have ever seen. I have played this game for over 1000 hours and have learned many new languages such as Russian and Peruvian, I have learned that no matter how long you play the game there will always be someone there to tell you you are a "noob", and I have only thought about murdering my friends over this game twice. If there was a sequel to Dota 2 called "Dota 2- The Remake of the Remake of the Original Dota," I would play thousands of hours of it aswell. 10/10 Ruined My Life
Psychedelicacies;-;Ruined my life. Five stars to this game.
Caprisun Mango;-;ruin my life 10/10
Standin.agent_perry13;-;download this game only if you want to spend hours playing and for go your life.
Apollon;-;It's cool
eat that china banana;-;spent $500 on keys 11/10 will recommend to family and friends
Glarus Appenzell;-;No comment for this game, because it's awesome !!!!
A Hypophalangial Pianist;-;A lot of fun, but requires you soul in exchange for downloading.
SelamatHariRaya;-;as
<3 My life for G2;-;Gave russians a chance after hearing bad things about them. Reported twice and called a  for 30 mins.
CKG;-;Watched friend buy 6 health pots and 6 mana pots. Said he kept taking damage so he did it for the health. Friend gets mad because he doesn't understand mobas. Get face rolled. 10/10 would play
Ganti ID ke 170817962;-;The best ever game
Killabight;-;This is the best video game I've ever played hands down. I have so much to say where do I start. Ok so dont be turned away by the huge learning curve, when you start you will be TERRIBLE but thats ok and likely you may never be great but you will make amazing friends and have so much fun. Actually I wish i could go back to being a blissfully ignorant noob because learning hero's abilities, what certain items do, lane compesitions, ect I can go on forever about how much there is to learn even after 2.5k hours (probably 1.5k - 2k hours actually playing) I'm still learning! The game hits an odd paradox it can be the most satisfying and exciting game I've ever played but also the most enraging and frustrating, its a ing emotional roller coaster sometimes. There will be highs there will be lows from amazing comebacks, to terrible throws, great teamwork, and Brazilian  feeders. I've even tried giving up after long agonizing losing streaks but nothing, no other game can quite fill hole not playing this game for a few hours a day leaves. Its perfect for me, I love being social, competitive, passionate, and excited all maybe too much at times but thats just the kind of person I am. Some of my best friends I've made playing dota with and even though I've never meet most of them I love them all and noting can quite compare to queueing for a ranked captains mode game with a 5 stack. Valve is an amazing company and I'm glad they took the game and ran with it. Were constantly getting new seasonal events, heros, game modes, and more cosmetic items I can throw my money at. Oh and one of the best parts, all the heros are free and unlocked from the start! No progression system where you can buy characters with in game currency or level up some  passives in a skill tree or something (like a certain game). You don't need to spend a dime but I strongly suggest you should considering your funding not only the people who make the game but the cosmetics are created by the community who they pay! Also all the items are tradeable, Ive spent countless hours browsing trading sites looking to swap my items that I got for free as random drops for my favorite heros new hat or whatever. Ive spent way too much time watching pro games as well which Valve fully embraces, they even host one of the biggest e-sport tournaments ever every year called The International. I put a good bit of time into writing this review so thanks for reading it all if this even gets one person to give it a try then its not time wasted. I hope you enjoy the game half as much as I do.
Metapod;-;1 of the best game everr
PAPA Reinis SPRAY;-;great game for gamers thet like a games were you nead to think
KSG;-;Best MOBA on steam !!!
Pick Responsibly;-;Must Play!
Aph1d;-;2k h wasted, i regret nothing.
Hypergolic Enema;-;Terrible game, played by terrible people.
atilla the wavey;-;would recommend, all it costs is your time, your social life, your soul and any chance you had at losing your virginity
Brian Griffin;-;This game has made me racist towards those who speak any language other than english
Panda;-;Not just a better graphics of DotA , it brings a whole new concept :D
mnsss;-;This game ruined my life, thank you.
Vince Masuka;-;Dota rulez others sucks
VoW| davidt1234.crofut;-;A really fun MOBA. Solid and a joy to play. LoL, Smite, HoN, and DotA 2 are all competing for the best MOBA, and DotA is some fierce competition that those other MOBAs better watch out for. I love all these MOBAS (except Hon, never played it) and dota is definitely a strong opponent. my opinions on the game, very fun and strategic while also having some action in it. although it is a bit unbalanced.
bukkake assassin;-;yall think that this game is some , lemme tell u something it is. when i first played dota 2 i thought this game was some stupid  shit. i would play and get some  scores, feed and had a  time playing but then i played a game as riki and came out like 2 - 2, some mediocre score like that and i was hooked. swag
Lorde' Johan;-;Great game, gets addictive and a better version to LOL.
mobish;-;May cause loss of social life, severe anxiety and hate towards mankind in general and yourself specifically. 10/10 will be playing a lot
You're-not-ero(1.7);-;Lots od dedication. but fun as f......ood :D
DONTING;-;This game is awesome
Das irrsinnig Demoman;-;Be one of the champions in Dota 2, win or not, the world will never forget you, even you die. That's what I will call this game.
makson-kolbacon;-;it's amazing strategy game for people who knows how to play using brains
Dal Bong;-;I love this game because a lot of options hero and items to use while also being able to play with a lot of people! There is always insignificant updates!
Jordy;-;7/7 would become worse at everything but dota again
SAY_FFS_PLZ;-;The best thing about DOTA 2 is its player vs player action. The worst thing about DOTA 2 is its player vs player interaction.
Schwann, Avocat;-;Meet new and interesting people, and then report them.
Dreag;-;if you are male and like  you will love this
CryingBoys;-;Just make a strategy for defeat your enemy's
ZiPu;-;i recommend this game too all good players of dota 1 with good pc !!!!
Battle_Sheep;-;i just want a achievement from steam
@_@;-;lets do This!
[LiEN][)rK!;-;this is a very fun to play game for everyone....and I recommend any type of gamer to give this game a try...
Sleepy Geomancer;-;Great game, If you come from League of Legends you may have some trouble finding your groove with this game, but it is better than League, the Heroes of Newerth players will have fun too its just a cleaner version of HoN. For DotA is love DotA is life
521.CLR;-;verry nice game
ASuperFatTeddyBear;-;One of the best game better than LoL
HARRY;-;addictive..!!!!
Demonangel;-;let's continue playing from dota to dota2
Sir Nefarius;-;This game shows why Russia should be nuked.
Insylu;-;This is a game that you should play if you want to be a cool kids that hates themselves.
Tyrannic;-;Dota is life!!!!!!! xD
Roshless;-;Great way to improve your russian, especially swears.
SolidSauce;-;Dota 2 consists the most unblanaced heros for any game on the market as of right now! There so many over powered abilities on too many heros. In fact, the heros are considered over powered are played every single, of every single match. Dota 2 is the worst game, I have ever played due to the lack community(which is toxic), hero abilities which are over powered, and all around broken game. If you like your sanity, do not play this game. If you do not want to become racist, do not play this, if you don't rich pumping  tons of money into professional gaming just so the game can make a buck or two, do not play game. If you do not like Russia, do not play this game. If you do not like any hispanic, do no play this game. Basically, what saying to you, if you want to play a moba, go play league of legends.
ARMY-[69];-;Join Now Dota 2.. Have Fun game Player :)
shout out toe;-;dota 2 helped me get rid of all the people i thought were my friends. 10/10 great game valve.
Robert_o;-;best game on steam ever s2 =D
Imperium;-;If you want to get rich playing games then this is the game to play. This is an amazing multiplayer online battle arena. The real-time strategy is the best part. If you ever want to win a game you must out think you opponent. Communication with you team is key, although you might end up hating them shortly after they start dying. The only down fall is abrasive players, if you tend to die lot and feed the other team some of your teammates will release their rage upon you. Other than the sore losers that you will meet from time to time this game has an amazing community. The Dota 2 community is a bit crazy but in a good way for Valve at least because they spend over 20 million dollars in just over 2 weeks. Currently about 8 million of those dollars are going towards the prize pool of The International, the ultimate tornament for the best Dota 2 players in the world. The team that gets 1st place will get around 4 million dollars and 2nd through 8th place will split the rest. Keep in mind that this game is free to play it is not pay to win; you never have to pay anything to enjoy Dota 2 at its full potential. Everything that is sole in game is cosmetic and does not affect you performance in-game. Again I say if you want to get rich playing games then this is the game to play.
Cerveza Negra;-;I will surely recommend this game not only to boys but to girls like me as well...:)
You sux!;-;Nice game , sure this game like a real life . you can hide in tree and much more.
bBirytog;-;, i'm lost THREE years, one year dota 2 and two year warcraft dota
SeizeKill;-;Better than LoL!
Sup'l4nder;-;It teaches you russian ! Get it !
Standin.Takahashi;-;Nice Game,But hard to play
Pepe;-;I made a deal with the devil for this game. At the expense of my self esteem, my family my friends. Worth every soul. 10/10
Darklight_2501;-;The most played game on Steam. I tried to like it, I really did. Something about it puts me off. Too much micro? Too much reliance on random teammates? Too many characters to choose from? You should try this, millions of people can't be wrong? I just can't seem to get into it... 3/5
#Mapo;-;Awesome game lots of fun Reccomende for everyone!!!
ShinyGordanFreeman - Space Pope;-;Best game I have played to date. I would recommend, and since it is free, check it out.
Stephen Curry;-;THIS IS THE MOST AMAZING GAME EVER CREATED IN THE UNIVERSE OF HUMANITY!!!
Standin.KALpoKAL;-;this game make me addict to play everyday. and the most important is, this game is free to play. lol
Fang;-;this game is very nice!
KinG;-;one of the best games
Esky;-;One of the best game on Steam :D
Traxex;-;looks like i cant press yes"
Cygne;-;The best game in the history of gaming, LoL can go suck a big, black d***.
Kismet;-;it's a fun game. everyone can have a great time playing it especially when u aim to be better u have to think new strategies, tricks, and builds on your heroes and you have to play as a team not just by yourself.
AGoW;-;drow is so easy to counter
NoName;-;Great game realy
The entire population of China;-;Made my friends hate me even more, wakes up neighbours with late night rage & causes domestic violence if family members enter my room while playing. 10/10 GG.
DeadRoller;-;Highly Addictive. Stressful . But quite entertaining and it has infinite ways to win.
I E N N E;-;this is indeed the most played steam game i ever had ! :D
Mr.Grubbs;-;game is very much so fun.
Trouble Maker;-;The best game ever... ^_^
lost-diez;-;This game is not for everyone! Can bother one card, but that's the point, every time you run around the map 1 map, and the tactics are different actions, building, but with characters another story, a bunch of different weapons, clothes and so on, that you just do not get bored, I think this yoke ideal both boys and girls, but children to 14 years, I would not be allowed. A great game to blow off steam, to relax while playing you will not succeed! In this worth playing! All a nice game!
Really2n2;-;This is one of the best games I have played in a while. It takes forever to learn, I played 210 hours and barely know 2 hero's. Though, you meet very nice people on this game....actually all the people on my friends list are from this game it's very VERY team dependent, you could have all the kills in the world and still lose the game (once got 35 kills and still lost) and to be honest at frist I didn't like this game, I was used to FPS and I hated this game at frist but know it ruined my social life. Thought I'm addicted and can't get enough
Forest.;-;WARNING THIS GAME IS SOO GOOD YOU WILL FORGET ABOUT THE EVERYTHING ELSE. NOT RECOMMENDED FOR PEOPLE HAVING FAMILIES. OTHERS..... JUST ALL AND DOWNLOAD.
Burinn;-;Best game on the market if you want to learn Russian, have your self-esteem crushed by foreigners, or contemplate why you even bother breathing anymore.
.JaCK;-;if u played this game u will need a rehab to quit it +best game ever
Jimbob767;-;To start with if you're thinking of playing Dota2 it's going to be rough when you start and it's probably best to start with some friends, BUT when you get past that barrier you'll never find another game to fill that void of Dota2's MOBA experience. Would totally recommend this to anyone thinking of playing just beast through the beginners block and ignore the flamers :)
dana13424;-;If you're looking to play Dota 2, chances are you already know something of the genra your stepping into. You may have come from HoN, LoL, Smite, or other MOBA games. The objective of dota 2 is to level up your hero, gain gold, xp, and take down stuctures untill you can successfully kill the enemy anciant. Most moba's have this in common. So what sets Dota 2 apart from the rest? Simply put, Dota 2 is deeper in mechanics, the skill cap is higher, the e-sports matches are more dynamic and interesting, and it has some berrier to entry if you're the type to pick-up a new game and jump right in. What really seperates Dota 2 from other's in the genre is the tone of each match. You are punsihed for your mistakes (but it's your fault, not the games), rewarded for good play, spells are much stronger earlier, and roles for specific heros tend to be well established(but these roles can change as the meta game changes and new patches or heros emerge). If you want to play dota 2, please play the tutorial offered and some bot matches. Practice different heros, learn different roles, and see what style of play best suits you. Also, using the in-game guides, get to know the heros in the learn tab, as well as the items you can purchase. Videos can also be a god-send in learning the game, as can playing with friends. Going into the actual mechanics of the game would make this review stretch way to long, so it's really up to you to find out. Youtube is a great place to find content to help you learn the ins and outs of each class, character, or mechanic. If you are looking for a challanging and rewarding game, dota 2 is definitely a great pick. Stick with it a bit, learn the heros, and have some fun with friends. If you don't want a game that asks you to effort in to get something rewarding out, then look elsewhere.
Fredda;-;This game taught me about the diversity of cultures that our small little corner of the universe offers. Then it taught me to hate them all.
Chrome;-;Side effects include: -Hatred of other humans -Lack of trust in others -Carpal Tunnel -Improved hand eye coordination -A large ego -Weight gain -Weight loss -Confidence -Despression -Extreme Racism -EXTREME RACISM -Increased strategic thinking capabilities -Mushy-brain syndrome -Subconsciously learning a new language -Subconsciously learning to hate the culture of said language -Literally every ailment that is not a transmitable disease 9/10 Doctors accepted this game on their recommendation list, but the tenth was afk
Grizzt;-;It's like roulette; fun until it turns into Russian.
psych0tic;-;Causes anxiety problems, low self esteem, Tourette's syndrome, mood swings, Bipolar disorder, breakdown of relationships, raging erections, racism. Would definitely recommend.
Sentimental Oriental;-;In Dota 2, Not many people speak your language. Not many people play well. Not many people talk nicely. Not many people work as a team. But if you find people that do... You'll have the most fun you've ever had.
Kyubashi;-;And you thought real life was a struggle.
ephir;-;I only played a little but it was fun.
Captain Obvious;-;Things I gave to DotA: 1. Money 2. Time 3. Love Things DotA gave me: 1. Arthritis 2. Carpal tunnel syndrome 3, Hatred of Russians, Mexicans, Spanish, Finnish, and Russians 4. Broken keyboard 5. Broken mouse 6. 9/10 ready 7. Server crashes 8. 4 stacks of Russians in EUW servers on English prefrence settings 9. Ranked matches 10. Free to play but Pay to win games (I.E. - Foreseer's contract, New Bloom 2015) 11. "It's in the bag" spam (especially Skywrath) 12. Multilingual cursing - I guess this is a good thing? 13. Split second math - Reliable/Unreliable gold and gold loss on death vs. Buyback availability - This is good too Essentially - DotA is a greedy woman, but I love her all the same. 11 / 10 would play again
HekaDooM;-;"THE PUB SUPPORT" "Where are wards?" The pub Carry demanded. "I placed them and they were countered" the Support began, "I am trying to juggle giving you complete lane farm, protecting you and harrassing the enemy while saving to buy more, also possibly sentries to remove their-" "UP COUR PLS" the mid hero politely added. "Give Savle" The Carry demanded. "Certainly." replies the support, using the salve on the Carry who subsequently ran headlong into an enemy creepwave. "So where is mek?" the Carry said, after he was ganked due to overextending. The Support died saving him and was treated to a rather enthusiastic series of map pings on his corpse. "Again, having not even enough to buy boots as well as wards, I don't think a 7 minute Mek is viable." The Support replies. "Haha look your level, so low, noob" the Carry retorted. "U have no item xaxa". "Well, jungle gold and experience through stacking and pulling with blocked camps is nowhere near as much as on lane which I attempted to give you, the carry, the priority over." The Carry is subsequently ganked again at the enemy tower, oblivious to the enemy tp that the Support moved away from. "Report Support, usless" The carry cried in allchat, in between mentioning various aspects of the Support's Mother's anatomy. "Instead of reporting and acting like that, why don't you try supporting for randoms sometime instead of instapicking a carry?" the Support asked, as he watched the Carry return to afk-lasthitting lane creeps. "HAH, support is for noskill noobs like you!"
flanadlivv;-;One day, a wise man intoduce me into this game. "it shall protect your virginity, my lad" he said.
MrCheezz;-;This game will make you hate yourself and everyone around you, 10/10.
Krombopulos Michael;-;Centaur Warrunner aint horsin around
|Z| Nutzu3650XL;-;The only game which makes you racist, despite no racist content or reference!
Emiya Kiritsugu;-;If you have played moba style games before, then you'll like this game. It differs greatly from other moba style games because it delivers a wide variety of game modes and customizations. Furthermore, every champion in the game is unique. Itemisation is diverse, fun and you can have many different builds for just 1 champion. A very nice feature to this moba game is the option to change the Announcer. Tired of that old generic hag? You can get the Bastion voice over for example as many others. Moreover you can customize your hero skins and weapons. You can buy different courier skins and many other things that other moba games don't support. It's a fun moba game overall and it's worth trying out.
Moon V #Na'Vi +25;-;best game on steam no doubt. but i must admit that it is hard to understand but once you do! and i repeat that! once you get the game!!!!!!!!!! you will just love it!
UraniuM;-;very fun game if you get into it but its very hard and public games are horrible but still a very fun game
matcuth;-;this ing game. all my free time is gone. my thought is dedicated to this game. it has made me an extremely racist . it has destoyed my trust in other people. this game has caused me so much pain and anger, and i end up hating it every time i play it. ultimateley, 10/10 would pay for it. Gieff Mahna
Svantensson;-;I still have no idea of what i'm doing. 12000/56
Enishiat0r;-;If you want to have a life, don't play this game. This thing is more addicting than crack and will turn you into a racist.
Woot;-;This game improved so much since it was released on the beta. There are over 90 heroes to choose from currently and the gamplay is as intence and as rewarding as DOTA 1. I know alot of people will be hesitant to try it at first but there has been a new tutorial system implemented in DOTA 2 and I think it will help new comers. I know some people who play LOL might bash in this game, but both games are compleatly different. Its like comparing COD and Battlefield, they are so different that connot be compared. (no preference on either game, I think bot of them are good) Give this game a try, the learning curve is very steep but it is rewarding when you learn. I think this is the best gave valve has ever developed and has been the most played game on steam ever since the second year of beta development. Try it out, its free and badass,A great PvP game that offers some of the most intriguing and nuanced team combat around. The Best Game Ever
ShoddySkill;-;One of the best games you could ever play...all for the price of free. Make sure to give this one a go.
Standing.Pig'CanFly;-;one of the game which makes you want to play again and again, crafting new skills from different heros with each class and skills .. building new items build changing the play style of each heros and the game
9+10=21;-;An awesome game.. High learning curb, but once you get the basics, you just can't stop playing! It's a challenging, but very rewarding game!
G6;-;This Game Is awsome anybody can play!!!
Teo;-;Heart<3
SixSix;-;Dota 2 is one of the best game now. game that use teamwork and individual skill. all of emotions fill in this game. but this game truly not for children. coz,this game need consentration,comunication,skill and controled emotions. For me this game suitable for teenagers to adult.
KEYSER SOZE;-;This game will take up your life, and spit it out in a chewy residue on the floor. Not that it's a bad thing, I suppose it depends on what floats your boat. Just make sure you remember that it's Pete's fault for not RNG'ing hard enough on Axe, and buyback is stupid. Get this game.
on;-;Good strategic game! Fun and it doesn't get repetitive! How something as simple as going up and down 3 lanes and destroying the same buildings every game DOES NOT GET BORING! One of the best game of its type! This game was only just a custom map on Warcraft III, now it's one of the most played game in the entire world and the most prize pool winnings for tournaments for any game in any world! Defense Of The Ancients 2!
Sharham;-;Quite interesting and fun
RNGesus.CC;-;cool
Bunglon;-;this game is good
:(;-;1000/10 turns you and your friends into racists
&6ing;-;for the long time ago
Kot`;-;Nice Game :D
bigboy;-;If you're looking for depression, easy way to drop out of school, isolation from everyone, this is the game for you. Very addicting and rewarding,  cyka .
Mr.Bull;-;One does not simply don't play this game.
[A]qlezah;-;Good game for MoBA, beter than LoL i guess, Nice graphic, customable heroes,big trade community and stuff
Draven_K;-;I began playing Dota 2 at a time when I thought "MOBA" games were the weakest of the game genres. I always thought it was weird to play a game like this and whenever I saw gameplay videos of Dota 2 - I had no idea what the heck was going on. It never occured to me though, that this game would have baited me in for more hours of playtime. When I first started Dota, there was some training missions I had to go through. These explained the basics pretty well to me and eventually, I thought I knew what I was doing. Also, I also thought there would've been some sort of story mode (Due to the way the training was presented). Unfortunately, there was none but I could see some potential for a story-like mode. Although during my first public matchup, I did feel like quiting because I really did have no idea what I was doing and my "teammates" were complaining about how bad I was TO THE OTHER TEAM (That's right; the other team/our enemies). Then they all began calling me a noob. The amount of insults I received were terrible, but eventually I had a few other friends play the game along with me and that's when things began to change. That's when Dota 2 became something I actually loved to play because of friends, and because my friends and I got better. It came to a point when we started to insult the enemy team whenever we trashed them. Everytime we do that, it would just end up with us having fun regardless of us winning or not. That's what Dota 2 is for me: having a good time with friends and having fun. I then tried LoL and I came to the conclusion: Dota 2 > LoL So since this game is free to play, I highly recommend it. It's free so I say, "Why not?". It's best played with people you know, after all- it is a team based game. There are more things to talk about in Dota, but if you want to know what they are, play the game. Experience it.
JZX;-;just nice game but i want arcana for faceless void
hevilide;-;A MOBA game with pure Awesomeness and Unlimited fun . A game where you can play with your friends and make good strategies.
Fredda;-;This game taught me about the diversity of cultures that our small little corner of the universe offers. Then it taught me to hate them all.
Chrome;-;Side effects include: -Hatred of other humans -Lack of trust in others -Carpal Tunnel -Improved hand eye coordination -A large ego -Weight gain -Weight loss -Confidence -Despression -Extreme Racism -EXTREME RACISM -Increased strategic thinking capabilities -Mushy-brain syndrome -Subconsciously learning a new language -Subconsciously learning to hate the culture of said language -Literally every ailment that is not a transmitable disease 9/10 Doctors accepted this game on their recommendation list, but the tenth was afk
Grizzt;-;It's like roulette; fun until it turns into Russian.
psych0tic;-;Causes anxiety problems, low self esteem, Tourette's syndrome, mood swings, Bipolar disorder, breakdown of relationships, raging erections, racism. Would definitely recommend.
Sentimental Oriental;-;In Dota 2, Not many people speak your language. Not many people play well. Not many people talk nicely. Not many people work as a team. But if you find people that do... You'll have the most fun you've ever had.
Kyubashi;-;And you thought real life was a struggle.
ephir;-;I only played a little but it was fun.
Captain Obvious;-;Things I gave to DotA: 1. Money 2. Time 3. Love Things DotA gave me: 1. Arthritis 2. Carpal tunnel syndrome 3, Hatred of Russians, Mexicans, Spanish, Finnish, and Russians 4. Broken keyboard 5. Broken mouse 6. 9/10 ready 7. Server crashes 8. 4 stacks of Russians in EUW servers on English prefrence settings 9. Ranked matches 10. Free to play but Pay to win games (I.E. - Foreseer's contract, New Bloom 2015) 11. "It's in the bag" spam (especially Skywrath) 12. Multilingual cursing - I guess this is a good thing? 13. Split second math - Reliable/Unreliable gold and gold loss on death vs. Buyback availability - This is good too Essentially - DotA is a greedy woman, but I love her all the same. 11 / 10 would play again
HekaDooM;-;"THE PUB SUPPORT" "Where are wards?" The pub Carry demanded. "I placed them and they were countered" the Support began, "I am trying to juggle giving you complete lane farm, protecting you and harrassing the enemy while saving to buy more, also possibly sentries to remove their-" "UP COUR PLS" the mid hero politely added. "Give Savle" The Carry demanded. "Certainly." replies the support, using the salve on the Carry who subsequently ran headlong into an enemy creepwave. "So where is mek?" the Carry said, after he was ganked due to overextending. The Support died saving him and was treated to a rather enthusiastic series of map pings on his corpse. "Again, having not even enough to buy boots as well as wards, I don't think a 7 minute Mek is viable." The Support replies. "Haha look your level, so low, noob" the Carry retorted. "U have no item xaxa". "Well, jungle gold and experience through stacking and pulling with blocked camps is nowhere near as much as on lane which I attempted to give you, the carry, the priority over." The Carry is subsequently ganked again at the enemy tower, oblivious to the enemy tp that the Support moved away from. "Report Support, usless" The carry cried in allchat, in between mentioning various aspects of the Support's Mother's anatomy. "Instead of reporting and acting like that, why don't you try supporting for randoms sometime instead of instapicking a carry?" the Support asked, as he watched the Carry return to afk-lasthitting lane creeps. "HAH, support is for noskill noobs like you!"
flanadlivv;-;One day, a wise man intoduce me into this game. "it shall protect your virginity, my lad" he said.
[D.F] Ancalabond;-;I'm pretty sure all of my friends play it (caused this is where I met all of them lol) BUT THIS GAME IS AMAZING! Strategy is perfectly orchestrated into the captivating gameplay and perfect graphics, storyline is not key but there are hints and traces of it shot out at you through weapon flavor text and fanmade comics. All in all this game is great, and although it may seem that this game is kind of lame because you don't keep items after matches at first, that doesn't matterf after the first hour or so of gameplay.
HexerGene;-;this is awesome
[FTv];-;You Should Try This One
Rasputin the Lovemachine;-;I only write this to get the badge, 10/10
Shade;-;Ah yes, Dota 2...one of the best f2p games of the past several years. I love this game to death, as do a few of my friends, but this ame isn't really suited for everyone, so I thouht I'd use this space to point out some of the pros and cons that people should look for when checking out this game. Pros: First off, everything is free. You don't need to pay to play a hero, and cosmetic items are dropped periodically so you don't necessarily have to buy them yourself. Even if you do decide you want an item, you can often get if for just a few cents on the steam market. Next up, the hero diversity. Every hero feels fresh and unique, despite the limited number of roles to play. A support Jakiro plays VERY differently from say, a support Shadow Demon. All of the carries, supports, initiators, junglers, nukers, and gankers of the game have unique spells that allow you to simply switch heroes and feel like you're playing a completely different game. Now for the game itself. Dota 2 has a pretty decent variety of game modes, and has special events from time to time as well (Diretide, Frostivus, New bloom). If you get bored of doing all-pick games, try out captain's draft or the new random ability draft mode. If you don't like playing against people, there are also co-op bot games of various difficulties (and some of the harder bots are, well, actually a bit of a challenge). Cons: This game is hard. I'm not joking about that at all. A lot of new players get discouraged because they come in expecting to be able to pick things up fairly quickly...most usually don't. Many of the game's mechanics seem counter-intuitive (denying creeps/towers/low-health teammates), and thus the learning curve is quite steep. Additionally, a lot of new players fall into the trap of learning only one hero (often pubstompers like Rikki, Drow, Sniper, and Ursa), and then have no idea what to do whe their favorite hero gets picked by someone else. Diversify...don't just pick the same hero every game. It's ok to have a favorite to play, but you need to be flexible to play this game. Now, for the biggest issue in this game: the community. Like every online game, Dota has its problems, but people can just be jerks in this one. One fineexample is the drow I played with recently. She fed relentlessly, standing under towers and never payed attention to pings or her minimap, and then blamed us for dying constantly. All she wanted to do was auto-attack creeps ad hope to get a few last-hits in, nevermind surviving long enough to spend the gold. In this game, very few people will admit their own mistakes. It always has to be someone else's fault that you lost. Add to that the League players that you find every once in a while that only come on to shout obscenities into the mic while feeding (I'm not saying ALL league players do this, I enjoy both games from time to time), and you have a recipe for very, very frustrating games. Long story short, great game that's hard to learn, and hard to stick with unless you can deal with an  or two. Or four.
Romeo Knight;-;Addictive.
SwaGGer LaGGeR;-;The best competitive game in the world
DEFTMOS;-;Well created and fun to play.
Sam The Paddler;-;Never thought I'd enjoy playing a game where other players continuously ask me to develop some form of cancer and then burn in a fire for securing a kill.
CYYAA;-;Come on! Guys, Let's fight!
exhausted man;-;this game can be really fun sometimes other times i hate myself for playing it at all
happiness;-;this game wrecked my social life ! good games for teamwork
UnT@MeD$piriT;-;Great Strategy Game to be Played!!! :) :)
#TheArabianOiler: gay;-;Amazing game! Love the Slayers reference.
57 Pixels;-;This game is sure follow reasons why i dont have. 1 i dont have girlfreind anymore. 2 dont have social skill only at work. 3 why i sit up long into the night on a friday night. 4 BUT HAVE  OFF FUN and alot off sets xD
Cthulu;-;This game makes my nipples so hard that it gives me a boner, plus this game is better than LoL but starcraft is the best DOTA DOTA DOTA OI OI OI
El Mero Mero;-;Pown Russian and Brazillians all day
Captain Spaulding;-;The best game I have ever played, great experience, filled with fun, rage, racism etc.
juyst soi;-;this is game
*-)Xydel(-*;-;It's Fun and exciting items
Kin;-;Having not played the first Dota, I wasn't sure what to expect. I am happy to report that this is a pretty solid game!! I was very sceptical of only one game map and always "starting from scratch" but that seems to be a great equalizer.I really enjoy the multitude of characters as well as the overall feeling of the interface. Must play for any fan of PvP/RTS. "GOLD!, For my master!!!"
Carlos;-;good graphics
[MNI] Mr.Wobble;-;This is kewl. :D
312.;-;Yes, but is a nice game
Anglo;-;Mindless clicking,people with nothing better to do screaming at you,and completely not fun.This game is the pinnacle of human achievement there will never be anything greater.
^&! Legend;-;Very good community, basically the only reason I play this.
Salty Juniors;-;This game is so bad, why would I even think of playing this game.... 10/10 would get matched with Russians and Brazilians again.
Artifex;-;There is nothing else I would rather play in my spare time.
Ulterior Feline;-;A pulchritudinous looking game, it is definitely my personal favorite MOBA game yet. It has a huge hero roster, is completely free (the only possible transactions result in aesthetic changes), requires coordinated teamwork and has a huge fan base and community. That said, you should be wary of many of the players, as many are extremely negative and will work to frustrate and annoy you in whatever way possible. In many cases you will feel that an opponent is overpowered, or a particular hero is cheap, but I can assure that in 95% of these cases, that is not true. I would also highly recommend that you learn the basics first and complete the tutorial, because your first few games are gonna be rough; you will probably get crushed into the finest paste you've ever been in your life.
Mythe;-;Nice game and better than League of Legends.
TwerkItLikeMILEY;-;Its Really Nice TO Play Here!
Im an Albatraoz;-;well played !
Sufferwell;-;I love the smell of Dota 2 in the morning
[R];-;Recommended game
Bot Paul;-;so much love this game
Bill Nye the counter-spy;-;10/10 would bang literally the best game you can ask for. Fun,addictive,rage-inducing, THIS GAME WILL MAKE YOU BECONE A RACIST HOW FUN IS THAT? :D
hunteroff'zo;-;best game ofc. Dota 2 4 life. <3
KochiSNSD;-;10/10 When I became 6 I fingered Lina
Flip;-;Really really really good strategy game!!
Soybo;-;I find it a fun game, it takes a while for you to get ok/good at it (however I do not recomend doing matches against players until you have at least 100hours OR have played another arts/moba whichever acronym you perfer.) Though i cannot say if it is better then LoL or HoN because I have not played either and even if I had it would be purely my opinon. Anyway I find it fun, and (unless you don't like arts/moba style games) recommend it.
Akua ShuZen;-;Play It!!!
What the fuck do you want?;-;Literally the best game ever. 10/10
Vic Sotto;-;I love this game :)
Mizorus;-;Is great yo
Money Hoarder;-;Good game to play with friends
cream;-;Too many ing russians. region lock pls
Defalt;-;Dota 2 is a free Strategy / RPG type game made by the worlds most biggest and succesful Game Company - Valve. Dota 2 gives you the oppurtunity to learn skills and tactics you have never been able to learn before, and also has a money making potential to it. Dota lets you master different players in the game, getting stronger and unlocking new items for them to make them more "Buff". There are three lanes in Dota, Top, Bottom and Middle, all in which occupy a tower to defend the teams "Ancient". To win the game, you will need to destroy the towers to get to the ancient and then destroy the Ancient with it. 10/10, I love this game.
Killackous;-;Makes you look at yourself and think why cant you be as good as asians but then you dont even worry about it because you have a bigger dong.
Huy Ph;-;Addictive game, nice animation, good gameplay
Zatchi;-;10/10 volvo destroyed my life
GameBreaker :3;-;Like so much this game.. I have learned so much strategy in this game
Devas^3.NO MMR;-;my house on fire,but i still sit infront computer and continues playing. 11/10
Greed;-;doto is good, volvo giff techies please
Juxti;-;very good game, woudl recommend
Pzkpfw IV Ausf. H;-;Still better than LoL.
Double;-;It's pretty swell.
BoosterZ;-;Boss game ever made on the face of the earth!! GJ
RiVeX;-;One of the most addicting games I've played. Steep learning curve, sometimes harsh community, but fun to pick up and play. Everybody starts from scratch, and when you're done, "all the pieces go back in the box". THE standard for MOBA games. Get wrecked, never say NO to DOTA2.
Ariana Grande;-;What a great game.
Nice;-;Awesome game. Each match is different from the last. Highly addictive.
Shade;-;'tis good stuff :D
RoVa;-;Very addictive and dangerous game 10/10.
Bloop;-;its a game that you can play so do it
303;-;Teaches you Russian,you'll now be able to use the word '' when communicating with your Russian friends!10 out of 10 stars.
Anuku Lorasae;-;Fun,except for the russians.
Neclair;-;I like dota because it allows me to use my strategic plan and it also boost my confidence and to improve my team building training
Secret.Eul;-;"Dota 2 is the best ever game that I have ever play on my life!" - Wilson Leonardo :D
Xanadu of Lamneth;-;This game is great! I have spent over three-hundred hours perfecting my skills. One thing though, there are a lot of russians.... Those . WARNING: CAUSES RACISM 4/10 great game
McLovin';-;Welcome to Valve's new cash cow. Yup. This is why we're not seeing Episode 3 anytime soon.
Liem, Dc.;-;Addictive And Many Custom Hero Costume !
[D2N] Kito;-;i love this game
Autism Reloaded;-;This game is a marvel.It is so good that I would punch a ing baby panda.
Killakan;-;Such a fun game to play with friends, can be frustrating at times but you will always end up coming back to it.
wheyabolic;-;Awsome free to play MOBA. Over 300 hours logged and I haven't scratched the surface. Every game is different, technical like a game of chess. Learning curve is steep so practice with BOTS before going live. Overall good community. Disconnectors should face stiffer punishments as it really can ruin a match. A lot of non-english speaking players playing on US servers, which can make communicating strategies challenging. 9.5/10
Johnny;-;This game makes me so angry but I can't stop playing it, can someone help me? By not helping me 'cause I'm gonna keep on playing this game! I love Ancient App, PA, AM, and just like 1/3 the hero list! Give it a shot babyyyyyyyyyyy
FROST;-;fun playing it win or lose. hehe
JG;-;Nastylicous gamer crack-cocaine of dreams and nightmares.
BlackRose;-;nice strategy game
SpaM;-;A great game . Too bad that the russian  kids made it allmost impossible to enjoy it or to win a game.
PTX;-;How to become a sociopath 101
Dark Knight;-;Awesome game..highly addictive and entertaining.
our party got shut down;-;Holy  it's a time sucker
In You're Face !!;-;THE WORLD MOST AWESOME GAME THANKS VALVE FOR THIS DOTA2
Yonur;-;Don't give up after the first few losses, get a thick skin to be able to ignore the unhelpful comments from ppl, keep improving and then it's quite fun.
Comrade#2425;-;Complete waste of time playing this piece of crap, all you'll find is a pile of negativity and  cancers with broken fingers.
Filthy Casual I Am;-;Possitives: Have you played any other MOBA before playing Dota2? Well allow me to introduce you to the first son of the MOBA genre's father father, the one that started it all, Aeon of Strife. Dota 2 is a well balanced and evenly paced MOBA which offers a lot of variety when it comes to Heroes to play and items to make your hero stronger. The game has quite a steep learning curve, but once you feel like you've gone over that curve then the game becomes so enjoyable especially with friends. The game has now been released and is F2P, so what do you have to lose? Negatives: The community is quite hostile to anyone who doesn't play very well, sadly. A lot of Russian players don't even want to play with other Russians and instead choose the 'English' language preference and end up screwing over the people who actually do speak English and causes communication issues. The toxic behavior some people in this game can be unreal, and they will sometimes do whatever it takes to make your game horrible. Yeah, you can mute them and try to ignore them but surely they would be inclind to just help the enemy team by feeding themselves to them just because you done one thing wrong that they didn't like. But that's why you should try to play with as many friends as possible, in order to minimise this issue.
It's Beef!;-;Best multiplayer game I've ever played.
kk;-;This game is Very awsome!
Shwee;-;ONE DC makes my MMR drop......IS WHOLE TEAM DC AND CANT RECONNECT BACK + WE ARE WINNING IN THE GAME :) WELL PLAYED VOLVO
Jinx Jelly Jar bitterness.;-;This is for people who like spending far too long in these types of games really one of the only Valve games I HATE
GG;-;Nice game try once
xDecifer;-;Much fun, very game
Moon-Chan;-;This is best of best game in the year
Slasher;-;very addicting game :)
Trike Patrol;-;I love this game!!!
MisterBanan;-;I got called a noob 10/10 would get called a noob again
Yukinoshita Yukinon;-;Just like Snowy said \\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\ Horrible game. Hundreds of hours spent on playing on the same map, even with lots of heroes. After first 20-30 hours, u'll start to be too agressive. After first 100 hours, u'll split up with ur girl friend and u will play dota even more times per week. After 500 hours, u'll  every mom u will meet. After 1000 hours... You're nobody. You got no friends, no girldfriend, no knowledge... Everything u have is DOTA. Do not play this game.
Hat Hunter;-;This is pretty much my favourite game of all time. The learning curve for the game is pretty brutal and it is quite difficult to become good at it, but once you do become a competent player, the game is infinitely rewarding. The game is always changing with regular balance patches and holiday events and the cosmetic item system is pretty awesome. You can customize the appearance of all the heroes and it does not affect the balance of the game and I find collecting cosmetic items to be quite fun. If you are into trading you can make a ton of money (steam wallet funds) playing this game. Pretty much all my steam games come from profits from cosmetic DotA 2 item trading. I have been playing DotA for 10+ years (including WC3 DotA) and never get bored of this game. I have played other DotA style games before and HoN and LoL can't hold a candle to this game. Seriously, those other games do not even come close to being as good as DotA 2 in terms of game and community. There is also a large esports scene around DotA 2 if you are into that.
Legion;-;Can eat trees. Destroy trees with an item that chops down trees. Can be a walrus. Can be a Puck (no idea wtf Puck even is) This is a hard game. You will die. This isint League of Legends. This is dota. This aint no game. 10/10 One of the best mobas I've ever played. Pros ~ Great game play. Really good game to play with friends. Simple to learn but hard to master mechanics. Can be a Walrus. Very enjoyable once you've learnt the basics. Cons ~ This game is not newb friendly what so ever. Smurfs. Leavers. 10 year olds. Pudges ;-; Steep learning curve. You WILL sometimes be the only person on your team that speaks english (Even if you are queing for servers where you live. Worth trying if you want a challenging moba with a not so friendly community! :D
Mr. Strong;-;addicted to play
Slimy Stringy Stalks the movie;-;>Well Played!
Sovasin;-;This game taught me russian. /10 would recommend
cunt;-;The only ARTS worth actually playing, in my opinion. All the other ones around are made for people who can't/don't want to learn how to play Dota, which usually means they end up with at least somewhat dumbed down mechanics. (not that this necessarily makes them bad games, it just makes them a bit dull in my opinion) This game will, no doubt, take a fair bit of time (and reading) to get into, however it is possibly the most rewarding game I've ever played. I'd say the time spent is well worth it. Because of the fairly large learning curve, you can't judge Dota by your first impression of it (There's someone in particular I'm looking at here. You know who you are). Solo queue is pretty bloody awful, though (unless you have a fetish for angry Russians or something), so I'd suggest never playing without at least one friend queuing with you. My only other complaint about the game is that its in-game tutorial is, quite frankly, . While it does a good enough job covering basic mechanics, that is also the only thing it covers, and it will most likely teach you some bad habits along the way. I recommend the guide at http://www.purgegamers.com/welcome-to-dota-you-suck/ . It covers practically everything you might want to know. If you read through and remember the whole thing, you're probably already better at Dota than the average pubber, but even reading less than half of the guide will give you enough knowledge to get you started (as in, not getting a K/D/A of 0/21/3 every game). I definitely recommend this game to anyone with some leftover time on their hands and at least one friend who is a somewhat decent player. One last thing to note: Games usually take about 45 minutes but it's not uncommon to have games that last about an hour, so make sure you have at least an hour before you'll need to go do something when you start a match. DON'T LEAVE GAMES UNLESS IT IS ABSOLUTELY 100% NECESSARY. IT IS A  THING TO DO AND RUINS THE MATCH FOR THE 9 REMAINING PEOPLE.
Microsoft Powerpoint;-;Teamwork, fast reaction, attention to details, this game has it all
Captain Anal;-;A player declined the match. 9/10
kshortes;-;While fun once you give it time it is definitely not for people who cannot wade through a steep learning curve or new comers crossing over from other popular MOBA games.
Notice Me Senpai;-;I rate this game as one of the best MOBA, even more than League of Legends or Smite itself, great quality and good gameplay.
Gonzo;-;game is hard
Dave Bowman;-;1: Download the game 2:  tutorials, just search for a game 3: Pick Pudge 4: Feed
MC drfeedernoob;-;A beautiful game with rage, friends, feed, and Russians. Lose all your free time and friends. It is ok you have Dotes and you can make new friends. Have fun and don't feed.
Don't worry, papa;-;This game will destroy your nonexistent life.
GGnoRE;-;Have you ever tried crack? Me neither, but DotA 2 is probably going to be the closest thing to it. Imagine spending every waking moment thinking about something. Is it drugs? Love? No, no. It's DotA. And may the gods help you once you take the first step. But trust me, it's worth it. Just trust me.
You remind me of the babe;-;100% would rage again.
pubdles;-;Best and Worst game all at the same time.
War007007;-;If the game was a banana,it would be a good banana!!
War007007;-;If the game was a banana,it would be a good banana!!
Popolski;-;better than lol
Henchmen no. 25;-;Wonderful game. Very entertaining and the atmosphere is a little more relaxed then the other popular mobas. The beauty of this game is that it tends to emphasize individual initiative more than your ability to emulate the latest guides. As cool as that is nothing really compares to the strong sense of nostalgia players of Dota 1 will feel while playing since the game barrows as heavily from the original as is legally possible. That said you absolutely have to play with at least two friends otherwise you're playing experience will go to hell very quickly 1 - No regionalization of servers - ae: Theres going to be a lot of psychotic chittering mic spam and people who think they speak English are just going to shriek at you with preposterous accents. Unless reliving you're favorite moments of Full Metal Jacket strikes you as being the epitome of strategic entertainment you'll want to queue with some friends. 2 - Self Imposed Dictators - ae: Everyone knows the self important team leader type. Some stranger you have never met, seen or heard of who feels that its perfectly acceptable for him to tell you what skills you're going to pick during ability draft ext. Unless you enjoy angry, nasally congested, petty and vindictive mic spam you'll want to grab some friends. 3 - Steam is still technically PG-7 - ae: Only the characters in your games are allowed to curse. Stating to another player "wow you sure suck at dota!" is a punishable offence. This issue is compounded by the fact that the ban system is automated. A player will automatically be banned based on the number of reports they accrue cross scaled by time they accrued them in. Fortunately I have managed to avoid any of the chat bans but some of my friends havent been so lucky... Consider the math. One in four people on the internet may be defective. Four reports within a 2 hour period may get you banned. You play three 40 minute games. How is that going to shake out for you in the long run? It may not happen to you and it hasnt happened to me but sooner or later you are going to get flagged and auto punished by the assbrains and this could compromise youre whole steam account. You dont have to be a victim of an injustice to speak against it and I believe flatly that automated oversight is as dangerous as no oversight at all. Dangerous and foolish business. So like I said, bring at least two friends with you or prepare for a pretty hellacious experience. Otherwise its very fun.
Sucker Punch;-;what a awesome game :D but learn russian before you try it because its full of  russians really recommended
Crackers;-;If you are new to PC gaming or RTS/MOBA games, DotA 2 will appear as impenetrable as a wall. The learning curve for this game is by far the worst element of MOBAs. However, those of you with some experience with RTS games or are willing to learn will find the teamplay experience of DotA 2 an enjoyable. Would recommend to anyone with a competent PC and drive to play competitively.
JLY;-;Nice game for competitive and rest ;)
onan;-;best russian simulator ever
skaterbud;-;A great game! its like 'League of Legends' but with a better community that will not ask you to kill yourself if you get a kill as support
adrenaline <HyperX>;-;Good Game Can Play Online :D
Maeglas;-;Dota 2 deserves its intimidating reputation, and it probably wont suit you if youre looking to play casually. Theres a huge time investment before you can even enjoy a game, let alone feel competent at it. But once you start to learn its secrets, theres a wild and exciting variety of play here thats unmatched, even by its peers. Its a challenge of knowledge as well as reflexes, and success is a rush. The fact that its completely and totally free to play in the way we wish all free-to-play games could be isnt just one of the most generous propositions anywhere in gaming, it creates a level playing field where skill and cooperation is paramount. May the best team win. PS. Dont play with Russians
Panda Face;-;A game for which YOU have to use brain and brawns to win it!! A well worth E-Sport if i must say..
Arapios;-;For sure one of the most amazing games.
http://www.gogoanime.com;-;good game! A game of intense,strategy and fun! i would recommend it to my friends!
.Twinkle.;-;Its Fun
YESTERDAY YOU SAID TOMORROW;-;Big learning curve but addictive as heck. Better than League of Bellends too.
I am Murloc [Trading];-;Murdered a donkey with a hammer. 10/10 -Omniknight
harry potter;-;its really good
Clay Davis;-;One of the best games I have ever played! <3 <3 <3
Chieftain 203 SQN;-;its good and i wasted 10 years of my life playing this
MORT STELIT CHE;-;This is very wonderful game! A lot of emotions, new friends and the opportunity to play in a team!
Blind KoalaHunter;-;A great game to think that it only started as a mod ^^ Played it at the time, still playing, one of my favourite games ever. + Teaches teamwork. + Recuires multitasking, map awarnes, calling misses, ETC. + Great to play with friends, makes losing actually still quite fun (as long as you are not curp stomped). + Fun way to meet new people ;D - Takes a lot of your time, why? Addictive as hell... - Like all MOBA games (even this the great ancestor) community can be quite punishing. - Steep learning mountain to climb.
Bulleh;-;This game make titans cry and babies grow facial hair. Before you can properly assess this game, you must first climb the highest mountain while your consciousness is implanted into a robot at the bottom of the sea. The moment you realize the gold that this game achieves is the very same moment that you become one with the greater knowledge, so please wrap yourself in this higher power by becoming one with the Dota 2.
Remus;-;if ur thinkign about playing this game ing dont seriouly
Fredda;-;This game taught me about the diversity of cultures that our small little corner of the universe offers. Then it taught me to hate them all.
Chrome;-;Side effects include: -Hatred of other humans -Lack of trust in others -Carpal Tunnel -Improved hand eye coordination -A large ego -Weight gain -Weight loss -Confidence -Despression -Extreme Racism -EXTREME RACISM -Increased strategic thinking capabilities -Mushy-brain syndrome -Subconsciously learning a new language -Subconsciously learning to hate the culture of said language -Literally every ailment that is not a transmitable disease 9/10 Doctors accepted this game on their recommendation list, but the tenth was afk
Grizzt;-;It's like roulette; fun until it turns into Russian.
psych0tic;-;Causes anxiety problems, low self esteem, Tourette's syndrome, mood swings, Bipolar disorder, breakdown of relationships, raging erections, racism. Would definitely recommend.
Sentimental Oriental;-;In Dota 2, Not many people speak your language. Not many people play well. Not many people talk nicely. Not many people work as a team. But if you find people that do... You'll have the most fun you've ever had.
Kyubashi;-;And you thought real life was a struggle.
ephir;-;I only played a little but it was fun.
Captain Obvious;-;Things I gave to DotA: 1. Money 2. Time 3. Love Things DotA gave me: 1. Arthritis 2. Carpal tunnel syndrome 3, Hatred of Russians, Mexicans, Spanish, Finnish, and Russians 4. Broken keyboard 5. Broken mouse 6. 9/10 ready 7. Server crashes 8. 4 stacks of Russians in EUW servers on English prefrence settings 9. Ranked matches 10. Free to play but Pay to win games (I.E. - Foreseer's contract, New Bloom 2015) 11. "It's in the bag" spam (especially Skywrath) 12. Multilingual cursing - I guess this is a good thing? 13. Split second math - Reliable/Unreliable gold and gold loss on death vs. Buyback availability - This is good too Essentially - DotA is a greedy woman, but I love her all the same. 11 / 10 would play again
HekaDooM;-;"THE PUB SUPPORT" "Where are wards?" The pub Carry demanded. "I placed them and they were countered" the Support began, "I am trying to juggle giving you complete lane farm, protecting you and harrassing the enemy while saving to buy more, also possibly sentries to remove their-" "UP COUR PLS" the mid hero politely added. "Give Savle" The Carry demanded. "Certainly." replies the support, using the salve on the Carry who subsequently ran headlong into an enemy creepwave. "So where is mek?" the Carry said, after he was ganked due to overextending. The Support died saving him and was treated to a rather enthusiastic series of map pings on his corpse. "Again, having not even enough to buy boots as well as wards, I don't think a 7 minute Mek is viable." The Support replies. "Haha look your level, so low, noob" the Carry retorted. "U have no item xaxa". "Well, jungle gold and experience through stacking and pulling with blocked camps is nowhere near as much as on lane which I attempted to give you, the carry, the priority over." The Carry is subsequently ganked again at the enemy tower, oblivious to the enemy tp that the Support moved away from. "Report Support, usless" The carry cried in allchat, in between mentioning various aspects of the Support's Mother's anatomy. "Instead of reporting and acting like that, why don't you try supporting for randoms sometime instead of instapicking a carry?" the Support asked, as he watched the Carry return to afk-lasthitting lane creeps. "HAH, support is for noskill noobs like you!"
flanadlivv;-;One day, a wise man intoduce me into this game. "it shall protect your virginity, my lad" he said.
pRopeLLerHeaD.lu;-;Great tactical game! my favorite ever
Nelydia Senrose (not muted);-;mothering game
Gromath;-;Russian Simulator 2014. All you have to do is select in which Russia you want to play today.
KraZyJay;-;This community can go  itself
Irene Hutchinson;-;Worst game. Do not try this! Save your soul!
Cheezegami;-;Wanna get flamed all the time? Play Dota 2. The community is  poop and it ruins your life.
9mm's of Payback;-;if you like to watch your hero being stunned for atleast 5 seconds every fight / enjoy a game with 0 balancing / overly confusing and nasty looking shop ui / being raged at ,then this is for you who ever instalocks the broken heros 1st wins the match 1/10
th0ma5;-;Tried to like it but I just don't. Aside from the ecosystem and huge amount of heroes etc. the game itself just isn't fun to play for some reason. I would much rather play demigod or space moba stellar impact instead.
Woodrow;-;It's fun about 9% of the time, gives me anxiety dreams, makes me lash out at the few humans on this planet I actually like and the vast majority of the community are abusive s who are trying to assert how alpha they are on the internet. Stay away unless you're either one of those really cool people who think trolling is the best thing in the world or are apart of the small percentage of people who somehow genuinely think this game is good.
Nicolette Threnody;-;Most games reward the player to some degree, when they have sunk hundreds of hours into them. Dota 2 is the only time sink I have experienced where you get absolutely nowhere for your troubles... thanks to a heavily broken matchmaking system that can take forever to queue up a game (as I am writing this, a 5 stack for a ranked match can take up to 20 minutes!). Dota 2 is less about how skilled you are, and more about who you know. If you don't have at least a dozen experienced friends who are consistently competent, prepare to queue with some of the worst players you have ever played a multiplayer game with. As an added bonus, you will often get players who do not speak your language -- even in ranked games! I have often wished that I never started playing this game...
Ron Burgundy;-;Addicting and will make you hate everyone thats not from your country.
MolotovCokteas;-;this game.  this game for everything it is, and everything it stands for. Don't waste your time on this nonsense.
KOSMONAUT_;-;THIS GAME IS  ! ALL OFTHE VALVE GAMES ARE AWESOME , BUT THIS IS SOOO BAD AND STOOPID HOW CAN IT BE THE MOST PLAYED GAME ON STEAM ????
Comrade#2425;-;Complete waste of time playing this piece of crap, all you'll find is a pile of negativity and  cancers with broken fingers.
Filthy Casual I Am;-;Possitives: Have you played any other MOBA before playing Dota2? Well allow me to introduce you to the first son of the MOBA genre's father father, the one that started it all, Aeon of Strife. Dota 2 is a well balanced and evenly paced MOBA which offers a lot of variety when it comes to Heroes to play and items to make your hero stronger. The game has quite a steep learning curve, but once you feel like you've gone over that curve then the game becomes so enjoyable especially with friends. The game has now been released and is F2P, so what do you have to lose? Negatives: The community is quite hostile to anyone who doesn't play very well, sadly. A lot of Russian players don't even want to play with other Russians and instead choose the 'English' language preference and end up screwing over the people who actually do speak English and causes communication issues. The toxic behavior some people in this game can be unreal, and they will sometimes do whatever it takes to make your game horrible. Yeah, you can mute them and try to ignore them but surely they would be inclind to just help the enemy team by feeding themselves to them just because you done one thing wrong that they didn't like. But that's why you should try to play with as many friends as possible, in order to minimise this issue.
It's Beef!;-;Best multiplayer game I've ever played.
kk;-;This game is Very awsome!
Shwee;-;ONE DC makes my MMR drop......IS WHOLE TEAM DC AND CANT RECONNECT BACK + WE ARE WINNING IN THE GAME :) WELL PLAYED VOLVO
Jinx Jelly Jar bitterness.;-;This is for people who like spending far too long in these types of games really one of the only Valve games I HATE
Erbear;-;pudge is a bad hero
_BioHaZarD_;-;Stay away from Dota. It will poison your life. This game is not worth it at all.
KONO DIO DA;-;toxic community
Crucia;-;Dota 2 is a good game but I quit after I reached a point. The community really is worse. They are no cooperation at all. I appreciate some people trying to make the game a good game but the game is simply overrun by immatures or people who just wants to rage at others. As for people who are curious if they should play this game or not. My answer is: go ahead since it's free to play. As for those who just wants to have fun, this game is not for you. People who play this game is not about fun but about winning. If you plan on having fun, I suggest go get other game or people will just insult you in many different crappy languages (that doesn't even exist).
OP 007: Nebula;-;Dota 2 Dota 2 is a F2P MOBA game made by Valve and was in beta for a long time until it became free to the public in 2013. Dota 2 requires alot of skill and it isn't a game where ou jump right in to the game like TF2. Valve intended that players should find their favourite hero and learn tacticts with that hero however most players don't get that and hate on it for childish or just ride the hate wagon. Let's get to the game now... You start in the same map each time (And I would appreciate some more maps). Each side looks similar and there are 3 main roads to each team's spawn but they are protected by minions, towers and players, the objective is to destroy the towers and get to the enemy base and destroy this core thingamajic. You start leveling up your character and your abilities/hero gets stronger and it's key to the game. You will really need to play as a team rather than a lone wolf and will require you to speak with your teammates and not expect them to know your stun and attack plan. I will give this game a 4.7/5. I think it's a good game but it might need some new maps.
Spaniscool;-;Nig, tihs game is awesome yuo know
:-{([Vis])}-: Archdeath;-;Great game, intense action pack gameplay thats fun for everyone.
Trike Patrol;-;I love this game!!!
MisterBanan;-;I got called a noob 10/10 would get called a noob again
Yukinoshita Yukinon;-;Just like Snowy said \\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\\ Horrible game. Hundreds of hours spent on playing on the same map, even with lots of heroes. After first 20-30 hours, u'll start to be too agressive. After first 100 hours, u'll split up with ur girl friend and u will play dota even more times per week. After 500 hours, u'll  every mom u will meet. After 1000 hours... You're nobody. You got no friends, no girldfriend, no knowledge... Everything u have is DOTA. Do not play this game.
Hat Hunter;-;This is pretty much my favourite game of all time. The learning curve for the game is pretty brutal and it is quite difficult to become good at it, but once you do become a competent player, the game is infinitely rewarding. The game is always changing with regular balance patches and holiday events and the cosmetic item system is pretty awesome. You can customize the appearance of all the heroes and it does not affect the balance of the game and I find collecting cosmetic items to be quite fun. If you are into trading you can make a ton of money (steam wallet funds) playing this game. Pretty much all my steam games come from profits from cosmetic DotA 2 item trading. I have been playing DotA for 10+ years (including WC3 DotA) and never get bored of this game. I have played other DotA style games before and HoN and LoL can't hold a candle to this game. Seriously, those other games do not even come close to being as good as DotA 2 in terms of game and community. There is also a large esports scene around DotA 2 if you are into that.
Legion;-;Can eat trees. Destroy trees with an item that chops down trees. Can be a walrus. Can be a Puck (no idea wtf Puck even is) This is a hard game. You will die. This isint League of Legends. This is dota. This aint no game. 10/10 One of the best mobas I've ever played. Pros ~ Great game play. Really good game to play with friends. Simple to learn but hard to master mechanics. Can be a Walrus. Very enjoyable once you've learnt the basics. Cons ~ This game is not newb friendly what so ever. Smurfs. Leavers. 10 year olds. Pudges ;-; Steep learning curve. You WILL sometimes be the only person on your team that speaks english (Even if you are queing for servers where you live. Worth trying if you want a challenging moba with a not so friendly community! :D
Mr. Strong;-;addicted to play
Slimy Stringy Stalks the movie;-;>Well Played!
Skooks 3;-;Steep learning curb but hours of fun with friends!!!
Enfrcr;-;The most addictive game I have ever played..... Please stay away from this if you want to have a life.... >.<
Theal;-;Play this if you like being sad
JorReno;-;Please return Lion to his former glory(as seen in my avatar) Sincerely, Everyone
[OIDA] Castor96;-;Great game for ruining the last bit of social life you try to save from the cruel internet. Also the best foreign language teaching program on the world available. Highly addictive to the point of self-destruction and getting severe mental disorders. 10/10 would recommend
[ D z ] - B L i T z Y;-;YOU CanT See Me , Coz I'm BehinD YOu .. BooM Panes .. :D
Player4;-;With a learning curve higher than J0int on any given day, this game is challenging but rewarding. Be aware if you're new to the whole MOBA genre with magic/mana and all the number crunch g33ks, it's madness but becomes managable the more you play!
SwooshMalk;-;Better than league
Mr. Wasabe;-;cool
Toosey;-;Most played game. Never-ending learning. Versatile. Great artwork and animation. Aggressive, naive, cocky, idiotic players fill the community but most of your mates are probably playing and you just add the good people you meet along the way. Pick your supports first!
fuck la;-;its alright
MyrrhMyrrhMyrrhMyrrhMyrrhMyrrhMy;-;This is game is fun, battling with your friends against other players worldwide.. its a must play game in the gaming history!
Remy;-;League of legends 2 is a great first-person shooter, great story driven combat and a Outstanding player base, after the first few matches you get the hang of yelling at your team mates and hemroids, please, try this game, you won't be pleased. 2/9
ArifSahputra;-;Good Real Time Strategy game !!
Brendan Fraser's Career;-;This game is garbage
Nti;-;I like trying my best but  i dunno, sometimes my boobs get in the way of a kill and im more concerned about the kitchen than this incoming gank.... i wouldnt play with me!
Big Man Christie;-;Quite tough for new players, but you once you start digging deep you'll find an infinite amount of depth in this gem. Originally a Warcraft 3 mod, this faithful remake brings the original into an all new graphics style which is very pleasant to look at. The game itself is a bottomless pit of mastering every hero, every item, and digging deep into the mechanics for the win. This game rewards time investment with a world that in some ways rivals ten games in complexity and depth. Plus, it's completely free, save for cosmetic items that don't affect gameplay at all. This means that all the characters will be unlocked right from the get-go. And of course, new heroes are still being added from the mod. I really look forward to the ongoing future for this game - winning a match beats everything else in its euphoria effect, and riding the high is half the game of Dota 2. Play it - even if you're scared of the community.
Penguin Velocity;-;Low priority sucks and 6 games is to long but maybe it worth it for the game itself
3YED AL!;-;this is the best game i play in my life
CARL;-;I just want the community pillar
=V=;-;No other game such as this out there, i love it so much
HaMRuN;-;Love this game ever
Senamii;-;i like its capability of radiocall :)) perfect for those teams who are playing far from each other.
Rudou;-;Great game!!....... For Russians....
Kippe;-;You need to get this game! It is too good not to get. Join the millions! Play the game!
Porkvahkiin 2.0;-;The title itself is self explanatory, DotA, DotA2.
----;-;I love the game dota 2 Because they are so much fun and wonderful and my brother also loved :D !
Fuzzy Wuzzy;-;this is the game i love :)
MenInBlack;-;Very nice game ^^
Silf;-;It's a FUNtastic game to play Try it for yourself!
Microgynon30;-;Nice game For U
Dutol;-;if you want to learn varioius language like brasil, russia, and philipines in less than 6 hours and free, you come to the right place, recommended.
Vegeta;-;I highly recomend this game for people who want to take their game to the next level. I think that there is no excuse to not play this game, because with a price tag of $0.00 there is no risk in getting it. This game has blown me away and I am always looking to play more. Also this game is HUGE I have played around 320 hours of this game and just got started with this game. It is very deep and requires a lot of thinnking ahead and attention. So a brief recap of my review I say 10/10 and cant wait to see how Valve could make it any better.
Kay;-;This game is not for everyone! Can bother one card, but that's the point, every time you run around the map 1 map, and the tactics are different actions, building, but with characters another story, a bunch of different weapons, clothes and so on, that you just do not get bored, I think this yoke ideal both boys and girls, but children to 14 years, I would not be allowed. A great game to blow off steam, to relax while playing you will not succeed! In this worth playing! All a nice game!
Akanderino;-;bedre en league of lesbians!
Zyynn;-;I got a kill one time... that was nice
Friendly Neighborhood Pedophile;-;Neglected my studies because of this game.
1000 horsepower processor;-;Current meta sucks, next meta will probably suck just as well. This game is better off you recognizing every aspect of the game and getting used to the learning curve, play 600-2000 hours, get mad at it, and fanboy over professional teams. Fanboying and following professional teams and tournaments is the best way to go. Also the lore isn't half bad. TL;DR this game is better than League of ies
biask;-;this game sucks,you cant even jump
[JDGE]Pyrate;-;One of the most addictive games ever
the_rascrew;-;very best game in the world
|Skindrusk| Gamer Guy;-;I think that this is my favorite game. The game itself has very good graphics and has good controls, and the actual strategy and all the different rolls you can play make this so good. It does take a lot of time to learn, though. Looking back at my first games, I can't beleive that we all faild so hard. But now, with over 500 hours played, I think that I can say that I know what every Hero does and what every item gives you. It is very fun now. :)
Steenbal;-;Dota 2 is a perfect example of how a Free to play game should be. It starts you off with all the characters playable. You can pay for items but they also drop in-Game.
Na`Vi, tell me why? :(;-;nice game with interesting time to play.
Deuce;-;Only play this if you have thick skin and the patience to learn the game. If you have both then you are in for a good game. If not then lol
CJbro4509;-;Ruined my life 10/10
Terry Crews;-;This is a game that when you have played enough you will hate, but you will still come back to play again. When you loose you will say "I hate this game", then come back an hour, two hours or afew days later to try again. When you win you will love this game, play again untill you loose and quit the game again! 4 of 5 stars. Will play again.
COMEBACKHOME;-;dota2 is life of mine the best game of me
AlekWoLf;-;Good game, try it :)
Hemoroid;-;Best free-to-play game ever played
BOB;-;nice game .. awesome
Peruvian Power;-;best game ever XP 10 points grifindor
Spoon;-;Nice game. Develop teamwork and team strategies. :) two thumbs up!
SoRRoW;-;Stay away, or be addicted forever
PLAYI3OY;-;Best game to learn russian langauge in few games.
Captain gaben;-;This game is unlike any other moba game in the world. At first I was just like, this is the same as the first dota. But when my friends allowed me to play the game i was getting better every second, and i was getting into the game and wanted to play more. The game is great and i highly recommend it to all gamers out there. It might also help you sharpen your accuracy in games and ur time-ing. Anyway, great game guys i just started go try the game out i believe it's better than league of legends. Peace bros. Oh yah play windranger, she's hot.
{No}_Game_{No}_Life;-;to occupy my days are boring and dota 2 is the most exciting game in
Ozymandias;-;Pretty fun. You can play nonstop, especially with some friends to make a team. Even when you feel like you're behind in a game, a comeback is almost always possible. Just be careful, sometimes the servers get sluggish which still surprises me since Dota's been out for a while.
Rendizzles;-;Dota 2 is a British crime drama series produced by Granada Television for ITV and created and principally written by Jimmy McGovern. The series is centered on a criminal psychologist (or "cracker"), Dr Edward "Fitz" Fitzgerald, played by Robbie Coltrane. Set in Manchester, it consists of three series which were originally aired from 1993 to 1995. A 100-minute special set in Hong Kong followed in 1996, and another two-hour story in 2006.
Virginity Unlocker;-;Best online game i ever played...
Argonaut;-;I last reviewed this game over a year ago. At the time I had played it for about a hundred hours. In that review I spoke about its strategic depth, adrenaline pumping action, and emotional highs. Over a year later and I've played it for nearly 900. I was only scratching the surface. Dota is the thrill of scoring first blood in a bad matchup, as well as despair of seeing the enemy Spirit Breaker gank yet another one of your teammates. It's flashy teamfights, and precise positioning. It's chaotic 30-minute slugfests, and careful 70-minute economic tug-of-wars. It's the uneasy suspense of snatching Roshan right from under the enemy team's nose, and it's the mind-numbing frustration of having an enemy Nature's Prophet knock yet another one of your towers down and get away clean. It a hard-fought victory snatched from the jaws of defeat, and it's watching your team get torn apart, emotionally crumble, and begin to blame each other. Dota is my favorite game of all time, and I don't think I'll ever experience anything like it ever again.
K3R;-;This game has shown me that Video Games are not just a hobby in which we can just pass our time. It can also be our career and also become our life. when you are the best at something,dont give it up that easily because you dont get it much in life.
Anon;-;At first I was like "Dude this game is too difficult for me!". I died so often that I mainly waited for the death timer to count down. My teammates insulted me all the time. I couldn't even understand their insults. They told me that my mother would be so fat Lifestealer doesn't need to build damage. But then I  how to  and .     .    ,   . ,  ,  . 9/10   .
Neclair;-;I like dota because it allows me to use my strategic plan and it also boost my confidence and to improve my team building training
Secret.Eul;-;"Dota 2 is the best ever game that I have ever play on my life!" - Wilson Leonardo :D
Xanadu of Lamneth;-;This game is great! I have spent over three-hundred hours perfecting my skills. One thing though, there are a lot of russians.... Those . WARNING: CAUSES RACISM 4/10 great game
McLovin';-;Welcome to Valve's new cash cow. Yup. This is why we're not seeing Episode 3 anytime soon.
Liem, Dc.;-;Addictive And Many Custom Hero Costume !
Laytnor;-;Select one of the 9 locations to play game in, and make new friends! The locations are : US of Russia (East or West), European Russia (East or west), Mother Russia, South American Russia, Asian Russia , Chinese Russia, and Australian Russia.
Jaggsaw;-;Too many Foreigners on servers they don't belong to, resulting in bad communication and them having bad lag issues all the while screaming "" and "blyat" in the microphone... (mainly russians) otherwise great game.
ShiinaMashiro;-;Change My Life 10/10
Ravhan'astre;-;a good game like Dota 1 .. but Dota 2 has much better graphics :D
Why am I even here?;-;Pretty much the best thing to hit the world since spandex. #yogapants . Most definitely reccomended for anyone who likes these type of games
GreatTigo;-;As a drop while playing Dota 2. Because Dota 2 is a free-to-play game, players do not receive free cards like most other games. Instead, a card drop becomes available for roughly every $9 USD spent on cosmetic items in the Dota 2 Store. If you have card drops available, they will appear automatically in your Steam inventory as long as your Dota 2 client is open. Cards drop approximately once every 15-60 minutes. From the Steam Community Market. By trading with another player. From a Booster Pack. Booster Packs are packets of several cards that drop randomly after you have forged one Dota 2 badge. Booster Packs can also be bought on the Market. Booster Packs drop more frequently for players with higher Steam Levels.
J Sarath Chandra;-;Fantastic Game to play with friends! Highly recommended
MrViggs_The_Kitty;-;Is good game. Such sexy. Many wows.
stillborn32;-;Gr8 Game... loving it!
llandan nevettnk;-;_  Give DIRETIDE:   _  DIRETIDE //\()/\\ BROODMOTHER WANTS DIRETIDE    Punch Volvo for the diretide
Leland Guillotine;-;Super fun game that I've sunken countless hours into. Quite possibly the best free to play model of any game (all in game purchases are purely cosmetic). Download this NOW if you have not already!
smurf;-;This Game is Great OMG..
Monk.N;-;loved this game
Adeshiii;-;When the time grows up DOta reborn
InfamousFTW;-;Glorious game for those MOBA lovers, if you play this you either love it or hate it. I would suggest giving it a go anyway.
Zyynn;-;I got a kill one time... that was nice
Friendly Neighborhood Pedophile;-;Neglected my studies because of this game.
<font face="Rockwell">Pinocchio;-;You can expose your talent in this game , and you can gain lots of friend of this game not only in one country but in the whole world.
Renzo;-;Ugh.
-TranquilitY-;-;I got this game more for nostalgia than anything else. Never really enjoyed defence of the ancient type games and at first it didnt seem like I would enjoy this either. The community may be fierce at times, especially when you are new but once you log a few hours and get the base mechanics under the knee the game and its community actually become pretty enjoyable. Serves to provide many laughs and WTF moments and is best enjoyed in a party with people who will be willing to help you get through the first few games.
Thunderkeg [];-;Really nice game. I always with all my heart and soul!!!
<b><i><u>K19;-;ilove this game :D
Mikha;-;great one
Ayams;-;cool!
Standin.Wisher;-;Damn good and fun to play!!!
xD;-;The most addictive game of them all...better than LOL
Amoz;-;Best Game Ever in the whole wide World az
RagePotato;-;Do I recommend this game ?  YEAH ! -> Way better than League Of Legends -> Amazing Graphics for a Moba -> Wide list of FREE Heroes -> Great Community -> Daily Updates -> ... i could be going like that for ever ! Buy it, NO...It's FREE ! How cool is that ? DOWNLOAD IT NOW !
WaD A Talent;-;simply awesome
[G.G.D]Am_JiPang;-;absoloutly
Lord Dreadelus;-;this game is the best , the game is awsome
Scrub Destroyer;-;One of the best strategy games I have played!
mitZ;-;DotA 2.. great game to play.. better with friends even not in the same place, becase of Online Party System :)
WtW| The Mad Hatter;-;Hard to learn and even harder to master! I can not find a reason to learn this game without friend, otherwise you should mute immediately all person with cyrillic script. Except you like it, when someone insults you about an hour. Just saying. But in the end, even with this really unfriendly community, there are some silver linings hidden.
DimGun;-;very interesting game, and make us forget about everything.
Meredy;-;Very fun strategic game where cooperating with your team is key to winning many matches. Its veru fun to play with your friends. Some may find it hard to use certain heroes but its all about practice. Remember, practice makes perfect!
Desarestra;-;This is a good competetive arena for fast paced players. Heroes now are more balanced than before and the first of its own kind, as a massive online battle arena
iron_swan;-;I heard a strong, wise man say that crushing your enemies was one of the best things in life.
Oppa MRKY;-;its a nice and challenging game. i like the cosmetics a lot. good work valve! its my primary game!
No Fear;-;good strategies and action game , using mind and team works to win . alot of action here . recommended !
Detox Underrated;-;THIS GAME IS ONE OF MY FAVORITE's :3
brGUGus RX RX;-;an excellent MOBA game , perfect for pass ur free time fast.
Imbecile;-;>Game is hard.
T-800;-;Dota 2 features the characters and factions from the original Defense of the Ancients title with new features.
Kristen Schaal;-;Its dota. It doesnt need a dscription of why you should play it you just should. If you haven't you're a damn fool.
Mateo;-;Free russian learning tool.
You fail to amuse me;-;This game is very very gud. It is the bestest ever of all teh time know by the human kind
Chloe;-;Good English Teacher xD
What is Love?;-;Easiest game ive ever played
Refugee Augustus;-;This game ing sucks. It is the same gay  every time over and over again. Also, Kyle Taylor sucks big fat nuts.
Zep;-;Fun if given a chance to learn the game!
TheFFC;-;Dota 2 is AWESOME. If you nerver played this game or dont know how to play it well, you have an unique chance of not being addicted to it so stay away from it. When you start playing it well and understanding how the game works, you will love Dota 2.
MISSMAMBOY;-;The Best Game.. I've played
Rydo;-;Just don't play this, the game has the worst community i have ever seen with nearly all the players being abusive constantly for being a 'noob'. The game becomes repetitive and boring and has taken me over 200 hundered hours to find this out and don't get me started on the amount of russians playing this even outside of their own servers. At first the game is fun but don't get dragged in, its not worth it.
FOX;-;A very fun, but hard to master game with lots of varied characters (At least you dont have to unlock them all *cough* LoL *cough*)
Riathar;-;It's pretty fun, even when you suck.
Ngamer;-;The greatest video game in the history of time and space. ...is what Dota 2 turns into, AFTER you've done 50 hours of boot camp and 50 hours of homework. Before that you'll be shocked and confused and humiliated more times than you can count. In the end the investment is well worth it, just be warned you'll need enough time and thick enough skin to survive the trial by fire.
Mr.Swash;-;this is a great game
StArGaMeR;-;Best Game In The World It's Fantastic
Lambo Jr.;-;this is my favorite game
kenoff;-;The Best RPG Game In The World !
MrShrim;-;I rate this game 9/10 just like how many people are in high priority loading 9/10.
fetcher;-;Boy gee williker if you like games about doing game things then is this game the game for your gaming sessions. This is called defence of the ancients and the ancients are big guys who walk around and you get to play as an ancient and use your powers to defend yourself from the enemy team who are also ancients who are defending themselves from for against you. As you can see the ancient defending is an ancient mechanic that people defend, but have you ever considered if you wanted to defend your ancient then why can't you make a peace treaty to protect the ancient you're playing as. Once I decided to defend my ancient by not taking my ancient out of spawn and everyone was mad at me but I tried to explain to them that my ancient would be safe this way and if they wanted to defend their ancient they should not leave spawn too but they got mad and then it said the game was safe to leave which means my ancient is safe so I win but everyone acted like I didn't win. PLOT HOLE GABE WENDELL?????? Aside from the lack of ancient defending despite calling it defence of the ancients you can play as an ancient and use your spells to stun the enemy team who are unable to defend themselves while you defend yourself. Good times. I played a game as a character called lion who is clearly not a lion. This game clearly does not have very good writing and I am glad it's not a singleplayer game because compared to mass effect I don't even know which character is saving the galaxy so they can't writing for sucks!!!!! If bioware wrote this game lion would be a lion and not a man who is not a lion and he could definitely save the galaxy with the help of his tolerance squad and gay romance wouldn't be opress like in defence of the republican George W "Hitler" Bush. Also I went to buy items but they cost gold why can't I buy item for free if it doesn't want to give me item VALVE???? Also there is an item called a "mekansm" which isn't even an english word. Valve can't even spellcheck and but they expect to go and beat league of legends without even any legends or correctly spelled word what morons why don't gabe just buy a thousand knife and stop worrying about game!!!! Especially since they stole a lot of character from league of legends. They turned nidalee into a lion and then into a man who was not a lion and then called him lion and changed his abilities so he's not as hard as nidalee appeal casual audience????? I trusted gabe newell after valve's great games like ricochet but when I played as lion who was nidalee but did not was nidalee I realised that gabe had made a big mistake and dota 2 will never have nidalee if they only have lion (WHO IS NOT A LION WTF!!!!!!) Overall I would say that it is a bad game that nobody should ever play that looks bad and sounds bad and is bad and doesn't have nidalee and instead has a lion but its a man there is no lion and hes not even commander sheperd and tali isnt even in here and nobody could save the galaxy aside from sniper who could be an infiltrator but he doesnt have good sniper for killing reaper so why even include dramatic singelplayer???? Nobody should ever play this game gabe did a big poo and was a big smelly poop without commeander shepord or nidallee - 9.5/10
Lq77;-;Best A-RTS game ever
Haidar;-;Simply the best game ever
Vegeta;-;I highly recomend this game for people who want to take their game to the next level. I think that there is no excuse to not play this game, because with a price tag of $0.00 there is no risk in getting it. This game has blown me away and I am always looking to play more. Also this game is HUGE I have played around 320 hours of this game and just got started with this game. It is very deep and requires a lot of thinnking ahead and attention. So a brief recap of my review I say 10/10 and cant wait to see how Valve could make it any better.
Kay;-;This game is not for everyone! Can bother one card, but that's the point, every time you run around the map 1 map, and the tactics are different actions, building, but with characters another story, a bunch of different weapons, clothes and so on, that you just do not get bored, I think this yoke ideal both boys and girls, but children to 14 years, I would not be allowed. A great game to blow off steam, to relax while playing you will not succeed! In this worth playing! All a nice game!
Akanderino;-;bedre en league of lesbians!
KingSlayer;-;If you want to learn other languages fast especialy (Russian) download this game.This game is originaly crated by VOLVO (russian gaming company) and its very popular in the whole world.When you download this game you dont need to play vs bots or do tutorials just click on ranked game and you will be ready to play.Now if you dont know any words on russian here are some that might help in the begining:  BLQT MAMO EBALO REPORT PUTIN VODKA and JA MID .I promise that you will learn russian very fast you dont actualy need to chose server just click on play and you will find russians everywhere. GOOD LUCK ! i dont hate russians
SQUID13;-;I Am ashamed in the fact that im Russian.
ezpz;-;the best
Syd Barrett;-;Americans>Russians>Mexiacans>You
Fredddi43;-;Don't play this game. You will get sucked into it and it will eat up all your time. Also this whole thing is free, there must be something wrong with that.
rubinofstorms;-;what a kak game lags when u play with friends
[ONX]-HiK4Ri;-;IF YOU ARE MOBA PLAYER AND DON'T PLAY DOTA2,YOU ARE NOT TRUE MOBA PLAYER
worst player SEA;-;You start off not knowing what to do. Then, you get a little bit of understanding, the basic movements etc. Suddenly, you're immersed in this world of farming, feeding, and pushing.  this game for being so addictive. Other than that, GG.
[BDSD]Daddy Khoo;-;fun game definitely a must to play!
hargar;-;very addictive dont play
XO;-;Cool :D
magicalbacon1;-;I'm  at the game but it's pretty good.
Kaneki;-;Simply a Must-Have .
Unbalanced_EVIL;-;this game is interesting because while it is very enjoyable and there is lots of variety; the people you will play with rarely know how to work as a team and when they do its becasue the enemy is really bad at the game. Also the community is very unwelcoming to noobs so if you just joined and are learning how to play nobody likes you. all in all it is one of my favorites but i will warn you it isnt the easist to just pick up and play. Also there is a low prioority pool so if you cant get out of that you will always be with noobs even if you are a good player.
Warning_Spooky;-;had slammin' and dunkin'. ruined my life. 10/10
QHero;-;This game is one that has taken up so much of my time and has kept me entertained for hours on end. If you're looking for a free game to play this is the one for the competitive players. While there are in game transactions they are all purely cosmetic. It is a team game that is the reason my freinds list is so stupidly long and is one of the reasons that I can enjoy every day that I'm on steam. I would defentaly play this game for over 1000 hours again if I had to. Its a game worth playing thats for sure.
TROGDOR;-;this game is so freaking free, and epic.
ntr dog;-;this ing game ruined my life
MidnightRosario;-;Play and have fun!
Logigo;-;Got first blood. 2 people disconnected. 9/10
# a e i o u;-;its international :)
Haxor;-;really funny and challenging game
Methampithamine Hydrocloride;-;DOTA 2 is the best !
[Au]Tangopig;-;Don't play it, you won't be able to stop once you do. "Just one more game..."
palindnilap;-;Great real-time strategy game. It is guaranteed to be different each time you play. Tons of fun whether you play alone or with friends.
Yamcha;-;is a good moba game i higly recomend it
Jonibangs;-;forced winrate kills the game.... i've been playing mostly on solo q it's win streak..lose streak...win streak...lose streak...all to keep the winrate close to 50%....suffice to say it's not your skill that make you win...its the matchmaking system... worst community of a game i've seen..you'll meet racist, haters, trolls, insulters,etc..and the worst of all..it will make you one..the game destroys you..such a bad bad community for a game so well made..
<Double J>;-;this game is good for life
Supassara Thanachart;-;nice game at all,very recommended :)
charlie.kheneldy;-;Must play it got many upgraded feature from dota 1 and we even can do business in here
Jahos;-;10/10 best way to learn russian
Absolutely Fabulous;-;Ok lets see I gotta get all these items and go to my lane and watch what im doing anOHGOD *FIRST BLOOD*. Frustrating and difficult. Team based while still encouraging greed. 10/10 would suck at again.
circumlocutory;-;Dota 2 is the most competitive fun you can have without buying a game this year.
snap;-;Why the  aren't you playing this yet?
Pancake;-;This game is free. It is also hard.
GoBluePrice;-;its hard
Sub.Cyclaw <3 #EU;-;ITS NICE
Argentine Lake Duck;-;It's is nice.
VIN DEASEL ACTOR;-;the websters dictiondary definition of ancient is ancient adjective \'an(t)-sh?nt, 'a?(k)-sh?nt\ : very old : having lived or existed for a very long ti and Boy this game is old and existed a long time. Steam made the old game DO.N.A. and now made it into the new game D.O.T.A.2. it stands for Defence Of Ancients. it used to be a old game for nerds but now It's a real life recration of the medevil life style. you can go down to the street to buy wares from the Fat man down the Street like olive branch, the slippers, and a eye ball on a stick. Just like medeval Times. Its a real life simulater so its got night and Day also. you can do all the chores you want like chipping down a tree with a leaf and driving the donckey horse down to the river to drink (your Team Mates will get mad if you do this wrong so get a lot of practice) if you like to be wizzard and cast Magic this is the video game for you. its technically a Massiveley Multiplayer On Line Battle House, or MOBO. this means that 1. 1. theres a LOT of people thats playing it. I counted at least 8 people in one house. 2. theres A lot of magicyou can cash a spell and it makes the little guy glow with magic glowing rings. I think theres a nother spell but I did not try it yet. 3. theres a lot of medeval guys (and the ladies) to pick from. Marana is the best one though because she shoots a really big arrow and rides a lion cat so shes the fastest. Watch out though that its pro grammed to be a Realistic arrow so its slow. you can also play as a donckey horse and this is easier except some times it does not like to listen but thats what stubborn donckeys do. 4. and if you like Secrets then Boy there is a lot of secrets in this game to choose from. if you chip down the right tree in the forest you get hit by a lightning bolt!!! It's a hidden secret and i could not find out how to make it happen again. it also happened when i didn't chip down a tree so its weird. also did you know theres a secret Fat man in the woods that sells wares but i could only find him once. if you find him again please make a web site saying where he is. 5. theres a lot of peope that shout a insult and curse word at you. this is the bad part of the game. I dont know why Steam put this part into the game but the voice acting is not very good. if its too loud you can leave the game house though. also i have a gameplay Tips for you. -stay onto the side of the house that you started on. if you go to the other side you get killed by a building. I dont know why Steam did this. -theres a Dragon in the forest. just like Medevil times. if you Slay the dragon you win i think. I killed the dragon after drying two times i finally killed it. then the game ended. I wont spoil it but its a big hole in the ground with little guys jumping and it says Die Wins. -some times people say things to you but its a secret code. i figured it out though. if they say b it means bad or g means good. some times they say Top or mid and bottom, it just means you have to tell the donckey horse to drink in the river and mid means go to the middle of the river.
Supe-Assassin;-;One of the most fun and addicting games I have ever Played! Recommended for everybody!* *MUCH BETTER THAN LOL!!
TY FOR SKINS FNGAYS;-;Best game in the world !
Proud Metal;-;Ok. For a game built for Russians, played by Americans and won by absaloute swearing at team members so that sniper can go top, this game has taught me more about the great passion that people have about winning games such as DOTA, your feeling do not count for  on the playing field, no. Niether does your spirit, but just your hero and its abilities and how fast your able to use them.To play this game requires not a patient personality but your skills at how fast your able to press "1,2,3,4" and where you use them. You will be sworn at, ed over and hated at first......which is fine because your not gonna get better at a game like this, oohh no, firstly to even count yourself as even a little bit past begginers level, you have to asess yourself. 1.) Am i russian? - if yes continue 2.)  ? - if yes continue 3.)          ? - if yes continue if you have answered no or yes to any of these questions you are still and undoubtedfully not a skilled DOTA player, please take it lightly that you wont do well in life, you cant play Dota, you cant play life. Now to start my review :).............. i recomend this game to russia
kill yourself;-;What is the "jump" button? Can't figure it out.
HT.Maxim09;-;This game would be better without russians.
TheManOfTheMan;-;Still don't know how to throw a grenade. /10
DeadEnd;-;Welcome friends and all to the greatest game of the millenium. By the year 2030, dota 2 will have infiltrated into mainstream media and become the game to decide all conflicts and terrorities. A frantic rush to recruit all the top players was undertaken by the nations. A great battle was sieged and only one victor emerged . With excellent teamwork, vocabuary, the Philippines quickly became the sole ruler of the Earth. I have returned from this apocalypse and now I regularly play and hone my Dota 2 skills for the day when the Philippines will rise against us. 10/10 would play again.
ROLE;-;Nice strategy game. It puts out the value of teamwork on each player.
Tata Chubby;-;This game is  damn i loving :D
Thesaurus;-;cool
Lord Dreadelus;-;this game is the best , the game is awsome
Scrub Destroyer;-;One of the best strategy games I have played!
mitZ;-;DotA 2.. great game to play.. better with friends even not in the same place, becase of Online Party System :)
easy;-;Simply the best
<u><font face="Ravie">LHENZ;-;i cant stop playing this game :sad:
ForReez;-;i love this game
Shoteken;-;Very addictive game. Love it.!!!
Queen.Nv;-;i recomended this game
MeMeWs;-;I hope in the future this game more fun and more heroes ^^
Aim. Fire. Cog.;-;cool game cool life
(RS) Rain;-;10/10 league of legends of the decade.
PaYamYam;-;This game is totally amazing and more easy to control than the old dota :)
I need to win, Please try hard;-;Cool game, great graphic
[TVR]Lynix;-;Amazing game oppinion wise i think it is way better than lol.
Rue;-;This game made me have no friends, which is okay. I guess. But not really.
Sergeant;-;Its very good
Jon Snow;-;Well,this game happens to be by far the most addictive and strategical game....!!!!
Andrew;-;Awsome game. Everytime is something new. New heroes, new models, events.
downfall;-;Games should be made like this. Can not easily master this. Highly addictive. Good thing this is a F2P
ShadowMilk;-;So addictive, great game, great for playing with friends and I highly recommend this if you're bored or looking for a good strategy game to play!
TF : Ev1LRaT;-;great game
Aleinto;-;If you like strategic teamplay games, this is the best choice for you.
torinsoyo;-;This game will become your favorite game in Steam :))) And Game in which you play the most!
Emii Rodriguez;-;heylols evryanody! mya nammeiz Reacrado n i m frOm con tree call PERU!! mebe 4 yr ago i mak revuew 4 doter n i lyked da revuew bt stopid h8ers say bad revuew witch mak ma sat. soe nowadaeys im gon to do wat i wonted to doest n revuew agen! alsow i gots form monthrer newu keybaord n tat mayk it EZ 2 spele god! lats stret wit da gemplay. dis gem is bout sperts like harkey (wif da stiks n puks yes) n u blod a teem wit ur firnds. i onlee pley wit me cod firnd caerlos n we nly nose 2 coracicatures. yees we goo maddle line togithre n i pley pooodge n he legion n we WIN THE GAME. yess so gaempley?? IS GOOD! o----k soe nawo u wants 2 nose abuts grafficz? weeel tha graffics in this gem r swell! is rulealastic locking n nanimatrons lok lyk reel lyfe! somtims i 4get not reel bot ten mi fatrhtrer com in rom n sey: REACRADO GIT OFF GAM N COM RAYS SHEPS!! yis as u may no i werk and liff on ferm wit 3 brotrherse n 4 sizteres. tis wy i loff DOTERS! its cos tis gem and c0st (s0rry dat st0pid kea bee tween da IIIIIIIIIII n PPPPPPPPPP keyz ai nt n0t w0rkin n0 m0re s0 i g0n use 000000000000000 K!) b0t yes it herd 2 bie gems cus i has 2 rays sheps n achckens evan ac0ws s0mtims! sa0 wen gem isa costs n0 m0nny its g00d! s0 n0w i fink u n0se all tat u needs 2 n0 b0ut tis gem so d0wnl0d stert n0w cus in peru takes 3 weeks! 0k haf g0d day n0w!
Shep Sanders;-;Holds up to the original
My Nigga;-;Dota 2 for me has set the standard for MOBA's. The level of detail gone into this is brilliant. The characters are well thought out with hilarious quotes and rivalry with the combat being fluid and fast paced. The only downside to this that I would say is the matchmaking. There is a steep learning curve when it comes to playing proficiently and already seasoned players do not take lightly to new players. Beware of this, and if this kind of stuff doesn't phase you then match-make away!
IvApE [ON];-;just one any set item
Vitalize;-;i leik this game and it it awsome while Mitchelle is  at it. ;)
c_d;-;This game is awesome. You'll be addicted once you learn the way to play it properly.
Arab Creeper;-;its cool and i am cool so we are both cool
Mrbojiggles;-;Great game i highly recommend it.
Cacuu, The Cactus;-;Here, gentlemen, the best moba around. what to say about it, hm? well, first of all, there's absolutely no advantage for those who play the game longer, other than experience; Why do people keep playing it? well, because its fun, duh. there is no rune system, mastery, skills, talents or whatever you get from levels, making the one who just started half an hour ago be on the same tier of the guy who's 1500 hours in (which obviously won't get matched against each other, because of the experience gap) second, everything's unlocked: you don't have to grind or pay to play the heroes you want; you want faceless void? there you go. Lina? sure, why not. Visage? Yeah; this is the part that gets to the new players as there is just so much in the game, that god, it just comes falling on top of your head and you easily get overwhelmed. and third, the cosmetics are avaliable for free (considering you're lucky enough). Sure, you can purchase them from the shop, but you can also get them from drops after games. Might take a while, but eventually, you'll get items. These three things together make this game's F2P model the best ever seen, and will probably continue to be the best, considering how freemium games are right now. And last but not least: The balance is flawless. This is a topic where most people go "but ursa is so OP! how is that balanced?". Well son, ursa may have his brute damage, alright, you touch him, you're most likely dead; But then again, you must touch him to die, and considering how slow he is, thats pretty hard. "But he can get blink dagger!". And you, can get ghost scepter, which nullifies pretty much everything that he can do. But thats in game strategy that newcomers usually don't know. Thats where the problem is: Dota is hard. I'm not saying just your usual level of hard, I mean HARD. You need to sink in 100 hours to start to get good at the game. That's just crazy. But somehow, people love it. Dota, different from other games such as those FPS team deathmatches, those capture the flags, you can actually see the impact you're doing on the game, you're not just killing people randomly, you're contributing to your team's victory, because with the kill, also comes the tower, and as you defend, you know you're getting space and denying the enemy team control over your side, as well as gold. Gold. yes, thats another cool point about dota. After you play a match, the hero you play, the items you get, the gold you painstakingly farmed are all gone. gone: you can't go back, you can't enjoy that won match anymore, where you will have to start over again with a new hero, or the same one, if you fancy him. And talking about heroes, there are a ton of them, and thats the main point of the game, you're almost guaranteed that you will never play with the same team line up versus each other, and even if you do, the match won't be the same. It has nearly infinite replayability. Well, folks, and all that for the small price of one nothing! Now that you look at it, it does seem like a great deal, no? And even if it isn't, what do you have to lose? Dota. Get to it.
G.U.N.N.E.R [A];-;I LOVE THIS GAME.. IT HAS A STEEP LEARNING CURVE, BUT ONCE YOU LEARN TO PLAY ITS SOOO ADDICTIVE THAT YOUR DAY DOESN'T END WITHOUT PLAYING IT!!! THIS IS ONE OF THE BEST WAR GAMES ONLINE. YOU CAN BECOME FRIENDS WITH PEOPLE ALL OVER THE WORLD. IT HAS GOT THE BEST DEVELOPER AND THE BEST OF PLAYERS IN THE WORLD. AND ITS FREE TO PLAY TOO.. :D
Bangjeko;-;angel move on
Raff;-;Simply amazing. Fast-paced, engaging, and addictive. It literally never gets boring. Must have for everyone, since it is free-to-play it shouldn't be an issue. 9/10!
Killpop;-;Great game!!!
Miss Lily;-;epic,addictive game and enjoyable when playing with my mates but literally ed up when play mmr solo match *cough
Free_Hugs;-;amazing game, lots of fun and very strategic.
Badman;-;This game is just a ripoff of Call Of Duty
#Smurf-#YoLo;-;Old game with renewed life from the good old warcraft 3 days
Nezmeriz;-;Leavers nearly evey second game, Russians / Ukrainians ( with no english level at all ) on EU ( ENG speaking servers ), novice players ruining games in ranked match, limited amount of tickets so how can we normal players make this community better? ...like what the *..* is this Valve!!! VALVE please WAKE UP and do something with it.... I have 1760hrs played I was in closed beta so I know what I am writing about.
barely alive gag;-;"MAMKU EBAL" "DNO EBANOE" "REPORT MY TEAM PLS"  .
MeeRuu;-;Best MOA game. Everyone should play this game.
mztique;-;best game everrrr~~~ cured my insomnia XD
FleX'N;-;I can say that this game is kind a good. I really love it and i continue playing it. I think every gamer who like strategy and mmo rpg games will love this game. So many things to do and learn, so meany characters and items, so many item builds. However you can see a lot of awesome animations and effects. You can explore the map at day and night. Also this game is not pay to win like other games, You just pay for character appearance ( if you would like ). I was a LoL gamer but when i tryed Dota 2 i thought that i left 5 years of playing kiddy game. This is an EPIC game with a lot of PVP and PVE and TM ( TeamWork). My rate is 10/10
[DvG] R3$P3CT F0R MH370 !!!;-;This Game Is The best =)
Simpley Orange;-;I suck at it so you should too
Algameth;-;This will provide hours of strategic, action packed, multiplayer glory!
Sleep@holic;-;best game of the year
THEDONG;-;Overall a great, and fun game to play.
#SaveThatPussy;-;great game :)
Armin;-;Yes, if you wish to be a pro in multitasking, concentration and fast brain functioning. You MUST get this game as it helps to improve your brain to work a lot faster. There will be some PINOYS and RUSSIANS to eat your brain, but you'll be fine if you protect your brain and use it in proper way to win the match. HAVE FUN!
Cvan;-;I recommend this game if you are trying to become more familiar with russian language.
MajorVince;-;I suggest that you play this game. You can learn more about working as a team and making friends along the way. You can be addicted when you like it like I do. Have fun and good luck :D
ORCA;-;No question needed to be this game best ever strategic game. <3
6pebany;-;this game ruined my life 10/10 goty it burned my eyes would recommend exciting (read: enraging) experience
BabyPunk;-;I really had a fun time playing this event. Small map area but it was challenging and fast paced.
gibpussib0ss;-;how do i recall?
Squid Grill;-;A game in which you must protect some really old thing. Not much else I can say about this game.
Squid Grill;-;A game in which you must protect some really old thing. Not much else I can say about this game.
=_=;-;a fun and really a great strategy game tht will make u drop ur jaw n not sleep for a week ^^
Phyusin :D;-;a nice game :D
CAPT.AWESOME!;-;^_^ highly recommended
BAMBINO;-;try this game. :)
SKULLCRACKER;-;THIS GAME IS VERY GOOD TO PLAY IF YOU KNOW WHAT YOU ARE DOING.this game requires a lot of team work to win and a little nit brain and patience
KingSlayer;-;If you want to learn other languages fast especialy (Russian) download this game.This game is originaly crated by VOLVO (russian gaming company) and its very popular in the whole world.When you download this game you dont need to play vs bots or do tutorials just click on ranked game and you will be ready to play.Now if you dont know any words on russian here are some that might help in the begining:  BLQT MAMO EBALO REPORT PUTIN VODKA and JA MID .I promise that you will learn russian very fast you dont actualy need to chose server just click on play and you will find russians everywhere. GOOD LUCK ! i dont hate russians
SQUID13;-;I Am ashamed in the fact that im Russian.
ezpz;-;the best
Syd Barrett;-;Americans>Russians>Mexiacans>You
Fredddi43;-;Don't play this game. You will get sucked into it and it will eat up all your time. Also this whole thing is free, there must be something wrong with that.
rubinofstorms;-;what a kak game lags when u play with friends
hehehhehehe;-;lol dota 2 has consumed my life. would not reccomend it to anyone who wants to be social
EzMasturbator;-;the worst events ever
Frank;-;Do not play this game, you will become addicted and it will ruin your life.
PiSquare;-;Sooner or later you will realize that no matter what language options you pick, or what servers you pick, you will be qued up with people who spamm the chat and voip with russian, spanish or portugese. As long as valve wont lock regions i would not recommend this game, as it will cause you more grief than fun.
ChaosZT;-;Dota 2 prefectly inherited the play style and cs feeling of Dota. The game flows pretty well with the new visual upgrade and getting rid of the old Warcraft3 system, it's entirely a nice try. However, it is an embarrassing situation Dota 2 and its Valve behind it are facing: first, the same old problem of Dota-it's just too hard for new players to play, even a seasoned player of Warcraft3 find it pretty hard and need months of practicing to become an ordinary player, not to mention those young players who never touched Warcraft3 before; second, for old Dota players, the old and familiar sound of each hero vanquishes, instead are newly created heroes that lack the lore backup them from Warcraft, I don't know how other old gamers feel about it, to me, it's a completely different game, lost the contest by his young and more energetic grandson--League of Legends. Sorry to say, but the golden age of Dota has faded. Dota 2 is merely a replacement of the greater past. When we play it, what haunts in our head are "The night beckons.""Us here to obey.""I'm here, as always." No...not really, you are not always here. Farewell.
Dante;-;cause its gay jks idk
Cannabis Corpse;-;Half of the time, you get stuck with people who rage at you, afk, speak russian or some other language you probably dont speak, or claim to be "professional dota 2 players". Overall, dota is a better game then dota 2.
Mozgus;-;I only recommend this game based on the FACT that this is the most generous Free2Play title you're ever going to find. The amount of content and support here is insane. There's a reason why seemingly millions of people play this game for years on end. Chances are, you'll like it if you're looking for a free game. But if you're looking for a free game, chances are you're young, unemployed, with tons of time to kill, which is what most of the fanbase here is. It also happens to be the only kind of person who can LEARN this game properly. You'll need months and hundreds of hours before you're any good. I want to say that, besides all that, it's a great game, but I can't. I've dabbled in DOTA when it was just starting to get attention. It was the only reason I installed Warcraft 3 a second time. My overall distaste for RTS games is actually not a factor here, as DOTA has very little in common with the game it was built on top of. No, my problem with the game is almost every core mechanic it expects you to learn is not fun at all to implement into your sessions. I disagree completely with the tasks at hand that are in every MOBA out there. I don't like the pointless, constant, neverending flow of creeps. I don't like how everything is a race to earn EXP at the fastest rate instead of using actual tactics, and if you die or leave the proximity of a fight for 60 seconds, you'll never catch up to the enemy leveling so you better just give up. The item shops are super convoluted and have nonsensical upgrade paths. I don't like the ESSENTIAL systems of "last hits" and "denying", as they make no god damned sense. Killing your own infantry so that the enemy doesn't get the EXP is LUDICROUS! It's the dumbest videogame logic I have ever witnessed and I can't get behind it. If all this stupid crap were removed, I feel like we would be left with a fun game, but perhaps that game has already been done elsewhere, like the PVP arena battles in Guild Wars. I just feel like if this were simplified down to heroes battling each other directly with their core abilities, I'd have a good time. It's so beautiful. So well crafted. So much innovation in the networking features. Presentation is tops. Epic as all hell. Everything you could want. It's a shame that all this is pasted onto a core game that is incredibly busted and dumb.
<font face=''Papyrus''>H@oJacK;-;fuker dota 2 why always got some porblem !!!! why today cant in the game .? plssssss server ur problem !!!!
bl_5ca;-;Dota 2 is a good game. When you start to play it will be very difficult to stop. So if you have a job and responsibilities and can only solo play, you might want to pass on this game and find something else.
Zro;-;Rip off of demigod sucks
Rovi;-;game. 700 hours played. Almost 200+ matches played without abandonment.  game askes for update during the year of the beast in the middle of my game making my game go from 60fps to 3 fps. Close client to reopen to fix  lag from the update. ing  game tells me that I can't connect because the dota 2 network is taking a  on Volvo. ing  game now gives me low priority for ing a network fail on their end. I quit. KBI.
Jizz (_);-;the game is fun, to bad in general everyone sucks
Buttershots;-;Do not play this game unless you have already been playing it for 2 years or more. As a new player YOU WILL get matched against players with 2000 games or more experience, and YOU WILL get matched with players who have 100 games or less even after years of playing, and no matter how good or bad you are YOU WILL STILL LOSE about 50% of the time unless you have 4 more friends who play with you every game. This game is JUST AS BAD as LoL and HoN in every aspect. PEOPLE WILL rage quit, go afk, feed on purpose, give up after first blood. The game is so well balanced most games will have 1 team with LESS THAN 50% of the other teams score, NOT JUST IN KILLS, but in experience and gold earned also. If you are thinking of switching to DOTA 2 from LoL or HoN, DO NOT WASTE YOUR TIME, it is the same game with the same issues and you will be 2 years behind the learning curve. If you have never played a MOBA before, DO NOT WASTE YOUR TIME, more experienced DOTA 2 players will just treat you like garbage for your first 300-500 games and make you want to not play.
Weismann;-;Biggest piece of  ever. Ride to Hell: Retribution and Alien Colonial Marines was better than this. -10/10
KNOWN FEEDER;-;slow piece of , just play LoL like the pros
Ch4osinFlame#666;-;this game is so good but these days it become so boring because of : 1- to much lagg 2- many russian ppl ( noobs ) 3- dc every single match *i hope you guyz to fix some problems in that game thanks for reading .
T-Stake is explewshit;-;Piece of crap  game that sucks so much balls that your eyes becomes ballsacks, now with SK removed this game is nothing, and has nothing to offer and thus it shall not be played.  YOU VALVE EAT MY  AND SUCK MY BALLS.
Legacy;-;I'm not a huge fan of MOBA's, but I do enjoy League of Legends very much and iv'e played Smite when it first came out. Like most MOBA's, the community can be cruel and insane at times, torching you for the simplest mistakes. Neat and interesting abilities that can be even complicated the first time you use them, this game has a lot of replay, giving you the choice to play many many heroes. Unless you like competition and a fierce community, stay away from Dota and try LoL or another MOBA, but you should still give it a try, play a bot game or two and feel the game. No Pay 2 Win as its a official steam game, and a very successful one. You can earn and buy costumes and cosmetics through playing the game and buying them with real money. If you feel up to it, you can also trade unwanted cosmetics for ones you want through the steam trading system. Personal Rating: 3.5/5
Tech.;-;Of the time I've played of this game, 97% of it was me being downstairs waiting in menus. Awful if you don't know Russian or if you're not a 10-year-old American kid who likes to shout at his parents. GG Dota 2.
Cancer Treatment;-;0/10 cant win
Powerful Papaya;-;Don't
Dobby;-;Pretty dumb, stolen straight from Warcraft 3 MODs
Dont Say GG Please;-;yes this game are so fully fantastic awesome me...
KCG.Miamato;-;The best choise for no-lifers :D
CODE.Line.TeamCODE.org;-;In the past I've been addicted and enjoyed games like Counter-Strike, World Of WarCraft, BioShock, Halo, GTA.. For 2014 the game I have already dedicated about 300+ rounds of play to is DOTA2. If you're a fan of team vs team games; This is the game to play. I'd love to play this game professionally in tournament style and make my way into The International - DOTA2's highest paying tournament for millions of dollars.
Crash;-;The best game on PC right now is free??? SAY WHAAAA?! You can sell rare drops that you get just for playing?! SAY WHAAAA?! You sold a rare courier for 90$ and actually made a profit off this game?! SAY WHAAAA?! LOL if you really are reading this review and haven't started downloading it yet... You my friend.. Are a idiot! Download now!
Ice Blocks Get The Girls;-;Do it, I dare you
TheSharkzz;-;Basically best MOBA game released yet!
doubtingreality;-;The "real" MOBA in the genre. Based off of the original Warcraft III mod: Defense Of The Ancients, this game provides all the goodness from great RPG, RTS and Tower Defense games and puts them in a 5 versus 5 layout. You fight as a hero with 4 team mates to defend your base (The Ancient). There are towers with different classes that defend your base, but with enough pushing power, the enemy can break through. Group up with your team to defend your base and face off or play as 108 different heroes, all with different skills, appearances, voices and animations. Unlock and trade thousands of items as you play to personalize your heroes. No runepages ( la LoL) and no play or pay to win tactics to leach money off of the players. Try this game and you won't regret it! It's really addictive and fun with a bunch of friends.
panrita_lopi;-;NIce game, high quality of animation
RoNiN;-;One of the best online game out there! see for ur self.
Dead_Reaper;-;the best game i have ever played....:)
Rola;-;Caution: This game may be addicting.
bLaCk~MaGgAtZ;-;Dota 2 the most played game in the world :">
Dogepai;-;wow such language sim very strat super fun
Kalimando;-;An interesting proposition. Unlike most games, this is the gift that keeps on giving. Over the lifetime of dota 2 many additions have been made, and many continue to come along. Dota 2 is based on an old warcraft mod, and on a weekly and monthly basis, valve continues to update and add features to the game. Aside from being a lucrative scene for competitive gamers, it also has a steep learning curve and endless combinations as far as team compisitons go. If you aren't the kind of person who likes to play versus other players, the game allows you to play cooperatively against bots. And to further add to the lifespan of the game, the developers release festive events every 3-5 months to add something extra for players to do. As the game is free to play, this game can potentially net you some gains in the form of the marketable items you recieve for playing.
Fayrot;-;I think that russian`s should not play dota 2.
Mitch;-;I love this game.. but you have to be willing to learn because its not an easy game like point and click and your the boss.. no you have to be intelligent to play. :) Enjoy.
otong;-;The best game ever!!
CheatMasterLew;-;this game is for koreans
Prince of Liechtenstein;-;Dawn of the Anti-mage 2 is an amazing game with stunning visiuals and an amazing story line. Watch as the Anti-mage kills the people using nothing but chlorine gas. This is the type of game that makes you ask; "mag ek asseblief 'n haker?"
blo;-;I love this game. Its has a steep but highly rewarding learning curve and is highly competitive online. That said, Valve has done an excellent job of cleaning up public games so that nice people are commended and offensive people reported. Even the games I lose I have so much fun playing. Great game.
The Black Baron;-;Turn back now! Its a trap!. It will eat ur life.
Le Wertzy;-;Dota 2 is going to ruin my life...... 5 stars
Silver edge;-;It's a pretty fun strategy game with a wide variety of items and character. You won't get sick of it very quickly, under normal circumstances.
L4G | pRoToTypE #D.A;-;very nyc game
Winston The Ripper;-;Buy it if you are sadomasochist who likes losing because the enemy team is a 5 man premade or because your team is full of Peruvians who keep pinging the map for 30 minutes.
Scared or panicked?;-;Awesome if you want to have no life pretty much ever again... Takes a long time to get used to but once you do? You'll wish you never did.
Mayor Fancle;-;players are hostile jerks if you don't do something right or know exactly what to do, So new players beware old players are jerk and will behave like childern and throw and trantrum rather than help you.
community.com/id/AlyssaHero;-;The best way to learn languages. Try this game after two weeks you will be able to talk Russian
kake;-;You will leav your wife and children if you play this game and i dont even know if that is a good or a bad thing !
Nonon;-;Let's play some DotA So, after participating in the open beta for 7 months, and continuing to play the game until now, there are endless reasons to keep coming back for more. If you want an absolute ((black hole)) of a game and community that has persisted for over 10 years. If you want to be frustrated and rewarded. If you want to lose friends. Certainly this is not the kind of game that everyone should play but those who played the original DotA or the original Warcraft series will feel right at home here. As a newcomer to the genre but a Warcraft player from a young age it's been nothing less than I would expect from the most popular WC3 mod of all time. The steep learning curve has gotten better. Valve has taken many steps to ensure that new players will learn what they need to learn. There are still so many little things and ways to respond to situations that don't come intuitively to people who are new, but if you enjoy the mechanics and stick to the game eventually you will know what to do. The game is very mechanically interesting although it takes some time to understand how it works. Whether you want to sit in fog and wait out the perfect 5 man ultimate, farm until you are 6 slotted, split push, find pickoffs, harass and deny, there are so many unique ways to play the game. Different roles are so different, and no two games are the same. With that said the game ~generally~ stays the same; an experienced player is an experienced player regardless of the balance changes. Valve and Icefrog's team are constantly patching the game, every year after TI they actually redesign the game in different ways. It keeps things fresh and ensures that no hero is too strong for too long. Servers are not region locked so expect people who speak little or no english on both sides of the map. Unfortunately this happens more than you'd think. Now, this does create a language barrier in a game where communication is crucial, but on the other hand it really doesn't matter too much unless the player is bad. You WILL run into people who think they know exactly what they are doing but in reality they are playing at a much lower level than they can imagine. You will start off as a decent person and you will keep your calm around bad teammates and in bad games, but you will turn into the problem very shortly if you let yourself. The problem with this game is, if you want to mute someone you easily can, but you never know if they are going to say something useful. To be completely honest with the type of people you get in this game it's usually worth having them muted regardless. The hat system is better than LoL's rune system, straight up. To those who wish they could switch but feel they won't have anything to grind, the gameplay itself is what you grind here. If you wish to support the community and Valve you can buy hats to make your heroes look cooler, but beyond that there's nothing you can do or buy to change the game. Everyone has the same game, one hero will always have the same stats and abilities as another player using the same hero. The only thing that changes are cosmetics, and as you can expect Valve has an endless amount of them by now. Whether its the newest hero release and their beautiful arcana that you just have to have, a fantastic announcer from a familiar game, weather effects, or the million different couriers that you can acquire. When you spend your money on this game's cosmetics, it goes to the people who make the hats, and Valve gets a percentage. That's it. Sometimes it will go towards a tournament prize pool or a player. In closing, play this game if you want a mix of Warcraft/Diablo that will test your sanity and willpower. With high highs and low lows, a skill ceiling that goes on forever, and teammates that make you want to punch yourself in the face you will find yourself coming back for more every day if you have the time.
Choi.Jkz;-;i like this game dota2 because give me a challange
Captian_Bamboo;-;It is an awesome team game so dont stay alone startagie game lots of different heros to play so there is lots of fun.
[] Mkmt;-;dota2 the best game
road to 2k mmr;-;this game is so much fun.i like this game because me and my friends play this a lot
arrieBiceps;-;THE BEST LANGUAGE LEARNING TOOL ON THE INTERNET. LEARN TO SPEAK SPANISH,RUSSIAN,PORTUGEUSE AND MAD AFRIKAANS FOR THE SUPER LOW PRICE OF YOUR SELF-ESTEEM AND FAITH IN OTHER GET THIS GAME, BEST CHOICE OF YOUR LIFE #NOFUN #ONLYDOTO #RUSSIANDOTOBESTDOTO
Mikasa;-;Dota2 is <3
SolitariusProeliator;-;fun to play and highly recommended
Kuroyuki Senpai :l;-;Nice game but i hope dota add more hero
Sansan;-;I like its security, hope to ban some of the scammers.
Mga Chotoy !!!!!;-;Very Nice
Flankovic;-;Dis be my life
[LDT] Hardcore Bob;-;I'll admit it, I haven't played any of its competitors (LoL, HoN) enough to justify saying that it's the best of them all, but from what I've gathered: it is. At least graphically it's undeniably superior. Sure it's hard at first, but there's nothing more satisfying than seeing yourself climb up that learning curve! I recommend this game because I've had a buttload of fun with it!
Fayde;-;Great game!
Fred;-;Once you get past the not knowing anything stage, this game is really enjoyable! Just endure the first few games you play and be prepared to learn quickly!
Winston;-;This is my favorite MOBA, IT GOT CURRIERS!!! yea and the gameplay is good to...
One-Eyed Jack;-;this game remides me of the song https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=OK4fJhbRL1g 100000/10
Scotty Mate;-;When I first started DOTA 2 my brain had downs, I had no idea what I was doing at all... But I soon started to pick up the mechanics like last hitting and denying and the learning the heroes (All heroes are free!). Before I knew it, I was performing better and better. I focused and kept learning little by little and BINGO! I got pretty good. You will encounter a lot foreigners good or bad but most of them can understand english. There's a lot of great people in the game and some are trolls and jerks but it's fun . I recommend this game for everybody! If you play LoL stop, unistall, and play dota 2. That game is canerous especially it's community has grown to filth I played since 2009 it was a great MOBA for many years until this game came out and perfected the orignal one(Warcraft III Mod). It's really hard at first I know that but give it a try and learn.
VasDeferensJelly;-;Has slowly, but surely, driven me into downwards spiral of raging alcoholism. There's no turning back now. 10/10 would be super salty rustled tustled again
Al'teRnaTiVe;-;Old-style of MOBA game . If you like DOTA i'ts time to play DOTA2. With new graphic , texture in same gameplay you have played in DOTA. You can customize your heros characters by got item drops or purchase on market. All hero are unlocked!! not same as some MOBA game. If you were newbie don't worry they're have practice mode and play VS bot mode. you still can gain EXP in VS bot mode :) Good to play with your friend . Now it's time to get some GODLIKE!!!
Offensive - ExplosioNNN';-;Game of my life!
lMaLaChi.XIII;-;This game makes a gamer more good in terms on insticts, reflexes, patience and most of all on how you communicate with other players
T1nym3xc1can;-;One game your prancing around ina meadow of flowers having the best time of your life, Then the next you want to murder all your teammates for being the horrible human beings they are... 10/10
Chops74;-;Out of all the recommendations.. Idk if i should play this game.. I mean Someone said it causes TOURETTEs SYNDROME!! +(ik he is lying) But ill try it!
Chris;-;This game is good since I played it when it was Dota 2
Assassin;-;Best free to play game ever
M;-;I HAVE NO IDEA WHAT I'M DOING WHY AM I LOSING
Marc;-;I recommend Johnny never plays this because he is a noob.
Zipfile;-;One of the best language learning tools. Learn russian, polish, bulgarian, french, spanish and many more. ABSOLUTELY FREE ! (Quallity isn't good, but it's free!)
Big Bad Voodoo Daddy;-;Crazy, unfriendly to noobies , but emotions are too damn high.
Swallow;-;Help my mates win the TI ; Collect the items to make happy my sweety fawn  ; Play when the inspiration is coming ;
Acru;-;If you are interested in anything besides CoD, try it!
{K};-;he great frind and forgiven about the kill steal hahahaha :) and he have steam wallet
Fiery;-;Learn to speak Russian and/or Tagalog. 10/10
Jim Lahey is a drunk;-;his smile and optimism: gone
LEZHION KOMMANDIOR;-;Love it.
cababear;-;So much fun, I love games like smite and i didnt think this would match up at all to the amazingness of Smite, but it holds its own in my book. Definitely a keeper. Dota 2 offers good graphics, friendly players and 100+ amazing characters to choose from. Remember this though, in appv purchsases are available but I haven't a need to buy any yet and as you can tell, I am enjoying myself greatly.
LOLONG;-;This game is really fun.
Munyu;-;Someone didn't follow meta. Reported.
[R]MERGE;-;DOTA IS ING AMAZING!!!!! THATS ALL I CAN SAY.
Infinity.XristosD1;-;prefect game!!!!!!!!
Angel with shotgun.;-;i dunno what shoul i say>_< hihi
NumerousBullet;-;This game has ruined my life, I would recommend to everyone.
Dark;-;forget about it i am dead
Lord Kamfa;-;dota 2 is almost perfect, one thing that makes it annoying for some traders are the scammers who keeps trying to scam people on dota 2,the fact that if you can please make some operations to track those who attemp to scam and ban them if found that the said/reported account has a multiple report submitted from the community. Your consideration is highly appreciated.
Rape/Road to report cyka mmr.;-;Learn new things about your family,and you don't even have to visit your doctor,everyone is basically a prophet in this game. Also forget about clones,dota 2 is the real cloning machine,i've seen 3 dendi in one game. 420/8
Shiroe;-;ENJOY THE GAME!!!
SandWraith_;-;Simply the best moba game out there.
If My Heart Had Love;-;good games good friends and good plays xD
Maze;-;Too many heroes, too little time.
Das irrsinnig Demoman;-;Be one of the champions in Dota 2, win or not, the world will never forget you, even you die. That's what I will call this game.
makson-kolbacon;-;it's amazing strategy game for people who knows how to play using brains
Dal Bong;-;I love this game because a lot of options hero and items to use while also being able to play with a lot of people! There is always insignificant updates!
Jordy;-;7/7 would become worse at everything but dota again
SAY_FFS_PLZ;-;The best thing about DOTA 2 is its player vs player action. The worst thing about DOTA 2 is its player vs player interaction.
WtW| The Mad Hatter;-;Hard to learn and even harder to master! I can not find a reason to learn this game without friend, otherwise you should mute immediately all person with cyrillic script. Except you like it, when someone insults you about an hour. Just saying. But in the end, even with this really unfriendly community, there are some silver linings hidden.
LiveStrong;-;Awesome game, some of the community members need to work on their attitude a little bit =P
obsy;-;I HAVE NO IDEA WHAT I AM DOING
ChemicalFUCKattack;-;If you want to hear(see in this case) a review from someone who's played other MOBA's than DotA 2, go elsewhere. If not, this is what I have to say about a game that I've sunk 600-700 hours into. Until DotA 2, I would have never considered myself truly addicted to a game, although I wish I had spent those hundreds of hours doing something useful, I'm going to explain why it was time well wasted. First Impressions: The first thing that really struck me about DotA is what many consider a negative thing, it's MASSIVE learning curve. But as a person who appreciates a challenge, I didn't find this to be such a major obstacle as many others have(the fact that this game is free totally makes up for it). But if you appreciate games that hold your hand the whole way through, this game probably isn't for you. The shallow tutorial it does have explains the very basic mechanics of the game, which is useful and all, but this isn't a game that's easily explained. The way to learn is really trial and error, that why it REALLY helps to have friends to play with you who, firstly, know what they're doing and, secondly, have alot of patience. This is a game of strategy, diversity, and tactics that will be far too complex to inherently know at the start. It's really, really hard. The Community: The "community" of DotA is hands down the WORST community I've ever had the displeasure of meeting. I've played multiple MMO's and other various multiplayer games, but none of them came even close(except for CoD, except for CoD). As with any group of people, there are also extremely nice, and helpful people you can meet, but that's heavily counterbalanced by sheer amount of trolls, or whatever you want to call them. The Gameplay: Another point of contension about this game is its horrible Match making system. You won't notice it right away, but as you increase in experience and skill you notice you are often grouped with people that either are completely new to the game or don't even speak your own language, and in a game that relies heavily on teamwork and communication, it becomes a very real disadvantage. Aside from that, DotA 2's gameplay is what makes the game what it is. At first your head will spin with all the many, many abilities that are constantly being thrown at you from the hundreds of characters that make up DotA 2, but as you get more street-smart and you've played most of the heroes you'll find it easier and easier to be aware of your foes strengths, and also use your enemies weaknesses to your advantage. For the Beginner: The first thing you HAVE to do as a complete greenhorn, is to read this guide and/or watch this video that are both very in-depth guides to DoTa 2, I will link you to this at the bottom of my review. After watching/reading the guide the links of which I have copied and oasted below, I would STRONGLY reccomend you first practice with bots, a mode in which you are in a team with bots against bots. Don't dive in headfirst with your friends or with strangers, as it's really a drag to have someone constantly dying and feeding the enemy team gold and experience ultimately resulting in a loss and your friends coming up with excuses to leave your party. Once you have practiced, I suggest you keep practicing for at least the first day you take the game up, go ahead and play a co-op bot game. In this gamemode you will be grouped up with random strangers fighting against bots. There are five difficulties, the easiest of which is "passive", but personally I would suggest "easy", which is slightly harder than passive but a better way to learn in my opinion. Cons and Pros: Pros 1. An amazing variety of heroes to choose from. 2. The exhilaratingly palpable gameplay. 3. The lore, each hero has their own backstory, which are all fantastic. 4. The art style, compared to other MOBAs that I've seen, DotA 2 has by far the best art style, you can buy in-game item sets that change the aesthetic of your characters and many other accessories, almost all of which are designed by artists and submitted to the DotA 2 workshop. 5. The multiplayer aspect, this game is amazing to play with friends. 6. This game is pefect for people who are looking for complexity and depth, it has plenty of it. 7. It's an E-Sport! This game is surprisingly fun to watch, and it happens to have a massive, worldwide pro scene. The DotA 2 international is considered of of the largest gaming events ever, with the price pool being racked up to 1.6 mil in total, it should make for a very exciting event. 8. IT'S FREEEEEEEEEEEEEEE! Cons 1. The learning curve, although I didn't have a problem with it, is a major setback for most people. 2. The matchmaking system, a heavily flawed matchmaking system that often teams you up with people that don't speak your language, and/or are not at your skill level at all. 3. The overpowered heroes, although this becomes less of a problem as you get better at the game, it's a nightmare at the start of the game, heroes such as viper, sniper, riki, and many others wreak havoc among the noobs. 4. The community, the most vurile, trolly community ever, I hate this aspect of the game. 5. It's extremely addictive, whether this counts as a pro or con is really up to you, but I would say it's more of a con in my opinion. To Recap: DotA 2 is not a casual game, it takes time to learn and master every character in the game, alot of time, which is unattractive to alot of people. Because of the amount of depth DotA 2 provides, it takes a very long time for it to get old. Even myself who has played this game for about a year now, am still learning things every time I play. Although the matchmaking is really bad, playing with friends is an absolute blast. Although certainly flawed, there's a reason why I and many others have spent hundreds hours on this game. Just try it, you'll have alot of fun. Links : http://www.purgegamers.com/welcome-to-dota-you-suck[/url If the links above won't function, copy and paste these into your browser: (Written Guide, the most in-depth)http://www.purgegamers.com/welcome-to-dota-you-suck (Video Guide, less in-depth but more entertaining for those of you who don't like reading)http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=yUcVxADBNeo
Hentai Hentai Hentai;-;fukn genious m8 fukn hallarious
Sleepy Geomancer;-;Great game, If you come from League of Legends you may have some trouble finding your groove with this game, but it is better than League, the Heroes of Newerth players will have fun too its just a cleaner version of HoN. For DotA is love DotA is life
521.CLR;-;verry nice game
ASuperFatTeddyBear;-;One of the best game better than LoL
HARRY;-;addictive..!!!!
Demonangel;-;let's continue playing from dota to dota2
Sir Nefarius;-;This game shows why Russia should be nuked.
Insylu;-;This is a game that you should play if you want to be a cool kids that hates themselves.
0m1CX;-;Dota created the MOBA genre, and Dota 2 it's taking it to the next level. This is the MOBA for people who like the challenge of going through steep learning curves to find a true gameplay experience. If you want a MOBA that dumbs things down you can pick any other clone. Excellent game, very polished, amazing voice acting and awesome graphics.
Mew 2 Drizzly;-;This game has risen above all other games It has become omniscient Basically it will become a part of your life And you will never be the same again 10/10 better than organised religion
go.cua.go;-;Best MOBA created. Easily one of the hardest to learn and master. It takes a lot of patience and research to be good in this game. If you played DOTA1/HON/LoL, this is perfect for you. Just be warned though people are not friendly, people trashtalk a lot, people are very elitist regarding the meta builds and does not want you experimenting. If you encounter this people, mute them ASAP, dont bother firing back. Just remember you been warned. Have Fun! :)
Last Impulse;-;Dota 2...where to begin? Dota 2 is a game of ups and down, heart break and happiness, and most of all, utter ing sadness. This game will literally kick you when you're down,  on you, and then continue to make you give your own father fellatio. Dota is not a game for the faint at heart and one should only attempt to play it if ready to lose; but losing the match isn't all you'll lose! When playing with friends you will find yourself constantly hating each other as you or your friend(s)  up. You will latch onto that hate and it will consume you. If you can survive the hate and keep coming back though, you will soon emerge into a world of new found misery and sometimes joy, as you begin to learn the basics. You will start to win, while you remain to lose at the same time. Dota 2 is a game where the player never truly wins. The player is never truly good, they're only slightly better each and every time; and every time will be different, no matter how many hours you pour into the masochistic game, that is -- Dota 2.
VacuumingUpFatNerds;-;Game gave me aids and herpes from playing with girls on dota 2, -10/10 do not reccomend. Bring protection.
xXx420_B3L3TH0R_69xXx;-;10/10 best application for learning russian spanish portuguese and greek all at the same time
[MIX_MAX];-;top
OutlAnDeR;-;the best
putac kashur;-;'"Is DotA2 a fun game?" is usually the first question people ask about this game. Great games in recent times seem to often have set themselves apart from other games by being an 'experience game' as an example Proteus is 100% experience and very little game. Braid was great because it was an innovative platformer but some of the greatest lasting attraction I felt to the game was because of the endearing story and symbolism that was symbiotic to the music and art of the game. DotA 2 is not a game that tries to make it as easy as possible to 'experience' the game and then be done with it, unlike the set of games that have defined themselves a new genre in run of the mill First Person Shooters which make it as easy as possible for new players to complete sections of it and reach great heights in an attempt to lower the dominance new players have through tricks like fast healing, killstreaks and fast respawns. It doesn't fit with Half Life 2 like games in being a great singleplayer experience which you run through like a roller-coaster ride either: each game starts out the same but can diverge in an incalculable number of ways due to the enormous number of variables innate in the vast number of heroes and builds. DotA 2 is a game; a game with rules and learning and practising; a game where you can't see the top of the skill ladder from the middle, a game that is challenging and intriguing at every turn. What is it that makes a game fun? I don't think anyone knows the true formula, but we know that fun activates the reward centres of the brain. DotA 2 will give you the rulebook and some practise scenarios, but you cannot expect to have it play itself. You must teach yourself the game and through your endeavours you will get noticeably better each time and you can and will feel proud of it. DotA 2 challenges both the intellect and the reflexes with battles between an enormous range of heroes each with interesting, astoundingly well thought out and developed move-sets and characters. Because of the sheer challenge and complexity of what DotA 2 provides, it is a very fulfilling game with much room for growth; it is a game that will be enjoyable, I expect for a very long time. Because of this, DotA 2 is not a game that is inherently fun in as much as you can't pick up a pack of cards for the first time and expect to play poker. But we have touched only on the mechanics of the game: DotA 2 takes place on a very beautiful map, complete with birds and squirrels, fish and butterflies, spiders and cobwebs, day and night; and forests and ravines. In honesty, all it would require for me to feel its atmosphere was perfectly polished would be weather effects it would be wonderful to see rain splashing in the river, or even little streams! The game has over 100 heroes, each memorable, with well-developed movesets, storylines and copious amount of character-to-character dialogue which allow the game's endearing heroes to cater to a huge variety of playstyles. Overall, DotA 2 is a game that is not made to take Game of the Year one year, then fade into obscurity as people complete it, it's a game that sits in that category of games that you go to to have fun with some friends, it's a game that wants you to keep coming back to it and you know in years time you can still pick up the cards and have fun again. If you want to pick up DotA 2, which, I should again emphasise requires some self-investment I suggest you ask a friend to introduce you one-on-one to the game's concepts with passive bots, then practise with bots, trying characters until you find one you like and are good at. Progressing to be able to beat the hard bots with little difficulty is very good preparation for multiplayer. Then, all get on mic and play an online game, you'll win or at least have fun if you co-operate.' - Zemnmez 2k13
Sexpantherdudebro;-;Highest quality MOBA there is. This is the most fair and most balanced MOBA. Welcome to Dota 2, you suck.
Montsalvat;-;Way ing better tha lol
NOVA!!!;-;I am addicted to this game
Ninja;-;Best game ever played in Steam :).
DEaTh;-;Dota 2 is a must have for strategic .team work needed player out there >>>>>>>you can fully customize every thing to your will possibility is infinited "WE NEED YOU" thats all i want to say .... join in to feel the hype of the battle and the glory you always wanted :)))))
Megaman;-;ROLE is not important in a game . Good Player knows how to play .
Pussy sore;-;This game will suck out your soul, but you will enjoy it.
Fallout Boy;-;only play this game if you are russian, mexican, or a masochist.
PV7R;-;THIS GAME 10/10 WOULD PLAY GAME OF THE DECADE EVERYTHING ARE AVAILABLE ON THIS GAME -HAT TRADING -LANGUAGE COURSE -STRATEGY -FARMING SIMULATOR -POINT TO CLICK -DEBATE PLACE VERY USEFUL INDEED PLS PLAY
Fair_UZ;-;the good game,...GOD BLESS DOTA 2
GrassHoppa;-;This
mike374040;-;Ruined my life. 11/10
[V]-Guy Fawkes;-;Dota 2 is the best .. :D
Kangen Mantan;-;Great Game :D
Balake;-;Will make you hate everyone that doesn't speak english and will waste all of your time.
INSANEVLADI;-;The best MOBA game ever, even better than the original W3 Dota Map. Good job Valve!
torinsoyo;-;This game will become your favorite game in Steam :))) And Game in which you play the most!
Aim. Fire. Cog.;-;cool game cool life
Jon Snow;-;Well,this game happens to be by far the most addictive and strategical game....!!!!
Andrew;-;Awsome game. Everytime is something new. New heroes, new models, events.
downfall;-;Games should be made like this. Can not easily master this. Highly addictive. Good thing this is a F2P
ShadowMilk;-;So addictive, great game, great for playing with friends and I highly recommend this if you're bored or looking for a good strategy game to play!
TF : Ev1LRaT;-;great game
enwwi_;-;Best game I have ever played.
noobroto;-;sequel for dota .. great gameplay .. steep learning curve .. best game ever
(RS) Rain;-;10/10 league of legends of the decade.
PaYamYam;-;This game is totally amazing and more easy to control than the old dota :)
I need to win, Please try hard;-;Cool game, great graphic
panrita_lopi;-;NIce game, high quality of animation
RoNiN;-;One of the best online game out there! see for ur self.
A Flock of Bears;-;This game taught me more about human interaction, leadership psychology and foreign cultures than any other single experience i've had to date. Also made me racist.
hani :3;-;Make My Life Full Of Happiness
Cyra;-;good thing its free to play now! we will all experience what it feels when playing the world's most famous and WANTED game! BTW THANKS TO AMADEUS EXODUS MACHINA FOR GIVING ME A DOTA 2 KEY!
TheJoker;-;the best
-Qsmc;-;free to play, need a teamwork to win the game. know your role and win it.
Duh;-;A really cool game you should play !
Your Lie in April;-;this game is for people who can use their brains properly LOL
ER-FOUR;-;Dota 2 was the most cool game to play with friends, because we can experiment combining items and hero skills. Created many war strategy. I love dota 2
Cum Wizard;-;this game
Lieutenant Dan;-;if you aint playing this you aint playing a moba
Robobetes;-;This is a very competitive game with some incredibly complicated mechanics. The graphics are nice, everything runs well and I've rarely seen issues, which are fixed on a regular basis. What makes it entertaining to me is the combination of hundreds of available characters, each with their own relatively unique skill set, along with hundreds of items to be bought during the course of each match. In a 5 man team, there are endless combinations of roles which can make for a solid strategy. There is a matchmaking system that does a fair job of creating balanced teams (hopefully, dear player, after you have practiced playing with bots and know all of the heroes) and an endless learning curve. The only problem I have with the game is how much abuse is prevalent in the community. New players are able to join matches before they have the experience to make reliable teammates and rather than give them advice or instruction, many would simply vote to kick a player from the team, and 4v5 is hardly ever winnable. I wish there were more people able to demand some respect and cooperation, that I had more reports for those who use the word noob regularly and then claim the game is over before it began because of anything else. If you like competition, teamwork, hilarious math, reflexes, and leadership, then this is one of the best games you'll find. But it will be frustrating at times.
massacresIV;-;I've played a lot of games with a wide and varied ammount of different communities but never have I played a game that could compete with the same level of ' ' (Bicth noob) that is russian dotos. I've travelled wide and far to experience the european servers but no matter how hard I try, I can never seem to find the promised lands. I've been around to experience the following: Ti3 = Na'Vi fountain hooking whilst Gabe Newel was clearly there. Diretide 2013 =   _  Give DIRETIDE VOLVO! Chinese New Year = "Broken ShiTblades,  my life I quit this  game." Ti4 = Techies confirmed, Valve shut up and take my money. 12/10 rated. Much fun. Very Russian. Too many reddit leaks. Would recommend, have recommended. They continue to play Call of Duty & GTA V. Maybe I should recommend to PC gamers, League of Lung Cancer still beats Defense Of The Ancient-russians 2
Kael;-;Awesome game, huge community
SL.13;-;this my game
G3n0c1d3;-;one of the best games in the world
Ice Cream Villes XII;-;Just PLay Just Build Items Just Trade !
Greb;-;DOTA 2 is the sequel of Defense of the Ancients commonly known as DOTA wherein two teams of players compete with a single character of their choice through an RTS-style interface which emphasizes on Intelligence, Cooperation and Teamwork.
Fart Party;-;Best game on steam.
NovaxXxDarkYodaMasterxXxNova;-;Dota 2 - A Game worth getting/playing Generally let me start of by saying I usually play alot of playstation but Dota 2 got me hooked and im still hooked on it. Ranged from using abilities, working as a team to the just pure enjoyment of having a last kill. Player friendly, can spend hours enjoying it with mates/friends and well if you decide to go alone, take some time to practice and learn the capabilities of each hero. I think this game is fun and yeah what makes it amazing is each character takes some time to play with its not like easy from the start which makes it fair for the noobs/newbies to the game. Positives about the game: Loads of characters Loads of items to choose from Epic duals to awesome kill streaks And well u think there are negatives, but its hard to find one except for the fact that the creators have created a awesome game but my only negative would be the maps. Stuck on the same map makes u wonder when the update will come or if will ever but yeah its only a small lag in the game which u can bypass!!! Negative Different maps Anyhows said enough, if u guys find it helpful pls like it and yeah catch u on dota 2 :)
GayFrags;-;One of my most favourite games, highly recommend having a go, guaranteed will be enjoyed by people who have played Warcraft III: ROC. 9/10
Fou Lafine;-;omegoooosshhhh !! can you appreciate a woman ?? :O
T-Fuck;-;best game of the word :)
Anavrin;-;Riot Games really hit it out of the park with this tower defense simulator.
EZ BUGATTIS;-;THIS GAME IS EPIC! PLAY IT Now
JetFuelCan'tMeltSteelBeams;-;Dota 2, play it or don't. I'm not your mother I can't tell you what to do.
DeAngel;-;this is 5v5 game that unpredictable. and i love it!
DM;-;Play, Relax and Fun..
Fredda;-;This game taught me about the diversity of cultures that our small little corner of the universe offers. Then it taught me to hate them all.
Chrome;-;Side effects include: -Hatred of other humans -Lack of trust in others -Carpal Tunnel -Improved hand eye coordination -A large ego -Weight gain -Weight loss -Confidence -Despression -Extreme Racism -EXTREME RACISM -Increased strategic thinking capabilities -Mushy-brain syndrome -Subconsciously learning a new language -Subconsciously learning to hate the culture of said language -Literally every ailment that is not a transmitable disease 9/10 Doctors accepted this game on their recommendation list, but the tenth was afk
Grizzt;-;It's like roulette; fun until it turns into Russian.
psych0tic;-;Causes anxiety problems, low self esteem, Tourette's syndrome, mood swings, Bipolar disorder, breakdown of relationships, raging erections, racism. Would definitely recommend.
Sentimental Oriental;-;In Dota 2, Not many people speak your language. Not many people play well. Not many people talk nicely. Not many people work as a team. But if you find people that do... You'll have the most fun you've ever had.
Kyubashi;-;And you thought real life was a struggle.
ephir;-;I only played a little but it was fun.
Captain Obvious;-;Things I gave to DotA: 1. Money 2. Time 3. Love Things DotA gave me: 1. Arthritis 2. Carpal tunnel syndrome 3, Hatred of Russians, Mexicans, Spanish, Finnish, and Russians 4. Broken keyboard 5. Broken mouse 6. 9/10 ready 7. Server crashes 8. 4 stacks of Russians in EUW servers on English prefrence settings 9. Ranked matches 10. Free to play but Pay to win games (I.E. - Foreseer's contract, New Bloom 2015) 11. "It's in the bag" spam (especially Skywrath) 12. Multilingual cursing - I guess this is a good thing? 13. Split second math - Reliable/Unreliable gold and gold loss on death vs. Buyback availability - This is good too Essentially - DotA is a greedy woman, but I love her all the same. 11 / 10 would play again
HekaDooM;-;"THE PUB SUPPORT" "Where are wards?" The pub Carry demanded. "I placed them and they were countered" the Support began, "I am trying to juggle giving you complete lane farm, protecting you and harrassing the enemy while saving to buy more, also possibly sentries to remove their-" "UP COUR PLS" the mid hero politely added. "Give Savle" The Carry demanded. "Certainly." replies the support, using the salve on the Carry who subsequently ran headlong into an enemy creepwave. "So where is mek?" the Carry said, after he was ganked due to overextending. The Support died saving him and was treated to a rather enthusiastic series of map pings on his corpse. "Again, having not even enough to buy boots as well as wards, I don't think a 7 minute Mek is viable." The Support replies. "Haha look your level, so low, noob" the Carry retorted. "U have no item xaxa". "Well, jungle gold and experience through stacking and pulling with blocked camps is nowhere near as much as on lane which I attempted to give you, the carry, the priority over." The Carry is subsequently ganked again at the enemy tower, oblivious to the enemy tp that the Support moved away from. "Report Support, usless" The carry cried in allchat, in between mentioning various aspects of the Support's Mother's anatomy. "Instead of reporting and acting like that, why don't you try supporting for randoms sometime instead of instapicking a carry?" the Support asked, as he watched the Carry return to afk-lasthitting lane creeps. "HAH, support is for noskill noobs like you!"
flanadlivv;-;One day, a wise man intoduce me into this game. "it shall protect your virginity, my lad" he said.
<font face="impact">[A]cid[B][C];-;really nice teamwork game
CorroDead;-;Very good graphics, i recommend this game to anyone.
DJ Justiciar;-;Pretty good game. Definitly one of the best
Naphtalene;-;Game is fun 10/10 BUT, watch out for nasty Russians, Turkish and Brazilians (oh and some typical asians too) :D
????????????????;-;So Good This Game :)
Neno;-;Feel dota 2 Power comes through you
WhiteHawke;-;You wont like DotA2. You may be one of the millions of people that think you like it, already playing it and making it the single most popular game on Steam by a ridiculous margin, but thats only because you dont understand it. DotA2 is pure abstraction, complexity for the sake of complexity, and rule sets within rule sets that are broken at random. This game is so far removed from the theme of heroes with swords and spells clashing in combat that you might as well be playing a game of chinese whispers in a mental institution for the mathematically insane. Many of the subsystems only function the way they do now because of the limitations of the Warcraft 3 engine, while many others have been quietly modified for this sequel. This game is a triumph of accidental design that rewards memorization, social adroitness, deductive reasoning, and the ability to predict what other humans will do in a complex system that they do not understand. Ask yourself why you play games at all. Compare the aforementioned truths attributed to this game to your definition of fun. You see? I've just saved you a lot of time. This game wasnt made for you. It was made for me.
V4L3R13;-;awesome game, fun to play
Ranzzy( 7ick );-;Highest players in valve games
Hamonangan-;-;Awesome gameplay and awesome graphic to....addicted to this
Portgas.D.Ace;-;wow this game is awesome while playing on a high performance system
Backstroke!;-;only game that i need from steam heaheaheaheah 10/10
I H8 Video Games;-;You right click alot. Sometimes you left click and press other buttons too. 10/10, it's alright.
[RRF] NeiL;-;This is a very good game.
SnOooPY[StUn Me];-;the best
Somnia;-;The game that ruined my life.. haha in a good way.
shia labeouf;-;probaly the best game i ever played
NightGLow;-;Addicting Fun Exciting Challenging Game ^^
Prime Minister Vladimir Putin;-;Much Moba, Very Graphics, So Dota2
semendemon;-;Learn Russian and Spanish at the expense of your anal virginity.
FUTURE MOVIE MAKER;-;This game is too hard to play. All I want to do is farm some creeps. Then some people kill me. Oh well.
=_=Porcelain_Lily=_=;-;i like this game so much,. you wiill enjoy playing this game full tactical gaming
Standin.Jen;-;cool
sorry;-;THE BEST LANGUAGE LEARNING TOOL ON THE INTERNET. LEARN TO SPEAK SPANISH, RUSSIAN, AND PORTUGUESE FOR THE LOW LOW PRICE OF YOUR SELF-ESTEEM AND FAITH IN OTHERS GET THIS FREE AS HECK GAME
Wolfcard;-;Frankly, I preferred the original Defence of the Asians, but this is still a worthy crowd-control simulator.
OZHET;-;a best game ever
sG | Harley's Puddin' [L3];-;This is my review for one of my favorite games, Dota 2. Dota 2 is much like League of Legends, in the sense that it is a MOBA game, and the best MOBA out there. I have tried other MOBA's like LOL and Infinite Crisis, yet Dota 2 seems to prove its the best of them all. With over 100+ heros, Dota 2 is very diverse from other games where each hero has a great skill set and personality. Each hero serves a role in-game, and items are bought to your choosing or what best fits the hero. But the game is very balanced, because each skill and items can be countered by another skill or items. This makes each and every game unique and very stratigic based. After over 500+ hours in-game, I have come to love this game. You couldn't ask more from a free game, and it is very fun. Although it is free, the game does have a store where you can purchase items that change the appearance of your hero or HUD, to having the in-game voice somebody else, to making your own workshop content that could be put into game. Training for the game at first is very difficult, and alot to take in at first. But if you are persistant and play against bots to practice and better your skills, Dota 2 becomes one of the best games out there. Although the game is hard to understand at the start and the community is harsh on "noobs", with time this game is one of the best free games out there, and I highly recommend it.
Obnoyingguy;-;It's like League of Legends, but you snowball harder. Never heard of league? Then it's like Heroes of Newerth, but with mroe foreigners. Never heard of HoN? It's like Dota 1, but with a 2 and better graphics. Never heard of Dota 1? It's like Smite, but top down instead of first person. Never heard of Smite? It's like Monday night combat, but top down, fun, and with developers who do . Never heard of Monday night combat? It's like CoD ghosts, but a different Genre. Oh and it's free. That too.
DUMPED ASS;-;bad game no one actually enjoys it but everyone can't stop playing it.
Jadax;-;Play this game if: 1) You want to learn Spanish or Russian for free. 2) Lose all hope in humanity. 3) Alienate friends. 4) Fill the gaping void left in your life after leaving WoW, SWTOR, EverQuest or any other MMORPG. You will not be disappointed!
PictishGabeNewell;-;Got kicked out of college because of this game. 10/10. Would do again.
Dong Gibab Kipidap;-;My Goat! This game is freakin' awesome. U guys should try this game. Feel it. This game is one and the only MOBA game that amazingly tests your courage, strategy, intelligence and also teamwork. Play it by your own way! Good Luck!
lunatic fringe;-;this is one of the coolest games I ever played..
`XNTH ";-;I LIKE THIS GAME PLAY AND THE COMPETITIONS ARE A BOBOBONUS..
faCeless vOid;-;This game is so cancerous, very good prep for exam! wouldrecommend/10
Zippie;-;Here's fire/ice/snow/frost/poison/pus/steel/axe/blade/sand/dirt/smoke/light/beer in your eye! Something in your eye? [hydra-media.cursecdn.com] Edit: After playing more of this game, I developed PTSD far worse than any soldiers who fought in World War 2 or the Vietnam War. The experience was worse than anyone who survived the Holocaust and the genocide that Hitler caused would be considered child's play compared to this game. I had my fair share of being anally r*ped in prison, from having a broomstick to a baseball bat inserted into me, even when I didn't drop the soap, but the gameplay of this was far worse than that. It was worse than removing the splinters from my butt when I was penetrated with those wooden objects. I was also forced to have sex with a corpse. Because of this game, I was recently diagnosed with AIDS and my T Cell count is currently far below 200. My skin started to horribly discolor, I started to develop tumors, I lost a gross amount of weight, my joints were giving out, I'm suffering from fatigue but I can barely sleep because of night sweats and chills, and I eventually became blind in one eye. People don't ask me "Do you have AIDS?", instead they ask me "Have you been playing Dota?" instead. Not even the suicide hotline can help me. I cry myself to sleep due to this horrible addiction. I finally understand how heroin addicts feel. On the bright side, you can pretend to be a suicide bomber when you're playing as Techies.
TheOnlyZii;-;Worse than drug addiction 10/10
AntonioBen8D;-;VERY GOOD AD COMPETITIVE DONT GIVE UP WHEN U 1ST PLAY IT!
Bot_Jani;-;ruined my life and took all my money. 10/10
Oldman;-;Good game! Everyone should play! Need a lot of practice and learning. Only playing cannot help you play better. You need to do some research on your own to improve your gameplay Requires a great amount of cooperation.
All Star Requiem;-;Dota 2 its a game where people leave in the first 5 minutes and everyone else is Russian 11/10
Mitt Romniknight;-;My grades have hit rock bottom and I have no social life. 10/10
SAMI;-;when i type LOL my hero laughs!!!!!!!!!1
LABAL;-;great game enough said
Slothhs;-;Almost 200 hours logged, still no idea what I'm doing 10/10 greatest evar
Lurtz;-;just play dota and win TI. No homo, No LoL!
NaTTy_H;-;This game is like a ier version of League of Legends. Obviously copied all the champions from League of Legends and just called them a different name and put them in Dota. Can't believe no one has realised what a blatant copy Dota is of League of Legends. 0/10
Griffith;-;-Learned russian in 3 days (Y) -Birth control and protection against STDs -Got muted for 2 weeks once for -ing everyone - Got reported because i didnt pick a ''TANK'' by a LoL player 10/10 still havent finished the game
IceColdLemonade;-;I liked this game it's really fun you should play it
CrazyRhian;-;Hell yeah!
Recky Reck;-;Perfect game, hope you enjoy
--Tan-- CSGO-RAFFLE.COM;-;Awsome game where u learn to speak russian
Baker;-;Do not play this atrocious Russian Simulator. It is not fun. 9/10.
ayy lmao;-;Want to develop a lifelong hate for all Eastern Europeans? Throw away your schooling so you can impress your friends and people you will never meet? Receive high levels of abuse? Learn Russian and Portuguese? Then this is the game for you! Dota 2 provides all of the above in a tight, free to play, package that will end up costing you hundreds as you try to keep up with the large quantities of cosmetics that come out daily.
Red Eyed Yokai;-;I'd like to make a few request Volvo: Buff Russia Buff Brazil Buff the english language; Make it Imba so everyone will start using it Nerf China Nerf Korea Install rosetta stone into the client I'm tired of Alt+Tabing Destroy Riot games Praise IceFrog Buff EarthShaker, For Gaben We need wards  Thank you
Pingu'-Sassy;-;Addictive game!
nazeem;-;I'm running a start-up tech company right now and yet we make it a point to play a game (or 2) during our noon breaks. This game promotes teamwork, camaraderie, strategy, and communication - essentials needs for running a start-up. 10/10 would recommend to the next successful start-up company.
Y@hiKo;-;Dota 2 is one epic game and will one day be bigger than Soccer and Rugby :)
(2ez)Gum_Punk;-;Good game ever.........
M;-;I HAVE NO IDEA WHAT I'M DOING WHY AM I LOSING
Marc;-;I recommend Johnny never plays this because he is a noob.
Spwaaa;-;This game has everything a competitive gamer would ever want. You'll never feel as though you're done with the game or have mastered the heroes, mostly because there are so many that it would take months to play them all- and years to master them. You can even team up with 1-4 other friends for endless strategies and even many fun game modes. One of my personal all-time favorite time consuming, competitive, and absolute pure fun games.
XSG Calculon;-;This game is awesome.
Sivol;-;Don't play it unless you are unemployed and no girlfriend, it will change your bedtime, lifestyle, dreams, and pretty much your needs of social time will be reduced. Brings bad influence to your attitude.
yuanyuen;-;Playing dota since dota 1 5.84 more than 8 years This game has a lot of memories and still remain to be my most favorite game. Recommend 10/10
Dino_Dik_Smith.exe;-;One of the best free games on here.
CODE.Line.TeamCODE.org;-;In the past I've been addicted and enjoyed games like Counter-Strike, World Of WarCraft, BioShock, Halo, GTA.. For 2014 the game I have already dedicated about 300+ rounds of play to is DOTA2. If you're a fan of team vs team games; This is the game to play. I'd love to play this game professionally in tournament style and make my way into The International - DOTA2's highest paying tournament for millions of dollars.
T I M;-;Better than Rosetta Stone for learning Russian. I can know say  you in 11 languages. Recommended.
PapaJahat;-;addicting game, can make someone lose her girlfriends
DACECAD;-;Outstanding!!! Think: 5 vs 5 real time chess. This game is the pinnacle of strategy meets teamwork.
LStreet;-;this  game
Oshino Shinobu;-;10/10 would play again
Teali;-;10/10 would feed again
Caador De Biatch;-;Valve,  Add This  Please!
kArL1To;-;great game
Jafapude;-;>Well Played!
Kurome;-;Finally the beta is over :D
JJ;-;If your hair is anywhere near this product, you should definately see a doctor 1/26
RandomBox~;-;Good game. It reveals who you are.
Teleologically Put;-;This is the most expensive game I have ever played. It will merely cost you your soul. Also, the hell with techies.
Al the magical banana salesman;-;If you play this game long enough, its starts playing you
Need For Feed.....;-;Game where ingenuity, creativity and aggression merge to form something STELLAR.
MechaKnightz;-;this game is so bad but you can't stop playing it
NoodleShield;-;A blast from the past and a major landmark for competitive gaming. DOTA was originally a Warcraft III mod which immediately became a crowd favorite. The deep learning curve provides a true strategic experience and will keep you on your feet. With the enormous pool of different Heroes to pick from along with the collection of items that you can build, you can create multiple ways of approaching a situation/fight. This game is not easy to pick up, however, the basic mechanics can be quickly picked up/taught. With the revision backed by Valve, DOTA 2 is sparking up the esports scene once again. It is providing another source of life to a game that was part of the few that started the whole competitive scene overall. Although the game might seem "over-competitive", it is definitely a great game to have fun with a group of friends and can provide numerous amounts of fun and laughter. Games of the same genre/basic mechanics (MOBAs) are : League of Legends (LoL), and Heroes of Newerth (HoN).
FarmvillePlayer;-;good game well played
Registeel;-;Excellent game, free to play. Great Graphics, Fun Gameplay. There is no reason to not play it. If you are a gamer and like MOBA platform games, then i recommended this game for you
Ya Boy, Yeezy;-;Doto of the ancients > LoLegend league of Legends 10/IV would play again, best fps in today's scientific community
Black Baby Goku;-;Simply put, the best multiplayer game of all time.
Spudnik;-;Combined with the original, Dota is probably my single most played game and still, I feel like I've only scratched the surface. Combined with a good community and Valve's policy of encouraging modding, this game has to be my all time favorite game.
ILLUMINTI;-;.Be Carefull)
Burning;-;Great
Cnet Online;-;Love this game!
CaddyFLR;-;Best Game ever. From the gameplay to the graphics, effects, and community(except russians) but it's playable :D. Tottaly recomend DOTA !
Ryougi Shiki;-;Extremely great and competitive game. Good to play alone but better to play with friends, especially for a beginner since it has a steep learning curve.
g-;-;THIS GAME SO AWESOME I ALREADY LEARN A LOT OF LANGUAGE LIKE  BLYAT PUTANGINA MO BOBO Cibai
Clover;-;Its good ~
Secret Agent Man;-;Steep learning curve, but tons of fun while playing with friends!
MadNess;-;i really really like this game!!!:)
Pro'sBite;-;Love this game Non-stop action
Love is You;-;very nice competitive game 9/10
Ed;-;Dota 2 is one of the deepest gameplay experiences I've ever had regarding strategy in gameplay. Taking the leveling and items from an RPG concept, this is team-based multiplayer at its finest. If you haven't played Dota or figured it out yet, play it again. You will thank me when you get it.
MyLittleKAWAIIPony;-;This game is fun ; if you like strategy games I recomend this game more than other games like this; Mobas
Biggus Dickus;-;Now I am fluent in Russian. Thanks Dota!
Naru #;-;Russian dictionary Russian simulator 10/10
Kumin!;-;its a good game!!!
E Genius;-;Better than: LoL,HoN,SMITE,STRIFE and other stupid MOBA games that try to copy Dota1 or Dota2 Becomes a Racist. 10/10 would still play
Age Of Aggression;-;don't need to speak that much. You should come and try to learn Dota 2.
Neo13;-;Really addictive amazing game. Be ready to b abused but its worth it.
Aji;-;New update is more better.
Buscemi, BoyWonder;-;Dota 2 is a massive online game with lots of characters to play. However the community is mainly built up of swearing teens, but his doesn't make thegame bad. The graphics are quite good and the map layout is graet, however matchs go for to long in mt opinion. I rate Dota 2 8.5/10!
checkstock;-;Dota 2 is a great game if you like being told you're the worst person to have ever lived in Spanish or Russian.
Matai;-;Great Game once you get in it you realy like it.
Babe Ju Ju Mario (>^.^)>;-;Nice game
Neozep;-;Good Strategic game
CHI LONG QUA;-;DotA 2 is not a game. It's an experience
Satan;-;I would definitely reccomend this game to others. It depends on teamwork and its a strategy game, that's why I love it.
Nice;-;Awesome game. Each match is different from the last. Highly addictive.
Shade;-;'tis good stuff :D
T-800;-;Dota 2 features the characters and factions from the original Defense of the Ancients title with new features.
Kristen Schaal;-;Its dota. It doesnt need a dscription of why you should play it you just should. If you haven't you're a damn fool.
Mateo;-;Free russian learning tool.
Doge #RoadToPERU;-;The most difficult game to master. Ever. Pros Always a challenge. Lots of customization for heroes. Large playerbase that isnt as loaded with kids as LoL. Blows LoL out of the water in terms of complexity. Loot drop/market system to buy and sell items. Community interaction via the Workshop. Cons Mexican infestation. Frustrating when people throw the game or feed, as matches can last 1 hour + Be prepared to get yelled at by people who don't speak english and cannot understand the simple concept of a TEAM BASED game. Be prepared to spend thousands of hours trying to master the game; You'll still never master it. Be prepared to dump money on treasure chests in the pursuit of that elusive arcana or mythical items; You'll only win rares and uncommons. Very rewarding to play competitive matches and emerge the victor. It's like chess, but not for old black men with pidgeons for friends sitting alone in the park. 11/10 would blyat again
[ZP] Sad Ferret;-;Dota 2 is a fun and energetic game. There is a diverse roster of heroes to choose from that each have there own unique abilities so you'll never get bored. You can buy character sets, announcers, HUD skins, couriers, and loading screens to customize the way you want your game to look. It is difficult when you are new to it, but you'll eventually get the hang of it. I recommend this game to almost anyone in the steam community, and the good thing is....its FREE!!!
[JTI] McDizzel;-;This is the best MOBA. You will despise every second. You will praise the the moments you are in the arena. You will have a terrible rage inducing battle. You will have the most epic conquest of your online career. You will get crushed. You will annihilate the enemy.
Clyde Mardon;-;The best game ever on steam! Highly recommended!
Mr. Ano;-;This game is so awesome.
TEENAGE BATHTUB;-;Changed my whole perception of MOBA games, great game, great creators, great community. And for free... What are you waiting for?
SwetaBenQ;-;Best game ever.Never tired of playing
Gemblungz;-;try hard for playing this game
AlwaysWannaThrow.DCE;-;The game that is best to play with your Friends..
Ace The Great;-;I have never learned so many languages in one game. I learned Portugeese, Russian, Mandarin, and Spanish. It also represents how frail a friendship is and how others treat the game with more respect than the people playing. Lost 7 friends, 17 aquaintences, took an arrow to the knee, and fed the OP Riki 30 kills. The game causes anxiety problems, low self-esteem, mood swings, racism, and raging erections. I definetly would recomend this to anyone who has the mental capacity and time to go through 400 hours of learning and being yelled at to just play the game correctly.
[LC] TuBizcochito<3;-;This game is addictive and kinda stressing. If you playing this, prepare because your social life is at risk.
Shurima is love;-;Game is good, but can be frustrating at times, and the learning curve is extremely steep. I do reccomend this game, but not to those easily frustrated or not willing to lose game after game when you start.
arte et labore.;-;pretty decent game with new heroes added in as well as some cool effects but nothing beats the original DotA
knitted raptor cozy;-;A wonderful romp through intraspection; every game offers new insights into one's sexuality and right to life.
PaZ;-;This game is awesome ! fun to play with some friends , epic gameplay , and the best game out there (?)
Space Ghost;-;Better than Rosetta Stone if you want to learn Russian fast.
Cita Rasa Souma;-;found so many friends without leaving my room 10/10
Meu Vizinho  Jajaj;-;Be careful with hues, cykas and jajajas.
erothen2;-;Paper beats rock Scissor beats paper Dota beats LoL
Elusive Turtle;-;you wont have much left, but youll have dota :)
J!NGGO senpai will notice u;-;Addictive, time wasting, teach u to rage and be racist. Very recommended.
| Pain | MoreFiction;-;- Finding match - Found match - 9/10 - Finding match - Found match - Waiting for loaders - Failed - Found match - In-match,everyone connected - First words in chat :  blyat mid or feed - No support,5 carries,4 russians,enemy team full of counters - Mad russian went mid and fed 0-5 - He abandons - I get mad and insult all russians - Got reported - Muted 24 hours + 4 low priority 10/10 would  with russians again.
Voomeister;-;Amazing game! I've just passe a thousand hours and I'm still addicted. Even with only one map, the possibilities are endless with a big pool of heroes, all unlocked, and many different items. This game is incredibly deep and there's always more to learn and new strategies to try out. Definitely worth your time! Good luck, have fun!
Jimbob Horatio Mcgee;-;A little kid tried to teach me dota 2 when i had 400 hours 15/5 would bang
Fae;-;Pretty nice game.
Aquarium Bird;-;It's an amazing game - technically outstanding, showing all of Valve's usual polish and attention to detail, especially in the all-important multiplayer aspects. The continual balance tweaks and new heroes combined with the vast amount of content in the game offer countless hours of enjoyment. It's hard to master but good wins with your teammates are incredibly satisfying. I'm helplessly addicted and every day look forward to getting home to fire this up with my friends. If you can spare the time - play it. :)
Ser DJ Hodor;-;Game for wannabe hipsters with a horribad mute system. Also: Hodor.
JCM;-;nice to play
Hikaru;-;I used to play DOTA 1 on my old Pentium 4 PC back in 2009 and it was a great experience. And when I learned that Valve acquired the rights to make a sequel for 1st mod game I was shocked like "How can they do that?, are they going to collaborate with blizzard to develop a new one?".. But then I found out that the project will be a standalone sequel without Warcraft or Blizzard.. And when I tried the final product I was surprised cause it's very similar to it's predecessor and for those who enjoyed the first one, I'm pretty sure that you will surely enjoy this Valve version as well, not to mention Ice Frog, one of the main modders of DOTA1 was the lead designer of this game so expect that the features that you've loved on the first still remains in this version.. Kudos to Valve and Ice Frog.. So far I'm enjoying the game more than any other titles on Steam... I will definitely recommend this to MOBA addicts out there, especially the DOTA 1 patrons..
lazar;-;Love it
D.;-;DOTO 2 russian language learning pack is the BEST BUY! Not only because it's FREE. You will learn russian in few months INCLUDING swearing and blaming others! DOTO 2 is one of best interactive tools to learn russian EVER. It allows communicating with russians using chat, voice-chat or by pinging morse code. You'll have lots of fun, your self esteem will be suppressed and you're going to lose all of your friends! DOTO 2, packed with native russian. Get it. NOW.
Luneko;-;Best MOBA out there in my opinion. This game was love at first sight! We're in a serious relationship now. Update: We broke up :<
Gelo;-;best moba game in steam
Failed MID Noob CARRY;-;This game so addictive 9/10. You can be rich if selling items
Who's That Boss;-;These Game is Asome
kimchiman;-;There goes my life away
Sigmaxita;-;This is one of the most addicting games I have ever played. Though it takes a while to get into, it is very fun once you get into it.
localsonly;-;love-hate relationship with Dota
Arcus.Us Krisco813;-;I first played dota and hated it.Later on I began to love it and now I am addicted to it, got goods people and some not so good people but overall made tons of friends and played the game more than over 400+ hours. Definetly a good game and a good time to play while not having nothing else to do.
G A Y B O Y S #keenformen;-;Dota 2 is a fun and strategic game, i really enjoyed it. There was a variety of characters to choose from and each character had its unique abilities and personality. The game had a detailed map which allowed the players to freely roam through. This MMORPG, in my opinion, is better than league of legends or any other, ranging from its resolution, gameplay, design or soundtracks. Overall all, Dota 2 is one of the best MMORPGs out there and i definately recommend it.
Thunder Cock;-;This game is not easy and you sometimes may hate it, couse it really makes nervous, but if you are smart you should understand: it`s only a game. Gain skill, be paitent and calm and you will enjoy this stuff.
Squall;-;i think dota 2 best game , because so big update on maentaince . TY
Luda;-;recommended!
Mn'M;-;Epic War and Well Played
kimDomingo;-;I like all the new and good features of this game. I hope there are more improvements to this game. I just dislike that when it has new features of the game the size also go up.
AdminOE;-;Do you like brutally killing random dudes on the internet? Do you like ruining your friendships? Then DOTA 2 is the game for YOU ! This is one of those games at whitch you have to be good in order to enjoy. I can't exactly say it's fun even when you ARE good at it. But it is very satisfying nonetheless. It's very competitve, as it is expected from a MOBA. The only turn off that is clearly noticeable is the steep learning curve. During the first 100 or so hours you'll constatly get yelled at for being bad at the game. After the forst 100 hours, you'll feel right at home while playing dota with your friends. Oh yeah, one last thing, when you plan on starting your DOTA 2 journey, invite some of your firends to start along side you. Because I had a problematic situation when a friend of mine wanted to start playing DOTA 2. The only problem was every time I wanted to play with him, he would be forced to play against players of a much higher tier than him. Of course, this can be solved with smurf accounts (fake-ish low level accounts), but that basically means you will be switching between accounts every time some low level friend of yours wanted to play. So either start all over again, or wait for your friends until they get good enough to play along side you. Have fun !
quiqie;-;Actually F2P no bull crap that tries to make you pay for anything that makes you better in the game. The stuff that is paid for is all visual and really stunning. They even have some community made art that makes it to in game. This game is intensely competetive and is really well done.
Enjey;-;Select region: Russia, Russia, Russia or Russia.
Uncle Bib The Bunny;-;One of the best games ive ever palyed 10/10 would play again
Lapis Lazuli;-;this game is for f a g g o t s
cRossX;-;dota 2 is one of the best mmo i've played (actually i played only one mmo which is this one, but) i like it too much because of it's always demanding awareness about the situation the playeris in... and it's free tooo and not so hardware intensive ...which adds it to my favourite list ...
Caja: Enhanced Edition;-;I started my journey the day a friend showed it to me and told me I could play as the very Zeus. I thought "Well, I could try a game or two".
Ninja Cyborg Pirate Jesus;-;A must have if you always wanted to learn russian, have a reason to hate peruvians and don't have an outside life.
Mapeh;-;Good play
SZ-PZ.nicl130;-;Do you like MOBAs? Enjoy League of Legends or SMITE? Well this game is, of coruse, another MOBA. However it is also the ORIGINAL MOBA. One of the things you may love or hate about Dota is that there isnt really any sort on unfairness to new players beyond skill. If a person with 10,000 hours faces a player who has only 12 they have no different items, no different heroes, no different abilities. The veteran may have new aesthetic things but the only thing seperating them will be skill. If you're new to MOBAs I encourage you to try this one, they are very fun and are fortunately not pay to win.
F16;-;great game
Ace Of Spades;-;This Game is Good!!!
G J;-;sometimes hard sometimes fun always have a challenge in every game :D
Stephen Curry;-;THIS IS THE MOST AMAZING GAME EVER CREATED IN THE UNIVERSE OF HUMANITY!!!
Standin.KALpoKAL;-;this game make me addict to play everyday. and the most important is, this game is free to play. lol
Fang;-;this game is very nice!
KinG;-;one of the best games
Attila[DK];-;LOL terminated! Awesome but a little repetative, need new updates new maps and new playmodes
Chimera;-;this is a great game with great heroes, great voice acting(mostly), and great gameplay. However, Dota2 may cause the following side effects: racism, losing all faith in humanity, being called a , rage, breaking your mouse, braking your keyboard, breaking your mouse and keyboard, impromtu breakdancing, mildly severe emotional turama, more rage, getting every diease known and not known to man, mild to severe headaches from all the facepalms and hand bangings against the wall, lack of sleep, even more rage, getting hyped for new heroes,* getting called a noob, feeding, being fed*, meeting RNGesus, BEING RNGesus*, incredible luc.. i mean skill, having to write a review, teammates yelling at you even though they are the ones feeding terribly(yes this happens), blaming of riot, blaming of icefrog, blaming of volvo, blaming of you, abandonment, loss of sanity, loss of cash, loss of eardrums, loss of spleen, failure, epic wins*, anger, sadness, cussing, raising of the dongers, lowering of the dongers, jukes, being juked, people trying to play hard carry omniknight(yes this has happened), random fires, random explosions, police drug tests*, getting punched*, and yet more rage. But other then that 11/10 will keep playng. (note: *=rare side effect)
The Holy Duck;-;well... PLAY THIS GAME. its so fresking awesome, with many different heroes n stuff. you need to play this. NOW.
commander smallson;-;#1 cause of racism. 10/10 would recommend
JRG.Deerstalker;-;Cool Cool Cool !
Mr. Zazu;-;This game has ruined my life. It's so great and I play it almost every day.
Carl;-;How do i use my legs?
Hammuri;-;Grate game
awesuhm;-;Awesome game that requires some competence and skill, unlike noob games like LoL. LoL=League of Losers. Don't play in a league of losers, play DotA 2.
dani;-;Under no circumstances should you play this game. Go for a walk instead. Teach yourself guitar. Anything but this.
Disco Pancake;-;Great game!
Tattari;-;Got over 2k hours on this game , explains it all :)
BlacK KinG BoY;-;nice strategy base but seiously very addictive
AkShAy;-;very awssm game
OO;-;greater than dota 2
Medscootsman;-;Confirmed Battlefield when WWIII starts.
[Qut.R] StarFyre;-;Hard when you start and you need to really practice but after a while you start to get the hang of it and that's when you can really enjoy it. It's a steep learning curve but if you keep going at it you'll eventually come to love it if you persevere
Tot Bot;-;Amazing game, full of friendly people and even more full of russians! 11/10 Would bang!
Zepion;-;This game is bad , the worst type of , it is the crappiest of . It is the dota
My.~____.');-;Nice game while we can do anything like strategy, combo, fast respond for hand and brain. This game is great for spent your time if you have nothing to do :)
eerrrhahaha;-;WHOSE THAT GIRL
Jafar;-;9/10 would russian again
[CK] MeatHammer;-;This is a game. It is harder than Obama's  when he first put on a pair of Jordans. I recommend it if you have a lot of time, and sperm on your hands. If you play this game you will hate children forever. Yours Truly- Rejekted
Tesserakt;-;Killing things is good
Exia;-;addictive...avoid at all cost!
Thorgrax;-;- Disclaimer - This review is for the Standard Edition of Batman: Arkham City, as of 08/08/2014 the review feature for said game has been disabled - This game is a bomb. I've never been deeply into the Batman franchise, never read any comics. Back in the day when it was on TV, "Batman - The Animated Series" gained my attention and never lost it. Batman:Arkham city is arguably the best, longest and most refined entry in this current series of games. It was thankfully developed by the Rocksteady studio under the guidance of Paul Dini, the main writer for the Animated Series. That whole thing plays like a Batman movie produced by Christopher Nolan. Talking about immersion. You will think you are batman. And that the events happening really occur TO YOU as the witnessing player. Stunning graphics, excellent sound design and a well rounded combat system give this game the edge it needs to turn you into a non lethal crime fighting combat machine. Comes with leaderboards,challenge maps and a multiplayer mode, nothing short of a single player campaign 30+ hours rich, set up in an open air prison this game shows, how deep the rabbit whole of human cruelty really goes. This is lore wise easyly one of the best games I've ever played in my whole life and I hope Rocksteady will soon deliver an Arkham City 2 after the letdown that was Arkham Origins. That what you get when you change a winning team, Eidos. If you like super heros, or punching based action games, or just good movies in general, pls do yourself a favour and buy this game. It'll be a sad story if you miss out on it.
Ninja_Beat;-;Real Time Strategy, micro one character, but strategize with bots, teammates, items, board features, and more! Replayability is like a physical sport, the game is different every time! One of the founders of the MOBA (Multiplayer Online Battle Arena) genre! One of my favorites obviously!
Become a Magical girl;-;This game, like most Moba games, is like an abusive partner, it will hurt you and make you feel awful so you tell yourself you will stop yourself and that you will put an end to the relationship but when you confront it it pulls you close and whispers in your ear while gently carressing your back that it is sorry for hurting you so you forgive it and the cycle continues. Great game
Melanie/Thesillyblob;-;DOTA 2 is quite an interesting game. Being a little complicated at first, one can be skillful and better at the game after several weeks (or months for some). I really do recommend this game.
trnq;-;This game has a lot of mechanics to it, be it controlling your character, managing other units at the same time. Game is hard to pick up, but worth learning the steep curve. If you've ever heard of League of Legends, this game is the hardcore mode of it. I would also confidently say that this game has a better community than League of Legends. Players are slightly more mature, and less hateful(?). I highly recommend this game to anybody that is looking for a game that has unlimited replay value, every game would be different, be it good games, or bad games. Sometimes you meet people who are rude, even though they did very badly in this game, sometimes you meet people that are actually doing what the team needs them to be doing.
Merchanting;-;It's alright.
Anothga;-;Dota 2 sure fullfiled the expectations I had. Must play, especially considering the fact that it'll be free-2-play.
dota 4 does exist;-;an f exciting game and the f best game ever existed. poor them whom doesnt lend their f time trying to learn dota. but somehow it's a f right choice too for them ;)
MY.doRa;-;THIS IS AWESOME
Fredda;-;This game taught me about the diversity of cultures that our small little corner of the universe offers. Then it taught me to hate them all.
Chrome;-;Side effects include: -Hatred of other humans -Lack of trust in others -Carpal Tunnel -Improved hand eye coordination -A large ego -Weight gain -Weight loss -Confidence -Despression -Extreme Racism -EXTREME RACISM -Increased strategic thinking capabilities -Mushy-brain syndrome -Subconsciously learning a new language -Subconsciously learning to hate the culture of said language -Literally every ailment that is not a transmitable disease 9/10 Doctors accepted this game on their recommendation list, but the tenth was afk
Grizzt;-;It's like roulette; fun until it turns into Russian.
psych0tic;-;Causes anxiety problems, low self esteem, Tourette's syndrome, mood swings, Bipolar disorder, breakdown of relationships, raging erections, racism. Would definitely recommend.
Sentimental Oriental;-;In Dota 2, Not many people speak your language. Not many people play well. Not many people talk nicely. Not many people work as a team. But if you find people that do... You'll have the most fun you've ever had.
Kyubashi;-;And you thought real life was a struggle.
ephir;-;I only played a little but it was fun.
Captain Obvious;-;Things I gave to DotA: 1. Money 2. Time 3. Love Things DotA gave me: 1. Arthritis 2. Carpal tunnel syndrome 3, Hatred of Russians, Mexicans, Spanish, Finnish, and Russians 4. Broken keyboard 5. Broken mouse 6. 9/10 ready 7. Server crashes 8. 4 stacks of Russians in EUW servers on English prefrence settings 9. Ranked matches 10. Free to play but Pay to win games (I.E. - Foreseer's contract, New Bloom 2015) 11. "It's in the bag" spam (especially Skywrath) 12. Multilingual cursing - I guess this is a good thing? 13. Split second math - Reliable/Unreliable gold and gold loss on death vs. Buyback availability - This is good too Essentially - DotA is a greedy woman, but I love her all the same. 11 / 10 would play again
HekaDooM;-;"THE PUB SUPPORT" "Where are wards?" The pub Carry demanded. "I placed them and they were countered" the Support began, "I am trying to juggle giving you complete lane farm, protecting you and harrassing the enemy while saving to buy more, also possibly sentries to remove their-" "UP COUR PLS" the mid hero politely added. "Give Savle" The Carry demanded. "Certainly." replies the support, using the salve on the Carry who subsequently ran headlong into an enemy creepwave. "So where is mek?" the Carry said, after he was ganked due to overextending. The Support died saving him and was treated to a rather enthusiastic series of map pings on his corpse. "Again, having not even enough to buy boots as well as wards, I don't think a 7 minute Mek is viable." The Support replies. "Haha look your level, so low, noob" the Carry retorted. "U have no item xaxa". "Well, jungle gold and experience through stacking and pulling with blocked camps is nowhere near as much as on lane which I attempted to give you, the carry, the priority over." The Carry is subsequently ganked again at the enemy tower, oblivious to the enemy tp that the Support moved away from. "Report Support, usless" The carry cried in allchat, in between mentioning various aspects of the Support's Mother's anatomy. "Instead of reporting and acting like that, why don't you try supporting for randoms sometime instead of instapicking a carry?" the Support asked, as he watched the Carry return to afk-lasthitting lane creeps. "HAH, support is for noskill noobs like you!"
flanadlivv;-;One day, a wise man intoduce me into this game. "it shall protect your virginity, my lad" he said.
AB.Soul Taker;-;Very Good Game :)
cbeat;-;THE BEST LANGUAGE LEARNING TOOL ON THE INTERNET. LEARN TO SPEAK SPANISH, RUSSIAN, AND PORTUGUESE FOR THE LOW LOW PRICE OF YOUR SELF-ESTEEM AND FAITH IN OTHERS GET THIS FREE AS HECK GAME
Athis;-;Oh wow look at me, writing a review for 1 of my 3 favorite games on Steam at 10:00 P.M. time for spell check spam. Well anyways as I said it is one of my 3 favorite games on Steam so lets start at the begginning. It all started in World of Warcraft, I bought the game in 2008 and knew little about. Later I found out it was Warcraft 4, so I went and looked at Wacraft 3. One of the mods for Warcraft 3 is called Dota (Defense of the Anchients) sound familiar? Well it is a super worked on mod that eventually turned into a game. Dota2, this has got to sound familiar to you now. So basically last time I counted there were 100 something classes in the game so obviously I wanted to try them all. Yah, I got to about 1/3 and I got tired of failing with new classes. So I chose my favorite class. Phantom Lancer. Anyways in Dota2 you can go around and kill people in a 5v5 match, doesn't get much better than that... Oh wait! It does. When ever you think you have the best class, there is one better than you. So you'll always get owned by someone, unless your Riki, C'mon that guys a god. Basically the goal of Dota2 is to use teamwork and your brain to destroy atleast 5 towers, 2 barracks and the, well, Anchient, hence the name Defense of the Anchient. So I want to make this really long so I am going to go on. When I got my first name tag, kill counter, and description tagged and jumped in joy. I was able to make the best item ever! (It is a common xD) So, in short do you like MOBA games? Roleplaying games? Strategy games? Teamwork games? Games where you break your keyboard? Dota2 is the game for you! To continue on with my jibber-jabber I would like to introduce No one the Puppet. No one the Puppet: Hi bros and brodettes! Get this game! It's free, fun, fascinating, furious, fabulous, frightening, fantastic, funny, fuming, another "F" verb and so much more! So get it. Post more "F" words below! Anyways I give this game a 9.5/10. Only thing I don't like about it is that matches take 30-60 minutes long... and you don't want to leave your screen during that times. So get this game!! But I feel like this review is to short. I am going to talk about Riki. So Riki is a Dranei (flying space goat) Assassin, heh, that obliberates. He has a shadowstep that can teleport him to a target, where he can 3 shoot the enemy with 3 backstabs, throw down some powder making it so his enemies can't do crap, kill the other 4 enemies, vanish, and go buy a Divine Rapier. Yah that is pretty OP. If you want to suceed against Riki make sure he never hits level 6, when he gets his stealth ability which is his elite skill. He can basically be forever stealthed when he is out of combat for 3 seconds. More on elite skills, every class has one which is his or hers greated ability. But in my opinion Phantom Lancer is better. Once he is high level is invincible! He can do lots of damage with his normal attack and when you run away at 15% health he shoots a lance at your, finishing you off and summon an illusion. When you attack you can summon an illusion, and when that illusion attacks he can someone another illusion, so on and so forth. So basically what I am saying is that Phantom Lancer is also OP. There is another class called Sniper which you use in tutorial mode. Basically you can have Riki stand invisible by a tower, so you have a view of the tower but the tower isn't attacking Riki, then have a Sniper, outside of the towers range, shoot the tower down and destroy it in glory! This would also work for any other stealth classes. Well I do not know much else to say so I am going to end this here.... but... I have 1 more thing to say... GET THIS GAME! IT IS AWESOME!!!
PREJUDICE;-;unfairness stress sorrow regret
Jeep;-;ruins friendships 10/10
Eren;-;There is no game that can get you depressed and madder than Adolf Hitler in 1945, and still have you keep playing it. Good game, especially with friends.
JiGzZz;-;Its an awesome game and addictive while making our skills more nice then ever
Quibber123;-;DO YOU LIKE RIGHT CLICKING? DO YOU ENJOY THE FIRST 4 LETTERS ON YOUR KEYBOARD? DO YOU LOVE FEELING UTTERLY HOPELESS AND LOST FOR HOURS UPON HOURS AS YOU TRY TO LEARN WHAT THE HELL IS GOING ON? DO YOU LOVE RUSSIANS? If you answered yes to any of the above questions then this game was essentially made for you. Now I could spend hours verbally blowing this game and telling you all the reasons you should play it and love it or you can just download it yourself you lazy sod and learn why it's the most played game on steam.
mAgnAt1c;-;For me its Excellent game. Rated
MinaOzawa;-;Dont get started, you will only waste your life. but 10/10, will do it again.
Manners maketh man!;-;i love dota 2...!!! i wanna be the best player!
Moregank Freefarm;-;the legacies of moba, legend. enough said..
Adlong;-;This game is so cool. Really worth to play this game.
Archer;-;Great game. Can totally ruin your life if you're not careful.
ecye;-;10/10 would play again
jem 420;-;best game to play stoned! :P
Happy Little Boozer;-;Dota. Dota. Dota, Dota, Dota Dota Dota Dota. What do you know about Dota? I know that it's the best competitive teamplay game in existance. Fun may or may not be found there, but once you get good, sure as hell you will have satisfaction from outplaying these pesky Queen of Pain and Invoker with your Earth Spirit or rampaging through the enemy team in Chronosphere as a Void who was allowed to farm for a little too long. You will have fun sometimes. You will get mad. You will get mad a lot. And you'll love it. 11/10 would sell my soul for.
Vivil;-;One of the best Esport games in history. A lot of people have problems with it's steep learning curve. It'll be hard for really long time to compete with veterans but it's an Esport game so that's what you should expect from games of this type. Also prepare for flaming from Russians. They think everyone know their language so they select all servers to 'communicate' with wider range of people.
Black;-;Cool Games, Try it !
Mang KanOr!;-;the grapic is so cool and all the hero is so odd!
meloetta;-;Unstoplable, its beyond godlike!
Maj_exOrcis7;-;The best Free to Play ever.. recently got addicted after uninstalling this game for about 5 times :P
Jezrin;-;This game will bring out the true gamer in you. It's challenging and easy at the same time. If you like games that let you choose how you like to play, this is the game for you.
Holy Crab;-;Cool game !
Senpai;-;This game has destroyed my life. This game is a monster. Somehow all your time vanishes. You will find yourself needing Monster. Shanti Shanti, Om
MR.BL1NK;-;Good Game have Fun
ABUL H;-;This isn't a F2P title , you pay for it with your life You're going to miss school days , classes , family gatherings , reunions 10/10 !
NOSTO;-;If you're into MOBAs, and you like it hardcore, then DOTA is your choice. Skill is all you need to be good in this game! Kappa
A-to-Z.PaPa Rapper;-;Nice game forever
Zer0 Inverse;-;This game ruined my life. I am not even kidding. i give it 10 stars out of 5.
Perfect.Is.Shit(PIS);-;please remove this ing low priority
[MaB]Luckwaz;-;Great skillful and challenging game you should only play this game though if u are very patient like i but it is still such an magnificent game
Want3d.DDD;-;Dota 2 is so good game ever who i playing every day
Guirufow;-;Addictive game, never thought I'd end up playing Dota, I gave it a try and have spent hours on it. Probably one of my favourite games, it also has a cool community and all the events are amazing and fun to play. Suggest you give it a try.
Anigmeaux;-;Love this game. if you dont like this go die.
Laugh.Coffin;-;yeah, dota 2 is the best. Show your skill in Dota2
PoopHat;-;This game increased my dislike toward brasillians.
saudgar sigup kirai;-;this gme mke me excited.........
{PV}Lexthatguy;-;A very good game, simmilar to LOL but a little different and harder in my opinion. Also you do not have to buy the champions wich makes it a truly free game,
a tree;-;Dota 2 is a well crafted, well thought-out game that has unlimited replayability and a ton of action from the very beginning of every match. Having played other MOBAs, I highly recommend Dota 2 over all of them for offering all the heroes for free and for requiring a higher skillset and competitive attitude, yet still being a fun game that you can play with your friends.
Bellerino;-;The best game ever
-Qsmc;-;free to play, need a teamwork to win the game. know your role and win it.
Duh;-;A really cool game you should play !
Your Lie in April;-;this game is for people who can use their brains properly LOL
ER-FOUR;-;Dota 2 was the most cool game to play with friends, because we can experiment combining items and hero skills. Created many war strategy. I love dota 2
Cum Wizard;-;this game
Lieutenant Dan;-;if you aint playing this you aint playing a moba
Robobetes;-;This is a very competitive game with some incredibly complicated mechanics. The graphics are nice, everything runs well and I've rarely seen issues, which are fixed on a regular basis. What makes it entertaining to me is the combination of hundreds of available characters, each with their own relatively unique skill set, along with hundreds of items to be bought during the course of each match. In a 5 man team, there are endless combinations of roles which can make for a solid strategy. There is a matchmaking system that does a fair job of creating balanced teams (hopefully, dear player, after you have practiced playing with bots and know all of the heroes) and an endless learning curve. The only problem I have with the game is how much abuse is prevalent in the community. New players are able to join matches before they have the experience to make reliable teammates and rather than give them advice or instruction, many would simply vote to kick a player from the team, and 4v5 is hardly ever winnable. I wish there were more people able to demand some respect and cooperation, that I had more reports for those who use the word noob regularly and then claim the game is over before it began because of anything else. If you like competition, teamwork, hilarious math, reflexes, and leadership, then this is one of the best games you'll find. But it will be frustrating at times.
massacresIV;-;I've played a lot of games with a wide and varied ammount of different communities but never have I played a game that could compete with the same level of ' ' (Bicth noob) that is russian dotos. I've travelled wide and far to experience the european servers but no matter how hard I try, I can never seem to find the promised lands. I've been around to experience the following: Ti3 = Na'Vi fountain hooking whilst Gabe Newel was clearly there. Diretide 2013 =   _  Give DIRETIDE VOLVO! Chinese New Year = "Broken ShiTblades,  my life I quit this  game." Ti4 = Techies confirmed, Valve shut up and take my money. 12/10 rated. Much fun. Very Russian. Too many reddit leaks. Would recommend, have recommended. They continue to play Call of Duty & GTA V. Maybe I should recommend to PC gamers, League of Lung Cancer still beats Defense Of The Ancient-russians 2
M.5IVE;-;great game
enwwi_;-;Best game I have ever played.
noobroto;-;sequel for dota .. great gameplay .. steep learning curve .. best game ever
Too many cooks;-;Ruined my life.
ZENIX;-;I love playing Dota 2 ,it makes me have somuch Fun :) .
eFISHERman;-;Best game player ever in Steam~!
AnubiS;-;Really good game if you know how to play it.
Rocco Dizael;-;A little frustrating at the begning as you team up with different kinds of people. Find a few friends and communicate together to get the best experience
Joerosky;-;This game pursues me to file a resignation right away. >.<
this dick aint free;-;IN MOTHER RUSSIA, B MEANS OF COURSE YOU CAN 5 V 1 THEM
.X.Chopsticks.X.;-;Good game. Highly recommended!
F.R.O.S.T;-;this game is great and its sharpen my strategy planning!
Icmn;-;Nice game
Rei Ji;-;i don't really play any other games here on steam. Dota 2 is amazing.
Player With No Name;-;Great and strategy game for loners.
Penguin Velocity;-;Low priority sucks and 6 games is to long but maybe it worth it for the game itself
3YED AL!;-;this is the best game i play in my life
CARL;-;I just want the community pillar
=V=;-;No other game such as this out there, i love it so much
HaMRuN;-;Love this game ever
Senamii;-;i like its capability of radiocall :)) perfect for those teams who are playing far from each other.
Rudou;-;Great game!!....... For Russians....
Bun.Baker;-;The TI4 for DotA 2 is World Cup for DotA's Player
|_|_|\||\|/-\T|-|[;-;For an epic and extreme PvP clash with matching brainstorm gaming! try this one
Nyanshka;-;Birds - the sky. Fishes - the ocean. Deers - WoT . Cancers - Dota.
Juraj;-;umm, fine, but dota 1 was better ;D
Ancient Apparition;-;Ultimate MOBA for Ultimate Champions.
RedBaron;-;DoTA 2 is quite similar to the famous League of Legends but has also some minor and major differences. In the following two sections I'll discuss in short the positive and negative sides of this game. Even though there is more text (I think) in the negative section I still think that this game is great and fun to play. Positive: # The earned XP doesn't alter the gameplay but only unlocks specific modes and items # You don't have to buy heroes (like in League of Legends). The only thing that stops you from picking a specific hero is the game mode you are playing. # The game is indeed a superb model for free-to-play - the stuff you buy or don't buy don't stop you from enjoying it completely. It also does not give any perks that can ruin the overall impression of the game. # Like all Source-engine games DoTA 2 can run smoothly even on a trashy PC configuration. I have two computers - a notebook that is approx. 2 years old and a workstation from the 2007 (the GPU is meant for CAD and is not good for gaming). On both (with the right configuration) machines DoTA 2 runs great. If you have a 5-6 years old (and more) PC, you might still be able to enjoy the game. Since I'm more of a "it's all good when the gameplay is great" guy eye-candy visuals are not important for me, lowering this and that setting is not the worst that can happen. Make sure however that it runs smoothly since this might ruin not only your enjoyment of the game but also of those who play with you. # Community - profanity is not uncommon but compared to the one behind League of Legends the DoTA-2-community is more mature. Since it's still young this might change in time (let's hope not). # Ranked mode unlocks after the player has reached a certain number of games - even though the player might have 100 losses out of 100 games (I can hardly imagine someone with such a groundbreaking record) it is still a pleasant thing to know that once you start playing ranked most of the players will actually have some experience with the game. # Ability to train against AI and/or with a coach - to ensure that the players are given the opportunity to learn if they want to Valve gives us all the chance to test new heroes and strategies against AI and/or with a coach (another player that wants to help you learn the game). # Many game modes - there is a decent number of game modes that you can enjoy. All of them have their strengths and weaknesses but still quite enjoyable to play. # Mute option is a blessing - the above mentioned maturity of the DoTA 2 community has its exceptions of course. You might end up with a crazy person who screams/insults or just belches on his/her microphone distracting you. Lucky enough for all of us who actually use the voice chat for its intended purposes there is a mute button next to each player in the list of players menu. Negative: # Reporting system is not mature enough. I'm saying this as someone with over 100 games behind his back and not a single ban or put on the low priority queue. Some people simply abuse it just because they cannot deal with some personal issues or whatever and decide that whoever is not following their lead should be reported. In a worst case scenario a great deal of the game goes by while threats for reporting someone are made instead of simply enjoying it. The given options to report a player are also quite limited. For example there is no way to report a player who is idle (doesn't do anything at all). He is not feeding, he is not abusing his abilities and is not feeding since his hero is just camping at the base. What do you do in such situations. The verbal abuse over voice chat is also not possible to report as far as I know. # Frequent updates - of which I get sometimes 3-4 per day, which of course leads to the prompt "Your client is out of date" way too often. After an update it is not uncommon that the game simply crashes silently. I'm playing on Linux so I can't say anything about the Windows client of the game. # Lots of bugs - mentioning Linux reminded me of the couple of bugs that seem to reappear from time to time such as the weird key binding menu bug where the player is unable to assign a specific key comination in most cases connected with the Chat-All command, which hasn't been working on my client since day one. One other bug that has still not been fixed is the famous invulerable DC (disconnected player). The player abandons the game and is replaced by a bot who might turn invinsible. This leads to some weird situations where players in the game are killed by this bug. The usual solution in this case is to push on those lanes where the invinsible bot is not present as fast as possible (the bot is not shot at by your own creeps and towers so it just goes along a lane and kills everything on its path). I even experienced a situation where such bug appeared on both teams. # Abandoning the game - I'm totally for punishing people who just DC and don't come back abandoning intentionally their teammates. But it's really unfair if you get points in this overall bad statistic for games that crashed. Sometimes the client crashes and again, and again so the time you are given to come back to the game might not be enough. Sometimes the connection might be so bad that the amount of lag might turn you into an unintentional feeder - stay in the game and feed or leave it? I have a decent internet connection but sometimes the problem might come from the servers that Valve places at your dispossal. I have experienced some games that are sluggish and not just for me but for all other players. What to do in such situations when things don't improve? I have 2 abandons because of the reasons I've mentioned above. # AI - if you play solo against bots (that you must do at least at the beginning during training) you will find out that maybe in 99% of all games the bots on your team act dumber (to say the least) comapred to those on the opponent's team. They not only feed way too much but they also have some basic issues like a decent path finding (I've seen plenty of bots getting stuck somewhere and it takes quite a while for them to realize that they can't go in that specific direction). Since I've mentioned feeding I care to note also that the bots that replace DCs can be a major pain for your team especially if the players that were playing those heroes were high level. The AI of the bots in multi is pathetic and they respawn, go straight forward to a specific lane (even though there is a certain chance of death ahead) and get killed giving XP to the opposite team. This routine repeats over and over again. # Matching - the non-ranked game mode has a really weird matching system. If you are level X, in a game you might get players with level X-10, X+20 etc. Needless to say it is great to have someone more experienced than you to teach you but I believe that's what the coaching is for. The first time I realized this weird matching system was more or less at the beginning of the game when I was level 4 and actually played with someone on my team with level 21. # Ability draft game mode - I give a special attention to this mode because there is something that reallly bothers me namely the absence of hero-information on the board where you select your abilities. If you haven't played all the heroes when this mode gets unlocked you might end up getting a bad surprise not knowing basic things about your hero such as is it melee or ranged, is it a carry or a nuker etc. The melee/ranged is actually not given anywhere in any of the modes (at least I haven't seen a hint about it) but at least in other modes you are given the chance to chat to the other players you are going to play with and ask them those things. In ability draft you can only use voice chat to ask questions, which might not be an option if other players don't speak your language and/or you/they don't have or don't want to use a microphone.
D-;-;love this game so much
<font face="Ravie">Eekay;-;Game Is Very Much Thrilling and can be Enjoyed With Friends... What I Disliked? no no no no nothing.
CrowneAnteus;-;When you're in lane you'll most likely pick your main You farm and you farm Hoping you stay away from harm a russian will be there soon after your squeels of pain will give them laughter no more safe lane for you your last hits will then turn to poo but what is this I see on the the horizon it's the carry, your teams score is suddenly rising he pushes hard, till you're all in base he rolls and he rolls all over their face so next time you think your time is through remember, your carry is not always poo.
Hell_Man;-;This Game Is Awesome
HAS312e;-;Dota 2, the best game ever, feels just like the original
$$;-;The Best Free Game :-*
x3 | Calibre;-;Best game in the world <3 and addictvie as well :3 life changer ;)
DM;-;Play, Relax and Fun..
NewbieGummi;-;good to spend 10-15 free minutes
The Cheat;-;Filled with mads and bads. Must play.
Guardian;-;this is my best game on PC .
Porno Mafija;-;Nice game
<font face="Ravie">kenChiKong;-;addicted to this game..ohhh yeeahhh!!
Baby Viola;-;This is awesome
picealau;-;I recommend it at all,only I sugest that you should introduce again High level rooms
Kosaki;-;Best stratigic game ever!!!
Lovely Kate;-;I LOVE THIS GAME BECAUSE I KNEW THAT EVERY FRIEND ADD ME I WILL BE HAPPY THANK YOU VALVE
#Titan Fist <IMB4>;-;Best competitive game in the world !
dakkamasta 9001;-;This is actually a good game.
[D2N] Kito;-;i love this game
Tiu Huyn;-;This game is so cool. I think it's better than DotA 1. I will invite my friends to play this game with me!
PinoCchio;-;World's Biggest and Best Game Of all ..!!!! :)) ))))
PulsatingShadow;-;The most wonderful game to ever grope it's exotic pixels against the smooth underside of my mouse's laser.
Ctrl + Alt + Del;-;best game in the EARTH !!
Just T;-;Really good !
Silent Siren;-;this game is great...i love it !!!!!!!
Ploppy;-;Dota2 is love, dota 2 is life
Kappa from Russia;-;not for Russians xD
Physician;-;Best way to lose friends.
Aquarium Bird;-;It's an amazing game - technically outstanding, showing all of Valve's usual polish and attention to detail, especially in the all-important multiplayer aspects. The continual balance tweaks and new heroes combined with the vast amount of content in the game offer countless hours of enjoyment. It's hard to master but good wins with your teammates are incredibly satisfying. I'm helplessly addicted and every day look forward to getting home to fire this up with my friends. If you can spare the time - play it. :)
Ser DJ Hodor;-;Game for wannabe hipsters with a horribad mute system. Also: Hodor.
JCM;-;nice to play
Hikaru;-;I used to play DOTA 1 on my old Pentium 4 PC back in 2009 and it was a great experience. And when I learned that Valve acquired the rights to make a sequel for 1st mod game I was shocked like "How can they do that?, are they going to collaborate with blizzard to develop a new one?".. But then I found out that the project will be a standalone sequel without Warcraft or Blizzard.. And when I tried the final product I was surprised cause it's very similar to it's predecessor and for those who enjoyed the first one, I'm pretty sure that you will surely enjoy this Valve version as well, not to mention Ice Frog, one of the main modders of DOTA1 was the lead designer of this game so expect that the features that you've loved on the first still remains in this version.. Kudos to Valve and Ice Frog.. So far I'm enjoying the game more than any other titles on Steam... I will definitely recommend this to MOBA addicts out there, especially the DOTA 1 patrons..
lazar;-;Love it
D.;-;DOTO 2 russian language learning pack is the BEST BUY! Not only because it's FREE. You will learn russian in few months INCLUDING swearing and blaming others! DOTO 2 is one of best interactive tools to learn russian EVER. It allows communicating with russians using chat, voice-chat or by pinging morse code. You'll have lots of fun, your self esteem will be suppressed and you're going to lose all of your friends! DOTO 2, packed with native russian. Get it. NOW.
SilverFoX [GER];-;good game but hard to learn/master
Nadine;-;Dota 2 is a game played by ten players divided by two sides, the Dire and Radiant with 5 players each. There are over 100 heroes to choose from. There are three types of heroes: Strength, Agility and Intelligence. Strength heroes are more on physical abilities and tough to deal with. Agility heroes are more on damaging and ints are more on supports.
Dritan.MJB;-;Epic game. nuff said
Millitant;-;Play a great game DOTA
Jittoa;-;Definitely worth the time to learn the game, they don't say good things come easy. Bigger reward means bigger pay off!
420blazeit420;-;League of legends is better
Shalev;-;great game
LemonFlavoredDongers;-;If you liked warcraft 1, 2 or 3 then you will love this!
Invisibilia Ignis;-;A game which teaches you how to speck russain and be raceist, 100% recommend
Inka;-;Wow I really like to grab y winky to all the glorious big  on the characters! MY WINKY GO KA-CHING!!!!!!! WHNE IT SEE THE PRETTY GIRL>!>!>!>>!>!>>!
nuchung.;-;In SEA server. You will learn the true meaning of patience. This is SEA server. Home of Mushi, Kecik Imba, Ohaiyo, KyxY, Johnny, me. And some pinoy. some are good, some are worst of the worst, this is SEA server boisss.
DFalco;-;[insert cool stuff here]
AZZOKEM;-;Pretrty good game.. u all should try it and feel the RAMPAGEE!!!
Kontolatos;-;10/10 If you had an acute depression, play this game, suddenly your deprresion will be gone. No srsly, My therapist said that i don't need to come to him anymore. Instead he told me to meet his friend and talk about Intermittent explosive disorder or something like that, dunno what that means though. Now that i remember it, i feel sorry for him that he had to hold his nose from his own blood gushing at our last session. He is such a nice guy.
IND CLAN;-;nice game ... i ever play in the world
Rajosh;-;very reccomended :))
PowerLogic;-;THE BEST ING GAME EVER
Arthur, King of the Britons;-;Lost 20kg in stress, best weightloss program. 10/10
THAIN THE INCANDESCENT;-;great game i have bnow logged over 100 hours on advice for anyone ontemplating downlaod get out of limited heroes asap ul be better for it just listen to ur team and look up hoteys online and youl be fine... also stay away from zeus
{EZ}Rasta;-;For the most part, yes I do recommend this game. And for the record, yes this game is addicting. Despite its extremely annoying penalty rounds due to abandoning games and a community that sometimes consists mostly of multicultural and and multilingual players or trolls, Dota is a moba that succeeds in keeping players playing -- not because of its given motivation to acheive high priority when one is in the lower level, but because of its unique atmosphere and game world, and characters that never cease to allure dotagoers in their many plethoras of styles and abilities. The large and very diverse "pool" of heroes as players and professionals alike call it never fails to encourage players to change up their tactics and strategies for the matches they participate in. All in all, this game, like the underground hit it was and is, is a keeper. (Obviously). Without a doubt.
takashi  #rip 5 weeks ban;-;This game is more contagious than ebola.
Skoke;-;This is such a good game, its tough to learn and get into but I love playing this
||||;-;I've been playing this game for many years now , the most strategic game to play for my opinion ,especially when you play it with your mates.
noob;-;Im not liking it alot.Im not some fan of strategy games
NEVER;-;Prodigious Game,I just forget my life temporarily when I press Accept Game button.
jakub;-;i really love this game, i spent 1000 hours on the game and its the bets i ever played. its tricky in start, but when u keep play it, its just gets funnier and funnier.
JAM <3;-;dota is life but 5 man carry game is hard
mm.Starving A;-;HELP IM ADDICTED ITS JUST TOO FUN
Mr. Peruvian;-;A game that teaches teamwork, strategy, and SOUTH AMERICAN RACISM! 20/10 Would be taught to be racist again.
its almost the end;-;many people argue about wether dota 2 is better or league of legends. i play both (Dota more) and i wouldnt say dota is better. there are many differences between the games and the main one is strategy. in league of legends vision is required and map awareness is essential however in dota, position matters a lot more than lol. since the 4th minute on, in dota everybody is ganking around the place and tp supports are coming in to survive ganks. in lol it is a lot simpler. farm, kill, push mid. in dota you have to think, constantly watch the map, counter draft, counter build, position yourself and rotate correspondingly. in lol there are many lacking features such as, vision obstruction (hills and trees) missing, diverse range of active items and ability types. if you want a simple, just play game go for lol, but you are a a strategic player and look for osmething that truly tests your skill id recommend dota 2.
morphlin05;-;Most awsome game for me, i`am realy enjoing to play this game. recommand this game!
Johnny Bravo;-;welp... its certainly more detailled than LOL there are less heros but they are very different, there is almost no match up between eachother. to be able to interact with trees, and other entities makes feel like im inside the games. Very good. Go DotA2 team HF and GL
Charles Xavier;-;I still haven't figured out how to jump!
GKIDD ( team O.D );-;recommended not for noobs lol ^_^
BLV.M <3;-;perfect strategic gaming
I like crayons;-;3 years ago i was a half-hippie, humanist dude, now i'm cursing to russians like "i wish hitler killed you all" 14/88 would play again
STEFAN;-;better than cancer
Dino (Medic in Training);-;Guys get this you can.......be turned into a pig 10/10
- Picker -;-;the greatest game online in the world !!!!
[UMCS]Wulfe;-;DOTA 2, this name needs no explanation, and yet, so much explanation. To say that this game has not changed my life would be a lie. DOTA 2 has proven that it can both create and destroy life, in term qualify itself as God. To speak lowly of DOTA 2 is heresy, but I am a heretic by default, a devil's advocate who speaks out against DOTA 2. DOTA, its predecessor, was an amazing map that I used to play with friends, DOTA 2 is just a target jokes nowadays. Boasting a lovely all Russian Matchmaking, with off-branches such as Turkey Matchmaking and Brazilian (HueHueHue) Matchmaking. If you wish to play DOTA 2, all I can say is go ahead. It's an amazing game that deserves so much more, a one man's story. It's you, and them, your team's just a meat shield. Don't let others coerce you into wasting your precious, hard-farmed gold on those pesky wards or, god forbid, support someone. Remember, chicks dig carries, so always pick them. Plz add VRZO, pokemonftw. 420SwagYOLO4EVER!
Zipfile;-;One of the best language learning tools. Learn russian, polish, bulgarian, french, spanish and many more. ABSOLUTELY FREE ! (Quallity isn't good, but it's free!)
[Element] Pyro;-;Beware. Your AFK teammate is jerking off. Try not to think about it. The things that will annoy you the most are: - Russians - Pinoys - AFKers - People who don't know how to turn off the mic - Feeders - Noobs (sad truth) - Whiners - That guy that failed to join the game - That guy who declined joining the game - Bots I recommend you go on DOTAfire and play against bots if you're just starting this god forsaken game. Take my word for it.
VVendettaVV;-;Best game ever, funny, interesting and dynamic.
LauZ;-;A Worthy Sequel Dota 2 have been developed for the past 2 years since its closed beta on 2011 where invites are poured out to players on steam. I may not be of those lucky few that have gotten the invite but nevertheless, after i experienced in from a friend's account i must say Valve has successfully elevated the progenitor of the MOBA genre to the next level with improvements that can only be possible with more advanced game engines. I myself has been a DotA player in the past and seeing the sequel made but still having its core game play maintained brings a warm joy to my heart since the core mechanics of DotA like denying, creep stacking, or even juking has been successfully brought back to this game. Dota 2 still manages to bring the competitive atmosphere into players both new or veterans alike since the core mechanics are not changed and then i would like to mention the huge improvement the game has bought is the Shop system in game where we can just click on an item if we have the enough amount of money since it's pretty tad confusing if you are new to Dota 2 and you don't know what are the item builds for each particular hero since Dota 2 can be really challenging by mastering different item builds for different situations or the hero mechanics itself, a long and tedious journey awaits you but once you have mastered the mechanics then your satisfaction will be very high. Another major improvement is the tutorial system that Valve has implemented such as introducing Close Combat with Dragon Knight and Long Range Combat with Sniper and also Laning tutorials which can help new players to overcome their fear in laning against enemy heroes. Probably the newest addition is the Last hit training which shows players how to last hit a creep to gain more gold and experience, this is useful for new comers and veterans alike to hone their skills. The steam workshop system also works very well with the game where players can contribute their unique items made for heroes in game.These items can also be implemented in game through the community's help by up voting the particular item which is also a fair way for players to get their favorite cosmetic items from the workshop to be implemented in game. Me myself kept regularly browsing the workshop to see the ideas of the players around the world and it's amazing on how you can see a lot of "fresh" content from players around the world. However the community of Dota 2 maybe very harsh on new players since i have seen players that tends to be harsh to newcomers since they haven't mastered the core mechanics and flame them regularly. But don't take it to heart since there are also some good left in this community, you will come across gamers with patience and are willing to teach you to get better and even enemies that can cheer you up and joke around with you even though they are losing or winning the game. Overall i give the game a 9/10 for its reinvention of the titular DotA title and with new improvements such as customization options while still retaining the core mechanics, makes this game...a worthy sequel.
2ez4yOu;-;Deffend of the ancient
(-_-);-;It's a very good game
The Salami Swindler;-;Wesley is really bad.
Simba Power;-;A game where You meet russians and rage at them.And they rage at you becuase you picked Riki.This is a must have game but sooner or later you will get sucked in this game and start buying stuff for your heroes.And it will protect your Virginity. :) 8/10
Token Female;-;DOTA 2 is the best free-to-play game I've tried this year. Even with its significant learning curve, this game had me completely addicted within the first three matches. Plan to dedicate hours to practicing against bots before approaching online matches or you will be seriously owned. It will hurt, you will feed, and everyone will yell at you, yet somehow you will still enjoy it. Just play this game! You will not regret it!
ZemRam;-;+ very balanced gameplay - first time I discovered the new generation likes to flame/curse a lot in chat/voice. gamers used to be happy to even meet other gamers :) +- pay / slow but doable xp to get items.
Bonkers;-;The people I meet in this game I would kill in real life.
Rodriguez;-;A combination of great game mechanics and compelling hero backstories make Dota 2 a cut above other Multiplayer Online Battle Arenas (MOBAs) such as League of Legend and Dota 1. Of particular interest to new and old players alike is the hero Mirana and her trademark w-button ability, sacred arrow, which when successfully deployed is often considered one of the most fatal not-ulti moves in the game. When not utilising this 360-damage 5-second stun, players may take solace in Mirana's other special abilities such as leap, a devastatingly evasive jump, starstorm, a powerful aoe magical damage dealer, and her notorious ultimate moonlight shadow which will render all heroes on Mirana's team invisible at the click of a button. Whilst Dota 2 does not necessarily revolve around the ever-popular hero Mirana at this time, many hope to one day see her in an online action/adventure of her very own.
Ezra Koresj Jr;-;Just play,teamwork,destroy tower,and you will be a winner!
TreebeardTheEnt;-;Its like DotA, but with a 2.
HAPPYDUDE;-;ITS AMAZING AND THE LLAMAS ARE FABULOUS
meme renaissance;-;I LIKE VOLVO DID AN AMAZING CHOP WITH THE GRAPHIC AND ALL THE GAMEPLAY
Pyssy Viikari =D;-;Just the best game ever.
DJ Meow Mix;-;This is the best Free To Play game I ever seen on steam.. I recommend it to play with friend`s. :D
God's Eye;-;So far its a nice game, unless you were teaming with a trash talker :v
TheAussieGermanBoy;-;A game where strategical teamwork is essential to win. So if you're under 12 years old and your favourite game is Call of Duty or Team Fortress 2, stay away from this game.
AKA.Firefox;-;Dota 2 is a game that is gripping and a refreshing change to games out there at the moment. I used to be a FPS person, but now im open to alot more games. Dota is a team game, which actually requires a stong bond between the team, rather than many FPS'es where one good person can win the game while the rest of the team does bugger all. All though it is infuriating at times where no missing is called, or someone doesnt use their ult, it is a great game from valve, and the workshop items for the game are diverse and unlike anything youve ever seen before. Dota is free to play, and incredibly addictive and fun, so i suggest that you install it and give it a go. Fox out.
-=Invy=-;-;Best MOBA game out there +1
Battle Toads;-;LET ME ASK YOU SOMETHING?! DO YOU ENJOY: -BEING INSULTED -GETTING CALLED A NOOB IN OTHER LANGUAGES -GETTING REPORTED FOR EVERYTHING WELL HERES A GAME FOR YOU. DOTA 2 COMING TO AN AMERICAN SERVER NEAR YOU. PERFECT GAME 10/9
TheSinOfMan;-;Main protagonist is American. You need to combat hordes of evil Russians invading european servers. 10/10
WhapphiEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEE :");-;Part of my life <3
DiYd;-;I don't know about you guys, but I learn how to deal with hot-headed people by playing this game alone. And oh yeah, most russians sucks (sorry, but it's from experience) tis' a game that really drains your time, truly not recommended for college students, especially in a week.. or month before their finals. From just a custom map in one of the best blizzard's game, to a stand-alone eye catching game with a world-wide recognized tournament for every player and friends that reach the skill-peak of this game. Note for parents, this game can be a big career for your kids. So, either let your kids play this game and encourage them to be a professional or block/control them for ever knowing this game.
Dota -25;-;Graphics are good. All heroes are balance. All heroes can be overpowered if get fat, therefore it is well balance.
LuD p0o NeVolQQ ;Pp [;;-;Dota2? Do not install this game. Just dont... I played 800 hours in this game and i can't say something good. 80% of this game depends on your team. But your team will be weak, because the matchmaking is not good, and the other team will be casual fed op heros that will wipe you and make you rage every single ing game. Do not install LoL or HoN, they are even worse. Play singleplayer games, they are much much funnier than this .
Arashi Admin;-;The most addicted game ever.... No game other than DOTA!!!!
Ajster;-;With almost 2k hours in the game, I've found that this game has great replayability value, with changes coming out on a constant enough basis to keep it interesting. I have learnt lots   in my time    but     ,     . PLEASE SEND
Firedance;-;Loaded game. Felt like I was going to waste my life so I stopped looking for a match and quit. I dont know if I should play or not, the reviews look kinda scary so I will stick to CSGO.
KillerPigeon;-;This game taught me that no matter what you are; $20 is $20
Swate;-;Addictive, satisfying and challenging. Very fun, great feel and lots of variety. Love it.
Relax Bra. It's TrashTier MMR;-;Dota 2. Do you like feeling inadequate, worthless? Do you like feeling angry or getting mad at people you don't even know? Do you love to invest hours upon hours of your life into something that will only bring you pain with brief moments of joy? Do you like playing team games with that require team communication with people that don't speak your language, queue from other countries and DC constantly? If so Dota2 is your game. I wish I never started playing Dota2. There is a deep understanding a person with 2k + hours of Dota begins to see. It's like the deeper side of chess. It is evil, majestic, molesting and somewhat horrifying. If you truly start playing Dota2, truly start to unlock its deeper secrets. Do be craful. This game is a POS that will rob your soul. The MMR is garbage, the MM is hell on earth. DOTA2 might be the best game I have ever played in all my life!
NaXaLwAdI NaMmy;-;nice game must play
Cailee :D;-;THE BEST GAME
mies CSGOhunt.com;-;its ok i guess
Revolver Octopus;-;Player #1: "Don't end the game. Keep trolling" Player #2 : "Yeah, I've played Dota before."
Do Not Disturb! (Playing Lanjiao;-;I like the game Dota 2, but I don't like other country people treat Philippines and other neighboring countries like that, I want them to be treated fairly.. I'm strongly affected by people wanting Filipinos to be gone in the Dota 2 world , Games are for everyone.. Please change..
MaxofPower;-;most challenging game i have ever played :)
RCXY;-;This is the best game.
Raydin;-;I was forced to play this game
Drkos Synicle TF:GO;-;75% of characters look like undead piles of crap and all the human females look like s... 10/10 In seriousnes, most of the charcters look pretty cool, even the undead ones, no hold backs on the female humans looking like s though. I'm not really a big fan of the game or any MOBA game as a matter of a fact, but when trying this game out I actually got pretty addicted to it for a while. I recommend trying this with friends though, makes the expirence better and gives less worries of meeting a stranger whom is gonna curse you out for eating his tree that one time... I recommend trying out the hero named "Sniper" if you're gonna play the game for the first time.
|EFC|Ellie Phil;-;Dota has become one of the most popular games ever, being one of the Top 10 most played games on Steam. Here's why. The learning curve. Some might say this is the worst part of the game but almost no one can deny that it's what gets you addicted and stuck in this world of heroes, might and magic. Like any traditional MOBA, each hero has it's own distinctive role from support to carry and many other positions. Dota focuses mainly on building your character up in the beginning of a match and then through teamwork and strategy, going head to head with the other team and "pushing" (Destroying the enemy team's towers, creeps, etc.) all the way to their "ancient" leading to its destruction and victory. It might sound strange to someone who may be unfamiliar with MOBA style games but, it's an art and science within itself, with millions of diehard fans constantly urging themselves to become better and more efficient with their playing styles. With the inclusion of the 100+ available characters, there are at least five different ways to play each character meaning there is an insane amount of replayability already staked onto the stellar online multiplayer experience of both casual, experienced and professional Dota 2 players. The game's learning curve will take at least 40 hours of in-game time and potentially hours of research outside of the game (YouTube, Wikis, etc.) which can seem like a major turn off for a game such as this. However, there is an offline practice mode available for new players to hone their skills and find out what characters they enjoy playing the most. I've read the other reviews for Dota 2 and found that many people are upset with Russians and Chinese going on US servers, causing a language barrier and potentially losing games because of that. I will admit, this is a problem that will hopefully be fixed in the near future, as it is rather problematic and detrimental to emerging victorious in a Dota 2 match. In conclusion, Dota 2 is a great game and has become one of my personal favourite games of all time. The amazing diversity of every match, the fantastic community and the overall amount of content being added every month is astonishing. Plus, it's a free to play. Not a pay to win, it's legitamately a F2P game. What do you got to lose? Give Dota 2 and try and find out what everyone is talking about. You won't regret it.
Lexosis;-;A very good game that is well known for its gameplay and its ... community.
twich.tv/martinhavo;-;Now, i am adicted to this game.
MAD MAX;-;Big hopes get crushed by a lack of skill. Very nice
Ultron;-;recommended
i-ghost;-;How to lose friends and alienate people: the game.
NigelThornberry;-;Most addicting competitive video game ive played.
road to 1k;-;Awesome game, made me waste money to look pretty.
ToySoldier;-;I was gonna clean my room until I played Dota I gonna get up and find the broom but then I played Dota my room is still messed up and I know why - cause I played Dota [repeat 3X] I was gonna go to class before I played Dota I coulda cheated and I coulda passed but I played Dota I am taking it next semester and I know why - cause I played Dota [repeat 3X] I was gonna go to work but then I I played Dota I just got a new promotion but I played Dota now I'm selling courier skins and I know why - cause I played Dota [repeat 3X] I was gonna go to court before I played Dota I was gonna pay my child support but then I played Dota they took my whole paycheck and I know why - cause I played Dota [repeat 3X] I wasnt gonna run from the cops but I played Dota I was gonna pull right over and stop but I played Dota Now I am a paraplegic - because I got fed [repeat 3X] I was gonna pay my car note until I played Dota I was gonna gamble on the boat but then I played Dota now the tow truck is pulling away and I know why - because I played Dota [repeat 3X] I was gonna make love to you but then I played Dota I was gonna eat yo  too but then I played Dota now I'm playing Dota and I know why - cause I played Dota [repeat 3X] I messed up my entire life because I played Dota I lost my kids and wife because I played Dota now I'm sleeping on the sidewalk and I know why - cause I played Dota [repeat 3X] I'm gonna stop singing this song because I am playing Dota I'm singing this whole thing wrong because I'm playing Dota and if I dont sell one copy I know why - I'm playing Dota [repeat 3X] Most realistic Russia simulator. Vodka out of 10
A_Salty_Sky;-;there is a reason why every other moba is also referd to as a "dota like" game
jiggsywinky;-;This is the only game I play and it's available on Ubuntu good job!
el bombo santiago apostol;-;the day valve decides to block connections from russia/excommie countries to EU/US servers this game going to be great. until that happens the game is infested with stupid as shoe excommies with zero teamplay.
Star31;-;nice strategy game :D
RiPThatGuysRank;-;This is a really cool game, totally worth playing
Gog;-;ALL THIS RUSSIANS, .
Jnzn;-;Great game, also educational if you happen to be learning russian.
House;-;Brilliant :D
Lonk;-;Was once a LoL peasant, saw the light, and never returned (well that's a lie, did play League again, but this time I pwned)
Engr. Millor Vaderrrrrrrrrrrrrrr;-;amazing game, but you should try to put something that can block abusive word
|Cool|;-;Very cool game!
Yongcs.[A+];-;this game is so challenging and gives me entertainment! job well done steam!
teh penguin;-;I have almost 100 games and this is only what I'm playing... 10/10
swaggetti and memeballs;-;Two of my friends no longer speak to each other because one of them denied a regen rune. 10/10 best game irl volvo pls nerf geef mana
Fifflaren;-;I Recommend This game To Other People Who play Dota 1 Its Like Upgrading Your Gameplay :)
1ntelligence;-;The BEST game ever!!! :)
Blitz;-;"It's alright I guess." -IGN
www.pudgemadstore.com;-;good game ever
Wasted Man :c;-;,  :c The game as a game, is not impressed :c
Squire Grooktook;-;Hope you enjoy hit scan and clicking things.
Rave;-;Better than League of Legends.
Mr Lenz Flarez;-;I strongly recommend getting this game because it is unique and does not remind me of any other game that i have played.
iksi99;-;A fun game. Fun to win, but perhaps more importantly, it's also fun to lose. I just wish more people used language preferences correctly instead of non-English speaking people checking English just for faster queue times, but that's kinda expected when queue times are as long as they are.
Science;-;I had 4 other friends who played DotA. They have all killed themselves. I now only play on the 'Russian' servers to avoid playing with Russians. DotA also gave me AIDS, cancer, low self esteem, ended all of my relationships, and killed my brother. 10/10 would play again.
Last Horizon;-;Warning: you WILL get addicted to it
-Ice-Fox-;-;Chill And play
Soulhunger;-;dota is the best
Butters;-;I'm sure I'm part of the minority, but I just cannot get into DOTA 2. The original warcraft mod was fun to play as a change to normal gameplay, but a game focused entirely on that is unappealing to me personally. Most of my friends actually play this game a lot, and love it. I however get bored or very frustrated when I play it, and unlike other games, for some reason I do not have the drive to make myself better at it. Also: the community is extremely harsh. I'll admit, I suck...Really bad, but the learning curve is so high very few people are really good. What makes the game frustrating is that instead of being supportive, when I joined games and tried, I got a lot of flame from the other players because I sucked. I admit that it is annoying in a small team game to have one guy who sucks, but at least don't go nuts when they say "sorry I'm a noob".
Rapahamune;-;If you are an old dota 1 player, download and enjoy. If you are a new player, don't even try. Realy, none is going to help you on your first games, tutorial is  for online playing, everybody will curse you. Unfortunately, there's no space for new players: I tried, gave up.
PRO PAIN;-;After nearly 2000 hours in this game I think it's time to write a review. DO you enjoy not being able to communicate with your teammates? Because even if you DO happen to speak ENGLISH... anything other than in-game chat binds is going to get you a voice ban. Expect everyone to be absolutely crap. The only way I win games anymore is if i boost some noob OP carry. That's another thing about this game, every new hero they come out with is even worse than the last, and has some ridiculous 50 dollar price tag for any item sets. Free 2 play ruined dota. It's all peruvians with 5 accounts lagging all over pausing the game all the time because their internet sucks. Smurfing has gone out of control. Still the best MOBA but the WORST ABSOLUTE WORST community.
noob ^_^;-;i never played warcraft but dota made me played dota. see it for yourself ^_^
7H.Osama Bin Techies;-;So addictive!!!
Chicken McFagget;-;such beauty so Russians many rage very cooperate Le amaze pls no 8
[A]wib;-;I like this game because challenging
DreEeEeam;-;well, ruined my school, my life, because, dota is life. Anyone who says it's just a game, (  )
saad_doto;-;Chillar game.
r0cky;-;One if not the most complex games that are definately worth a try. With the greatest community of s and  who will always be next to you if you need another dose of low self-esteem, this game embeds more than learning how to play alone, but more on how people learn to cooperate. The process of scrambling random players into a team proves to be easy, but the talking and teamwork sometimes prove to be hard if not impossible. This game is a masterpiece of bipolarity, prejudice and humiliation. If you, reader, want to experience how tough and obnoxious people may become during a match which doesn't even take up an hour (most of the time) this is the game you definately should choose to try out. Oh, I forgot to mention, don't confuse the Dota English language with the actual English language because this one's got elements of Russian, Greek, German and any other language you can think of. Enjoy!
[E.Z.A.] WTFNOOBFTW?!;-;Same as dota, but with more 2. 10/10, would 2 again
neon_cacti;-;If you're a fan of MOBA games you'll probably enjoy this. Surely you might find it to be harder to begin playing with it if you're coming from League of Legends or some other MOBA game. The community is quite trash mostly, and if you're playing pub matches you'll be overrun by low level players that use pubstomp heroes and you'll most likely lose, unless they're so bad they're even bad at those heroes. It will take you a while to get onto some decent levels and decent pubs but it's worth it. Graphics are nice and somewhat toony, like TF2, and gameplay varies a lot depending on the teams, heroes and item builds you pick. It's free, so why not try it? All it's features are free, the only thing you might want to buy are aesthetics. EDIT: "Depression Simulator 2015" - This game taught me that everyone deserves the same amount of hate... oh and if it's Russians that are playing, I'd prefer Russian Roulette, thanks. At least you get to learn every single language except English. Nobody talks English in Dota 2, are you crazy?
TheLeafsNation;-;I don't know what's going on in this ing game. I press buttons and people die on occassion. 10/10
-Ax-;-;Most Cool Strategy Game.....
Reapergod36;-;The most challenging and engaging MOBA, warning to LoL players there is a steep learning curve and you need to unlearn a lot of habits. All attack animations are not designed to last hit, making it actually take skill. Meanwhile the game is all about skill, activatable items and always being able to comeback if you're diligent and knowledgable. Its about crushing defeat that sinks to your core, and triumphant victory that makes you yell to the skies!
Race;-;Do you want to learn how to  talk on russian? You've picked a right place! Also its kinda addicting.
Jeeffee.pptx;-;Blatant rip-off of the Adventure Time MOBA.
I AM MEL GHANIS!;-;fun as long as your not playing with idiots
g-ice;-;If you want your head to blow up->definitely recommend.
sPEAR;-;This game is so good that i played everyday and everynight. Steam is doing great XD
Dingus Suprice;-;I turned fish guy into a fish. 10/10
HFT;-;I sold my soul to this game
Ebi Ebokil;-;Complete waste of your life. If you start you will not stop. Don't even think about it.
A Fabulous Killjoy;-;This game is very fun but also very addictive
tommyfoxy;-;There were pandas, apart from that this game can  it its own face.
Skullerz;-;I've been converted from LoL to Dota and i dont regret anything.
Bundem;-;Perfect MOBA!
spe-;-;I love playing with russians, they're totally not ing
Umwittert Unaufgklrt;-;Amazing Game, never thought anything better.
EAGLE EYE;-;Dota 2 promises to take the unique blend of online RTS and RPG action that has made Dota popular with tens of millions of gamers and expand upon it in every way. This is a competitive MOBA game of action and strategy, played both professionally and casually by millions of passionate fans worldwide. Players pick from a pool of over a hundred heroes, forming two teams of five characters. Radiant heroes then battle their Dire counterparts to control a fantasy landscape, waging campaigns of cunning, stealth, and outright warfare. Put a few hundred hours into a game and you'll normally have its mechanics down pat. You may not be the greatest player ever, but you can usually expect to be at least competent and able to make a valuable contribution to your team's efforts. Sure, some teenager all hopped up on Mountain Dew and pubertal rage is still going to have faster reactions than you, but you'll get by. Until you pick up Dota 2. In Dota 2 you can play for a hundred hours and still be the most useless n00b to ever play the game, a let down to your team, an embarrassment to friends and family. It's a brutal game. But if you get into itand not everyone willit can make a full-on heroin addiction look like nothing more severe than a mild hankering.
sKullCandy;-;i recommend this to every one to play... =D
CraZeD DraGoN;-;Dota 2 has it all ! ! are you in the mood to play an FPS !? pick sniper! Want a flight simulator !? play gyro copter! want to play a mech simulator!? play timbersaw !! want to play a dragon simulator? !? pick dragon knigh!t! you in the mood for a ebola spreader simulator? pick veno! want to play barbie simulator!? pick cm ! want some hentai tentacle simulator? pick tide and go ravage!! want to play a pirate simulator!? pick kunka! want to play a bird simulator!? pick phoenix ! want to r4pe es with your big stone !? pick earth shaker! you ever wanted to see what it feels like to be invisible forever !? dota 2 has invisible simulators like riki ! want to play a hippie simulator!? pick NP! want to play samurai simulator!?! ? pick jug ! wana play a batman simulatoR! ? pick night skater ! wan t o ever be a zoo kkeeper simulatoar? pick bear druid or beastmaetster ! wan to play cool games like cool zombie survival games like h1z1 !? dont bother nerd ! just pick undying and u have ur own zombey! want to play icecream cone simulator !? pick AA ! As you sacan see from my revew of dta 2 this game is basically all games in the world combined into 1 massive simulator gagme ! very worht the price $ so buy now and play for free best pay to lse game 2015 !
Buckles;-;Overall i'd say its not that bad. little different from League but still fun enough. however my steam friend Mwacky is too stuck in his ways to try it and the moment he started doing poorly in a bot game just quit. he is a big .
Square.Overkill;-;Dota is either fun or infuriating once you figure out what to do. Dota destroys relationships with friends, makes you racist to nearly everyone that doesn't speak your language, makes you a terrible, intolerant person who insults people when barely provoked. If you're going to play dota, don't play it with good friends. Play with friends you don't mind losing. That'll either make you super close or hate eachother. Over 9000/10 get it now
RAT;-;The most addictive & best game I've ever played :)
kimchiman;-;There goes my life away
ONIN;-;i like dota 2, its my everyday habit 8 hours a day
?;-;May cause low self-esteem and suicidal tendencies. 10/10 recommend
-Rhizckey;-;This game is very awesome. I really like playing it. although in the beginning I was bored because don't quite understand. but in the end I was HOOKED \ :v /
Pegisuee;-;The Developers are really updating this game allot, and the recent changed they made show that they actually listen to the people playing this game. Because of the constant updating and tweaks in heroes you can get suprised in every game with a reaction like: does that hero do new  now!? Anyway the game is really fun to play especially with friends. The game has a good Tactical Depth to it and people finding new good combo's everyday! If you like Moba's this is the way to go.
Astrocat;-;Has a steep learning curve (the road is rough) but if you commit effort, it can be a lot of fun - especially when you are playing with friends.
Earth (afk for a week);-;This is a Great game and I love it! Plus its free
Meme.Morphine;-;super ber awesome cool swag turbodank turnt snacko approves so much coolness i  meself like a dog on laxatives. 3/10
sysadmin;-;it's alright
Sir Fatman the Morbidly Obese;-;Its like Farmville, but with weapons and magic. 10/potato would CKYA BLYAT again- IGN
FFF;-;it's nice game if you know
Jarod194;-;This game will ruin you. It will ruin your friendships. It will ruin your life. You will develope severe racism previously unknown. Anyone who doesn't speak English will ultimatelty be inferior to you. Never play this, as once it grabs you, you never leave. But damn does that new set look good.
Banana LOAF*;-;Ummmmm a very good way to improve on your russian xD
ExieD -[ok]-;-;Aaroud.Chon
Killingmonster5;-;Its a decent game im not that into it yet.
DeceiveDA;-;I orginally played Dota 2 when it first came out having my friend play and tell me about it. I tried the tutorial which was an awful idea because the game's tutorial is, for the most part, useless. I recommend going straight into a Bot match with some friends who have already played the game that will be so much easier. Here are the pros and cons of this game. Pros: *Great, but hard gameplay. *Super Addictive *Great music, voice acting, graphics, and animations. *Unique characters. *Strategy based teamwork. *Occasional good teammates. *Gives you a list of items to get for you charcter such as Starting Items, Early Game, Core Items, and Situational Items. *Hella Charcters *Team creation and rosters. *A GIANT playerbase and I mean GIANT! Cons: *Occasional bad teammates. *Russians play on your own server. *Occasional feeders(One who gets killed on purpose) *Racism *Annoyance and anger when loosing. *Can, if you let it, ruin your day even your life no joke, although hasn't happened to me. *Unlike LoL(League of Legends) has all characters unlocked which can make it harder to chose and get used to characters. *One map which is fine but can turn some gamers off. I know this seems like a lot more cons than pros but this is really a good game definently if you have friends to play with. One more thing this game is not for casual gamers at all and you most likely will die a lot at first. Even if you don't think you'll like this game you should still try it. If you need help with it at first get a friend to help you play if not contact me and I can help.
faece lssvoyd;-;good game and i know every one loves this game
ParadoX's cube;-;love this game :D
NightMare;-;Friendship Destroyer, stay away from this game. 10/10, would spend another 2K hours.
Tashek;-;Try it
Nuubs;-;Very Awesome ,very addictive and very more awesomeness
Nevermore;-;YOUR SOUL IS MINEEEEE
we lost;-;help me please
Hidan;-;its amazing. ty volvo
4.0.4;-;Nice Game All Time..From DotA 1 untill Now
Project X;-;HELLL YA thats all i have to say
GeT_ReKt;-;This is the most wonderful sack of  game I have ever played. I wake up in the morning and think about this ing game all day. I skip out on breakfast trying to come up with new strategies to use in this stupid game. I go to class and get  grades because i'm thinking of good team comps to beat strangers that call my a  and try and impress my team who report me and tell me to uninstall. I go home and instead of doing something with my friends, if i had any, i play this ing game. As I am watching the stupid ing black volvo guy turn his head at me, i begin to think about my  life. I have no girlfriend, and I am still a virgin. I turn down requests to hang out with my real friends so I can gain imaginary points on this game. This game has ruined my ing life. There are so many characters and items and strategies. I ing love it. This is the most beautiful turd pile of a game I have ever played. 0/10 would recommend.
T3RRORBLAD3;-;Better than rosetta stone, and it's free! 8/8 m8
widdiful;-;as you can tell from my game play hours i have had quite an....... epic?..... time playing this video gameb ased of off leage of legends "defend the ancients, please!" is an action adventure game starring jack black and jason statham as they and three less famous friends defend their ancients from evil jack black, evil jason statham and three less evil less famous friends this video game was clearly made in russia (but i dont know??) so theres a lot of rusians playing it but i can kinda see why because its quite a fun video ame id rate "defend the ancients, please!" a 7/11 which is my favourite japanese store which links to the reason that this game isnt a 11/11 which is that it wasnt made in japan how else am i going to get my bonner hard if there arent any hot anime babes well i guess that these american women would suffice but in all honesty anime girls and a few japanese musicians are the only attractive people on this westernised planet long live nippon
L'Azy;-;Dota 2 is one of the most enjoyable games at the moment! It's definitely a MUST-PLAY!
I Love Raw Latex;-;dis is better than sex.
King Jong-Il;-;My life, where did it go?
Sam Brodin;-;the best game I've played so far.... very recommended
GUGalaxyTV;-;This game ruined my life. 11/10
Check 'em;-;Extremely good community, I have found multiple edgy Sonic OC's in my time playing and wrote atleast 3 fanfictions about Invoker's hair. If only the community would start feeding the children in Africa instead of the enemy team. Overall 10/10, fluent in russian now.
koomorang;-;game is hard
BStyle;-;Dota 2 symptoms *swearing lot's of swearing *loss of you're real friends *appetite loss *depression *anxiety *addiction *weight loss or gain *hair loss *stress *rapid heart rate Its the new FREE meth So why not give it a blast 10/10 ggwp
[POG]Okechuwu Odoharum;-;The best MOBA hands down. The lore of the heroes, the diversity and unique design of each hero, every aspect is well thought out. While some heroes are a bit overpowered, you can still counter them, and you can still win. The setting and soundtrack adds to the aspect of gameplay as well. This game crushes LoL, SMITE, and HoN in my opinion.
xXx_MR_SNRUB_xXx;-;This is a game that surprised me. Most of the game is just clicking with the mouse, right click to do this, left click to do that. It did require a bit of effort getting used to it. But it can be picked up easily. Still getting to grips with the camera. And the lengthy matches means that you play for hours without realising it. This game probably will take up a lot of time in your life, so make sure you have many reasons to leave your computer screen.
Fumer;-;4 noobs only
Sputnik Satellite;-;Dota is the best MOBA game I've ever played so far. Even if you're new to MOBA games like I were you should still try Dota! It's free, it's fun.. The only thing you lose on it is your social life!
DrinKinG -A-;-;HAve a nice game!!!!!
Level 3 Grind;-;This game will take over your life, do not ever expect to do anything productive, you will lose contact will all outside life, you will break countless keyboards, every word in you vocabulary will be replaced with F***, overall i strongly recommend it.
Retired;-;Dota2 is the highly successful sequel to the WarCraft 3 custom map Defense of the Ancients. The original DotA was the parent of the MOBA genre that we enjoy today, and Dota2 has done an amazing job carrying on the legacy. If you were a fan of the original, or enjoy the current MOBA games on the market such as League of Legends, Heroes of Newerth, or Smite - Give Dota2 a chance. There are literally dozens of heroes to choose from, with multiple item builds for each hero. This can make the learning curve a little steep, but there is a decent tutorial system in place for helping new players learn. There is also an improved bot mode now, where you can practice against AI and hone your skills until you feel comfortable playing with other players. Ranked play adds a more competitive arena for players looking to improve and advance, and there is now a solo mid 1v1 mode to practice laning if you so choose. Dota2 is an ever evolving game, and growing into a prominent E-Sports arena. It isn't for everyone, and players that get frustrated easily might want to avoid it. The community can be a bit hostile towards newer players, but with some patience you can find great players and make friends that will help you through the process.
Inigo Montoya;-;Dota 2 is one of the most addicting games i have ever played 10/10 would recommend to a friend
nao sei;-;better than crack
Smooth Criminal;-;Ez,Free,Russian Dictionary. 10/10 IGN its allright
Jordan Michael;-;too many quiters
JZou;-;From a DotA 1 Player of wc3 i can rly recommend this game.This game helped me improve my russian.When i first started learning russian in DotA 1 I really thought it was hopeless but when i started playing DotA 2 everything changed.Thanks for the new russian features where you always get in a lobby with a russian whatever country and whatever preference you pick.This is a really good russian simulator. 10/10
LohkAre;-;Got into low priority for insulting ruskies. 5/5 would play again.
G | rtemisia I of Caria;-;I love this game sooo much!!! A must have and a must play for all DoTa fans out there!!
H Senpai;-;Better than league
Captain Dwarven Meteor;-;A good game for team players
TaNzEeLuRrEhMaN;-;Made my life a peace of
Bilbo $waggins;-;Learn't Russian In 2 Weeks. 10/10
Ma nezajebaji brate;-;Gut game very Soviet Union much russian.
[Ab]Woofing Dinosaurus 21:13;-;"Report" "Commend Me" "u are girl?" "mid or feed kthx" "I am mlg" "COMMEND ME PLZ I COMMEND YOU" "gg fggt" Sigh.....10/10
spoodermon;-;this game will change your life in the following ways. -you will hate russians -you will hate everybody who speaks any other language than english -you will lose your friends -you will lose your girlfried -YOU WILL THROW YOUR LIFE AWAY FOR DOTA!!! -also you will rage I r8 8/8 plz no h8
ED-209;-;Not recommended to people with russophobia. Otherwise it's ok.
StriderBoY aG;-;Don't start playing this unless you don't plan on stopping. IT'S LIKE SUCCUBUS 10/10 would gank bottom again
haalloow;-;Dota 2 is the best game i have ever played for last few years.
Fhangky;-;good player and fast trader lol
Curvy Brace;-;If you're into BDSM, you're into Dota
Redemption;-;Play 70+ min games where you feed and nurture your carry just for him to disconect in the middle of a crucial teamfight due to valves servers. 10/10 would cry myself to sleep again.
Spectre;-;You could have a career, a girlfriend, a family, some friends, success, money.But heres DotA 2 instead.
Saga.Darling<3;-;1500 hours of playing, never get tired of it 10/10
Gd Kr dm;-;better than lol
Excalibur;-;This game is similar to League of Legends but only have 1 map. You should try this and League of Legends to comare the two, some people say that dota 2 is more fun andother say League of Legends is more fun, but these two are really the same, so you should try both out
Mr.MeLkIY;-;DotA -    Defense of the Ancients,  . -   2.    , ,    ,    .    , DotA 2 -     ,    (     ).         (   3-5 )     -  . ,   2     ,    .  ,         ,    .             ,      . ,    -     "",      .       ,   ,  dota 2    .    ,         -.       500.       . ,   ,     .   dota 2     (   -  ),     ,       ,    .      -   ,   .   ,    .        .
JoBae;-;Very nice game :)
A;-;This game is great. No other questions should be asked. Sure the tutorial sucks but they are working on it and there is a Huge learning curve BUT this game is so amazing especcially if you have 4 other friends!
[L]eGenDaRy FeaDeR;-;no game as best as dota 2.... i hope someday i can be the asian player olso... but that only a dream....
arte et labore.;-;pretty decent game with new heroes added in as well as some cool effects but nothing beats the original DotA
knitted raptor cozy;-;A wonderful romp through intraspection; every game offers new insights into one's sexuality and right to life.
PaZ;-;This game is awesome ! fun to play with some friends , epic gameplay , and the best game out there (?)
Space Ghost;-;Better than Rosetta Stone if you want to learn Russian fast.
Cita Rasa Souma;-;found so many friends without leaving my room 10/10
Meu Vizinho  Jajaj;-;Be careful with hues, cykas and jajajas.
erothen2;-;Paper beats rock Scissor beats paper Dota beats LoL
[i] i;-;I like this game but i have no items yet , my old account scammed :(
KletusCreed;-;This game taught me alot about different cultures and people. And then it taught me to hate them all.
[A]rctru[Z];-;Great game for strategy type players. Items do not directly affect game result for this game are to strategy and teamwork
D05A01DA13 ();-;Since at the era of Dota 1, I'm already a fan of this game... What I do like on this game is it's not like just the other normal games, here you have to squeeze up your mind to win, it is all about strategy, skills, techniques, and many other more.
Minor.;-;One of the most tactical, thought-requiring game out there. Amazing gameplay and graphics providing the player with visual stimulation as well as gameplay satisfaction. A must for the moba peeps. It was my first moba game and I can't get enough of it. Rating: 9.9/10 P.S: Volvo why you no get better servers :<
ReMnant;-;I have a pet peeve of basically always liking valve games. Now call me a fanboy, but this one, like all of them, has a reason for being one of my favourites. Though it is slow paced and complicated, it is a great game when you get into it. I, myself, was never really interested in MOBAs, or RPG games like WoW or Diablo, but I really liked this. If you play alot of games that are competitive and involve alot of thought, teamwork, and strategy, this shouldn't be too far away from what you already know. Find a character you're comfortable with, (Some of my favourites are dragon knight, clockwerk, and venomancer) play some offline matches with bots, and you should do great. I warn you, though. This is one time-consuming and addicting game.
Flint Eastwood;-;Easiest way to develop anger issues. 10/10
Kaeseklumpn;-;Best Freaking Teamgame EVER! =)
Dis;-;Made me learn Brasilian Russian and English 152/10
Snappy the Saltipeetle;-;This game is a test of everything in your life. EVERYTHING. It will turn you into a stronger person but the road is filled with toxic chemicals everywhere. You will most likely fall victim to the dangers that Doto 2 holds or you can be legend.
seoulja;-;DotA 2 - Better than LoL
Yeul the Seeress;-;sleep - eat - dota this game is that good
Alexandria;-;What can I say, Dota never dies.
Vorfall;-;Worse than a heroin addiction. 10/10
Rakun |Envy|;-;GG, was fun, great for rage.
X-Ray;-;This Game is the best Game mankind ever created! Go ahead and play it!
Khak WORKING PC;-;AWESOME GAME I SUGGEST PICKING CARRY EVERY GAME AND SPEAKING IN BRAZILLIAN 10/10 BEANS
JamesFranco;-;somehow i just got crashed in game
VengeancE;-;"Dota 2" is the most amazing competitive game i have ever played in my whole life!!! XD And it's free also so nothing more to ask for guys!!! XD I'll give 10/10 rating, must play this game!!! XD
Cookie;-;Easy and fun game, invite your friends to experience the thrill of dota with good graphics.
ibnn;-;Great game in the world
Rhodes;-;(Speaking from a past LoL player's perspective) This is the one game i play to death and im really good at as of now. This game will make you feel an array of emotions from rage to happiness and back again leaving for quite a ride. Bottom line, if youre gonna play this game, and i cant stress this enough, go in knowing what you're doing. If you dont, you will fail hard, so many people forget that. Got that? Good. The gameplay itself is typical of a MOBA, but LoL players beware, the courier system, gold loss on death, and other mechanics is going to warrant some getting used to. The community is relatively fine so long as you know what you're doing (the LoL trashers are few and relatively uneventful for me) and you are perfectly nice, the few s will come, but as the Bronies say, love and tolerate. The graphics are good, what else is there to say? Im not gonna do a whole paragraph on it, theyre fine. The gameplay is smooth and provides a decent amount of challenge and fun. Overall, this is a great game 10/10 (this is my first review).
MiMoS;-;i faild school and didn't graduate 10/10
Ninjagoat;-;Eh its ok
Crowy;-;its fun to own noobs
TheMus1c;-;This game nice
Abraham Blinkoln;-;I once knew a social life. 10/10
Trouble;-;this game make me happy every single day
wasilis92;-;perfect strategy and teamwork game
ThankYouTremblingYarnMan!;-;worst game dont play
Nights&Reala;-;you love this game so much
Baconflakes;-;Let's look at this in a civilized fashion. If DotA was a person, it would be Bill Gates, complete and perfect. However, DotA does not have it's own island. League of Legends is like the YMCA. It's full of children, who never had a taste of Bill Gates lifestyle. The people who have had a taste of it will never set foot in the YMCA ever again. Ever. Unless, of course, they find that everyone is too good, and they leave to join the YMCA (Nothing against the YMCA, but Bill Gates' life is probably better).
Angry Muffin;-;THIS IS DOTAAAAAAAAAAA!!!
Skylord_Steele;-;Dota 2 is my fav game and it is good because i have learned russian from it 10/10
ampedsamo;-;Yes this game is hard to learn. yes people can be rather aggressive. yes it is possibly the best multiplayer experience I've ever had and yes once you play at least 10 games you'll be hooked. I try to play at least one game a day and have been doing so for months and don't plan on stopping. Give the game a chance (more like 5) and I guarantee that you'll see why its the most played game on steam. be prepared to be dumbfounded as to why you were playing anything else. also a side note: the games free. steam is free. the only thing u have to lose from giving it a try is alil self respect in the beginning. but don't worry after one game where u actually do really good you'll feel like a million bucks.
Mr Lahey;-;what else to say
slippery wet dog poop;-;Makes me want to kill myself. Highly recommended.
pyt;-;nothing in the world has ever made me this mad
VVolfz;-;Nice game, Russian language learning tool, patience simulator 2014, would play again, 10/10...
Darwin;-;This game is awesome t(*o*t) unbelievable
[cH]zofi;-;Already more than tousand hours during with teammates, friends, russians, and some others from whole world gamers ranked/public matches...find it a answer wich hero are the best, propably cant answered, the game so perfect, spend lot of time, so many heros...learn mechanics every hero needs a time...teamplay game, 1 man on war is nothing.
Choo Choo Motherfucker;-;I entirely reccomend dota2 it is a game you can sink so much time into and not get bored.
Big Gay Pablo #grindr;-;this game
Bimo Wiroprayogo;-;out of hell! i got no thesis for this game!
4e6yp_p;-;nice, but LoL is better, ololo
R D;-;Make's me want to do meth and become lesbian.
RachetThunderStud;-;sucks balls like seriously it sucks 10/10
SuiciDe IS ReaL;-;i love this game
c0njur3r;-;7 years and counting.....1 map...millions of outcomes...never the same *thumbs up*
Tortorise;-;Playing it every day. Not so balanced, but still fun to play! Recommending for people that like strategy type of games. Huge events (The International, Starladder etc.). If you will be that good in this game you can win huge prizes on that evetns with your team. 98/100
HEY IT'S G33K;-;I learned Russian in less than 2 weeks! 11/10, would go back to Legend of the Leagues
v;-;Better than League.
Cruel Child;-;If you like never ending games, this one it's a must get !
Hidden Eye;-;Nothing to say. 5 years playing dota 1 n dota 2. This game is my life.
FishProtato;-;fun to play with friends
DotChannel;-;When I played this on the US East servers and had the whole team only speak russian all I ask them is to speak more clear Japanese because I don't understand Morse code. But anyways I'd rate the game 10 / 10
S4G3.EtherealSilence;-;Game is called Defence Of The Ancients where team never defends, always push, and your mid lane is always mexican. Techies/10
Flaw;-;love this game <3
Copper;-;The best basic foreign language learning tool that includes violence and provocatively dressed chicks. Gets all my commends and approvals.
Rufusaur;-;This is the best game to ever walk the earth!
Limme;-;love this game since dota 1..
Mr.cupzJaYu;-;Well, you can't actually buy it, because it's free to play. But you should definitely play it. https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=j5IsvD5bRpg
Mage Healer;-;This game is just great! But dis ing sun strike is getting me fukkd up! i cant even dodge him then invoker in enemy team, and cant nonscope my enemies!, but like anyways!
Lucky8;-;This game is awesome!
Fight me u lil bitch;-;This is like roulette. Its fun, until it turns russian...
Tango The Mango;-;Learn to hate Russians simulator.
Hank "The Frutata" Hill;-;It's Rosetta Stone in a murderous name-calling racism simulator
Bob Swaget;-;I FOUND ME SOME POT -longkillington 2014 8/10 game wish it was swaggier with more glocks
sKullCandy;-;i recommend this to every one to play... =D
CraZeD DraGoN;-;Dota 2 has it all ! ! are you in the mood to play an FPS !? pick sniper! Want a flight simulator !? play gyro copter! want to play a mech simulator!? play timbersaw !! want to play a dragon simulator? !? pick dragon knigh!t! you in the mood for a ebola spreader simulator? pick veno! want to play barbie simulator!? pick cm ! want some hentai tentacle simulator? pick tide and go ravage!! want to play a pirate simulator!? pick kunka! want to play a bird simulator!? pick phoenix ! want to r4pe es with your big stone !? pick earth shaker! you ever wanted to see what it feels like to be invisible forever !? dota 2 has invisible simulators like riki ! want to play a hippie simulator!? pick NP! want to play samurai simulator!?! ? pick jug ! wana play a batman simulatoR! ? pick night skater ! wan t o ever be a zoo kkeeper simulatoar? pick bear druid or beastmaetster ! wan to play cool games like cool zombie survival games like h1z1 !? dont bother nerd ! just pick undying and u have ur own zombey! want to play icecream cone simulator !? pick AA ! As you sacan see from my revew of dta 2 this game is basically all games in the world combined into 1 massive simulator gagme ! very worht the price $ so buy now and play for free best pay to lse game 2015 !
Buckles;-;Overall i'd say its not that bad. little different from League but still fun enough. however my steam friend Mwacky is too stuck in his ways to try it and the moment he started doing poorly in a bot game just quit. he is a big .
Square.Overkill;-;Dota is either fun or infuriating once you figure out what to do. Dota destroys relationships with friends, makes you racist to nearly everyone that doesn't speak your language, makes you a terrible, intolerant person who insults people when barely provoked. If you're going to play dota, don't play it with good friends. Play with friends you don't mind losing. That'll either make you super close or hate eachother. Over 9000/10 get it now
Zacharie;-;Dota 2 is highly addictive in the respects that it's fast paced, strategic, and overall fun to play. To be honest, at first I couldn't get into the game though after I kept pushing myself to learn the heroes, items, mechanics, strats, etc. This as become one of my favorite game to play with friends. Every time I play a match it's different, it's always different. When other heroes are chosen, it changes the game entirely. The rules of the game change everytime you pick your hero and your enemies and team mates pick theirs. Every hero is over powered when leveled and given the right items. +Pros: Wide and ever growing pool of heroes, Wide ranges of team and lane combinations, Training grounds are very friendly to new players to the MOBA style of gaming or just to the game over all, Wide range of abilities active and passive, Casual and competitive game play from non-ranked to ranked, Keeps track of your MMR, Matches you with people around the same skill level as you or the head of your party, Some heroes have companion lines. -Cons: Dated textures on some heroes, Hard to get out of Low Priority once in Low Priority, Other regions get intertwined easily, Prefered language doesn't always mean you'll get with people who speak in a tongue you understand (English, Portuguise, Russian, German, Etc.), People tend to rage easily, Reports might be common to new players unfamiliar with multiplayer matches.
Revan;-;A place where you can meet jerks, get scolded, ragequit, etc. One of the best game of all time.
White Cosmos;-;Its Good :D :D
Winkbell;-;Nice Game ;) Today was good. Today was fun. Tomorrow is another one.
De Butcha;-;This is game is awesome!! The teamwork! the violence! the cooperation!
RamPaGinG GodliKe Noob;-;This game is unlike any other game..the graphics is awosome unlike other games..
[]Barry.Allen;-;Good game to play and ducking addicts me
GiDEC | twitch.tv/gidec;-;Racism everywhere! 10/10
''\(-_-'')/'';-;first thing i thought about dota is boring.. but then when i try to play i become addicted.. @_@
[OPC] Boarman1;-;Learning curve isn't as bad as people make out. Fun to play with some friends, and even better when you pull off good strategies.
[EPC]"Seijuro";-;Cool game
xvr`;-;If you love your family and friends. You should never play this game with them. Highly recommended!
[R]upee;-;Blyat. After 1,000 hours of this game, I can say it is one of the best games I have played. But, I wouldn't advise you to play it as it will drain the F***ing soul out of you, and you will not have any life from then on. However, if you do decide to play this game, Report the Russians and flame your team.
Fredda;-;This game taught me about the diversity of cultures that our small little corner of the universe offers. Then it taught me to hate them all.
Chrome;-;Side effects include: -Hatred of other humans -Lack of trust in others -Carpal Tunnel -Improved hand eye coordination -A large ego -Weight gain -Weight loss -Confidence -Despression -Extreme Racism -EXTREME RACISM -Increased strategic thinking capabilities -Mushy-brain syndrome -Subconsciously learning a new language -Subconsciously learning to hate the culture of said language -Literally every ailment that is not a transmitable disease 9/10 Doctors accepted this game on their recommendation list, but the tenth was afk
Grizzt;-;It's like roulette; fun until it turns into Russian.
psych0tic;-;Causes anxiety problems, low self esteem, Tourette's syndrome, mood swings, Bipolar disorder, breakdown of relationships, raging erections, racism. Would definitely recommend.
Sentimental Oriental;-;In Dota 2, Not many people speak your language. Not many people play well. Not many people talk nicely. Not many people work as a team. But if you find people that do... You'll have the most fun you've ever had.
Kyubashi;-;And you thought real life was a struggle.
ephir;-;I only played a little but it was fun.
Captain Obvious;-;Things I gave to DotA: 1. Money 2. Time 3. Love Things DotA gave me: 1. Arthritis 2. Carpal tunnel syndrome 3, Hatred of Russians, Mexicans, Spanish, Finnish, and Russians 4. Broken keyboard 5. Broken mouse 6. 9/10 ready 7. Server crashes 8. 4 stacks of Russians in EUW servers on English prefrence settings 9. Ranked matches 10. Free to play but Pay to win games (I.E. - Foreseer's contract, New Bloom 2015) 11. "It's in the bag" spam (especially Skywrath) 12. Multilingual cursing - I guess this is a good thing? 13. Split second math - Reliable/Unreliable gold and gold loss on death vs. Buyback availability - This is good too Essentially - DotA is a greedy woman, but I love her all the same. 11 / 10 would play again
HekaDooM;-;"THE PUB SUPPORT" "Where are wards?" The pub Carry demanded. "I placed them and they were countered" the Support began, "I am trying to juggle giving you complete lane farm, protecting you and harrassing the enemy while saving to buy more, also possibly sentries to remove their-" "UP COUR PLS" the mid hero politely added. "Give Savle" The Carry demanded. "Certainly." replies the support, using the salve on the Carry who subsequently ran headlong into an enemy creepwave. "So where is mek?" the Carry said, after he was ganked due to overextending. The Support died saving him and was treated to a rather enthusiastic series of map pings on his corpse. "Again, having not even enough to buy boots as well as wards, I don't think a 7 minute Mek is viable." The Support replies. "Haha look your level, so low, noob" the Carry retorted. "U have no item xaxa". "Well, jungle gold and experience through stacking and pulling with blocked camps is nowhere near as much as on lane which I attempted to give you, the carry, the priority over." The Carry is subsequently ganked again at the enemy tower, oblivious to the enemy tp that the Support moved away from. "Report Support, usless" The carry cried in allchat, in between mentioning various aspects of the Support's Mother's anatomy. "Instead of reporting and acting like that, why don't you try supporting for randoms sometime instead of instapicking a carry?" the Support asked, as he watched the Carry return to afk-lasthitting lane creeps. "HAH, support is for noskill noobs like you!"
flanadlivv;-;One day, a wise man intoduce me into this game. "it shall protect your virginity, my lad" he said.
EvenHuman?;-;This is one the best Games you could ever come across. But everything has it's Pros and Cons, I'll write it's here. Gameplay : It is a typical MOBA genre game. You select a Hero from 112 Heroes. Each hero has unique abilites which cost Mana to cast, that are used to assist the Hero along with it's Physical attacks which deal variable damage, to kill the Enemy Heroes. A typical DotA 2 game is about 30 - 50 minutes. You kill uncontrolled units called "Creeps" in the starting phase of the game to gain Gold and XP and later fight the Enemy Heroes along with your team to destroy their "Base" and their Ancient. Pros : - Helps improve . Strategical Thinking . Teamwork . Quick Decision making . Reflexes . Observation Power . Ability to Predict - Fun to play - Relaxing - Anti-Boredom - Keeps you away from Porn (Because it's so Addictive) Cons : - Time Wastage - Affects Eyesight - Affects Vertebral Column - Very Addictive - Bad Grades - Inability to Concentrate - Makes you Racist - Makes you Anti-Social - Makes you Violent - Makes you Aggresive - Makes you Frustrated too often - Makes you Abusive - Makes you Cold Hearted - Affects Relationships - Many more. Should you Play? : Whether you should play or not depends on what you want. If you're looking for a good Strategical game involving Teamwork and Quick Reflexes and Decision making, this is what you're looking for. However, If you're looking for a casual game just to kill some time and you're pretty busy through the rest of the day or if you're a student, this Game is just not for you. However, I'd recommended, that keeping in view the Risks of this game that I've mentioned in the Cons, you should, if you can afford the risks, give this game a try atleast. NOTE : Most of the cons only appear once you play it Online. Since, there's close to no Cons in the game Itself besides being Addictive and the other Physical Effects of excessive Computer use. The main reason for the cons is the Extremely Toxic Community. Everyone Rages, Everyone Flames, Everyone Abuses, Everyone Blames here. Welcome to Dota.
Drayke;-;I hate this game so ing much.
lLsY! :D;-;All dota 2 players be patient to your teammates,,,we are not perfect all the time :D :D
GrandRiser;-;Extremely good graphics, good interface,and easy to adapt (shifting from Dota 1 to Dota 2) ! Gameplay experience is always good. If you ever feel bored, just switch your heroes/get used to new heroes and you will feel a brand new experience again. A very good game. Gives free to play feature, and you dont have to pay to win. You give money merely for eye candy only. Only real skills are allowed here!
Usavich;-;pinoy feed well played nice game
Roxton13;-;10/10 best game to play with friends
nokeca;-;Awesome game. I've had some great exp with it. Just AWESOME !
Mach;-;This is a really fun MOBA game that keeps you satisfied, and it never gets boring, no matter what you do.
Skadi;-;Low prio = normal match They both have idiots and you'll always end up having a sniper with 5 bracers
GeT_ReKt;-;This is the most wonderful sack of  game I have ever played. I wake up in the morning and think about this ing game all day. I skip out on breakfast trying to come up with new strategies to use in this stupid game. I go to class and get  grades because i'm thinking of good team comps to beat strangers that call my a  and try and impress my team who report me and tell me to uninstall. I go home and instead of doing something with my friends, if i had any, i play this ing game. As I am watching the stupid ing black volvo guy turn his head at me, i begin to think about my  life. I have no girlfriend, and I am still a virgin. I turn down requests to hang out with my real friends so I can gain imaginary points on this game. This game has ruined my ing life. There are so many characters and items and strategies. I ing love it. This is the most beautiful turd pile of a game I have ever played. 0/10 would recommend.
TheCatFondler;-;Best russian language teacher ever
The_Shredder;-;I like the team game playing aspect and plans to kill a hero
Spike Spiegel;-;Here is your typical sarcastic review of DOTA2: The game is so good, I picked a carry then asked for safe lane at the start of the picking phase -Team then picks: FACELESS VOID, ANTI-MAGE, SPECTRE ****! REPORT SUBMITTED. Damn this is fun, 10/10 would play again Situations where you become frustrated about losing because of lack of proper communication with your team arise very often in this game, so the key to enjoying is by simplying letting go (not so easy when desperate to win). Aside from this con, everything else is pretty much solid, and it is still a very enjoyable game 85/100
Sathyir;-;t's super fun when playing with friends
CanadianCannabis;-;The only way to master Pugna, is to go full Pugna Pugna/10 "fouckin luv Pugna m8" - IGN
Engr. Millor Vaderrrrrrrrrrrrrrr;-;amazing game, but you should try to put something that can block abusive word
|Cool|;-;Very cool game!
Yongcs.[A+];-;this game is so challenging and gives me entertainment! job well done steam!
teh penguin;-;I have almost 100 games and this is only what I'm playing... 10/10
swaggetti and memeballs;-;Two of my friends no longer speak to each other because one of them denied a regen rune. 10/10 best game irl volvo pls nerf geef mana
-Angel-;-;very nice game :)
Pyroteknik308;-;Fun, can be a little hard to get into at first. PLay a few easy bot matches adn dont be dissuade if people are mean. Most of the community seems to be pretty cool
K u u h a k u;-;Nice game
poiu;-;this game is nice.
Mercer;-;Like on the best way to spend your leisure time. Dota is such game that can like really glue you to your seat for hours. Its really awsome but the updates are just a problem .....TOO many updates
BE MY FRIEND OR ELSE;-;Ending was weird so I had to google it, turns out GladOS was Caroline all along.
Ciphra;-;This is a great game. I play it for hours on end without getting bored. If you're looking for a mixture of hard-core rage and intense last minute comebacks, this is the game for you.
K.;-;The good: - Challenging. - Rewarding. - Competetive. The bad: - The Community. - Addictive. - Can cause severe rage. The ugly: - Russians.
Edgemaster Big Show;-;Better than rosetta stone. Built in langauges such as, spanish, portuguese, and russian. (japanese not included)
Death Wish Mask;-;this game is super fun get it i mean its free why not?
Moved;-;Tell me guys how to reach 5k hours I've been playing dota 2 since it was on beta I met Russian every game when dota still in beta and didn't like them and Now I miss Russian so much in SEA Server (They was replaced by pinoy but not as epic as i expected)
AH1DDENGAMER;-;i love this game MatPat is wrong
White Knightington the Third;-;So i was fingering my bloody  with a carrot, and realized.... "wtf am i doing with my life" so i decided to try Dota 2 for the first time. Needless to say, I got back to fingering my  in about 5 minutes. This game is absolute garbage, and would rather play minesweeper, while attending a 5 hour orgy fest at a McDonalds. I give this game a 2/, because at least Lemon Party had me interested for about 2 seconds.
Shanev551;-;It is an excellent game, lots of choice of characters, alot of abilities to learn and different items/set ups to try. Not suggested for those who only have 10 minutes to play a game :P Needs achievements though, they could so easily impliment them but are too lazy as of yet.
Chauncey H. Swagton Standin;-;I am just starting to play this game but I am starting to like it.
ecinaj;-;This game is the best game i had in my life. everyday i wake up, i always rush to my computer then log in steam then boom launch dota 2 i used to hate dota 2 cause it was hard. but now i love this game so much i wanna flip out! bythe way, it ruined me, but i dont mind. the love for my dota 2 game is so strong it makes me stay up all night! 11/10 -rif
Gog;-;ALL THIS RUSSIANS, .
Nights&Reala;-;you love this game so much
Baconflakes;-;Let's look at this in a civilized fashion. If DotA was a person, it would be Bill Gates, complete and perfect. However, DotA does not have it's own island. League of Legends is like the YMCA. It's full of children, who never had a taste of Bill Gates lifestyle. The people who have had a taste of it will never set foot in the YMCA ever again. Ever. Unless, of course, they find that everyone is too good, and they leave to join the YMCA (Nothing against the YMCA, but Bill Gates' life is probably better).
Angry Muffin;-;THIS IS DOTAAAAAAAAAAA!!!
Skylord_Steele;-;Dota 2 is my fav game and it is good because i have learned russian from it 10/10
ampedsamo;-;Yes this game is hard to learn. yes people can be rather aggressive. yes it is possibly the best multiplayer experience I've ever had and yes once you play at least 10 games you'll be hooked. I try to play at least one game a day and have been doing so for months and don't plan on stopping. Give the game a chance (more like 5) and I guarantee that you'll see why its the most played game on steam. be prepared to be dumbfounded as to why you were playing anything else. also a side note: the games free. steam is free. the only thing u have to lose from giving it a try is alil self respect in the beginning. but don't worry after one game where u actually do really good you'll feel like a million bucks.
Mr Lahey;-;what else to say
CheesyBob;-;guess its good
Templar;-;Good game in real time in the MOBA genre with RPG elements from the creators of Warcraft III (the developer and publisher of computer games Blizzard Entertainment) www.youtube.com/watch?v=NrEfMI6uSJc&index=13&list=PLC6DFAE8272F70BD8
Nailing Jesus;-;Do you play LoL? Do you play HoN? Do you play any type of MOBA that is not DoTA 2? How about you grow some nuts and play a real mans game. Stop playing  imitations and play the real deal, seoritas.
[MNI] Lens Blair;-;Welcome to Dota, a game where you will sacrifice everything for your teammates, only be flamed by afk Pudges and never-satisied Medusas until the end of the match. You will hear such insults and remarks as, "no items", "why u buy item instead of wards?", "why aren't you stacking?", "Y U NO HAVE TP INSTEAD OF WARDS/DUST?", "Y U NO DIE WITH ME?!", "u should read ur abilities noob because I get concerned when someone in unranked gameplay doesn't remember exactly how their ult was reworked last month", "omg I've never seen such a bad kda before", "ugh your all horrible just like my teammates the last 5-6 games", "JUST UNINSTALL THAT'S THE ONLY THING THAT'LL MAKE YOU PLAY BETTER". All this while desperately attempting to save your hard carry's life, and die time and time again to the enemies' burst damage. It may be that a friendly soul will attempt to reason with them, but it will be to no avail. To those teammates you were nothing but a verbal punching bag in a long line of verbal punching bags; once they locked on, they became dead-set on flaming you (as mentioned previously) until the Very. End. Of. The. Match. Then as you go to Dotabuff, spirits low, you see the scrubs haven't even registered. And then you will see that Dota 2 has sent you a notification informing you that action has been taken against those flamers, all thanks to your reports. It is then you will realize that once more all is right with the world. 11/10 would recommend.
GOIS;-;it is addictive and enjoyable
Mr;-;:D cool.
Little Eagle;-;its very good i have not played sooo long only 400 something hours on this but i like it when you start trie sniper and watch purge alot it helps guys overall never played dota 1 but dota 2 is certanly the  TRIE IT OUT your life cannot be more fullfilled
Communist Crotch Goblin;-;This help's me poop
Gibbers (away);-;I tried to play this, but I couldn't due to how much of an annoyance it was to learn to play. This type of gameplay isn't my style, but I can see others having fun with it! Happy Gaming!
Iceberg Simpson;-;Its a quality game
Euphoria.;-;a blessing and a curse, but still far better than LoL. played it since Blizzard's wc3 and still love it.
jsp;-;addictive addictive diktiv/
T I G E R-;-;Very Nice game! :D
StriderBoY aG;-;Don't start playing this unless you don't plan on stopping. IT'S LIKE SUCCUBUS 10/10 would gank bottom again
haalloow;-;Dota 2 is the best game i have ever played for last few years.
Fhangky;-;good player and fast trader lol
Curvy Brace;-;If you're into BDSM, you're into Dota
Redemption;-;Play 70+ min games where you feed and nurture your carry just for him to disconect in the middle of a crucial teamfight due to valves servers. 10/10 would cry myself to sleep again.
Spectre;-;You could have a career, a girlfriend, a family, some friends, success, money.But heres DotA 2 instead.
Saga.Darling<3;-;1500 hours of playing, never get tired of it 10/10
Gd Kr dm;-;better than lol
KmK;-;I recommend not to play this if you want a life :c
NotALegend;-;Get. This. Game. Very Fun When you Learn it, you won't want to stop playing. Despite the constant unknown language from Russians, and the rough learning curve. You'll be set into the BEST moba I have ever played.
Gob Bot;-;nice game...great graphic...really addictive
DetectiveFox;-;Dota2 is a PC game played from the prespective of 3rd person. There are around 40-50 classes to choose from with unique abilites and items. The map is always the same, but there are so many different ways to play the map. The game may seem slow, complicated, and frustrating at first, but don't let that fool you. After I played this game for around 4 hours I got the hang of things and began getting a couple kills per match and leading the team to victory. I would give the game a 8.5/10 and would recommend it to others, plus its free. -Good luck playing Dota2, and if you need any help feel free to add me, But comment on my profile first.
Much Wow;-;This game has changed my life. Before i found dota i used to be a twelvie and pwns noob mlg style in CoD but now im an xXxSwag260rektgamerxXx and play the best fps game out there. i cannot thank you enough volvo for giving me swaggness and teaching me how to #360rek noobs while at the same time smoke weed evryday and eat doritos as well as Mtndew. I give this awesome fps game a 4/20 (#blazeit) as it is better than LoL and Badrats at the same time. Thanks again valve for making the best Fps game ever created. Shout out to my good m8 Gabe Newell 4 being the swaggest evr, plz dont h8 im only 8 and im iside a g8 givin u all b8 and bein ber8ed by some 8's. (BTW LoL is better then DoTa #skrubs)
a1zen.;-;ill recommend this game to those gamers who want to try some bloody team fights, and epic graphics, intense game such as dota 2,, the biggest and most popular online, lan strategy game of all time..
Rob_Lucci;-;Ama thes na ginonte ta neyra sou kordeles AYTO EINAI TO PAIXNIDI SOU!!!!!
I QUIT DOTA;-;THIS IS THE MOST EASY GAME EVER, LIKE PLAY 3 GAMES AND YOU ARE ALREADY BEST DOTA 2 PLAYER. AND BE TAKEN TO TI4. ALL YOU HAVE TO DO IS TO KILL 1 STUPID ANCIENT. SO EASY LIKE WOW. IF YOU WANT A CHALLENGE PLAY LEAGE OF LESBIANS. NOW THATS A HARD GAME MAN.
effjay;-;It will waste your time, suck your life out and turn your friends against you. But you'll always queue one more time.
The Narbuckle Of Narbuckleton;-;I can never say why i love this game, i just do. my friends played 2 games then said it sucked and stoped. I kept playing and then showed them the ropes, they never stop playing it now. My advice? you need to have alot of bad games before you get into it, and friends will help, but in the end its worth it.
NTR;-;Play with people from all over the world, whether you want to or not.  Get cool items so you can be spammed friend requests from scammers in 3rd world countries.  Be reminded of how much you hate humanity in general with the constant aneurisms caused by their gameplay decisions.  This game has it all.
Rex Cannon;-;Party party party everybody party pick me monkey and go get a party started party if you wanna party get your girl and get her to get her girls and they get their girls then we gonna party if you wanna leave the party then we going to my party after that party we go to your party dr pepper party mix it with bud light and we gonna party. ~ Pit Bull on DOTA 2
chOp'pEr;-;It's a very nice and good game :D
''Mr. Di | wepe '';-;Good game. Make me spent half of my life hahaha
TSM Wukong;-;10/10 a game where I can rek scrubs.
Onizuka Eikichi;-;Why can't I use my tango on Treant? 10/10
BUBE IZ SELA;-;Wrong game for Russians
NippySparks;-;Dota 2 makes me rage, makes me hate my friends and ruined my life. I love it.
__;-;I have played. This game for some Time it maybe alot for part of the people but others think its just the beinging. This game remindes me of Minecraft , the only diffrence is that it does NOT get boring after a while . As a child I have played Minecraft for over 3 years, well now i hate it I cant even remmeber my controlls , but this game i can tell I will not leave. I have made over 90 daily online friends from dota and that number keeps on going up. I recommend it to every one , and to all these people that hate russians, dont just dont because when you play against a russian newbee that WILL keep you going till the end, ever get bored find a chat channel that one might even have a guild an example is Minimis. They even created MNI Mode popular in the dota 2 workshop check it out 10/10 every one shall have a objective of playing over 1k hours...
Mikasa;-;Love to play this game, better when played with friends. Full of strategic thinking and teamwork.
Treant of Pain;-;This game is perfect. Yeah, it is. Until you meet a russian. And when you do,  blyat .
Yo Momma;-;Great game
Muning;-;Fun but some people were way too arrogant. Nice game and more of custom avatars :)
esTryer | P E R  |;-;Dota 2 is fun, but at times its not! There is alot of South American Dota players who "troll you" (mess around). Also Russians can be a probelm, but you only play with Russians if you get a low priorty penlty
[HGN]Alan Thomas@PRO;-;This game is the best .Man its wicked <3 i have only spend hrs on this game :)
Innovation;-;mediocre game, but it gives the kids at the special olympics something to do
Genral Speci;-;This game is fun in many ways if you like mobas. There are over a 100 of heros that can fit your game style. There are also many items that you can use and strategize with. In the begining, it might be challenging, but you can overcome that by playing the training that Dota 2 has given you. Play a few games and you'll get a handle of things. Dota 2 is (in my opinion) the best moba game out there (now all the lol players are gonna yell at me). Lastly, the game has a very kind community (besides that one guy that you might play with every 20-50ish games). All in all, Dota 2 is a great game and should be played by all gamers who love mobas
Pepe;-;-Installed the game -Accepted a match -Played mid -Was told to uninstall -Uninstalled it -Repeated the same process untill they told me i did good 10/10 would repeat again
TARS;-;8/10 Needs more meepo and network issues.
Athmaz;-;10/10 made me want to start a holocaust against russian people. would recommend to everybody.
Meme.Morphine;-;super ber awesome cool swag turbodank turnt snacko approves so much coolness i  meself like a dog on laxatives. 3/10
sysadmin;-;it's alright
Sir Fatman the Morbidly Obese;-;Its like Farmville, but with weapons and magic. 10/potato would CKYA BLYAT again- IGN
Fd.gOd.MidNighT;-;This is the best game in the world.
smartdude2;-;Pudge is a wizard 10/10
He Who Dare's;-;beast brawl cant find match and still connecting, fixed your event plsss
MajorGlutes;-;A very versatile game, you discover new ways to play every match. It is especially fun to play with your friends! A very rewarding game without taking too much of your time, matches usually last around 30-60 minutes.
Unkn0wn;-;Best game in steam :D
Ohsobeastly;-;I love this game so much
chodemonger;-;All my friends started playing this game but I'm still too amazed by the fact that all mandarins are pre-sliced by nature.
Emilia Clarke;-;I play this game so much that I dont play my paid games anymore.
Exur;-;Don't make the same mistake I did.
Brooklyn Bopper;-;0/10 would rather try quit heroin than try quit this.
SnowingRock;-;Learn hundreds of free russian cureswords, develop anger issues towards everyone you meet, waste insane amounts of money on fake clothing and spend 90% of your time complaining. BUT You'll keep coming back for another chance of +24 MMR, trust me. It's basically crack cocaine, recommended for all.
-Cyclone;-;Update arcana Crystal Maiden, pleasee :D
Teknopathetic;-;EXPLORE EASTERN EUROPE IN THE COMFORT OF YOUR SEAT
Catastrophe9.scarfed anime;-;This game was made by goyim, for goyim. There aren't any gentile characters at all. Why are there no champions wearing a kippah or a a yarmulke??
sherLOck;-;I Love this game so much. so muny strategy in it
FBLU;-;It's a good game. Nice graph and anything :v
E-Edgar;-;If you are ever trying to learn russian or spanish feel free to play this game, after around 200 matches you will know how to insult people in various languages and you will acutally hate these people for reasons you dont even remember , after spending over 670 hours in this game i can say its actually great you will have fun , you will be angry sometimes , you will tryhard in some games , but youll realise theres no reason to flame others , you can just mute them and put music in the background , ofcourse after you report them for feeding and another things. Apart from that, at one point youll notice youve spent more time and money in a free to play game than in COD or another 60 dollars game , but youll say to yourself "Its fine , it was worth , now i have the best set ever" just to realise that there will be a better one coming up in 2 months. What can i say dota 2 is a great game , the community is sometimes horrible but youll learn to love it 10/10 IGN
Painrazor;-;this game is bootylicious!!!!!
Sinappi;-;awesome free game
[MNI] iMurkyDA;-;Has Its Goods And Its Badss But I like the game good game but sometimes theres updates that shouldnt of been done
Tantrum76;-;Dota is the game that drains your soul and slowly your steam wallet by influencing items that slightly alter your character's look in game, not like you don't look at the bald spot on their head 24/7 anyway but still, you do it, slowly. It caused me to denounce every other game in my library, i can't help myself but play more of this cocaine lined work of art with a cashmere fitting. My muscle to fat ratio is shifting to the latter and i am currently drinking prune juice non-stop just to pass a pair of nail clippers i mistook as a cheeto, whose family was being pilled into my mouth for consumption between courier runs. someone... please help me other than that 10/10
SoundClown;-;Dota 2 Review: 1. Joined game 2. Got killed once 3. Was told I suck and to stay at spawn bacause of how bad I suck 4. Same guy who says that gets killed 5. Says "GG" 6. Same guy disconnects 7. I get 6 kills and 1 death that match 8. Some reason got put in Low Priority servers 9. Tried to get out of Low Pirotity servers 10. Was reported for ditching games 11/10 would waste 25 hours of life again
{-RG-} Imchanting34;-;Fun. You get to play with new people from Russia. I love that aspect because now i dont have to buy roseta stone. i have russians to teach me
MR.UNICORN;-;ITS FREE AND AWESOME ;)
Left Wing Grandpa;-;The first time I played, I was  rammed by easy bots. 11/10 600+ hrs now.
YT;-;dota is not too friendly for new player :)
I'm Back Bitch..!!;-;See My Play ..!!
[ ];-;Good game in the world
NaeNae;-;ty !
Wawc;-;The most annoying game ever. Must play!
B E L L A;-;One of the best games ever made in history.
Hahz.Pacific.eSports;-;I reallly enjoyed this game.
alesana;-;i love this game
VenuS;-;Doto is hard
A Homeless Canadian;-;Gets reported for being better than some one, 10/10 best game ever by this scrub: http://steamcommunity.com/id/cannus/
kurty;-;Might have to f#$% a dog ay!
mipaw_K;-;best online game
JUMPIN OUT THE GYM;-;>Take League of Legends >Make it a good game >Voila, DOTA 2
crisis;-;Do you have too much spare time? Do you enjoy spending money only to make minor differences to character models? Well then do i have a game for you. Designed to eat money and time alike, DoTA2 gives an experience you wouldnt soon forget. While new, the game offers a community that will constantly remind you of this fact with constant taunts of "Noob' , "Rubbish Noob", "Delete game now, so bad' etc. Practice Bot matches turn feral when joined by MLG leet pro amazeballs players whose God like playing is only matched by thier inability to stay alive against easy bots and to blame new players for this. Overall I would give DoTA a score based on a percentage of either x/10 or x/100. That 'x' is due to vary depending on the day so i have decided not to include it.
[xXx]Creed;-;I came from HoN to dota 2 and i find the switch so gratifying dota 2 is a much better game and far better community no two games is ever the same and i like that
Happy Eid Mubarak;-;this game is very good. no need pay to win. but just pay for good looking :))
Swate;-;Addictive, satisfying and challenging. Very fun, great feel and lots of variety. Love it.
Relax Bra. It's TrashTier MMR;-;Dota 2. Do you like feeling inadequate, worthless? Do you like feeling angry or getting mad at people you don't even know? Do you love to invest hours upon hours of your life into something that will only bring you pain with brief moments of joy? Do you like playing team games with that require team communication with people that don't speak your language, queue from other countries and DC constantly? If so Dota2 is your game. I wish I never started playing Dota2. There is a deep understanding a person with 2k + hours of Dota begins to see. It's like the deeper side of chess. It is evil, majestic, molesting and somewhat horrifying. If you truly start playing Dota2, truly start to unlock its deeper secrets. Do be craful. This game is a POS that will rob your soul. The MMR is garbage, the MM is hell on earth. DOTA2 might be the best game I have ever played in all my life!
NaXaLwAdI NaMmy;-;nice game must play
IntensedRaughing;-;SEA server players doesn't even understand english 11/10. (Help me get out of this server)
Ace Of Spades;-;This Game is Good!!!
|TTV|-Schriesegollum;-;Dota 2 is a very unique game that is mostly known for its great community of Insta-picking Russians and Mexicans that love to play on american servers. If you're looking for a MOBA better than LoL then you are in the right section of steam!
beauxors;-;I suck at this game, but its pretty fun.
Fredda;-;This game taught me about the diversity of cultures that our small little corner of the universe offers. Then it taught me to hate them all.
Chrome;-;Side effects include: -Hatred of other humans -Lack of trust in others -Carpal Tunnel -Improved hand eye coordination -A large ego -Weight gain -Weight loss -Confidence -Despression -Extreme Racism -EXTREME RACISM -Increased strategic thinking capabilities -Mushy-brain syndrome -Subconsciously learning a new language -Subconsciously learning to hate the culture of said language -Literally every ailment that is not a transmitable disease 9/10 Doctors accepted this game on their recommendation list, but the tenth was afk
Grizzt;-;It's like roulette; fun until it turns into Russian.
psych0tic;-;Causes anxiety problems, low self esteem, Tourette's syndrome, mood swings, Bipolar disorder, breakdown of relationships, raging erections, racism. Would definitely recommend.
Sentimental Oriental;-;In Dota 2, Not many people speak your language. Not many people play well. Not many people talk nicely. Not many people work as a team. But if you find people that do... You'll have the most fun you've ever had.
Kyubashi;-;And you thought real life was a struggle.
ephir;-;I only played a little but it was fun.
Captain Obvious;-;Things I gave to DotA: 1. Money 2. Time 3. Love Things DotA gave me: 1. Arthritis 2. Carpal tunnel syndrome 3, Hatred of Russians, Mexicans, Spanish, Finnish, and Russians 4. Broken keyboard 5. Broken mouse 6. 9/10 ready 7. Server crashes 8. 4 stacks of Russians in EUW servers on English prefrence settings 9. Ranked matches 10. Free to play but Pay to win games (I.E. - Foreseer's contract, New Bloom 2015) 11. "It's in the bag" spam (especially Skywrath) 12. Multilingual cursing - I guess this is a good thing? 13. Split second math - Reliable/Unreliable gold and gold loss on death vs. Buyback availability - This is good too Essentially - DotA is a greedy woman, but I love her all the same. 11 / 10 would play again
HekaDooM;-;"THE PUB SUPPORT" "Where are wards?" The pub Carry demanded. "I placed them and they were countered" the Support began, "I am trying to juggle giving you complete lane farm, protecting you and harrassing the enemy while saving to buy more, also possibly sentries to remove their-" "UP COUR PLS" the mid hero politely added. "Give Savle" The Carry demanded. "Certainly." replies the support, using the salve on the Carry who subsequently ran headlong into an enemy creepwave. "So where is mek?" the Carry said, after he was ganked due to overextending. The Support died saving him and was treated to a rather enthusiastic series of map pings on his corpse. "Again, having not even enough to buy boots as well as wards, I don't think a 7 minute Mek is viable." The Support replies. "Haha look your level, so low, noob" the Carry retorted. "U have no item xaxa". "Well, jungle gold and experience through stacking and pulling with blocked camps is nowhere near as much as on lane which I attempted to give you, the carry, the priority over." The Carry is subsequently ganked again at the enemy tower, oblivious to the enemy tp that the Support moved away from. "Report Support, usless" The carry cried in allchat, in between mentioning various aspects of the Support's Mother's anatomy. "Instead of reporting and acting like that, why don't you try supporting for randoms sometime instead of instapicking a carry?" the Support asked, as he watched the Carry return to afk-lasthitting lane creeps. "HAH, support is for noskill noobs like you!"
flanadlivv;-;One day, a wise man intoduce me into this game. "it shall protect your virginity, my lad" he said.
bhuboy;-;cool beans
))));-;The best of the best
Noob Slayer;-;This is the game were it changed me from being a boy to a man.
Sub Zero;-;Great game, Pudge is my real father
TranscendingHumanity;-;My Grandfather smoked his whole life. I was about 10 years old when my mother said to him, 'If you ever want to see your grandchildren graduate, you have to stop immediately.'. Tears welled up in his eyes when he realized what exactly was at stake. He gave it up immediately. Three years later he died of lung cancer. It was really sad and destroyed me. My mother said to me- 'Don't ever smoke. Please don't put your family through what your Grandfather put us through." I agreed. At 28, I have never touched a cigarette. I must say, I feel a very slight sense of regret for never having done it, because this game gave me cancer anyway.
Velly;-;Life is too good? Friends are too kind with you? You have lost taste of begin mocked by random people? Install this and play it a week. From the question of gameplay, i can say - THIS IS NOT MOBA, its like tf2+csgo in thirdperson and you use mouse to move around and keyboard to shoot, simple.
GentleNarco;-;Stress Simulator 2014. Play it, at your own risk.
BlackGhost;-;its really great game it makes u happy and feel energy in bad times and boring times and there something incredible can do in the game so play it its really fun :)
Popo;-;The single most addictive game I have ever played. However, if you're not ready to spend 1000 hours playing what has been aptly dubbed a "misery simulator" until you're proficient at all of it's over 100 heroes, I suggest you give this one a pass. Otherwise, welcome to one of the most awful, toxic, horrifying communities outside of that one website, you know the one. It just so happens it's attached to one of the most replayable, simple yet deceptively complex, and absolutely enthralling games out there. GL HF 10/10 would be called names in Russian again.
A Crazed Gunman;-;I hate this game, but why do I keep playing it. This game takes your soul away, makes you hate particular nationalities especially those who refuse to speak in english, awful community filled with troglodytes which of whom takes enjoyment of eating human excrements, AIDS-ridden subhuman degenerates. 9/10 would report again
Likeadog*-;-;good game well played
MovesLikeMercury;-;The new era of gaming is here!!
Ulrich;-;Goodies -> noobs in groups of enemy Cons -> noobs in your group
Sir Draw;-;dont do it do not download this game
Smurphy;-;This game, is quite the read. I kid you not
Extortia;-;Blew up enemy tower by self, Killed by creeps 10/10
Shavara-sama;-;Fantastic game, i've played other MOBA games and this is truly the best 1 of them all, i can safely say that this game gives you everything you could ask for, the high skill cieling of each hero for you to learn makes it so you've always got something to do, get a solo ranked MMR or go play with your friends, it's great and i've not gotten bored yet in nearly 900 hours (i'm on around 860 games played). 10/10 :D
COPROTURBINE;-;first dose for free
TheCatFondler;-;Best russian language teacher ever
The_Shredder;-;I like the team game playing aspect and plans to kill a hero
{WTF} Whirly twitch(whirly1227);-;One of the best games I have every played!
SoW slimpyman;-;game is a face rolling, masterpeice. game is point and click, but the best point and click game available.
Auobo  KONAN;-;nice this game
c700;-;Great game! The best thing is it's free to play! Thank you, Valve!
Masochi$t;-;Dota 2 is like your girlfriend but she is on her period most of the time
E Genius;-;Better than: LoL,HoN,SMITE,STRIFE and other stupid MOBA games that try to copy Dota1 or Dota2 Becomes a Racist. 10/10 would still play
Age Of Aggression;-;don't need to speak that much. You should come and try to learn Dota 2.
Neo13;-;Really addictive amazing game. Be ready to b abused but its worth it.
Aji;-;New update is more better.
Buscemi, BoyWonder;-;Dota 2 is a massive online game with lots of characters to play. However the community is mainly built up of swearing teens, but his doesn't make thegame bad. The graphics are quite good and the map layout is graet, however matchs go for to long in mt opinion. I rate Dota 2 8.5/10!
Nukawari;-;This game....... Many times i've told myself to stop playing, to resist the constant urge to 'pwn' scrubs in public matchmaking...BUT as singsong would say "NEIN"! DOTA IS LIFE! And well GGWP Thanks Dota 6 month anniversary, Still flaming :) -10/10- Also ruins social lives SOooo i recently hit 2000 hours in game , must say i'm kinda proud and dissapointed with myself at the same time. Reasoning for---- A.Dissapointed in myslef for letting myself get preoccupied with this game instead of doing more important things , and B. I am Proud because of the fact i actually stuck with the terrible community that DOTA 2 is (Essentially full of Raging 12 year old kids and extremely ignorant "6K' mmr players) But thus i am indeed still here and somehow continuing to add more hours on to this game day to day, I have one more comment about DOTA 2 and that is that people seem to rate down this game and say "i've wasted so much time" , but although it may have been wasted time , was it still fun? Why would you regret something you enjoy? I don't know i love this game man i'd definitely reccomend!
Anal_Curry;-;10/10 Ruined my life
Jane;-;The game is awesome the environment the gameplay and other cool stuffs even funny thing can happen in this war game,You can also experienced heroes with lots of different abilities and their stories If you do not understand what I'm saying here all I wnat to say that this game is frickin awesome and fun
Fredda;-;This game taught me about the diversity of cultures that our small little corner of the universe offers. Then it taught me to hate them all.
Chrome;-;Side effects include: -Hatred of other humans -Lack of trust in others -Carpal Tunnel -Improved hand eye coordination -A large ego -Weight gain -Weight loss -Confidence -Despression -Extreme Racism -EXTREME RACISM -Increased strategic thinking capabilities -Mushy-brain syndrome -Subconsciously learning a new language -Subconsciously learning to hate the culture of said language -Literally every ailment that is not a transmitable disease 9/10 Doctors accepted this game on their recommendation list, but the tenth was afk
Grizzt;-;It's like roulette; fun until it turns into Russian.
psych0tic;-;Causes anxiety problems, low self esteem, Tourette's syndrome, mood swings, Bipolar disorder, breakdown of relationships, raging erections, racism. Would definitely recommend.
Sentimental Oriental;-;In Dota 2, Not many people speak your language. Not many people play well. Not many people talk nicely. Not many people work as a team. But if you find people that do... You'll have the most fun you've ever had.
Kyubashi;-;And you thought real life was a struggle.
ephir;-;I only played a little but it was fun.
Captain Obvious;-;Things I gave to DotA: 1. Money 2. Time 3. Love Things DotA gave me: 1. Arthritis 2. Carpal tunnel syndrome 3, Hatred of Russians, Mexicans, Spanish, Finnish, and Russians 4. Broken keyboard 5. Broken mouse 6. 9/10 ready 7. Server crashes 8. 4 stacks of Russians in EUW servers on English prefrence settings 9. Ranked matches 10. Free to play but Pay to win games (I.E. - Foreseer's contract, New Bloom 2015) 11. "It's in the bag" spam (especially Skywrath) 12. Multilingual cursing - I guess this is a good thing? 13. Split second math - Reliable/Unreliable gold and gold loss on death vs. Buyback availability - This is good too Essentially - DotA is a greedy woman, but I love her all the same. 11 / 10 would play again
HekaDooM;-;"THE PUB SUPPORT" "Where are wards?" The pub Carry demanded. "I placed them and they were countered" the Support began, "I am trying to juggle giving you complete lane farm, protecting you and harrassing the enemy while saving to buy more, also possibly sentries to remove their-" "UP COUR PLS" the mid hero politely added. "Give Savle" The Carry demanded. "Certainly." replies the support, using the salve on the Carry who subsequently ran headlong into an enemy creepwave. "So where is mek?" the Carry said, after he was ganked due to overextending. The Support died saving him and was treated to a rather enthusiastic series of map pings on his corpse. "Again, having not even enough to buy boots as well as wards, I don't think a 7 minute Mek is viable." The Support replies. "Haha look your level, so low, noob" the Carry retorted. "U have no item xaxa". "Well, jungle gold and experience through stacking and pulling with blocked camps is nowhere near as much as on lane which I attempted to give you, the carry, the priority over." The Carry is subsequently ganked again at the enemy tower, oblivious to the enemy tp that the Support moved away from. "Report Support, usless" The carry cried in allchat, in between mentioning various aspects of the Support's Mother's anatomy. "Instead of reporting and acting like that, why don't you try supporting for randoms sometime instead of instapicking a carry?" the Support asked, as he watched the Carry return to afk-lasthitting lane creeps. "HAH, support is for noskill noobs like you!"
flanadlivv;-;One day, a wise man intoduce me into this game. "it shall protect your virginity, my lad" he said.
ONIN;-;i like dota 2, its my everyday habit 8 hours a day
?;-;May cause low self-esteem and suicidal tendencies. 10/10 recommend
-Rhizckey;-;This game is very awesome. I really like playing it. although in the beginning I was bored because don't quite understand. but in the end I was HOOKED \ :v /
Pegisuee;-;The Developers are really updating this game allot, and the recent changed they made show that they actually listen to the people playing this game. Because of the constant updating and tweaks in heroes you can get suprised in every game with a reaction like: does that hero do new  now!? Anyway the game is really fun to play especially with friends. The game has a good Tactical Depth to it and people finding new good combo's everyday! If you like Moba's this is the way to go.
Astrocat;-;Has a steep learning curve (the road is rough) but if you commit effort, it can be a lot of fun - especially when you are playing with friends.
Earth (afk for a week);-;This is a Great game and I love it! Plus its free
Dota2Star.Com;-;Dota 2 is best game i see ever play so you can easy mange your hero and skills to kill your enemy . if you have profeshinal team you will win the game easy .
@Arbuz;-;Prety good game despite of that I used to yell to my friend until my vocal chords got complety wrekt and crushed my pc. 1337/420
une lgende putain;-;Game becomes playable once you reach 4k mmr
Esdeath;-;Nice Games Try To Playing this game
GraMatoN_CleRic;-;lets all play dota together
HerkyTurkey;-;So um.. I got this game beacause i am a BIG fan of RTS games....It is cool that it is supported on both Windows and Mac,therefore i can play it with all of my friends....The game offers a very hard but rewarding multiplayer experience, simmilar to LoL.It is still very different and totally worth giving it a try!!!
cork_stopper;-;Really awesome game, so many different things you can do. It can give you hours and hours of gameplay without getting bored
Naruto;-;Suffer the ravages of time
CutePlut(osha);-;Cool game)
Nirmeister;-;Amazing game. So much possiblilities to the way heroes can be played.
ingaling;-;Ever since my friend got into this, I haven't heard from him. We don't speak to each other anymore, and he will not stop playing this game. This is highly addictive to some people, I was one of the lucky ones. If you want someone to stop talking, or having a social life/soul I would recommend this for them.
Bagdis;-;Best game in the world
fredda2k;-;Game so goooood! Best played with friends otherwise you get stuck with people without a brain..
DeaThly_ArroW;-;Dota 2 is better than most of games and it is free.
MissaKILLA;-;this is GOOD
xD : YaphetS *_*;-;Its Fun :D
xD : YaphetS *_*;-;Its Fun :D
mari;-;the opposite of fun
M R;-;I love this game... Lots of experiences that you will gain... And of course you can have new friends.
Bzzz.Brotato;-;WANT: SOUL, HAPPINESS AND THE WAY YOU KNOW HOW TO KEEP CALM HAVE: DOTA, FUN GAMES, RUSSIAN  BLYAT
HOSTELTHEGANKTRAIN^;-;CAN YOU GET ME OUT OF THE LOW PRIORITY THEY REPORTED WRONG GUY AND I GOT LOW PR FOR 16 GAMES TY !
[W.M.D]  D3LTA;-;The best game ever
Skips;-;Got reported by my entire team in my second game for sucking so bad
I'm out! ^w^;-;Nice Game :D
Tamango;-;great game :)
Armagedon;-;I LOVE THIS GAME <333
Gaiacon;-;Real tough learning curve, but awesome once you start getting used to it. I'm addicted to this game. Don't bother unless you have patience and time. The more you play, the better you get, and the more fun it is.
Dragon Munday;-;DOTA 2 is a stratigic line-war game that also involves alot of team work, its fun to play with friends and has over 100 characters to choose from. All in all DOTA 2 is a great game and on top of everything its free!
ghostie;-;Dota blows.
Left Slark;-;Love this game. I played League of Legends before this, heard about Dota 2 and thought Dota 2 was going to suck, but i play this more now.
TheViperPanda;-;an exellent example of a game that requires teamwork. made lots of good friends here. be patient and learn the mechanics, u will end up enjoying the game a hell of alot more. be patient though, especially with (no stereotyping) pinoys and russians...... The picks they make... lol. and for the love of good stop playing riki! 9.5/10. my game of the year for 2013 Game in Review as of 26th March 2015- Not much changes from my first review, except for some terrible events from valve, such as the oracle PA fest, as well as the year best 2015 which constantly crashed servers in it's ludicrous pay to win concept. Really hope this does not become the norm for dota. Other than that, current meta is pretty stale with SF, sniper and jug in every game. Hope TI5 changes things up for the community. Side Note. Managed to learn fluent russian and tagalog in this 2 years. Who knew dota was a language simulator?
Dheeraj;-;One day Im going to croak from all this high blood pressure.
GGWPFAGgot;-;On a good day,like normal person open comp ,playing dota 2. Find match. After choose hero,realise thats 3 crazy kid from filipino, 1 rage adult from russia at my team,Spam mic against each other ,RIP my ears. 10/10 would try agn.
Jony-;-;PRO: + Dota 2 Lounge - Marketplace, Trades, Bets + More strategic depth + Watch games live + customizable hotkeys(very customizable) + better sounds(more appropriate) + reconnecting to the game you were in feature(and allies can't sell your items) + broadcasting game feature + ble to edit settings while in a game, like hotkeys + Co-OP + Valve Anti-Cheat + Warcraft III mod that laid out the principles of levelling up a hero + Hero abilities are impactful and satisfying to land + rewarding at the end of the round + Profile Level + Beautiful environments, great graphics CONTRA: - Tutorial isn't done yet - There are some bugs that must be fixed - No Achievements CONCLUSION: A deep and rewarding competitive game that becomes something special when taken on in the company of others.
.;-;1.Pick Pudge. 2.Farm some money,xp 3.Buy Blink. 4.Hide at the edge of the map behind the trees. 5.Hook enemy heros. 6.Blink outside the tree. 7.Watch your enemys stack. 8.Have Fun.
TRACE;-;Now i believe in love from the first sight!. This game blows your mind, it's really fun, competetive and a time spending solution. I really recommend such games, a jaw dropping MOBA to satisfy you. DOTA 2 is the god of MOBA, 100% Free: Everything is unlocked (Not like LoL) , you get drop and you can make money from it. I give it a 10/10 ^^ GET IT! :D
Apam;-;this game is awesome in terms of strategy games........i like this game and i would recommend others to play, what i don't like about this game is that people who had join this game earlier they got advantage in term of item drops and item while it hard to find items now days which i would like to be changed.......
TeamAutism.TRUE_HOKAGE;-;Good game, Well Played
M1lky Way;-;Good game. Very Enjoyable to play and best game ever.
Oh!!! Look At The Stupid Boy!;-;this is a ing good game try it
Mine;-;awesome game! definitely would recommend
-Bearix-;-;Really Love to play Dota2... Best Game ever
37;-;Dota 2 is the best ever game not only uses skills but also mind, always ready and alert every time, its challenge me so much to play more..
phewwpheww!!;-;dont play it,it will take your life. 10/10 recommended
LuX;-;Great game! you wouldnt expect for Valve to have been the creators of Dota 2 and Team Fortress 2, The games are vastly different.
JLaw!;-;Dota 2 is fun and addicting action real-time strategy(ARTS) game that you can sink countless hours into. However, this isn't the case from the beginning. The tutorial teaches players basic mechanics of the game, but it will not teach you how to survive in a real match. If you jump right in to a game with other players lacking personal experience, you will die constantly and likely find yourself demoralized. It's not fun. While this is true, if you really take your time with the game, slowly learning about heroes, items, and strategies, the game begins to open up. It becomes the addicting game I first mentioned, and you will love it; there are countless possibilities, and every match is different and interesting in its own way. You need to sink some time into it to get to this point, but luckily Valve helps ease you in with the aforementioned tutorial, as well as bot games and the ability to play against bots with other humans. As of the time of this writing, there are 110 playable heroes in Dota 2. Although the map is always the same, you will encounter different characters, combinations, and tactics every time you play. This is what I mean by "countless possibilities." There are characters for all kinds of playstyles; supports, carries(the powerful ones dealing out the damage), teamfighters, and more. It truly never gets old. Give Dota 2 a try and some of your time, and I assure you that you will not be dissapointed.
Iced;-;Only the best game ever. If you want to play an aggravating game, with a ridiculously steep learning curve, that will probably ruin your life, and a community that speaks through cussing, this is for you. Other than that, its a great game. Newbies should always play Meepo their first game.
Dilly Dingus;-;Mid or feed
Final  _;-;this game is game is so much funny where u can meet some new friends
SaLadass;-;This is a great game ever!!!
xD : YaphetS *_*;-;Its Fun :D
mari;-;the opposite of fun
M R;-;I love this game... Lots of experiences that you will gain... And of course you can have new friends.
Sir J1mmyn3utr0n;-;worst game in my life, dont recommend to anyone that has a life, 10/10
Hype Algerian;-;DOTA 2 adds a great deal of complexity to the MOBA genre. Its balance tenet is: "Everything goes." There is no character that is underpowered; in fact, they're all overpowered in their own way. The game places a great burden of knowledge over whoever tries it out. Be sure to stick to Co-op games for starters. The tutorial may prepare you slightly, but the game as a whole is a lot more complex than other MOBAs on the market. Oh, and the saying "It ain't over till it's over" applies here. You can't be sure you're winning until the Radiant/Dire goes down. Lots of rooms for comebacks in here, but the game is far more snowbally than other MOBAs.
AmHer;-;This is a Good Game, and very Fun to Play with my Friends,.
Satan;-;I would definitely reccomend this game to others. It depends on teamwork and its a strategy game, that's why I love it.
Lexuz;-;dota 2 is good game for me because im a gamer :)
[A]narh+Monarh!!!...../)(\;-;Best Game Ever.... You dont know where time flows...!!!
Youkai;-;10/10 recommended, it's a game where you meet infamous thai girl(?) Noozkii, a female womanizer, and a male catfisher with names like Miyako. Oh, you will also encounter people who sound like a great leader and stream their game in twitch. Lastly, what you will always see in this game is Harvest Moon legend, who farms potatoes for the entire game.
Dr.Derp;-;i like to kill people. this game is good.
Hvfbahkub;-;Playing Doto 2 may cause schizophrenia, racism ,nausea ,throat pain , nutrition disorder, hypertension, muscle spam, depresion, scoliosis, internal bleeding, hair loss, blindness, diarrhea, your mother being a  and yourself having down syndrome. Dota isnt for everyone, consult your doctor before use.
Officer Stoever;-;play this game for the rest of your life
Good-PG-name419;-;love this game, its great and very addicting once you get the basics
ceeday;-;Single-handedly the best game ever made. While simultaneously being the most awful, horrible, frustrating, sorry excuse for a time-waster that I have ever been exposed to in my entire life. Did I mention this game helps you to find your inner racist? There's a reason why I haven't stopped playing this genre for ~10 years. It's worth it.
Lanz;-;Fun Addictive Game. Recommended!
beavis;-;If riding around on a big hairy creature, bashing people with a hammer is your thing, Dota 2 has you covered. Sort of. Dota 2 offers a huge array of characters that enable players to take roles that are in their wheelhouse. Whether you like sneaking and ganking, smashing through the frontlines, or sitting back and supporting your team from a distance, there are characters that do all that and more. What immediately strikes me about Dota, to coin a hideously overused clich, is that it's easy to learn, but difficult to master. While the game is generally forgiving, the players are much less so. As with all multiplayer games, the experience of playing with others can be a bit of a mixed bag. The most important thing to remember about Dota 2 is this: it's not about winning, it's about losing stylishly to progressively more back-breaking, marrow-sucking odds.
Juzo'sJason;-;:D its good playing DOTA 2!
Nox;-;One of the best steam games available for free :D
Lord Brianicus of Deez Nuts;-;This game gave me cancer 10/10 would get cancer again
Fnatic.KyXy.DouyuTv;-;It's a must for every hardcore gamer
Darkness;-;Got rekt by an invisible unit, flying green dragon, fat rotten guy with a hook as his hand, old midget with a rifle and a demonic species named lion. 10/10 will play again.
| Pippie;-;Its alright i guess.
Rattlers;-;Dota 2 is My Love !!!!!!
inchekoiz;-;Dota2 unto real good players are haven of opportunity for meeting new friends improve the way you play and makes you a responsible person.
Tragao~n;-;Bad game would not play
F-puru;-;This is a very good game, I don't think it needs any reviews anymore, the only drawback of this game is that it's too addicting...
[ ];-;Good game in the world
NaeNae;-;ty !
Wawc;-;The most annoying game ever. Must play!
B E L L A;-;One of the best games ever made in history.
Hahz.Pacific.eSports;-;I reallly enjoyed this game.
alesana;-;i love this game
VenuS;-;Doto is hard
A Homeless Canadian;-;Gets reported for being better than some one, 10/10 best game ever by this scrub: http://steamcommunity.com/id/cannus/
Dota2Star.Com;-;Dota 2 is best game i see ever play so you can easy mange your hero and skills to kill your enemy . if you have profeshinal team you will win the game easy .
PinoyGameStore.com;-;The number 1 game in the Philippines! To buy Dota 2 items, just go to www.PinoyGameStore.com
Jrdmtl;-;Great game!! I love it!!
Sparta;-;Best MOBA with no dubt. If you are skilled, you will win. Recluit some friend and play with free to play game ! No pay to win , just an aggressive community :) You have to try it ! :D
Moon V #Na'Vi +25;-;best game on steam no doubt. but i must admit that it is hard to understand but once you do! and i repeat that! once you get the game!!!!!!!!!! you will just love it!
UraniuM;-;very fun game if you get into it but its very hard and public games are horrible but still a very fun game
The Bantorious matcuth;-;this ing game. all my free time is gone. my thought is dedicated to this game. it has made me an extremely racist . it has destoyed my trust in other people. this game has caused me so much pain and anger, and i end up hating it every time i play it. ultimateley, 10/10 would pay for it. Gieff Mahna
Svantensson;-;I still have no idea of what i'm doing. 12000/56
Micoo Haiku;-;Made the switch from League of Legends, instantly found myself unable to stop playing.
OldNight;-;Best way to learn russian ^^ and fastest way to hate them ...
Lion Fish Lover;-;This game will consume countless hours of your life that you will never get back. If you are a beginner, you will experience phases of depression and lowered self esteem due to the fact that you are unable to be good at the game. Play long enough and those phases will turn into fits of rage directed at those new players who were just like you when you first started. Often times after a bad game you will question why you even bother to spend time playing this game. However, every once in a while you will get one of "those games". Those games where everything seems to work in your favor and you completely outplay your opponent. Or those games where it was so close that victory fringed on one crucial teamfight, one kill, or a few bars of HP. It's those games that get your blood pumping and it's those games that give you an experience no other game can give you. The hope to find the next one of "those games" is what drives you to continue playing no matter what. In end, DotA is a game that you play in order to find those fleeting moments where you can truly appreciate the game for what it is.
[Emo]*Baby-J@N3";-;Nice Game Ever!!!!!! :))
Cloudy;-;Nice competitive game of action and strategy.
Markov;-;I spent lot time play dota 2! this game never old and i still fun play... 4 ever dota <3
Hallucinogen;-;Right Click to get Yelled at.
Shoestraw;-;i hate this game
Gwynbleidd;-;This game is basically digital heroin.
Practice accnt;-;Nice game if you like dota 1, and warcraft 3 type of games.
Cavalier;-;epic community !!!!
<font face="snap ITC">MR.ROCK;-;I LOVE THIS GAME!
Madrzaxr Fruantr;-;I hate Russians...
Kitsune;-;One of the best games I've ever played. I've been playing this for quite a long time and I can really recommend it to anyone! This is not for russians tho ;)
FUZZYBUNNY RELOADED;-;this is a game worth geting its like dota 1 only better if you play dota 1 then yo will love this!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
LORD PUDING;-;Need more time to write an helpful review.But so far so good
Kraken;-;dota 2 is really awesome ,its very stratergic and i made alot of friends throught it ,some of us even skype . The thing i love about dota 2 is playing online with your friends , which is really fun and awesome.
`ImbaMeSir;-;i recommend this not to everyone because this game is only for intelligent people!
blag0eff;-;The best game ever ^^ ! Come play with US !
This is SPARTA;-;Well played!
Draconis;-;Awesome game, couldn't quit playing.
JL;-;You either die a scrub, or live long enough to be called a try hard. 10/10
Mailboss [AFK for a few days];-;Any good thoughts I had about Putin and the Russians were lost upon playing this game. You will hate them too. I give it an A out of 5
Sheev la Sheev;-;The hell is a gank What is an e-sport What do you meen by 'Carry'? What are you even saying? (Russian probs) If that sounds entertaining then this game is for you I have 7 hours on Dota2 and I do not know how I got those hours, I almost killed a bot once... I am terrible at mobas But still a good game 10/10 would get rekt again, and again...and again.
MCBaqir;-;This game is absolutely amazing, with a great mixture of depth and hilarious moments. One such example, is the fact that despite the game's serious atmosphere, it has the funniest videos on youtube, like "Never go full agility" and "Chaos dunk." I have really come to enjoy this game, having played almost 650 hrs on it. Though i must say that some of your teammates in game are going to be s, and will report you for stupid reasons such as "stealing kills" or "not listening." Good luck and have fun :D
lied to by my own frnds;-;its just awsome!!!
brainiac;-;Finally, i barely made it. After almost 2.3k hours of playing this sh*i deleted it once and for all. I u are a dark forever-alone titan - this is ur game, otherwise GO AWAY! DO NOT DESTROY UR LIFE!
Nateo;-;Will make you hate your friends, perfect for those of us with no friends!
Vladimir Pootis;-;Pros: can kill trees learn fluent russian kill an ancient creature for its cheese protect virginity forever get fat learn that there are many races but yours is the best realize how ed up the world is get firebombed by russians Cons:       . Overall: /10
AAAGaming;-;Hmmm, Dota is extremely addictive.... however this is because its a good game. The community can be very harsh and rude towards beginners ( So just ignore them ) Overall i give the game a 9/10 rating for gameplay ( would be 10/10 but the community is a bit too harsh on newbies )
KurT  #Level 24 CP INSTOCK.;-;Dota 2 is undoubtedly the best mobo game i've ever played.It's far better than Dota 1 where the graphics is creepy.
ktN;-;This game will devour your soul..... 10/10
AH | NightMare;-;i swear on me mum m8 gtfo before you turn into one of us. Literally the most addicting game ever created
CptnG!ggLes;-;far more than you expect this game seems to have a life and culture all its own challenging and fair dota2 delivers in spades
Gorilla Dunk!;-;This game is extremely difficult to play. I am terrible at it. I spent more time watching than playing. I amassed a large amount of in game items. I did not know what to do with these items, since they were digital and did not exist in the reality I was born in. Therefore, I decided to sell them all and make a profit off of people weird enough to collect things that do not exist in reality. I made a good amount and bought a few games during a sale. I got free games for being bad at a game!
Lavish~;-;fun and entertaining
Vex;-;Horrible, unbalanced, more annoying than fun sometimes, but, at the end of the day and after so many hours it feels like family when you play with friends so 10/10 would download again.
Lionbiscuit;-;This game has taken over my life.
MANGUU PLS;-;Escape the clutches of Dota 2 while you can. It will snare your soul and drain it until all you can think about it "God damnit that feckn noob riki i can beat a nob hero like that anyday turst me" while all your friends slowly slip away from existence until the only friends you have are the friends who play dota, and you just use them to reduce the amount of skrubs you get matched with. Escape with your social life clutched in your arms as fast as you can. Of course, I highly recommend it.
MovesLikeMercury;-;The new era of gaming is here!!
Snake;-;Went into game. Selected europe. GAME STARTED! Russian team! Selected EU WEST, EU EAST GAME STARTED! Russian team! Selected Africa. GAME STARTED! Russian team! Selected SEA. GAME STARTED! Russian team! 12suka/13suka best russian learning simulator!
TeaBears. Pheonix 24;-;Amazing game heavily focused on cooperation and communication. Pros: *NOT P2W this game heavily benefits experience over money as spending money on the game will only give cosmetics and no advantage in matches what so ever. *Great community, Mostly the dota 2 community is hell upon earth as language barriers are all over the place. Even tho this is a problem the community in and of itself is amazing having alot of contributions daily and providing help for problems of all kinds. If you have the right frame of mind the community will always give you a hand. *Outstanding gameplay in general. After many hours of gameplay Ive come to realize that dota 2 has one of the best character pools in MOBAS and overall multiplayer games. From heros with strengths as the game goes on to heros wich destroy in the earlygame. Character variaty is there. *100% free. Ive already made a statement on P2W being non-existant. But I have to restate that Dota 2 is true to its F2P standards. Every single Hero (Character) Is free from the get-go. If you dont want to spend 1 cent on the game you can. Cons: *Servers. Even tho the server variaty is great there is problems with the servers itself. As server breakdowns make the game somewhat unfair as better ping with the right set of skills will mean a big difference between a win and a lose more with heros wich require apropiate timing or an apropiate combo(Strom Spirit for example) *Language barriers. As the game many times missjudges the ping of a player it might send players wich speak a specific language into a server wich has mostly players that speak another. Me being from southamerica and speaking english go mostly to US servers as Theres better ping. But as I do many other southamerican players go there too and language barriers start appering as an example the typical "Peruvian" wich plays misserably and ruins matches for US players. Overall Amazing I recommend to anyone whos willing to spend large ammounts of time on a game. And to all the MOBA lovers even tho its the hardest by far. Id give a 9.0/10. Great job Valve
Klanxis;-;We're sitting here in TeamSpeak 3 and playing quite a lot DotA 2...
Notice me Senpai!!!;-;NICE GAME!!!! BESET EVER!!! the only thing that makes me hate this game are the ing idiot racists.
Sasuung;-;good game play now it fun have fun play now it fun play russian makes fun
AZ;-;I am always thinking like, "World is in crisis, I must do something productive and contribute to it's improvement. . . but then, let me just finish this match first o.O". 'Ravage'. . . 'Ravaaaage'. . . 'Ultee'. . . 'Hit 'R'. . . 'R', 'R', 'R'. . . f**king NOOOOB :@.
Standin.246810;-;Better than Bad Rats
mR., octoPOPS;-;i love dota 1 but when dota 2 came it was a blow. the iteming method is over simplefied and a game can be ended in just 20-30 minutes its awesome.
MossPimp;-;Pretty much a boring version of League of Legends. Why League of Legends is better than this game: 1) League fo Legends is f2p. Dota 2 costs $30 2) League of Legends has a broader selection of playable characters 3) League of Legends has a nicer UI 4) League of Legends has a slightly smaller map for more intense and skilled battles 5) League of Legends is more popular on Twitch.tv and has more MLG pro gaming tournaments and such 6) No russians in League of Legends 7) Dota features a Pay-2-Win system in which you can buy exclusive items for each character such as armor and weapons. 8) Dota only has one map while League of Legends has several maps and game modes which you can play to your liking 9) Biggest problem with Dota: NO RANKING system. You can't see improvement through ladders and such, horrendous stats page, absolutely no ranking system other than levels which is also Pay-2-Win with XP boosts avaliable on the market 10) Very gimmicky crates dropped at the end of each game trying to sucker you into spending more money on keys 11) Extremely boring map, it's all dark and depressing. Makes me want to fall asleep. 12) Very low player population. Highest played game on Steam, but not even 1/3rd of League of Legends population due to the fact that this game isn't free to play and supports a Pay-2-Win model 13) This game suffers from a lack of updates, it seems to be just a cash cow for Valve 14) Matchmaking takes ridiculously long, it's actually suprising that the #1 game on Steam suffers from match-making this awful. Really shows how rarely this game is updated 15) Players can draw on the map disrupting each others experience and mic usage is also allowed which always brings griefers who like to spam the mic and ruin the game for everyone 16) You can teamkill your own creeps in this game ruining the game for your team and your enemy 17) There is no META anyone does anything, this causes a very chaotic enviorment which is very daunting a new player just trying to learn the ropes 18) This game is not free to play 19) This game uses a Pay-2-Win system with gimmicks involved like Keys trying to get you to spend money 20) The community is actually terrible with plenty of hackers and griefers ruining the game for everyone involved. PLAY THIS GAME AT YOUR OWN RISK
<u> XevO(Neil);-;this game is so cooooooooool
Falmer;-;Fantastic tower defense game, however, you need to be quite experienced to play. - Many heros and strategies to use and if you don't know how to use them your team will lose horribly. - If your looking for a new game to get into I recommend Dota 2, Defense of the Ancients 2.
Rustalavista;-;I only played a bit ,but i like it.
secret;-;I've wasted my life on this game and I suggest you do it too
Ngoproblem;-;I have spent much time,effort and even money on this game......... What do I have to show for it? Still terrible at a large number of heroes and have a less than positive outlook on some of the people in the community 10/10 Game would play again
[ Longon ];-;It's an average game.
Doge Senpai;-;A great timekiller. Longplay 5v5 which requires good teamwork to be effective, it can bring people together. Highly addictive and fun to play. Though the only cons I see are these: gametime may affect your schedule drastically, so think twice before starting a match. Also, though addictive, NEVER OBSESS OVER MMR. DON'T LET THE GAME CONTROL YOU EITHER.
AxRo.Spextrum;-;This game is very addictive and so fun to play
Green Knight;-;if there are more than 3 pinoys stack in your game, you are guarenteed to lose
C|3R...AsTaLaBiStA..GP:..\;-;when i play dota 2 i reach another world
TheJohny;-;Better than LoL... LoL players can't DENY that.
Luffy;-;Free time!
[BCD] Rashid Abbasi;-;This is an anth game, really nice graphics. One word for it, "Kapari".
Applepine;-;The game is simply like life: has its ups and downs but overall a great experience.
Johnny {{SPIDER}}..;-;Too much hero choices , too much items and cosmetics , too much good graphics.. Good Co-op , Medium gameplay Too little item drops ! , hard for beginners ! , hard for non-strategy gamers I recommend the game , come on it's DOTA 2
Link;-;after playing 1088 hours of this game, im still: durak. . blyadischa. dolbo yeb. huesos. Thats just the russian i recorded, if you too want to meet russians, play dota in any region because every regions servers are in russia. i rate this game 11/10
Kcaghllumb;-;Because of this game, I now know what  means. Thank you DotA. gr8 b8 m8 would r8 8/8 has many gr8 tr8s
RocKing ThE_rEaL_wEeBo;-;Dota 2 is a moba and is the stand-alone sequel to Defense of the Ancients, mod for Warcraft III. This game is pretty funny to play with friends and it's a F2P, not P2W, which is awesome. The game comes with a really well done competitive system with a nice elo system. The prizes on the tournaments are quite high and since it's a F2P, not P2W, you can improve to the level where you go to tournaments. The community is not the best but it's totally not the worst. Russians, yes Russians, that's a main thing in this game even if you play in the Europe server/American server, apperently, even with their own server, they tend to come to other servers and most of them are kinda as[s]holes. Sometimes it can be a frustating game and a real pain in the as[s]. Rating 7.5/10 TL;DR Version + F2P + Not P2W + Funny to play with your friends + Nice competitive feeling + Good elo system + High prizes in tournaments - Russians everywhere, they tend to be as[s]holes and not speaking in english. - Frustating game when you're in a lose streak - Not that funny to play alone, imo SORRY FOR BAD ENGLANDINO, PLEZ DON'T COPI RAVIOLI PASTARINO
XAINTI (HTM);-;meh , i dont like this kind of games , but its fun :/
Ign0r[4]!;-;The game is intense, interesting and diverse. Requires a lot of thinking, fast reactions, and knowledge of mechanics, just to begin with. Tough to learn for a lot of people, but there are a lot of guides implemented in the game and on other places online. Graphics are really good, the sound and visual effects are superb, and the legacy this game carries from dota 1, or even prrevious names of this map is still there.
Sanchez <3;-;Im very love this game.But sukanahuivrotebal
$YcoN;-;Best game i have played
Burt Fuckin' Reynolds;-;Once upon a time in a distant land, people were happy. They lived content lives chatting, sharing and feasting together. This time would be know to you, everyone of you who have played this game, as the past. Now chatting is seen as dysfunctional and disruptive. Chatting causes you to lose, and that must be purged. Now Sharing is considered the must do for even the most supportive person. But that person will be exploited and as in modern politics, one mans pocket shall become barren and the other flooded with wealth. Now Feasting is not considered a sinful pass time but an even more sinfull chain of events. Doing these will result in banishment from the perfect land of 'Dota' and into a negative land, known only as low priority. While many see this as the seventh level of hell, a positive person will see it as 5, 40 minute, breaks from the brutal assualt of hate from the common Dota peasent. This land of Dota, long known to those who have played the game of ancients, is overrun with the xenophobic. The angry and hateful. I can honestly say that this was well worth my time and you should spend what is left of your rotten soul for this game. For it is glory and glory comes with a price.
9X9I9V9;-;this is awesome game to play with friends
- Mr. Happyface;-;After playing over 1000 hours of this game, I would love to say that Valve have done an amazing job working with IceFrog to create a game that, although objectively the same each time, is engaging and extremely dynamic every time. Screams of joy and frustration will be heard when you play this game, maybe you will develop an unrelented hatred for the Russian people or simply call "Mid or Feed". All I can say is, I am glad I took the time to get past Dota's steep learning curve for it has been a rewarding experience that I am looking forward to continue for many months to come.
X-EcUtIoNeR;-;Man, I dnt think I have the time to marry someone after playing this game
Seifer;-;Hours of fun, all you have to do is select in which Russia you want to play today!
Stilldeadly;-;Dota 2 for life \m/
.:M_ilchaK:.;-;This Is One Of The best Games In Online World but We Cant Win Any Games , Cuz This Russians ...
Roshgarroth #;-;More competitive then dota 1, but yet so hard to play. It was so hard for some players who were used to dota 1 mechanics to adapt to dota 2. Abstract game, the camera is too close to the players, is just a pure chaos in a teamfight. Dota 1 is better.
I still Love you;-;best game ever ...waste time of ur life ...meet a lot of ed up people all around the world ..dota suck ..but still sucking it
Koko;-;Addicted
SlayerQ;-;So osom. 10/9 Would bang
Derpaloo;-;It's like League of Legends with guns!
MoodymaN;-;Gets b1tches
anime;-;i like the part where the monkey man comes out of nowhere and oneshots you
zippo;-;Best Russian Language-Learning Software on the market.
Fallen Knight;-;Nice game.
Standin.EemCee.[HyperX];-;Its a Really Fun and Addictive game for a person like Me thank you so much :D
L'Azy;-;Dota 2 is one of the most enjoyable games at the moment! It's definitely a MUST-PLAY!
Umehara;-;I love the game of DotA 2 is using proven strategies and a good team cohesiveness, and there pitted 2 teams each containing 5 players, which both have major headquarters called the Ancient and the first team to successfully destroy the Ancient opponent is the winner, There are 3 roads or paths (called 'lanes') which connects both the Ancient and forces ('creeps') that spawn or appear regularly in these pathways, fight with 'creeps' round opponent in the battle towards the opponent's headquarters. And I'd like again there are a lot of options at the beginning of the game due to the chosen heroes, each hero has 4 skills and a few more (active or passive) so it is not too complicated to play, i love dota <3
opressivebanana;-;this game is realy great because its free but the only problem was that i began playing for multiple hours on end and i eventualy became hungry and began eating all of my money and my rent is due this afternoon i dont kniw what i should do i ate all of my money because of this game i have no money for anything important like sinks and other games also now my family wont stop complaining because apperently i am a terrible person they wont stop whinig about how hungry they are but them i show them the games awesome mechanics and they all shut up
run thru the 6 w/ my woes;-;Great game, but community sux.
{Spro} fluffy pink marshmallow;-;great game i first started because my friend was playing and didnt know how to play but i got started and now i add people and teach them to play other then that great game i love it play it ever day i highly recommend it no real bad glitchs or any glitches really everone is friendly and nice...!!!!!
McCheese;-;Awesome strategy game. I started it when my brother showed me and I can't stop. So addictive!
Afelers;-;Good one. The only problem is its overcomplicated for a moba.
GOTTA GET A GRIP;-;the chance of having a russian or more in one game is the same as waking up in the morning.
icydeadpeeps;-;The only game you will ever need again.
hec;-;Great game!
Bung Dorji;-;Nice game but please eligible ban player, sometimes bad player trying to ruin a game
171581762;-;this game is good
Heitai-san;-;Don't do drugs, do Dota! It's just as addicting once you get the hang of it. :D
Eyebrows on Fleek;-;Everyone in this game appears to be Russian and only knows how to say  you or i ed you mother
[GK]=PhantomOverLord;-;this is an addictive game since dota1
3c_zcxv;-;This is really a nice game.
(-Admiral-) Dunkster;-;Very addictive game lol
S-J;-;Nice Game Very Good Graphics
Zecky Chen;-;The Best Game in Universe
Standin[Angie];-;use your brain for defeated your enemy... strategy, team work needed... nice!!!!!
Bilbo $waggins;-;Learn't Russian In 2 Weeks. 10/10
AxRo.Spextrum;-;This game is very addictive and so fun to play
Green Knight;-;if there are more than 3 pinoys stack in your game, you are guarenteed to lose
C|3R...AsTaLaBiStA..GP:..\;-;when i play dota 2 i reach another world
Numolis;-;its a moba by valve 11/10
T I M;-;Better than Rosetta Stone for learning Russian. I can know say  you in 11 languages. Recommended.
PapaJahat;-;addicting game, can make someone lose her girlfriends
DACECAD;-;Outstanding!!! Think: 5 vs 5 real time chess. This game is the pinnacle of strategy meets teamwork.
LStreet;-;this  game
Oshino Shinobu;-;10/10 would play again
Teali;-;10/10 would feed again
xgoodweedx;-;great game hard as nails to master
KiRiTo_KuN;-;i love this game..
W33P0;-;This is a good game. It has a lot of meta and it's hard to play. I love it.
I'm gonna miss you;-;One of the best MOBA games out there.
EaZZy;-;If you want to learn Russian this is the .
Dragos;-;It's a cool game.
The Rebel Taco;-;THE RUSSIANS....THE IN RUSSIANS.....THEY ARE EVERYWHERE......RUUUUUN.......*dies*
Plankton (AdolfKirby);-;It'll give you back your virginity
Ar;-;DOTA 2 is the best Strategy game . Almost every gamers on steam have this game on their library XD
Ben;-;Dota 2.. what can I say? Well, first of all I can say that it is an unbalanced grind through a small level where big pink men fight the antichrist or something like that. I can also say that it is , and shouldn't even be considered for a download. Remember kids, you can't spell Dota 2 without C A N C E R. 1/10 would rather stick  in a blender whilst wearing the oculus rift, whilst playing Planet Horse.
MrCheezz;-;This game will make you hate yourself and everyone around you, 10/10.
Krombopulos Michael;-;Centaur Warrunner aint horsin around
|Z| Nutzu3650XL;-;The only game which makes you racist, despite no racist content or reference!
Emiya Kiritsugu;-;If you have played moba style games before, then you'll like this game. It differs greatly from other moba style games because it delivers a wide variety of game modes and customizations. Furthermore, every champion in the game is unique. Itemisation is diverse, fun and you can have many different builds for just 1 champion. A very nice feature to this moba game is the option to change the Announcer. Tired of that old generic hag? You can get the Bastion voice over for example as many others. Moreover you can customize your hero skins and weapons. You can buy different courier skins and many other things that other moba games don't support. It's a fun moba game overall and it's worth trying out.
Madara Uchiha;-;Best game of life xD
KING IN THE NORTH;-;Game stole my life 11/10 would play forever.
Kung Fu Dugong;-;After The 781+ Hours,I Know How To Talk Russian Language.11/10
6102;-;Best game of my life.Addictive and 100% Lifesteal.
Swervebot;-;this game makes me want to kill myself sometimes
jajeta;-;That's awesome :cool:
Shagaur;-;Learned to speak\write in russian. 10\10
Thats What I Poo;-;I f u leike herd puzlerz leike moneycraft, grow man, and holmime liemtie than u r hapi when wyo pay 2 win in this fon RP LogOtLeoon e gaemoemde. LMMFO
leksi;-;Russian swearing course 101 for free.
MrHeartAttack;-;1 of the best strategy game
Sandwich Bag #1;-;This game gave me alopecia, No joke 7/7
Franciscus PP.;-;It feeds on your life force
119744955;-;It's Help Develops Strategy And Statisics.
Flying Phuck;-;Dota 2 has taught me the difference between being a man and being a filthy savage who can't speak english or have a decent ping. Life lesson learned. Would recommend.
Vengeance;-;Its good to play, the graphic is more interesting, but some times u maybe meet someone who ruining the game, its relly sucks, but i like the game :v
Illuminati Wombat;-;So far I have played Dota 2 for 1 day, and I'd like to share my feelings about it. Unfortunately it's lacking one of the most important aspects of a game, which is being easy to pick up, but tough to master. This game doesn't cater to beginners, if you have never played a MOBA, then even the tutorial will be hard. But I watched some guides on YouTube and followed the instructions. It helps to use the easier characters first, like Viper and Lich. It's still fun, but frustrating deep in the battle when you die and it takes about 2 minutes just to get back to where you were unless you spend gold. But with all that aside, I would recommend it to anyone who likes MOBAs and those who just wish to expand their horizens. I look forward to improving, and with a little practice, I think it could be one of my favorite video games.
Hikigaya;-;Great strategy games
Deathw1sh;-;Learned Phillipino in 2 weeks
hh;-;good game alot people play this game and so much fun
FelixtheEmperor;-;this game is really noob unfriendly but once you get the hang of it and you have a bit of xp... you will enjoy it very much!
StarScream;-;Very nice game
I'm MrChow;-;Best Game Ever Made. 20 Over Years And People Still Support This Game. Dota!!!!
[D]eathstroke;-;Awesome game but requires skill :p
Geo;-;The game is fun. There is no doubt about that. It is fun and frustrating at the same time. You have to work as a team. You and you alone aren't going to decide the outcome of a match. Unfortunately, it seems to have most of the same trappings as Valve's other F2P game, Team Fortress 2. The items introduced into the game have little to no quality control. Thankfully, we have yet to see items that affect the stats of the characters themselves. Dota 2 is one of the best MOBAs in the genre, but far from the most popular. Dota 2 allows you to play all of the heroes that the game offers without spending antyhing, but similar games only allow you to play a small, rotation free hero pool. You must then purchase the each hero individuall with in-game currency or real money. Dota 2 is far better in this sense. Dota 2 also seems to be a bit more high-level than other games in the same genre. This can be both good and bad as it allows for you to reach a higher skill ceiling, but it can be discouraging to new players. The community can be vile and the punishments for "leaving" a game are strict. If you have connection problems or have other commitments that won't allow you to spend updwards of an hour at the computer, I don't think that this is something you could enjoy. Since it is free, I'd recommend you pick it up and give it a try. I will update this review to be more in-depth at a later time.
Dondo;-;Took over my life 10/10
JazzBlaster;-;While many Action RTS games tried to take its place, the original DOTA mod was still played for a long time until this semi-remake, semi-port. It retains everything that made the original great, with an improved engine and metasystem. Built-in matchmaking makes things balanced between players, great workshop support for cosmetics, and the best F2P system around make it an overall more enjoyable experience to the original. However, due to the port trying to be 1:1 with the original, some features that could've been changed remain the same. There are a few concepts that, while making sense over time, are baffling to new players, and it's that complexity that is DOTA's greatest strength, as well as its major weakness. It's very hard for new players to hop in and enjoy, especially compared to other Action RTS games that find a better balance between depth and accessability to new players. Despite this, after putting in time DOTA is one of the most rewarding and unique experiences in gaming, one that has yet to be matched.
#NEETlyf 420 weeblord;-;if it wasn't for this game i wouldn't be the proud racist i am today
Gold Finger;-;i like to play dota2 because my problem solved .. if i'm playing dota2
Hamburger Helper;-;It ruined my life. Over 1.2k hours I can't get back. Definitely recommend.
FiFtH-HaRmOnY DaniL D.C.E;-;play this good game
zogw;-;this game ruined my life 10/10
Ez;-;Step one: Download and install DotA2 Step two: Open and play Step three: Quit your education, and put all of your pocket money into this game Step four: Continue playing the game Step five: Watch your friends and family leave you Step six: Rent a low cost-apartment, and work at seven-eleven. Step seven: CONTINUE PLAYING THE GAME!!! Step eight: ??? Step nine: You're a multi millionare!!! Congradulations!
Scarface;-;Recommended game.
Lolicat;-;Lots of fun and plenty of heroes to make you put hundreds of hours into the game.
Contrast;-;The best game i have ever played... Hope you will enjoy to play this game... i prepare games like this ^_^
Frodo;-;Nice game
The Butcher;-;Cool Game
Mein Name ist Jeff;-;it's alright that.
SCWynette;-;An absolutely amazing game, I've played hundreds of hours In this game and It never gets boring or feels the same. With over 100 Heroes to chose there Is so much variety and so many different ways to play that the experience Is always different, be prepared to lose alot of your time and to also have to learn alot as well! It's all well worth It though, download this game now.
Packard;-;A great way to learn Russian.
{WTF} Whirly twitch(whirly1227);-;One of the best games I have every played!
SoW slimpyman;-;game is a face rolling, masterpeice. game is point and click, but the best point and click game available.
Auobo  KONAN;-;nice this game
c700;-;Great game! The best thing is it's free to play! Thank you, Valve!
Masochi$t;-;Dota 2 is like your girlfriend but she is on her period most of the time
you anger me;-;this game sucks. dont get it
< Odin >;-;Awesome in a sense, however, there are quite a bit of trolls and rude people that think that you MUST build the Heor the way THEY want. Besides that, it is highly addictive and very fun.
cRaze. DeezNuts!;-;This Game is Truly Amazing! Best Suits for any Age,, :D
Rinelk;-;Too addicting O_o
digital_peer;-;You will never "get the hang of this" or "fully understand" all the ins and outs of this Esport. It can be one of the most frustrating, annoying soul crushing games. But when it starts coming together and you have a good group that knows how to play together its amazing. Unless you have 400 hours to spend on this game i wouldnt bother, because even with around 400 hours you will still be a fairly rank amateur.
'[ErA]'(HR's)Flakac;-;This is a very good game i have been playing it for 9 months now and still throughly enjoy it. This is a very good game to build up teamwork.(if your partners are not idiots ;)
Jan Solo;-;Game that never ends...
Fruit Punch Samurai G;-;it's so much better than LoL LoL sucks and LoL just copeid dota BEST GAME EVER!!!
Rashanko;-;If you want to learn Russian the quick and easy way. This is the dictionary for you!
Innocentius;-;Gives you ebola . 10/10 would lose again .
Pedrowy;-;Better than Russian dictionary.
speedy;-;UGRAT V ETO DERMO NE YVAJAT SEBYA, UGRA DLYA KONCHENNIH YBLYDKOV KOTORIE NE OTBIVAYT NIHYA, STADO OTBROSOV PITAETSYA VSYACHESKI ISPORTIT DRYG DRYGY JIZN, V DOTY UGRAYT SAMIE KONCHENNIE I OBRIGANIE LYDI, SAMIE NIZSHIE SLOI OBSHESTVA, STADO TYPIH YBLYDKOV I NICHEGO BOLEE ok ok ok ok ok
ImSG;-;Nice Game Ever
Vladimir the Archangel;-;Best team-fight game I've ever played !!! :D
P!pOoO-*;-;the nice game
The unkown warrior;-;Wow once you start playing DOTA you embark on a true challenge!!! this isnt a game its a way of life.... come to Dota if YOU THINK YOU CAN HANDLE IT???
fagget;-;Dota ruined my life and saved my soul
SPITFIRE;-;Ruined my life, gg
Walktheline;-;Best Moba there is - also the oldest one.
xKROGOTHx;-;I LOVE IT nuff said. It's just difficult starting out and if you ignore the trolls and tryhards it's really great. Ofcourse the game will never be balanced, heroes are harder to play than others, and some heroes are just plain OP. Each game takes atleast 30-45 min of your life sooo... play at your own cost. This game is extremely exciting and addicting once you finish the basics and want to step your game up. The market items and stuff don't mean anything either, it's just tracking, renaming, and customizing your favorite heroes for minimum prices. Overall i'd play this game over many others I have in my library, it's definitely in my top three. I'd recommend my fellow friends to play if they have the time. I could probably write a book on this recommendation but the game is free, so why not give it a shot? You get free drops in game, spend time with friends, sell your dropped items on the market, buy anything else you want... etc. It's very entertaining to say the least and hopefully you'll try it out for yourself and give it a chance.
[MOO] Illidan Stormrage;-;10/10 Pinoys everywhere stealing your hero even though u reserved the hero, then threatening to feed the enemy team if you don't give them mid by yelling "Ako mid, MID OR FEEED" Zzz pinoys are like Russians for the people in SEA.
Sam Johnsnow;-;Shut up and take my money, oh wait, IT'S FREE!
C.S.;-;Best game ever. I just want to thanks. Thanks Valve. Thanks Icefrog. YOU ARE AWESOME.
Drogba;-;If BassHunter made a song about this then you know it ROCKS!!
Bey;-;Probably one of the most infuriating and addicting games out...
aH3Danidem;-;GG Most game
Thank you God always;-;The game is good. Tightens something it was too much, like in every new game you have to download the knitted character and achieve new successes in PvP, but it does not worsen the feeling of contentment game :)
Walshy690;-;Remove these damn challenges. You can no longer have a normal game of dota anymore because people are concentrating so much on the challenges that it is ruining the game. Constant 5 man dota where skill elevl means nothing anymore. It is just like the PA arcana event that ruined the game.
OVER 9000!!!;-;One of the deepest, most complex, skill-based games to ever be produced in human history. No other game will challenge your mental abilities quite like Dota 2. Every match is different, every character is different, every role is different. The game is a never-ending learning experience, a mental challenge that is not for players that are either weak-hearted or stubborn, Dota 2 will teach you life-lessons, it will force you to learn through defeat and dissapointment, to truly review your performance and see what you did wrong. The game requires an unbelievable amount of cooperation between the teams, and it truly is a beautiful thing to witness a plan come through as characters work in synchronization to pull off unbelievable game-changing plays. Dota is, unbelievably a 100% free game, with free updates that feature new characters and game-changing items all for free. First timers might play it and view it as difficult, and not a very friendly game, and they are right in certain respects. However, the game quickly becomes addicting once a person catches the rythym and begins to succeed. Few things in life are as satisfying as destroying an entire team by yourself, to crush the collective will of five people as easily as breathing. Dota 2 is a fantastic game, and an emotional rollercoaster. You will get frustrated, you will flame and be flamed, you will laugh, you will rage, but most of all, you will feel awesome as you learn to dominate and terrorize the souls of the enemy team. Dota is a must-play game, that really needs people to give it a couple of shots before they figure out whether they love it or not,
Nukawari;-;This game....... Many times i've told myself to stop playing, to resist the constant urge to 'pwn' scrubs in public matchmaking...BUT as singsong would say "NEIN"! DOTA IS LIFE! And well GGWP Thanks Dota 6 month anniversary, Still flaming :) -10/10- Also ruins social lives SOooo i recently hit 2000 hours in game , must say i'm kinda proud and dissapointed with myself at the same time. Reasoning for---- A.Dissapointed in myslef for letting myself get preoccupied with this game instead of doing more important things , and B. I am Proud because of the fact i actually stuck with the terrible community that DOTA 2 is (Essentially full of Raging 12 year old kids and extremely ignorant "6K' mmr players) But thus i am indeed still here and somehow continuing to add more hours on to this game day to day, I have one more comment about DOTA 2 and that is that people seem to rate down this game and say "i've wasted so much time" , but although it may have been wasted time , was it still fun? Why would you regret something you enjoy? I don't know i love this game man i'd definitely reccomend!
Anal_Curry;-;10/10 Ruined my life
Jane;-;The game is awesome the environment the gameplay and other cool stuffs even funny thing can happen in this war game,You can also experienced heroes with lots of different abilities and their stories If you do not understand what I'm saying here all I wnat to say that this game is frickin awesome and fun
streetrider43;-;An outstanding game. Makes you forget every pain.
Danik;-;Dota, The best russian simulator out there.
Zed;-;1/5 I want my money back
Sneaky Washing Machine;-;All around me are familiar Russians Worn out Peruvians, worn out Peruvians... Raging and feeding for the daily matches going nowhere, going nowhere. Their rage is filling up their cognitive skills no calmness, no calmness Hide my profile, i want to drown my losses No good players, no good players I find it kind of funny I find it kind of sad The matches where i abandoned are the best i ever had I find it hard to play with them I find it hard to farm Mad life, mad life Players waiting for the next international with Na'Vi Funny fails, funny fails And to feel that every player should Play skillfully, play skillfully Went to all pick and i was very nervous No one knew me, no one knew me Hello guys tell me, who should i pick? Rage right at me, rage right at me. And i find it kind of funny I find it kind of sad The matches where i abandoned were the best i've ever had I find it hard to play with them I find it hard to farm When players feed the enemy it's a very, very mad life, mad life. Ruining your life, mad life
-[Sigh];-;Tnx really like this game :D
Kosakey es key 2 my heart;-;Dota 2, a game full of russian, pinoy, indo that doesn't communicate with English even if they have selected English as their language. They only speak english when "Up courier", "Ward", " noob" 100% best game ever. Train your patience and self-esteem. 20/10 ruined my life too.
kev;-;gives cancer. would bang
*N|i_DaRk*;-;Its The only one game without Hacks :p
Otter von Blitzkrieg;-;So my friends dragged me into this game just over a year ago, and I can now say it's one of the the best things that has ever graced my computer screen. The game is challenging, has a beautiful environment, allows one to choose from a multitude of unique and diverse heroes, and most importantly, fun. The sense of teamwork that you receive is fantastic, and the knowledge that your co-operation with your teammates is winning the game is very rewarding. Of course it isn't perfect, but nothing is. And to be completely honest, the most amount of grief you will encounter is the ness of a certain few players. But that does not detract from the huge amounts of fun and challenges that Dota 2 offers. I highly recommend this game to anyone.
Kraken;-;dota 2 is really awesome ,its very stratergic and i made alot of friends throught it ,some of us even skype . The thing i love about dota 2 is playing online with your friends , which is really fun and awesome.
`ImbaMeSir;-;i recommend this not to everyone because this game is only for intelligent people!
I feed your MOM;-;If you want to hate people, this is the game for you.
Ketsu;-;! -  honorous     ,   ,         ,  -!    ,  .
Katana;-;They say "quit Dota" everywhere. Wherever I read about DotA they say "quit it". So I did quit. I quit read them.
CrimsonKnight12321;-;INTRODUCTION Dota 2 is a game where it contradicts life and death. Dota was based on World Of Warcraft as Dota 2 is now based on itself.With new looks compared to Dota and a brand new map with much more and now even better a free to play game! POSITIVE: 1.Its graphics are amazing compared to Dota and LOL 2.It has a wonderfull variety of heroes which could be built in unlimited possibilities 3.You can either rage or laugh at the noobs who try to play Dota 2 while feeding. 4.Plenty of core items for heroes and lots of active items like Radiance and Abyssal Blade NEGATIVE: 1.The tutorial needs improvement because when i played the tutorial,it felt just like playing World Of Warcraft. 2.Need lots of experience with these games because lots of high ranked players raged at you for feeding the enemy team. 3.League Of Legends (LOL) copied this game and many other players from LOL say that Dota 2 copied them when its actually LOL who copied Dota 2 CONCLUSION This game is really addictive where funny and wtf moments meets your ways.Overall Dota2 deserves around of applause as LOL should  off because they suck. BIOGRAPHY My life of Dota 2 started as a young boy at the age of 11 who was looking through piles of games when i found something interesting.I downloaded the game and started playiing it.Years past as i played hours and hours as days past by.When i was 23,i got myfirst car and a girlfriend.When my girlfriend was wondering why i never asked her on a date, i just asked that i was busy.But 1 day i got careless and didnt hear the door open as my girlfriend came in and asked what are you doing.I thought she would break up with me but she only said what game is it?I replied with that this game was called Dota 2.When she got home she immediatly downloaded Dota 2 and started playing with me.We had so much fun until at the age of 34,where we got married and had 2 children,1 boy and 1 girl and still playing Dota2.Well now you see how much fun Dota 2 is.I wont force you to play it but i will say this,try Dota2 rather then other games because this game will give you eternal happiness. THE END
DMGR;-;dont play in dota2 please!!!
road 2 speedy network;-;i love this game just because im sick of mmorpg game that always have alot of beggar ingame play
Dark;-;This game is so cool, its the best strategy game that test's one's mind and a team's teamwork.
Omnicide;-;Great pvp experience, steep learning curve but one of the best pvp multiplayer games ever made, and definitely one of the best PC games on the market right now.
cRusTy;-;every match have different story even if you want to try to replay the match still it's different
Madzeus;-;Do you wanna become a xenofobic racist man with a heart full of hate against mankind? Play this game. Would be xenofobic again. 10/10
Kencezz;-;this game is very fantastic, i love dota 2
[WEEB];-;I hate this game so much
Icmn;-;Nice game
Lion Fish Lover;-;This game will consume countless hours of your life that you will never get back. If you are a beginner, you will experience phases of depression and lowered self esteem due to the fact that you are unable to be good at the game. Play long enough and those phases will turn into fits of rage directed at those new players who were just like you when you first started. Often times after a bad game you will question why you even bother to spend time playing this game. However, every once in a while you will get one of "those games". Those games where everything seems to work in your favor and you completely outplay your opponent. Or those games where it was so close that victory fringed on one crucial teamfight, one kill, or a few bars of HP. It's those games that get your blood pumping and it's those games that give you an experience no other game can give you. The hope to find the next one of "those games" is what drives you to continue playing no matter what. In end, DotA is a game that you play in order to find those fleeting moments where you can truly appreciate the game for what it is.
[Emo]*Baby-J@N3";-;Nice Game Ever!!!!!! :))
XristosD1;-;prefect game!!!!!!!!
FiFtH-HaRmOnY DaniL D.C.E;-;play this good game
Tuscany;-;This is a terrible game that you will continue to play until you are nothing but a mere husk of man incapable of loving or feeling anything. You will wake in the night sweating thinking of missed last hits, you will cower in the corner broken by no wards or courier and you will break down crying at the four other carries on your team who will endlessly berate you in a mix of different languages until finally you give in and call GG. I would absolutley reccomend this game.
MEEPwn'D;-;A great game with tons to do and you never get bored of it and unlike LoL you dont have to grind for heros that you want to play or wait untill it becomes avaliable. There are many events throughout the year such as diretide and the international to add even more stuff to an already great game i would recommend this to anyone who has the time to learn the basics because otherwise it will be very difficult to play without hurting your teams preformance which could result in the reports and low prio but other than that it is a great game.
fpsGhost;-;/10 would blyat again
DotaMasterMind | Kharidari shod!;-;DotA2 Best Game In The World , thx Valve
Songkolo;-;good game in the world
PMB | Puppey;-;This Game Has Ruined My Life So Many Hours With Friends Drinking Smoking Partying Thankyou Dota Community
Vixiel;-;Fun, competitive and team work game if u like dota, LoL, HoN u should love this too
BLACK CHOCOLATE;-;Best MOBA I have played in a long time
Koven;-;better than League of Legends
Tyrone;-;"I don't like this game at all. This game is too hard. This f@#king game, man.. This f@#king game.. I don't like this f@#king game anymore, this is the worst f@#king game I've played in my entire life. I would like to switch games now. " - Sing Sing in "Dota 2 - Sing Sing Gets Bashed"
Z_Owl;-;After playing Dota 2 almost 800 hours, I decided to give this game a bit of a review. Ok, basically Dota 2 is just defeating the enemy team. Your team consists of 5 mates and the enemy team consists of 5 mates. Of course you can abandon the game anytime you want to, but 5 mates is the basic. The map is divided into three different roads called 'lanes' and your team spreads up and fills those lanes. Usually it's 2 guys top lane, one mid, and two down. You can also pick a character from a group called as 'junglers'. In Dota 2 you pick a character. There are over a 100 possible choices, more to come during updates etc. Picking the right chatacter is the key to everything. If you happen to get a dream team, you are sure to win. In case it's a dream team, it requires the players also to know how to play the game. For example: Many people pick Riki, one of the most frustrating chars of the whole game AND they don't know how to play him right. During you develop your hero, you gain money and experience points. With money you buy different items, it depends of your chars' item build. With experience points you gain levels. By the time you reach lvl 11 early game with your op hero, you've already won the game. By the time you reach the max lvl, 25, with a bad hero, it basically ain't helping your team much. You make progress by destroying enemy towers. There are 3 towers on each lane + 2 extra towers protecting the main building, ancient. Behind the third towers, there are the barracks. If you take out one lane's barracks down, it makes your creeps do better on that lane. If you take down every barrack in the enemy base, it makes your creeps do 4x the original damage and it boosts their HP as well. Okay, that's the main view of the game. And now we'll get to read about being in a match with other people. Mostly in Dota 2 there's a war going on all the time. EU against Russians, Russians against Americans and Americans against Russians. In almost every game, you'll get a chance to speak with a real Russian. Mostly that person just writes any word wrong and makes you laugh at his/her grammar and it makes that person to become more angry. In almost every game you also get the chance to be called as a '' and you get to read the most known words in Dota 2: , report, feed, noob, report, w8, your mom. Those are one of the most known words in Dota 2. After a couple of weeks playing Dota 2 you'll see what I meant. Pros +Awesome gaming +The fun it has +Variety +No match repeats itself +Very detailed and well made game Cons -Everyone hates everyone -Extremely hard to learn -It makes you frustrated -It has an extremely high addiction risk That's basically Dota 2. Play, it's worth it! Edit after 1500+ hours of playing: Dota 2 has changed somewhat much. New elements have been put into game, making people angry and happy (Some do enjoy these updates while some don't). Some heroes who were crappy back then have become overpowered and some heroes who earlier were op are now crappy. And that makes people fizzy. As I've kept on playing this game I've seen that it's become somewhat dull and unlogical. While you pick these heroes who are your favorites you keep on doing those same builds you've done for ages, not making almost any variety at all. Though it's still not a repetitive game, it can sometimes make you feel like you aren't that amazing. And when you've honed this one very special and op-like build, which works against every hero in one match, then suddenly it just stops working even though your enemies pick the same heroes it earlier worked against. The community has also changed a bit. People don't do so much swearing anymore but that doesn't mean they'd shut up. No, not all. Nowadays it's very popular to talk about your mistakes etc. But even though this community is a bit flopped one, it's still nice. During these hours after my original review, I've noticed the beauty in it: Huge variety of people and different natures. You can meet many new people there. Some are nice, some aren't. But that's how it's in real life as well. You like some people whilst disliking others. By now I should be thrusting this game on you but I'm not gonna do it. I recommend you to try this game but it wouldn't be the end of the world even if you didn't try Dota 2. If you decide to start playing this game, remember not to die a scarless man. Riki isn't that popular anymore.
nice job dumbass;-;Paul Delanda gives this game a 10/10 rating.
Mr. Match;-;This game is free. Not even  you. No runes, no grind, no . Yes, Game is hard. But Dota 2 was built for both the casual and the hardcore player. Also, you can watch other people's games, which has 10 times the quality of Twitch, but still sucks because it lacks the power of Twitch chat. Kappa There are only three rules. 1. Do not die 2. Song name is always Darude -Sandstorm 3. There is no third rule. Download it.
Kasiornis;-;This game is too boring for me, won't play it much.
Cipher;-;Awesome game though matchmaking sucks sometimes..
Ghost;-;Well , the months of summer are almost upon us , and so are the various summer-ish problems . Heat , dust , ice creams melting too fast , you know the like ? But the greatest of them all , are " What to do in the vacations ?" . Well , when I started playing Dota 2 , in the summer of 2012 , it was precisely because " I didn't know what to do !" . If there are such gamers out there , who while away hours on the steam store , unable to decide which game should they buy , bored and distraught of having to go through the same old list of , games in their library , Dota 2 might just be it. Also , it's free. What exactly , is Dota 2 ? Sounds funny right ? I thought so too . Well it's a sequel to the award winning world of warcarft III mod "Defence Of The Ancients" ( Dota) and since it's a sequel , hence the '2'. Well , I'm not really the Dota 2 type , I would spend most of my time fanboying over call of duty , battlefield bad company 2 , I never really took myself as an Online MMORPG type player . I always had this prejudice , " Wha.. MMORPG ? What you kidding me ?" , but that was only till Dota 2 came along. Getting started in Dota 2 , is really difficult. I shall not mince my words here. The learning curve , is very steep. However, if you are able to get past the learning stage , I guarantee you , all the abuses you endure and the "noob " calling will be every bit worth of it. Dota 2 , is essentially a free game , and it's "completely" free , meaning purchasing power does not influence your ability to win the game , hence its purely based on skill . It's not possible to spend money on 'xxtra super human upgrade packs' or anything like that , to stomp everyone in your way , unlike league of legends (tsk tsk) . Hence , the game is fare in everyway possible . There are ingame cosmetic upgrade purchases , which you can buy if you like , or if you are patient enough , you will get in-game drops. Mode of game play ? It's an online battle arena MMO , so you have two teams , five - a -side . There are various game modes you can play , the most common being All-Pick where you are allowed to pick from the entire pool of heroes ( the characters which you control in the game) each hero , not being remotely similar to the other. Each one is completely different ,and some hereos get along well with others in terms of abilities ,and stuff . So , it's for YOU , to find out these hidden combinations , which makes Dota so intricate . There is strategy , involved at every step. The game is indeed complex , and I don't know a single person willing to forego the evil satisfaction of having mastered something complex. The game , is definitely a must , for everyone to have played atleast once in their lifetime. In a nutshell - PROS - - Good Graphics - Great Sound - Smooth Gameplay mechanism - Fair system - Addicting - Exciting - Thrilling - Awesome and so on CONS - The community is a bit immature right now , but well dota 2 is young. - Steep learning curve , but the first place where learning is totally fun. - Cravings to buy ingame cosmetic items. - Cravings to download it again , everytime you delete it due to addiction . Well , that's all folks.
Korasake.;-;worst game you will play in ur life 10/10
Hamburger Helper;-;It ruined my life. Over 1.2k hours I can't get back. Definitely recommend.
Gucci MagiK;-;If you are good at something, don't start playing LoL
Futushia;-;This is actually pretty fun.
I'm Batman , Bitch!;-;Best game ever. Thanks you Valve thanks you Ice Frog
Silly (No PC);-;Everyone called me a noob.
NeXuS;-;i enjoy dota 1 because of different heroes, when i played dota 2 at first it' kinda not that interesting. then when i played it more i enjoyed and now i love it it is much better if all of the heroes will be updated asap since i want to toplay the same heroes like dota 1 they have new heroes every month.
Na'Vi DenDi;-;very nice game
pppqo;-;This game sucks. 10/10
El Dovahkiin;-;Very good, many servers worldwide, Russians on every server. Learn russian today and and have fun!
|| ||;-;nice looking water
WhiteRaider;-;Please fix the community by eliminating the noobs :)
THE CAT CROSS THE RAINBOW;-;nice and funny game ++
PUPSHI;-;way better then lol and hon... just play it. still waiting, go play it. NOW
Lamia;-;HELLO :C KAK Y TEBYA DELA ?
YuKiSSU;-;I downloaded Dota 2 because my friend is good at it. He told me to not pick Meepo because I'm new to Dota. I picked him because I was just curious on how he works. I got 24 kills and a Rampage. Also It was my first game of Dota 2. I will never forget that moment. 322/10 would bang again
Chelios;-;hi ! my graphics card is gts450 still cant play 60fps in game :( .... in middle lane . my fps drop into 40fps ... can u fix it ????
Synergy.Frost;-;It's dota, what else, best mmorpg ever
brutemilk;-;Ruined my life. I cant think of much else to say, so, yeah. 10/10 would recommend.
Lord Prolapse;-;I don't know what is this but i'll give it a 10/10
skill level russian;-;dota taught me that all countrys, england,germany,france,america can all come together. and gang up on the russian feeders but besides that i had lots of fun playing dota, when i started i wasnt verry good but after much help from the russians i started   then eventually i stopped     never wanting to
buge;-;If you want to learn a few new languages, have your life ruined, and meet some rage filled people... this is the game for you! In reality it's quite fun and I can't stop playing. 9.9/10
Pierce the Heavens;-;Some words about Dota 2, it`s a game, which can take a lot of your free time, and usually you won`t be worried that you played 13 hours in 2 day. You have to try this, you`ll sure be entertained, whoever you are (Even if you`re troll C:). Dota 2 is new begining of MOBA games, you can play it for free, and if you`ll go to professional scene, you`ll even earn some money. Just in case, worldwide's tournament "The International" has more than 1.000.000$ as prize fund each year, can`t say if it is going to be 4th International, but i hope so.
terrorclawapex;-;GREAT GAME!!!! 10/10 RECOMMEND TO ALL!!!
Emoshun;-;While ive only played about 20 hours of this game, i can say that this game is quite enjoyable even if the community is sub-par. If you enjoy rts games then you will most likely highly enjoy Dota 2. Hell, even if you just play mmorpg's like WoW youll probably still like it.
Gaomamedic;-;This is a great game with hours of fun if you like the first person shooter genre. but unfortunantly there is no multiplayer, and that can make the game boring after a while. but its fun every time i pop it into my PSVita.
Jalapeno Golfer;-;Don't play because you'll feed.
Seraphim.Quan[T];-;Great Game, You can play with your own on Solo Ranked Matchmaking or Have Friends and have Fun Great way To kill Time and Lose your future but if you put your heart into it You might win 5 million $ Great way to lose your girlfriend but Im not losing mine Game is 100/10 This Game lets you learn how to speak Russian, Peruvian and more. If you are interested in learning new languages, Try this Game!
U Suck Bawls Kid(;-;DotA 2 Is a F2P Game (Of Course). That The GAme is... idk
eyeseaq;-;good game. beginners beware: takes more than the tutorial and a few games to be good
<font color="#00ff0027">(Y)<;-;very nc game
NCA Ballistic;-;Really good game, until someone picks riki on the other team. Thats a whole different story
Mnr. Botha;-;Causes anxiety problems, low self esteem, Tourette's syndrome, mood swings, Bipolar disorder, breakdown of relationships, raging erections, racism. Would definitely recommend. THE BEST LANGUAGE LEARNING TOOL ON THE INTERNET. LEARN TO SPEAK SPANISH, RUSSIAN, AND PORTUGUESE FOR THE LOW LOW PRICE OF YOUR SELF-ESTEEM AND FAITH IN OTHERS GET THIS FREE AS HECK GAME
Dincht;-;Too addict to play this game...
Kinoea;-;Best game ever more enjoyable with friends
AlterMann;-;Gud gaem 2 play w/ friends. so casuul 'n' funny.
Bye bye;-;Alright, listen up. Instead of being sarcastic and writing a funny review that jabs at russians, I'm going to tell you how Dota 2 really is at it's core. In a nutshell Dota 2 is a great game, but a terrible experience at the same time. You want to keep going back to it, but you also hate to go back. Why? One word: community. Dota 2's community is for the most part rude and hateful (and undeniably filled with russians who refuse to speak any other language than that of their own), sapping the joy out of this otherwise polished and addicting MOBA. It's unfriendly to beginners and the basic mindset is to belittle anyone who makes a mistake. Make one wrong move and you are called a noob right away... at the best of times. Often it's much worse and I would prefer not to go into the details. Sometimes you get a crapstorm of hate and blame even if you haven't actually done anything wrong. Occasionally though you come across friendly players, and when that happens, the game is a pure joy to play. However, since the game is 5v5, coming across four nice players at the same time (if you're solo queueing) is a rarity. Why then have I played the game for over 1300 hours? The sensation of winning. Your determination to keep playing, despite of the discouraging community, is fueled by the fantastic sensation of winning. That sweet moment when you see the enemy Ancient blow up and look back on the match, remembering all the plays and teamwork that lead you to victory is ever so gratifying. But even a victory can come with a grain of salt. Many times you have rude teammates that rage in the chat even when your team is winning. There is a mute option, but that doesn't stop the bad manners that extend outside the chat. People can intentionally feed the enemy team, ignore their own team, teamkill with some abilities and just generally be a bad player. It's really frustrating and the worst part is it happens all the time. Going ranked doesn't really solve the problem either, at least not completely. Ranked matchmaking is a more serious type of mode in Dota 2 that ranks you based on how well you do and finds opponents of equal skill. It feels much more professional and "tryhardish". Although you meet nice players more often, nothing stops the rude players from jumping over the fence and playing ranked aswell. Having played some matches in ranked, I can say the mode isn't "hate free". I had some of the worst matches in regards to teammates in that mode. Another problem with ranked is that, like I said, it's more "tryhard". Many just want to play the game casually and not have to worry about ranks and such. But don't get me wrong, Dota 2 is a great game in itself. The core mechanics are spot on and gameplay flows well. No technical issues to speak of (not counting the occasional missing texture bug or so, of which I have had none myself). Graphics are great and have a very subtle water painting type feel to them. All the various spells and abilites look great. The game is very deep and complex with tons of items, skill and item builds and strategies to learn. It can be a bit terrifying to beginners, but once you get the hang of things it's engaging. All the playable heroes are well balanced (although there is always some debate on a couple specific heroes being "OP") and free to play from the start. That's another thing the game does right. All the heroes are free and playable from the start, unlike Dota 2's undeniably very successful competitor, League of Legends. Dota 2's microtransactions focus on purely cosmetic stuff, which means there are zero "pay to win" elements in the game. It really falls unto you to decide whether if you want to suffer the rude community for the sake of playing this great game. To put it roughly in perspective, it's like playing Skyrim, but having someone stand next to you the whole time yelling at you for every mistake you make, calling you a "fooping idiot" every time you miss an arrow or fail a quest objective. Failed to kill Alduin? "Uninstall Skyrim, noob." Don't know how to make dragonbone armor? "Learn to play, tard." It's like that. Having played the game as long as I have, I would say that you are better off not playing Dota 2. The game is fun when you're winning (because people tend to rage less when your team is doing fine)... which is 50% of the time. Sometimes not even when you're winning. It isn't the losses that make the game unpleasant, it's the unfriendly people. If you're one of those people who can just calmly ignore everything rude being said at you, you have a better chance of not finding Dota 2 so terrible. But realistically, why should you even have to? Videogames are supposed to be a form of entertainment and when you can't have fun half of the time, the game isn't worth it. People will tell you that Dota 2 is great, but that greatness comes with a price. Do take in notice that this is all coming from a solo player point of view. This review is meant mainly to those who are likely to play the game alone most of the time and want to know what it's really like, not just the great things. If you have four friends who you can play with on a regular basis, then you're golden. The game is at it's best when you play with friends and don't have to worry about getting "a stick in the mud" player on your team. Great game with a bad community.
McSpaz;-;Great game
Simba Power;-;A game where You meet russians and rage at them.And they rage at you becuase you picked Riki.This is a must have game but sooner or later you will get sucked in this game and start buying stuff for your heroes.And it will protect your Virginity. :) 8/10
THAIN THE INCANDESCENT;-;great game i have bnow logged over 100 hours on advice for anyone ontemplating downlaod get out of limited heroes asap ul be better for it just listen to ur team and look up hoteys online and youl be fine... also stay away from zeus
{EZ}Rasta;-;For the most part, yes I do recommend this game. And for the record, yes this game is addicting. Despite its extremely annoying penalty rounds due to abandoning games and a community that sometimes consists mostly of multicultural and and multilingual players or trolls, Dota is a moba that succeeds in keeping players playing -- not because of its given motivation to acheive high priority when one is in the lower level, but because of its unique atmosphere and game world, and characters that never cease to allure dotagoers in their many plethoras of styles and abilities. The large and very diverse "pool" of heroes as players and professionals alike call it never fails to encourage players to change up their tactics and strategies for the matches they participate in. All in all, this game, like the underground hit it was and is, is a keeper. (Obviously). Without a doubt.
Jittoa;-;Definitely worth the time to learn the game, they don't say good things come easy. Bigger reward means bigger pay off!
jk_-my name is jeff;-;the best game I had played
ian_:(lonely_forever):;-;this is amazing
I like crayons;-;3 years ago i was a half-hippie, humanist dude, now i'm cursing to russians like "i wish hitler killed you all" 14/88 would play again
Agrol;-;perfect game..
#<HandJoB>;-;This is really nice game if u play with your friends
ChosenJuan;-;THIS IS THE BEST ING GAME EVER! I DO NOT REGRET PUTTING IN SO MUCH TIME INTO THIS GAME!
a-pes;-;Very nice game
syw;-;dota 2, the best way to offend/mock other people for whatever reasons without having a gun pointed at your head. 10/10 would do #safeinternet
Tranexy;-;ruined my life. would recommend 10/10
jonttuWE;-;Just awesome! If you havent try this... you should! 10/10
Legion Loves Storm Spirit <3;-;nice game...lots of fun momments ^^
fem-teezy;-;I hate peruvians. But I love Dota 2.
Inbread Cat;-;OMFG This game guys this game is one of the most addicting games ever over 100 hero's to play with above 70 items to buy and play with friend this isnt like those boring slow pace strat games it much better then that it feels like a more combat game while having the elements of ambush patience and knowing when to strike the enemy but its a bit hard for cons to know what to buy what to do and what not to do 9/10 great game!!!
pilzsammler2002;-;Dota 2 <3 In my opinion the best "MOBA" game... Needs a bit more practice and more micromanagement (items and sometimes npcs) then in League of legends, but it comes with more fun and more "rewards" :D 10/10 - Mobagame
KRoNoS;-;If you haven't played dota 2 you haven't lived a good life
Solid Snake;-;Have been playing this game since quite a while now. Found myself coming back to it each day. Even if I did have better things to do, I preferred playing a match of DOTA 2. This game has everything that you can expect from a good MOBA game. Every game is a completely different experience. You are snowballing and pub stomping in one game and other game, you lose throne in 20 mins. Matches are highly unpredictible specially with the new updates that have made #comeback real. Winning a losing match is the ultimate satisfaction. Also, many people don't understand this but there is actually no -right- or -wrong- way to play a hero. Some ways make the hero stronger and some don't. It all comes down to personal preference and the scenario or kinds of enemies you're facing. Having said that, yes the game has a very steep learning curve. Takes a couple of hours to play a single hero properly and there are 110 heroes at the time of writing this review. Each with their own unique set of skills and item builds. There are 129 unique items in the game about 70 of these are built by combining the rest of the items. It DOES take a while to understand and learn what each item do and if its worth building it on a particular hero or not. Say, the hero Anti-Mage has a innate ability to "blink" on the battlefield so, crafting a blink dagger on him is a bit useless and waste of gold. Some items can further strengthen the strengths/abilities of heroes while some others can overcome their weaknesses. It will take a while to understand what items will be good on a hero and what will be bad. Now, the worst part of DoTA 2 -> The major player base/community. Almost every single person playing this game thinks of himself/herself as the biggest and the ultimate champion of DoTA 2. Its like, as if they were born with the innate ability to pwn on the DoTA 2 battlefield and learned everything about this game in their mothers' womb. If you are new, get ready to be yelled at. Being called noob a LOT. Being called different names, being abused a lot in languages you didn't know existed before DoTA 2 and last but not the least, hearing nasty things about your mom. And no, this is not an exhaggeration. Actually, it can get worse depending upon how badly you do in a game. If you are stomping, however, you will be getting a ton of friend requests and party requests. Sure, some people are just dumb and had all the flame coming as they just don't learn even after putting in thousands of hours in game. But, new players should be taught how to do it properly instead of being told to uninstall the game. The overall player base is much better on higher MMR (matchmaking rate) range but reaching there is a climb through a spiky-rocky cliff and takes quite a bit of effort and patience. Finishing off with some tips for new/potential DoTA 2 players if they are reading this review: 1# Don't go in with zero knowledge of game. Go watch some youtube videos first to understand the basics. Most videos by Purge are pretty helpful. 2# Take the game seriously. If you are not serious about winning, please don't play. DoTA 2 is a serious competitive game and you shouldn't spoil it for others. 3# Know your limits and don't try complex micro and/or heavy farm dependent heroes like chen, meepo in normal matchmaking. At least not untill you have practiced enough with your farming/micro skills and are confident about it. 4# Try supporting heroes and buy courier/wards. This will make the team appreciate you. If however, you can't ward properly, get ready to be flamed... 5# Last but not the least, try to have some fun and try communicating with your team (if they understand/speak your language). Overall a pretty solid MOBA game. Though I don't like a few mechanics, I don't even care. I have so much fun that I overlook all the bad things. And thats the sign of a great game. The game is contantly evolving and changing though with new heroes getting released now and then and gameplay patches that completely change the way some heroes play. And thanks to valve's ultimate money guzzler mind, the events and constant flow in of cosmetics can keep you hooked in. This game can never get boring. Just gather some friends and start playing now if you haven't done yet. Thats all folks. Game on...
BuckZ;-;You can choose to remove Russian servers . . . 10/10
kuka951reku;-;Fun game, very addicting, you will get  and killed when you play it, and this will continue for a long time, because this game is hard... I LOVE IT
[A.f.T.H] Any@RaN;-;team work game
ethrzcty;-;Never in my whole life have I imagined that I'd lose 3 friends over a stick with an eyeball on it.
Jet Fuel Can't Melt Steel Beams;-;Great MOBA! There are a few learning curves to Dota 2. Make sure to practice with Bots and watch tutorials and the differnt playable characters Also, ITS FREE!
Cstl;-;Dota 2 in a very strategic challenging game. I know a lot of people start playing Dota and get discouraged because of how brutal it is when you get started. Don't give up! Don't be afraid to ask players for help and watch videos, watch TONS of videos. Read guides and builds, and experiment with every hero in bot matches. Go to the Library in-game and read up on every hero and item. Don't skip the tutorials! They may seem boring or dry at first but they really, really useful. This game can be extremely fun, and so fulfilling when you play it. There will be games that your team gets stomped with a 74-16 game....don't worry about it. There will be other games where the entire game is tied and both team have the same amount of towers down and neither team can get ahead, and it reaches over an hour. When it does finally end, whether you won or lost, it won't matter because both teams realize it could have went either way and that is was a truly amazing game. It is moments like that when you are congratulating the other team on a good game, not just because it is expected of you, but because it really was a great game. This is why you need to stick it out in the beginning and keep on trying. More than likely you will start out with a 2-17-4 score, but that's ok! Because in no time you will have that game, the game where your team worked together amazing and your hero was a perfect counter to their entire team and you'll get that 44-6-12 game. As far as the gameplay is, Valve is very good about fixing the bugs. Most bugs are only on for a few days before a fix has come out. The game is very stable. The only problems I could have with Dota 2 are with the servers. There have been server issues and sometimes it causes you to have an abandon which wasn't fair, but non reversible. Also, there are issues if setting your language preference to English and you get paired with players who don't know any English, this can get frustrating. All in all, Dota 2 is well worth the hours put into it and the best part is it is completely free to play. You don't have to pay a dime for any content whatsoever. The only thing that costs money is to customize your experience while playing, including Cosmetics, HUDs, Loading Screens, etc.
AeRoSh0T;-;Some of my friends come up to me and say "WHATS DOTA?" sarcastically , I respond with what dota is to me , "dota is the gameof my life." It helps me get through the struggles of the real world Lately my uncle passed awayand therewas a bigger holein my life but this wunderfull game brought me back up i just whant tosay to the makers "Thank You" So much for bringing this game into the steam world and letting it bring me up in the real one.
The_Fist;-;Don't play this game unless you're okay with losing days of your life
Onyx Templar;-;Hard and challenging, always something to learn and it never gets boring. Currently my favourite game ever.
Ethereal spoon;-;the best moba game ever i play
Bilz;-;mood swings, Period symtoms, screaming, breakdown of relationships, hatred, raging , racism. Would definitely recommend.
Fredda;-;This game taught me about the diversity of cultures that our small little corner of the universe offers. Then it taught me to hate them all.
Chrome;-;Side effects include: -Hatred of other humans -Lack of trust in others -Carpal Tunnel -Improved hand eye coordination -A large ego -Weight gain -Weight loss -Confidence -Despression -Extreme Racism -EXTREME RACISM -Increased strategic thinking capabilities -Mushy-brain syndrome -Subconsciously learning a new language -Subconsciously learning to hate the culture of said language -Literally every ailment that is not a transmitable disease 9/10 Doctors accepted this game on their recommendation list, but the tenth was afk
Grizzt;-;It's like roulette; fun until it turns into Russian.
psych0tic;-;Causes anxiety problems, low self esteem, Tourette's syndrome, mood swings, Bipolar disorder, breakdown of relationships, raging erections, racism. Would definitely recommend.
Sentimental Oriental;-;In Dota 2, Not many people speak your language. Not many people play well. Not many people talk nicely. Not many people work as a team. But if you find people that do... You'll have the most fun you've ever had.
Kyubashi;-;And you thought real life was a struggle.
ephir;-;I only played a little but it was fun.
Captain Obvious;-;Things I gave to DotA: 1. Money 2. Time 3. Love Things DotA gave me: 1. Arthritis 2. Carpal tunnel syndrome 3, Hatred of Russians, Mexicans, Spanish, Finnish, and Russians 4. Broken keyboard 5. Broken mouse 6. 9/10 ready 7. Server crashes 8. 4 stacks of Russians in EUW servers on English prefrence settings 9. Ranked matches 10. Free to play but Pay to win games (I.E. - Foreseer's contract, New Bloom 2015) 11. "It's in the bag" spam (especially Skywrath) 12. Multilingual cursing - I guess this is a good thing? 13. Split second math - Reliable/Unreliable gold and gold loss on death vs. Buyback availability - This is good too Essentially - DotA is a greedy woman, but I love her all the same. 11 / 10 would play again
HekaDooM;-;"THE PUB SUPPORT" "Where are wards?" The pub Carry demanded. "I placed them and they were countered" the Support began, "I am trying to juggle giving you complete lane farm, protecting you and harrassing the enemy while saving to buy more, also possibly sentries to remove their-" "UP COUR PLS" the mid hero politely added. "Give Savle" The Carry demanded. "Certainly." replies the support, using the salve on the Carry who subsequently ran headlong into an enemy creepwave. "So where is mek?" the Carry said, after he was ganked due to overextending. The Support died saving him and was treated to a rather enthusiastic series of map pings on his corpse. "Again, having not even enough to buy boots as well as wards, I don't think a 7 minute Mek is viable." The Support replies. "Haha look your level, so low, noob" the Carry retorted. "U have no item xaxa". "Well, jungle gold and experience through stacking and pulling with blocked camps is nowhere near as much as on lane which I attempted to give you, the carry, the priority over." The Carry is subsequently ganked again at the enemy tower, oblivious to the enemy tp that the Support moved away from. "Report Support, usless" The carry cried in allchat, in between mentioning various aspects of the Support's Mother's anatomy. "Instead of reporting and acting like that, why don't you try supporting for randoms sometime instead of instapicking a carry?" the Support asked, as he watched the Carry return to afk-lasthitting lane creeps. "HAH, support is for noskill noobs like you!"
flanadlivv;-;One day, a wise man intoduce me into this game. "it shall protect your virginity, my lad" he said.
Mr.Banana;-;this game is flipin awesome
Windfury;-;party mmr for good players,but in this gamemode you have 's team.
Swirl;-;Best russian language learning programme
DoubleU-DV;-;This game really brings out your own imagination on how you think and react and what you want to do, Limitless possibilities is one of the few things games have these days especially Online gaming, I never was a big DOTA fan but after I got to play around a bit after being pushed in to it with friends i found out that it truly is something that attracts the mind, It is like a dopamine is released into the brain and you want to come back for more, The game and detail along with it being a Free-to-play game really takes my fancy, I would recommend this game to any person who likes a challenge, someone who likes to explore his imagination and to be competitive to rise and see how good you can get at something, Valve really outdone themselves on this one. Good job guys.
IMTTOTSL;-;I'm a big fan of Dota2. It's interesting
The Grand Swagus;-;Full of Glitches, Full of russians, Noob teams, Ruined my life, Addictive, Sexual harrasing, . When you are winning the enemy team support gives up and asks for your .
rocker king;-;i like the whole package of dota 2,
Rogue;-;10/10 would waste my social life again.
Levu;-;Awesome game, i didnt like it at first but then it grew on me xD 10 out of 10 unless you have russians on your team ^^
IronDragon;-;amazing birth control
MiuMew @yellowrune4yellowpeople;-;THIS  IN ROCKS YO
Tuscany;-;This is a terrible game that you will continue to play until you are nothing but a mere husk of man incapable of loving or feeling anything. You will wake in the night sweating thinking of missed last hits, you will cower in the corner broken by no wards or courier and you will break down crying at the four other carries on your team who will endlessly berate you in a mix of different languages until finally you give in and call GG. I would absolutley reccomend this game.
fpsGhost;-;/10 would blyat again
MEEPwn'D;-;A great game with tons to do and you never get bored of it and unlike LoL you dont have to grind for heros that you want to play or wait untill it becomes avaliable. There are many events throughout the year such as diretide and the international to add even more stuff to an already great game i would recommend this to anyone who has the time to learn the basics because otherwise it will be very difficult to play without hurting your teams preformance which could result in the reports and low prio but other than that it is a great game.
Chonks;-;Technically not free to play since it costs you your soul.
Madzeus;-;Do you wanna become a xenofobic racist man with a heart full of hate against mankind? Play this game. Would be xenofobic again. 10/10
Huto;-;well i would say that DOTA is the best game i have ever played till now , its sooo much fun :D and its such an intense game ,well alot of people play DOTA and it good to meet new people too ,and people usaully get bored of DOTA cuz of the same map again again but for me that would never happen xD it will never get boring for true DOTA players! i would rate this game 9/10 ,thank you god for bringing DOTA in my life :D haha peace out people!
[EPC]"Seijuro";-;Cool game
xvr`;-;If you love your family and friends. You should never play this game with them. Highly recommended!
[R]upee;-;Blyat. After 1,000 hours of this game, I can say it is one of the best games I have played. But, I wouldn't advise you to play it as it will drain the F***ing soul out of you, and you will not have any life from then on. However, if you do decide to play this game, Report the Russians and flame your team.
Anjak-Amu;-;i love this game
Sun Bak;-;Everyone of us wanted to be a warrior, a gladiator or a samurai from when we were little. Sadly we were born in the wrong age but there is a way to live up to our childhood dreams. A way that we can live the intensity on the battlefield, a way with which can bring glory to our clans and doom upon our enemies, a way in which we can hear millions cheering for us," Maximus, Maximus, Maximus.....................". Brothers and sisters, let show you that path, the path that dredges through blood and tears and finally leads us to the Valkyria, Defense of the Ancients 2........................................
Par[A]doX;-;It's too much addiction but it feels just great
Scott Sterling!;-;Single handedly destroyed my social life, confidence and education. 10/10 would play again.
Skubastew;-;When I played Dota Wc3 Mod for the first time I died as WindRUNNER and moved on to Hero Line Wars. Now that value has made Dota 2 I tried it again. The F2P model is very fair, almost too fair which lets in undesirables. The graphics are clean and crisp. The gameplay is what you expect from an RTS, lots of clicking and moving your unit around or, for you plebs out there, lack there of. There is a rating system that and that really is the worst. I have close to dial up internet and lag all game. My rating sucks because of this and the reason I am writing this is because I am waiting for a 100MB download aka 2 hours. All that said Icefairy has made heroine in video game form and its free /dance....zzzz doesnt work
Vutr@lone -ZM- (acc na prodaju);-;Dota 2 is a game that you can play the entire life course with friends for added fun, the game you play longer peridon and we'll play on for a long time, my score 10/10. Great game.
Mouhammed;-;There's a hedgehog who snugs all his goo on you while hiting you with a stick. 10/10
Gucci MagiK;-;If you are good at something, don't start playing LoL
Futushia;-;This is actually pretty fun.
DISHARMONY;-;this is recommended game
o;-;Nice game. Recommend it so much.
Wurstmann;-;Under all Clones like LoL,Hon or whatever, finally the real DotA is there,  yeah
take this, haters;-;filled with angry russians, feeders, hackers, idiots, noobs, morons, children, peruvians, attention seekers, molesters, and people who generally hate you and will ridicule your every move in this game. 10/10
DJGamerZX360;-;The Game is really really good and reached 1500.5 hours playing this game Im am so addicted I spend most of the time playing this game it has good influence and bad influence but helped me in my education a bit like math english and more others Good Influence: -It make you do math ingame like damage or percentages -You play with people you dont know in the same language or not which is good for using english as your language ingame -You play with people you can make friends with -Very competitive strategy game and enjoyable -Decent prices for sets or treasures etc.... Bad Influence: -Makes you swear -Makes you suffer 5 games with no rewards -You can make enemies with this game -You can easily get scammed -Addictive time waster -Probably make your computer slower But its ok if it has bad influences I can live with that its a greadt game Highly Recommended for LoL players and more play the game its really good worth installing for. Your choice to download man
[7ds] 2nd sin - GREED;-;great game :))
Silly!;-;white men don't know how 2 fix the severs 5/10
Virgin Dreams;-;I have been playing DOTA for almost 10 yrs if not more. I am glad and happy to see how it evolved.
ZiadG10;-;This game will physically, mentally and emotionally destroy you. I recommend it to all my closest friends because of the above reason.
fox sucks in melee;-;This game sucks
Edward Daniel;-;I am playing this game all because of Dendi
RaGin' Psyc;-;Even though it might be hard to learn at the beginning, it will be great after you learned the basics. This game changes over time, the meta changes and there is no way to master everything. If you like MOBA's it is a great game for you.
MAYUYU CG-3;-;Dota is a competitive game of action and strategy, played both professionally and casually by millions of passionate fans worldwide.
Suln Ky;-;I guess it's alright.
CLQ;-;Soon after 5000 hour of gameplay you will quickly learn that this is not MOBA this is MMORPG, which stands for "Mostly Men Online Role Playing Girls"
sn4tch0vsk;-;Fantastic, best moba ever.
LC;-;This is arguable the hardest game I've come across. Yet it feels very rewarding at the end when you win a single game. I absolutely recommend trying it out. Its a game for smart people only
Farsight;-;Join us as we battle against countries. DOTA 2 -FTW
Stefan97pro;-;It is quite interesting and fun to play.
HatsuneMiku;-;Pros---------------------------- Best Game of your life trust me Cons--------------------------------- This game will be perfectly balanced if they remove Pinoys!! 10/10 All my Ranked Matches are being trolled by Pinoys.GG If you have Pinoy in your team sure lost!
BroT - Slick;-;This game taught me so much about South East Asian culture. Amazing things such as "?????", "wkwkwkwkwk", "QQ", and "ING NOOB BOBO". A real eye-opener.
CokCan;-;Awesome game, very hardcore, not for casual gamers.... cant stop playing :D
BLCCAB;-;My virtual world
Chelios;-;hi ! my graphics card is gts450 still cant play 60fps in game :( .... in middle lane . my fps drop into 40fps ... can u fix it ????
Pierce the Heavens;-;Some words about Dota 2, it`s a game, which can take a lot of your free time, and usually you won`t be worried that you played 13 hours in 2 day. You have to try this, you`ll sure be entertained, whoever you are (Even if you`re troll C:). Dota 2 is new begining of MOBA games, you can play it for free, and if you`ll go to professional scene, you`ll even earn some money. Just in case, worldwide's tournament "The International" has more than 1.000.000$ as prize fund each year, can`t say if it is going to be 4th International, but i hope so.
psychopath|GOD;-;best game ever played.
anuFrag;-;Try this thing n get addicted :P
EA`AM96;-;The game is very enticing and addictive , would recommend. ^_^
nelchael;-;Discovered that I'm gay and russian
ashbash155;-;There are lots of +s and -s, but here's some of them: + every hero differs from the other + every game is different + you can own and pwn sometimes + updates/patches are usually every month + more than just one gamemode + it's free - bad communication among teammates here and there - takes awhile to get even 'decent' at the game ---------------------------------------------------------------- I've played this game for over a year now. I haven't gotten tired of it yet. If you're new to Dota 2, I recommend watching Purgegamers on Twitch or YouTube. He's very insightful to Dota 2 and worth watching. Overall, Dota 2 is awesome.
Oatboat;-;This game makes me want to commit suicide.
Mag;-;It is very free, and it is very fun.
Tredecim;-;i lvoe this game
Hansmaulwurf550;-;A Dota player and a LoL player walk into a bar. The Dota player says: "LoL sucks!" The LoL player couldnt deny.
Gandalf the Black;-;Valve strategy of $$$$$$$$. Release a free game that is as little pay-to-win as possible, ??????? ????? ???????? ????? = $$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$
$W33ty;-;very nice game.
Farsight;-;Join us as we battle against countries. DOTA 2 -FTW
Stefan97pro;-;It is quite interesting and fun to play.
Dang;-;Very nice f2p game. I never thought I'd like a game like this but after trying it I love it!!! One advice: If your team isn't good don't get mad (you'll understand one day). 8/10
Asuna;-;really great game :D
CN#1;-;DOTA 2 > LOL I DEFINITELY RECCOMEND THIS GAME TO ANYONE WHO LIKES A CHALLENGE AND HASP LAYED LEAGUE BEFORE.
Squalllover;-;Dota is the best game strategy & team work
intelllllll7;-;nice game easy gg
Merciless Alex;-;10 : 10 :D love the original these is better ( make a server without russian)
Symba;-;Giving gamers delight and fury for over a decade. 10/10 would lose my social life again.
berzha101;-;No words of explanation needed. Just play it and you'll know. Rating: 9.8/10
Irxson - Steal Back Your Future;-;Fantastic Moba, my favourite, and perfect F2P model, you have full access to the game, the cash shop is only for cosmetic items. It has frequent meaningful updates and it's the most balanced MOBA I've played, not to mention the graphics are good and it's engine is very tweak-able, meaning you're going to be able to play the game on older systems, it runs on Linux too.
taipaN-[CE];-;Defense of the Ancients 2 is a fascinating game. Building upon the success of the MOBA genre, DOTA 2 brings hardcore pvp, strategy, and tactical team based execution of ideas to fruition. The game itself is amazingly beautiful, and simple in initial appearance - Most hero units have 4-6 key skills. However it is a combination of the vast number of heros with their unique abilities and counters in combination with a huge array of items which produce additional effects that makes the tactical possibilities in DOTA 2 simply mind numbing. From soloing a creep lane for gold and xp, to ganking other players with an orchestrated team effort, this game delievers the goods. The only negative I can think of is the player community itself, which can be quite harsh to those still learning the finer points of the game. That point aside, it can be a thrilling and rewarding experience, especially when shared playing with friends, and overcoming skilled opponents. 9/10
Lulz;-;In the starting when i saw this game for the first time i thought it will be boring and at that time it was not that popular like LoL but when i saw some of my friend had this game like 500+ game hour recorded then i thought there should be something special in this game so without wasting my time i installed this game on steam and when i played the first match then i don't know what happened to me i got so addictive in this game that now i nearly have 210 game hour recorded about 120 matches played. i liked this Heroes,the abilities, i like to watch The International Tournament each year live all those teams fighting to become world's best Dota 2 team. I seriously recommend this game to all the guys who are reading this review. There are alot of events each year people enjoy more playing it, more Hero Sets, more Heroes added in the major updates that makes Dota 2 a "Game For All Time".
WhiTe ShaDoW;-;Dota2 is perfect game for team fight, Dota single pulse (0.0) (-.-') ( ) -E >>>>>>>>> hook >>>>>>>>>> /|\
HatsuneMiku;-;Pros---------------------------- Best Game of your life trust me Cons--------------------------------- This game will be perfectly balanced if they remove Pinoys!! 10/10 All my Ranked Matches are being trolled by Pinoys.GG If you have Pinoy in your team sure lost!
CokCan;-;Awesome game, very hardcore, not for casual gamers.... cant stop playing :D
take this, haters;-;filled with angry russians, feeders, hackers, idiots, noobs, morons, children, peruvians, attention seekers, molesters, and people who generally hate you and will ridicule your every move in this game. 10/10
DJGamerZX360;-;The Game is really really good and reached 1500.5 hours playing this game Im am so addicted I spend most of the time playing this game it has good influence and bad influence but helped me in my education a bit like math english and more others Good Influence: -It make you do math ingame like damage or percentages -You play with people you dont know in the same language or not which is good for using english as your language ingame -You play with people you can make friends with -Very competitive strategy game and enjoyable -Decent prices for sets or treasures etc.... Bad Influence: -Makes you swear -Makes you suffer 5 games with no rewards -You can make enemies with this game -You can easily get scammed -Addictive time waster -Probably make your computer slower But its ok if it has bad influences I can live with that its a greadt game Highly Recommended for LoL players and more play the game its really good worth installing for. Your choice to download man
[7ds] 2nd sin - GREED;-;great game :))
dfrgui;-;Best Game Ever !!! The intense they put into this game is amazing !!! I love this game and will make my offspring to play it :3
charming(^_^);-;i really like this game!but what i dont like is, those scammers,,,and i have so many friends now becouse of dota 2!
Watch Your Ass;-;Hmmm Dota 2. After more than 400 hours I can say that thit is a really good game. It is logical, that I have pro, and contra. It is a 5star game as a free-to-play. But there are some futures, that make this game aintresting...abilityes of heroes are changing RADICALLY! (for example Bloodseeker, I played totally of 95-96 games whit Bloodseeker of my 384 matches...so I think that I know what he knows...but whit the new futures...it is a bad hero :/ , and I dion't say this because I don't like to play whit "harder" heroes). Another good experience is that there are some new heroes, and this is very good. Another thing is that we can upgrade our heroes ig game how we want. So I played 400 hours, but It's still a pleasure to play, and I think that I don't played enough! So in conclusion it's a really nice game, but I want to ask you to don't make the game worse whit futures. In the end: Thank you Dota 2, and thank you Steam!
{MPD}Space Sheep with sauce;-;It was hard at the start, but then i turned to be good at playing Enigma, the i learned how to trap everyone into my   and then i learned to    the I started     Rubick and  then I   ,      ,    ,
Rachi;-;Dota 2 is a fun, strategy game that some may find hard, or boring. Out of other MOBA's Dota delivers, but only after you've learned the game. For new players, the tutorial doesn't teach much and may actually confuse you. If you have friends that also play, it will make game more fun, as there a many different game styles.
[SANDLE] Meat;-;I remember when I first played this game and I thought, "wow i really don't like this game" and then i went back to league legends and was like "wow i really don't like this game" and then i went back to boba the 5th and was like "wow i really like this game" and so now i play this and league legoon is obsolete to this wonderful mastapiece of sweg.
Duchess;-;A great game. Just started playing today and i'm offically hooked.
CamotesGaming.Bradtol;-;this is GG
ijiemoKirotaS;-;Yeah. It's pretty good.
Olliepommy;-;great game involves international banter with russians! But as the servers have improved Volvo has been kind enough to remove the commies and grant us the glorified Pinoys so i am now currently studying pinoy so i can one day travel to pinoy land and become a famous dota player ( #goals , #standards # Hitler is jesus , allah is god and i am their desciples
LC;-;This is arguable the hardest game I've come across. Yet it feels very rewarding at the end when you win a single game. I absolutely recommend trying it out. Its a game for smart people only
CLQ;-;Soon after 5000 hour of gameplay you will quickly learn that this is not MOBA this is MMORPG, which stands for "Mostly Men Online Role Playing Girls"
RAVE.gabrielkhen;-;its nice +rep
Pyromaniac | B> H.O.U.W.A.R.;-;If you love Warcraft, you will love this!
Acheron;-;Addictive but frustrating. Best played with a group of friends who work well together.
Last Roze;-;Solid MOBA Pros: Free to Play Not Pay to Win Balanced Heroes Best MOBA Gameplay Mechanic Playable For Free Custom Game with Custom Map from DotA 2 Workshop Customized Heroes Skin, Panel Theme, Courier, Emoticon, Skill's Theme, and Announcer Can Use Your Own In-Game, Performance, and Networking Configuration Learn Russian Language in 3 Months for Free Cons: Nothing ! SCORE Originally posted by IGN : Best MOBA Ever, Get REKT MLG 360 No ScOpe, 420 BLaZE iT 10/10
Karna;-;100% Putin playing this game.
UmJamLam;-;There are only TWO types of people who play Dota 2, those who flame at you for the slightst mistake. And those who are the kindest gentlest souls in the entire world who will let you steal his kill and not get mad. I have yet to meet the latter.
Raynor;-;9/10 Most racist game out there.
GuanDerrick;-;Played this game since the wc3 days. Compared to the other MOBAs that i tried, learning curve is steeper which makes playing it more challenging and fulfilling than the others.
Momai;-;Sometimes disgusting, sometimes amazing, simply awe-inspiring. The best moba i've ever played.
Eduard Laser;-;Better than crack ruins your life
My Friends Call Me Yes PAPA!;-;i love this game :3
Huge Cock;-;this is a fantastic game. one of my favs. i only know one person who does not like this game (he is a idiot).
Armorshield;-;At least it taught me how to understand Russian
[MLS] Rainbow Dash;-;First of all, you should really play with a party of 5 if possible, this allows for the most fun times, minumum you'd want to be 3, the less you are, the more you will have to deal with terrible players. Also Russians errywhere. That said, this game is an amazing bland of fast paced action mixed with extreme strategie requirering to think and act on the spot (get em korean fingers rdy.). This game is for hardcore gamers looking to get into a competitive setting, all you softies that don't wanna get real play private lobbies or don't be wondering why people think you suck. This game is serious pants, this game is real life, don't  with it. Serious pants level: 5 pants outta 5 Irl Level: 5 real lives outta 5 Fun level: Fluctuating between 5 beethces on ma D to 1 depending on mah team. Also this game is addicting as hell, if you start playing it, say goodbye to all your other games, you'll probably never be able to play anything else then dota 2. Recommanded, play it, do it now, its free, unless you like to play barbie, then throw dat cash out thur.
Lord Jelly Donut;-;Welcome to DoTA! You suck at this game, you don't know what the  is happening, and everyone gets mad at you for your lack of knowledge of the game, and assumes that you play League of Legends! Which, for some reason, is a bad thing! 10/10
Crimson Eclipse;-;I've only played a bit. It was ok, too much water, 9/11 -IGN
RAVE.gabrielkhen;-;its nice +rep
Pyromaniac | B> H.O.U.W.A.R.;-;If you love Warcraft, you will love this!
wiener forever;-;bad game copied league of legends
GetBusted;-;My Favorite game in steam.!!! he have some community problems but if you ignore it is good game!!! +1 from me. Recommend it
h4dipermana;-;i have been played dota about 8 years ago, dota its a strategy game. its was a great game coz make me thinking how to win
][AiRo-SAMA][;-;This game is very popular .Its most interesting .Goooo playing
Joseph;-;I've been playing this game for a while now, and I can tell you that it is the best MOBA game out there, in graphics and money-wise and game play itself, I would definitely recommend it.
_BROXIGAR_666;-;Excellent Edit: 6,84 - Really nice job, Frog, yeah, well done xP
fever;-;A vast, all consuming abyss that teaches you colourful words in foreign languages
............( ''-'');-;i love this game . am here on steam just because of Dota 2
Toshiro;-;This is a very nice game, fun to play. Better with friend's of course, like all multiplayer games are. Recomend everyone to play it. But be sure to practice before playing it.
*tips fedora*;-;Ruined my life, made me spend over 400 hours staring at a computer screen screaming at fat dudes over the internet. Would definitely recomend, 10/10
MiuMew @yellowrune4yellowpeople;-;THIS  IN ROCKS YO
PiuPiu;-;Great
Asianwariorking;-;Super fun and costs nothing!!! What could be better?
[33rd]The-(3agwa)MAN!;-;Me:STUN NOW ING NOOB Teammates:        ,                ,       .      ,    .                      .
Dexter Del Rey;-;Great game.I always play this when i get sick of Gmod and it never stops to entertain me
AntidoteEsport;-;BEST GAME IN THE WORLD
IMTTOTSL;-;I'm a big fan of Dota2. It's interesting
Speedily;-;I've played a little bit of DOTA 2, we have a hate/hate relationship. 10/10
MrSparklyPants;-;Really steep learning curve, but once you get into it, it's brilliant!
Afoninje;-;I Like Dota 2 , Very Very Nice Game
<font face="ravie">kimici;-;nice and happy to play.
Hexo;-;Great game, reminds me of an office job. You want to kill your coworkers, but you can't...
moon;-;Free to play & trains your thinking skill
BlueFlytrap;-;I don't know how to play.
Y A H I K O;-;It's an amazing game - technically outstanding, showing all of Valve's usual polish and attention to detail, especially in the all-important multiplayer aspects. The continual balance tweaks and new heroes combined with the vast amount of content in the game offer countless hours of enjoyment. It's hard to master but good wins with your teammates are incredibly satisfying. It took me a long time to warm up to, but I'm helplessly addicted and every day look forward to getting home to fire this up with my friends. If you can spare the time - play it.
i habe cancur;-;I now have a basic understanding of Spanish.
Fredda;-;This game taught me about the diversity of cultures that our small little corner of the universe offers. Then it taught me to hate them all.
Chrome;-;Side effects include: -Hatred of other humans -Lack of trust in others -Carpal Tunnel -Improved hand eye coordination -A large ego -Weight gain -Weight loss -Confidence -Despression -Extreme Racism -EXTREME RACISM -Increased strategic thinking capabilities -Mushy-brain syndrome -Subconsciously learning a new language -Subconsciously learning to hate the culture of said language -Literally every ailment that is not a transmitable disease 9/10 Doctors accepted this game on their recommendation list, but the tenth was afk
Grizzt;-;It's like roulette; fun until it turns into Russian.
psych0tic;-;Causes anxiety problems, low self esteem, Tourette's syndrome, mood swings, Bipolar disorder, breakdown of relationships, raging erections, racism. Would definitely recommend.
Sentimental Oriental;-;In Dota 2, Not many people speak your language. Not many people play well. Not many people talk nicely. Not many people work as a team. But if you find people that do... You'll have the most fun you've ever had.
Kyubashi;-;And you thought real life was a struggle.
ephir;-;I only played a little but it was fun.
Captain Obvious;-;Things I gave to DotA: 1. Money 2. Time 3. Love Things DotA gave me: 1. Arthritis 2. Carpal tunnel syndrome 3, Hatred of Russians, Mexicans, Spanish, Finnish, and Russians 4. Broken keyboard 5. Broken mouse 6. 9/10 ready 7. Server crashes 8. 4 stacks of Russians in EUW servers on English prefrence settings 9. Ranked matches 10. Free to play but Pay to win games (I.E. - Foreseer's contract, New Bloom 2015) 11. "It's in the bag" spam (especially Skywrath) 12. Multilingual cursing - I guess this is a good thing? 13. Split second math - Reliable/Unreliable gold and gold loss on death vs. Buyback availability - This is good too Essentially - DotA is a greedy woman, but I love her all the same. 11 / 10 would play again
HekaDooM;-;"THE PUB SUPPORT" "Where are wards?" The pub Carry demanded. "I placed them and they were countered" the Support began, "I am trying to juggle giving you complete lane farm, protecting you and harrassing the enemy while saving to buy more, also possibly sentries to remove their-" "UP COUR PLS" the mid hero politely added. "Give Savle" The Carry demanded. "Certainly." replies the support, using the salve on the Carry who subsequently ran headlong into an enemy creepwave. "So where is mek?" the Carry said, after he was ganked due to overextending. The Support died saving him and was treated to a rather enthusiastic series of map pings on his corpse. "Again, having not even enough to buy boots as well as wards, I don't think a 7 minute Mek is viable." The Support replies. "Haha look your level, so low, noob" the Carry retorted. "U have no item xaxa". "Well, jungle gold and experience through stacking and pulling with blocked camps is nowhere near as much as on lane which I attempted to give you, the carry, the priority over." The Carry is subsequently ganked again at the enemy tower, oblivious to the enemy tp that the Support moved away from. "Report Support, usless" The carry cried in allchat, in between mentioning various aspects of the Support's Mother's anatomy. "Instead of reporting and acting like that, why don't you try supporting for randoms sometime instead of instapicking a carry?" the Support asked, as he watched the Carry return to afk-lasthitting lane creeps. "HAH, support is for noskill noobs like you!"
flanadlivv;-;One day, a wise man intoduce me into this game. "it shall protect your virginity, my lad" he said.
THE CAT CROSS THE RAINBOW;-;nice and funny game ++
PUPSHI;-;way better then lol and hon... just play it. still waiting, go play it. NOW
Ghost;-;Well , the months of summer are almost upon us , and so are the various summer-ish problems . Heat , dust , ice creams melting too fast , you know the like ? But the greatest of them all , are " What to do in the vacations ?" . Well , when I started playing Dota 2 , in the summer of 2012 , it was precisely because " I didn't know what to do !" . If there are such gamers out there , who while away hours on the steam store , unable to decide which game should they buy , bored and distraught of having to go through the same old list of , games in their library , Dota 2 might just be it. Also , it's free. What exactly , is Dota 2 ? Sounds funny right ? I thought so too . Well it's a sequel to the award winning world of warcarft III mod "Defence Of The Ancients" ( Dota) and since it's a sequel , hence the '2'. Well , I'm not really the Dota 2 type , I would spend most of my time fanboying over call of duty , battlefield bad company 2 , I never really took myself as an Online MMORPG type player . I always had this prejudice , " Wha.. MMORPG ? What you kidding me ?" , but that was only till Dota 2 came along. Getting started in Dota 2 , is really difficult. I shall not mince my words here. The learning curve , is very steep. However, if you are able to get past the learning stage , I guarantee you , all the abuses you endure and the "noob " calling will be every bit worth of it. Dota 2 , is essentially a free game , and it's "completely" free , meaning purchasing power does not influence your ability to win the game , hence its purely based on skill . It's not possible to spend money on 'xxtra super human upgrade packs' or anything like that , to stomp everyone in your way , unlike league of legends (tsk tsk) . Hence , the game is fare in everyway possible . There are ingame cosmetic upgrade purchases , which you can buy if you like , or if you are patient enough , you will get in-game drops. Mode of game play ? It's an online battle arena MMO , so you have two teams , five - a -side . There are various game modes you can play , the most common being All-Pick where you are allowed to pick from the entire pool of heroes ( the characters which you control in the game) each hero , not being remotely similar to the other. Each one is completely different ,and some hereos get along well with others in terms of abilities ,and stuff . So , it's for YOU , to find out these hidden combinations , which makes Dota so intricate . There is strategy , involved at every step. The game is indeed complex , and I don't know a single person willing to forego the evil satisfaction of having mastered something complex. The game , is definitely a must , for everyone to have played atleast once in their lifetime. In a nutshell - PROS - - Good Graphics - Great Sound - Smooth Gameplay mechanism - Fair system - Addicting - Exciting - Thrilling - Awesome and so on CONS - The community is a bit immature right now , but well dota 2 is young. - Steep learning curve , but the first place where learning is totally fun. - Cravings to buy ingame cosmetic items. - Cravings to download it again , everytime you delete it due to addiction . Well , that's all folks.
nice job dumbass;-;Paul Delanda gives this game a 10/10 rating.
brutemilk;-;Ruined my life. I cant think of much else to say, so, yeah. 10/10 would recommend.
Lord Prolapse;-;I don't know what is this but i'll give it a 10/10
Koven;-;better than League of Legends
i habe cancur;-;I now have a basic understanding of Spanish.
skill level russian;-;dota taught me that all countrys, england,germany,france,america can all come together. and gang up on the russian feeders but besides that i had lots of fun playing dota, when i started i wasnt verry good but after much help from the russians i started   then eventually i stopped     never wanting to
Lamia;-;HELLO :C KAK Y TEBYA DELA ?
Tyrone;-;"I don't like this game at all. This game is too hard. This f@#king game, man.. This f@#king game.. I don't like this f@#king game anymore, this is the worst f@#king game I've played in my entire life. I would like to switch games now. " - Sing Sing in "Dota 2 - Sing Sing Gets Bashed"
Z_Owl;-;After playing Dota 2 almost 800 hours, I decided to give this game a bit of a review. Ok, basically Dota 2 is just defeating the enemy team. Your team consists of 5 mates and the enemy team consists of 5 mates. Of course you can abandon the game anytime you want to, but 5 mates is the basic. The map is divided into three different roads called 'lanes' and your team spreads up and fills those lanes. Usually it's 2 guys top lane, one mid, and two down. You can also pick a character from a group called as 'junglers'. In Dota 2 you pick a character. There are over a 100 possible choices, more to come during updates etc. Picking the right chatacter is the key to everything. If you happen to get a dream team, you are sure to win. In case it's a dream team, it requires the players also to know how to play the game. For example: Many people pick Riki, one of the most frustrating chars of the whole game AND they don't know how to play him right. During you develop your hero, you gain money and experience points. With money you buy different items, it depends of your chars' item build. With experience points you gain levels. By the time you reach lvl 11 early game with your op hero, you've already won the game. By the time you reach the max lvl, 25, with a bad hero, it basically ain't helping your team much. You make progress by destroying enemy towers. There are 3 towers on each lane + 2 extra towers protecting the main building, ancient. Behind the third towers, there are the barracks. If you take out one lane's barracks down, it makes your creeps do better on that lane. If you take down every barrack in the enemy base, it makes your creeps do 4x the original damage and it boosts their HP as well. Okay, that's the main view of the game. And now we'll get to read about being in a match with other people. Mostly in Dota 2 there's a war going on all the time. EU against Russians, Russians against Americans and Americans against Russians. In almost every game, you'll get a chance to speak with a real Russian. Mostly that person just writes any word wrong and makes you laugh at his/her grammar and it makes that person to become more angry. In almost every game you also get the chance to be called as a '' and you get to read the most known words in Dota 2: , report, feed, noob, report, w8, your mom. Those are one of the most known words in Dota 2. After a couple of weeks playing Dota 2 you'll see what I meant. Pros +Awesome gaming +The fun it has +Variety +No match repeats itself +Very detailed and well made game Cons -Everyone hates everyone -Extremely hard to learn -It makes you frustrated -It has an extremely high addiction risk That's basically Dota 2. Play, it's worth it! Edit after 1500+ hours of playing: Dota 2 has changed somewhat much. New elements have been put into game, making people angry and happy (Some do enjoy these updates while some don't). Some heroes who were crappy back then have become overpowered and some heroes who earlier were op are now crappy. And that makes people fizzy. As I've kept on playing this game I've seen that it's become somewhat dull and unlogical. While you pick these heroes who are your favorites you keep on doing those same builds you've done for ages, not making almost any variety at all. Though it's still not a repetitive game, it can sometimes make you feel like you aren't that amazing. And when you've honed this one very special and op-like build, which works against every hero in one match, then suddenly it just stops working even though your enemies pick the same heroes it earlier worked against. The community has also changed a bit. People don't do so much swearing anymore but that doesn't mean they'd shut up. No, not all. Nowadays it's very popular to talk about your mistakes etc. But even though this community is a bit flopped one, it's still nice. During these hours after my original review, I've noticed the beauty in it: Huge variety of people and different natures. You can meet many new people there. Some are nice, some aren't. But that's how it's in real life as well. You like some people whilst disliking others. By now I should be thrusting this game on you but I'm not gonna do it. I recommend you to try this game but it wouldn't be the end of the world even if you didn't try Dota 2. If you decide to start playing this game, remember not to die a scarless man. Riki isn't that popular anymore.
Mr. Match;-;This game is free. Not even  you. No runes, no grind, no . Yes, Game is hard. But Dota 2 was built for both the casual and the hardcore player. Also, you can watch other people's games, which has 10 times the quality of Twitch, but still sucks because it lacks the power of Twitch chat. Kappa There are only three rules. 1. Do not die 2. Song name is always Darude -Sandstorm 3. There is no third rule. Download it.
Korasake.;-;worst game you will play in ur life 10/10
Huge Cock;-;this is a fantastic game. one of my favs. i only know one person who does not like this game (he is a idiot).
<font color="#00ff0027">(Y)<;-;very nc game
eyeseaq;-;good game. beginners beware: takes more than the tutorial and a few games to be good
Tap Water Connoisseur;-;Don't play because you'll feed.
Seraphim.Quan[T];-;Great Game, You can play with your own on Solo Ranked Matchmaking or Have Friends and have Fun Great way To kill Time and Lose your future but if you put your heart into it You might win 5 million $ Great way to lose your girlfriend but Im not losing mine Game is 100/10 This Game lets you learn how to speak Russian, Peruvian and more. If you are interested in learning new languages, Try this Game!
Armorshield;-;At least it taught me how to understand Russian
[MLS] Rainbow Dash;-;First of all, you should really play with a party of 5 if possible, this allows for the most fun times, minumum you'd want to be 3, the less you are, the more you will have to deal with terrible players. Also Russians errywhere. That said, this game is an amazing bland of fast paced action mixed with extreme strategie requirering to think and act on the spot (get em korean fingers rdy.). This game is for hardcore gamers looking to get into a competitive setting, all you softies that don't wanna get real play private lobbies or don't be wondering why people think you suck. This game is serious pants, this game is real life, don't  with it. Serious pants level: 5 pants outta 5 Irl Level: 5 real lives outta 5 Fun level: Fluctuating between 5 beethces on ma D to 1 depending on mah team. Also this game is addicting as hell, if you start playing it, say goodbye to all your other games, you'll probably never be able to play anything else then dota 2. Recommanded, play it, do it now, its free, unless you like to play barbie, then throw dat cash out thur.
Lord Jelly Donut;-;Welcome to DoTA! You suck at this game, you don't know what the  is happening, and everyone gets mad at you for your lack of knowledge of the game, and assumes that you play League of Legends! Which, for some reason, is a bad thing! 10/10
Gaomamedic;-;This is a great game with hours of fun if you like the first person shooter genre. but unfortunantly there is no multiplayer, and that can make the game boring after a while. but its fun every time i pop it into my PSVita.
buge;-;If you want to learn a few new languages, have your life ruined, and meet some rage filled people... this is the game for you! In reality it's quite fun and I can't stop playing. 9.9/10
U Suck Bawls Kid(;-;DotA 2 Is a F2P Game (Of Course). That The GAme is... idk
Fredda;-;This game taught me about the diversity of cultures that our small little corner of the universe offers. Then it taught me to hate them all.
Chrome;-;Side effects include: -Hatred of other humans -Lack of trust in others -Carpal Tunnel -Improved hand eye coordination -A large ego -Weight gain -Weight loss -Confidence -Despression -Extreme Racism -EXTREME RACISM -Increased strategic thinking capabilities -Mushy-brain syndrome -Subconsciously learning a new language -Subconsciously learning to hate the culture of said language -Literally every ailment that is not a transmitable disease 9/10 Doctors accepted this game on their recommendation list, but the tenth was afk
Grizzt;-;It's like roulette; fun until it turns into Russian.
psych0tic;-;Causes anxiety problems, low self esteem, Tourette's syndrome, mood swings, Bipolar disorder, breakdown of relationships, raging erections, racism. Would definitely recommend.
Sentimental Oriental;-;In Dota 2, Not many people speak your language. Not many people play well. Not many people talk nicely. Not many people work as a team. But if you find people that do... You'll have the most fun you've ever had.
Kyubashi;-;And you thought real life was a struggle.
ephir;-;I only played a little but it was fun.
Captain Obvious;-;Things I gave to DotA: 1. Money 2. Time 3. Love Things DotA gave me: 1. Arthritis 2. Carpal tunnel syndrome 3, Hatred of Russians, Mexicans, Spanish, Finnish, and Russians 4. Broken keyboard 5. Broken mouse 6. 9/10 ready 7. Server crashes 8. 4 stacks of Russians in EUW servers on English prefrence settings 9. Ranked matches 10. Free to play but Pay to win games (I.E. - Foreseer's contract, New Bloom 2015) 11. "It's in the bag" spam (especially Skywrath) 12. Multilingual cursing - I guess this is a good thing? 13. Split second math - Reliable/Unreliable gold and gold loss on death vs. Buyback availability - This is good too Essentially - DotA is a greedy woman, but I love her all the same. 11 / 10 would play again
HekaDooM;-;"THE PUB SUPPORT" "Where are wards?" The pub Carry demanded. "I placed them and they were countered" the Support began, "I am trying to juggle giving you complete lane farm, protecting you and harrassing the enemy while saving to buy more, also possibly sentries to remove their-" "UP COUR PLS" the mid hero politely added. "Give Savle" The Carry demanded. "Certainly." replies the support, using the salve on the Carry who subsequently ran headlong into an enemy creepwave. "So where is mek?" the Carry said, after he was ganked due to overextending. The Support died saving him and was treated to a rather enthusiastic series of map pings on his corpse. "Again, having not even enough to buy boots as well as wards, I don't think a 7 minute Mek is viable." The Support replies. "Haha look your level, so low, noob" the Carry retorted. "U have no item xaxa". "Well, jungle gold and experience through stacking and pulling with blocked camps is nowhere near as much as on lane which I attempted to give you, the carry, the priority over." The Carry is subsequently ganked again at the enemy tower, oblivious to the enemy tp that the Support moved away from. "Report Support, usless" The carry cried in allchat, in between mentioning various aspects of the Support's Mother's anatomy. "Instead of reporting and acting like that, why don't you try supporting for randoms sometime instead of instapicking a carry?" the Support asked, as he watched the Carry return to afk-lasthitting lane creeps. "HAH, support is for noskill noobs like you!"
flanadlivv;-;One day, a wise man intoduce me into this game. "it shall protect your virginity, my lad" he said.
^ KLLK';-;Don't even get me started. BEST GAME EVER! BEST MOBA! One dota a day, keeps the girlfriend away. Play and you will never stop playing!
cG.Fanta [XX];-;free to play more like free to stay and tickle my
OpiniGer;-;The game that makes you hate your friends and love random people! It's Dota2, you don't need a review! It's awesome!
sTyLiSh1234;-;This game is like the only reason you would download steam.I would highly recommend you to play this game if you are a DOTA lover~~ <3
Blood Elf;-;Dota 2 is a lifestyle! Best game to ever change my life. Extremely competetive and the most addictive game ever to be made!
Bolt-Action Spaghetti Noodle;-;I used to have a life. Then Dota happened.
[RtK]Command;-;Best moba ever made... What else is there to talk about this?
KitCat;-;DoTA2 is a really good game that doesn't require experience since every player starts playing form level 1. The good thing in DoTA2 is that all the heroes are available to all players, players can communicate with chat or mic, and there are different game modes which make the game more challenging. The bad thing about this game is..... well..... RUSSIAN PLAYERS!!!! They will not leave you in peace, they will feed so much that Africa wouldn't starve for decades, and they will take over every single server i the world!!!     AND also i would like to          and play a little bit                        !!!!
Agent 47;-;BEST GAME EVER BUT IT WILL RUIN YOUR LIFE :) Dont PLAY THIS GAME DONT EVEN START IT BECAUSE IF U DO YOU ARE GONE AND NO ONE CAN SAVE YOU FROM THAT
Jolly Cooperation;-;pretty amazing game, bit difficult to get a hang of and community can be shity some times but other then that, good by yourself and amazing with friends.
TAMAGOCHI;-;FIRST BLOOD : only know one hero and feel like pro (noobest) KILLING SPREE : boast own stats and blame other players DOMINATING : all about trashtalk, harrasment, country issues, bad language , etc MEGA KILL : solo gank and die ( says , " why no help, noob ? no ward " on far allies ) UNSTOPPABLE : get banned on low priority and play some heroes random WICKED SICK : try to watch people play dota and learn to see war situation MONSTER KILL : be more patient, no greedy and no boast GODLIKE : know to pick counter hero, play safe, good timing skill, better farm and balance in game BEYOND GODLIKE : ggwp RAMPAGE : be a good dota player 9.8/10 ruined my life
[D];-;Game is so addictive... ^_^
M94;-;very nice game in ever i played as per my interest DOTA 2 foreever :D
Lawrence Eagleburger;-;5/5 would play again
Treubh;-;Just doin this for the badge...
Rayle Entair;-;If you enjoy losing your humanity, Dealing with languages you can't pronounce, And to be filled with anger at the incompotence of people. Play this.
Noob Rage Quitter;-;Dota is life, nothing more need to be said.
botmun;-;if your into multiplayer games ( MOBA , MMORPG ) . Then this game is mostly suited for you . Enjoy your time with the game :) /* Not a real expert just another commentater */
Ewats;-;All you gotta do is right click
Ragnar Lothbrok;-;worst game i have ever played.... smite is better..... league is SOOO much better... do i need to tell you again? Just go play league
Arnold SchwarzeNegev;-;This game will devour your time, your social life, your friendships, your money, your self-respect, your love life, along with anything else that gets caught up along the way. I was stupid enough to play this game (and still do) with my IRL best friend. It is an absolute miracle that we haven't killed each other in real life, yet. 1200 hours (50 days) and still going strong. I hate you, Dota 2. I love you, too.
Nesnaj;-;i highly recommend this game!!!
Pew;-;Very nice game
Reinhearth;-;Mucho Russian 10/10
BigBlue;-;Highly recommended, is competitive has a large learning curve but once you understand all of the heroes and items/what they do then it becomes fun and it's your 5 man team vs their's. It's all about position, builds, and team cooperation
Azm.;-;Anger management class it can make you feel as though you're at the mercy of an unpredictable and powerful emotion and destroy your personal relationships, and in the overall quality of your life.
Jethro;-;Too many Russians 9/10. -IGN
Shadin23: BRA BRRRAA;-;I dont realy like supernatural games but when i played dota 2 I fell in love with this game instantly. Such great and detailed map, and heroes so unreal yet still each one of them make sense and anyone can easily grasp what the game is about and can learn the game in just a couple of hours. But one can hardly say that he knows everything about dota 2 because there are so many little details in the map or heroes that one needs to experience everybit of it in-game in order to understand them. I've been playing the game for over 2 years now and I'm still learing. Its a game in developing process but still is known all around the world for being one of the best and most famous games ever and most importantly it is free. I definitely recommend this game for every one. Just give it one shot and you'll see what i'm talking about.
Namida;-;Nice Game for learning teamwork.
Wyvernick;-;This game will consume your mind, soul and life. 10/10 will play again
Wyvernick;-;This game will consume your mind, soul and life. 10/10 will play again
General.Butters;-;Dota is one of the most popular MOBA's out there DANGER: DOTA 2 is a harder MOBA then LOL (atleast that's what i think i played LOL and was easyer then DOTA 2) but DOTA 2 has many friendly players but in the same time a bunch of .....how can i call it ...ohh yeah 's sorry but is true but is a fun game i found a bunch of people what becomed my friends -General.Butters ( excuse my spelling i am very tired at the moment ) That is what i belive about DOTA 2 , Is a fun game try it out
twitch.tv/notdean3;-;There are 9/10 people that like and play this game 10/10 -ign
Henkmans | DutchDota.com;-;Play 4 ever, never be satisfied by own play. Always love winning, always hate losing. Teamwipes make you come or cry, depending on the outcome. pay for hats like once, twice maybe 45 times. Spend money, make money, spend it again, untill only  commons left. Pitlord my favorite hero so far! go play!
fucc....;-;Highly addictive hat sim made by our favorite jews working at Valve HQ.
Elsa of Arendelle;-;Russian s feeding simulator 2014 10/10 would recommend
KARUN.themostmlgguyever;-;This is 1 of easy MOBA game to play. :D
fox sucks in melee;-;This game sucks
Silly!;-;white men don't know how 2 fix the severs 5/10
MAYUYU CG-3;-;Dota is a competitive game of action and strategy, played both professionally and casually by millions of passionate fans worldwide.
SickKunt;-;Fun and competitive game
Dabee;-;You can get the narrator from the stanly parable to be the announcer. 11/10 would play again
Lemonsire;-;This game gives me the creeps. See what I did there?
BooLBa;-;This game WAS excellent. But then Valve made some terrible updates Example: "Year Beast". All of it was made for nothing but to decrease my fps. Also untradable items... Just kill yourselves...Going to play League of Legends more often, less russians,more fps.
JULIUS BLAZED;-;It's like pounding your head against a brick wall but you just can't get enough.
Retr1bution;-;This is an extremely addicting game. It's had me hooked for about two years now. Download the game, grab a few friends, and find a match. If I were to rate this game I would probably have to go 9.6/10, although almost everything about this game is positive, The community needs to change a little. If you're new to Steam I recommend this game to you and hope you enjoy it! -Shadow
SALTY SHIT 322;-;Enter pub, get stomped, report team, repeat jk best game of my life i truly wasted 3k hours on this  10/10
Crayfish;-;Get yelled at by people in languages you can't understand. Get yelled at for dying. Get blamed for teammates dying. But the yelling doesn't matter because for all you know, they could be complimenting you. But it is a free language learing software which you can't really find anywhere else. 10/10 learned russian.
realpolitik;-;Great fun, if you find yourself playing this game, make sure to take part in it's economy.
Lionmak;-;Best MOBA game of all time!
WiShBoNe;-;Rage Simulator 2: Reborn.
headshot_hero5;-;dude i kno dia gam is made by valv so thats all i need to say bro it is a compkete rip off leagee of legends wich makes it bad, and som ppl like cause it has hats like tf2m but in reality hats are just dumb and should not be egnoliged by any1 other than the simple minded nerd who like all a dem dumb games that are not first person shooters cuse first person shooters are the only gud games and all of the other games are for nerds and scrubs that are very dumb and need friends cause they dont anything else to do with thier dumb pitfull boring lives cause they are dumb.
Le Crab;-;Dota 2 is one of those games that you end up having a love hate relationship with. After 1000 hours of play I still thoroughly enjoy playing it on a daily basis, however sometimes I find myself quitting after endless hours wasted playing terrible games. There are many things that I can say about this game but I think it's all been said a thousand times, so instead I'm going to give any new players a tip: play with friends. This game can be complete  and ragequit worthy if you constantly play with randoms. Highly recommend this to anyone with s of spare time on their hands.
Guru;-;Review from a League Of Legends player (Playing since S1) If you play League Of Legends, you might have difficult on buying items, making combos , counter pick , etc. But, the gameplay is more different that League Of Legends starting with: 1) Creeps , Towers, Neutural making more damage than league of legends 2)Adding more combos to the game with items than league of legends have (and making it more fun :D) 3)WAY DIFFERENT the items and stats (You can upgrade your stats (health,dmg,armor,mr etc)) 4)All heroes are free, so what are you waiting for? JOIN THE BATTLE
Bilz;-;mood swings, Period symtoms, screaming, breakdown of relationships, hatred, raging , racism. Would definitely recommend.
alphadragon;-;This game is a free to play MOBA which in my personal *biased* opinion is the best as it sets the standards for most modern MOBA's. Based off of DoTA a mod for *Warcraft3 -A Blizzard Title* Which was the first MOBA. DOTA 2 continues with it's greatness and beautiful character design. The Map never changes; but, it does cycle through day and night continuing the game along. you can choose 1 of many Hero's in the classic mode and play against others to defeat their towers and eventually the ancient. This game will induce rage as you may be paired up with people who feed, or play with some angry Russians. Just remember it's just a game~ ~Shane Simpson (alphadragon)
Treubh;-;Just doin this for the badge...
zMe.illmnte;-;good game well played , goodluckhavefun with dota 2 :)
[D];-;Game is so addictive... ^_^
Uzumaki Naruto;-;im in love with this game.. i love you dota...:*
G. Wisp;-;BEst Game EVER free to play thanks valve and icefrog
such pro. very skill;-;awesome game! You might not like it at first (because of all the trashtalking), but when you get a hang of it. It really gets your blood pumping.
Sky;-;This game is awesome!
Mazento;-;Don't play this!
M94;-;very nice game in ever i played as per my interest DOTA 2 foreever :D
Rayle Entair;-;If you enjoy losing your humanity, Dealing with languages you can't pronounce, And to be filled with anger at the incompotence of people. Play this.
Lawrence Eagleburger;-;5/5 would play again
Husk;-;This game is fun and interesting and will never bore you, even if you play it for 1000 hours! Recommended!
dualbot;-;Never lets me down! Pick antimage every round, win game.
prof;-;THIS GAME IS
sTyLiSh1234;-;This game is like the only reason you would download steam.I would highly recommend you to play this game if you are a DOTA lover~~ <3
Blood Elf;-;Dota 2 is a lifestyle! Best game to ever change my life. Extremely competetive and the most addictive game ever to be made!
Bolt-Action Spaghetti Noodle;-;I used to have a life. Then Dota happened.
[RtK]Command;-;Best moba ever made... What else is there to talk about this?
Henkmans | DutchDota.com;-;Play 4 ever, never be satisfied by own play. Always love winning, always hate losing. Teamwipes make you come or cry, depending on the outcome. pay for hats like once, twice maybe 45 times. Spend money, make money, spend it again, untill only  commons left. Pitlord my favorite hero so far! go play!
Korixela;-;When you launch this game the first time, you'll be overwhelmed. You have to play at least 100 hours to be able to tell if you even really like the game or not, and the whole time you'll be ragged on and put down by a harsh, unforgiving community. But, if you pull through, you'll find yourself immersed in a rich, complex contest of strategy and skill. 10/10 will consume your life.
Ez SF;-;Dota 2 is a ing  game.
FallenPrincess;-;i love this game, seriously, i never found game like dota 2 :D
'M A D I - Coming Soon';-;play dota since 2005 and now still played.....
whykatakcanjump;-;never boring to play this game.. never :)
Windfury;-;party mmr for good players,but in this gamemode you have 's team.
KARUN.themostmlgguyever;-;This is 1 of easy MOBA game to play. :D
Mr.Banana;-;this game is flipin awesome
DoubleU-DV;-;This game really brings out your own imagination on how you think and react and what you want to do, Limitless possibilities is one of the few things games have these days especially Online gaming, I never was a big DOTA fan but after I got to play around a bit after being pushed in to it with friends i found out that it truly is something that attracts the mind, It is like a dopamine is released into the brain and you want to come back for more, The game and detail along with it being a Free-to-play game really takes my fancy, I would recommend this game to any person who likes a challenge, someone who likes to explore his imagination and to be competitive to rise and see how good you can get at something, Valve really outdone themselves on this one. Good job guys.
Lyzzie;-;I look to this game and I think: how a game with only one map and one scenario can be s complex? Only Dota can do this for you. I will be an eternal noob on this, and that's why I recommend this game.
FURY -HyperX;-;One of my Fav Games.
AlaskanBullworm69;-;Kind of like monopoly mixed with rugby. 9/10 would bang.
TAMAGOCHI;-;FIRST BLOOD : only know one hero and feel like pro (noobest) KILLING SPREE : boast own stats and blame other players DOMINATING : all about trashtalk, harrasment, country issues, bad language , etc MEGA KILL : solo gank and die ( says , " why no help, noob ? no ward " on far allies ) UNSTOPPABLE : get banned on low priority and play some heroes random WICKED SICK : try to watch people play dota and learn to see war situation MONSTER KILL : be more patient, no greedy and no boast GODLIKE : know to pick counter hero, play safe, good timing skill, better farm and balance in game BEYOND GODLIKE : ggwp RAMPAGE : be a good dota player 9.8/10 ruined my life
Ethereal spoon;-;the best moba game ever i play
no more aimang :'(;-;the best!!
pilzsammler2002;-;Dota 2 <3 In my opinion the best "MOBA" game... Needs a bit more practice and more micromanagement (items and sometimes npcs) then in League of legends, but it comes with more fun and more "rewards" :D 10/10 - Mobagame
Inbread Cat;-;OMFG This game guys this game is one of the most addicting games ever over 100 hero's to play with above 70 items to buy and play with friend this isnt like those boring slow pace strat games it much better then that it feels like a more combat game while having the elements of ambush patience and knowing when to strike the enemy but its a bit hard for cons to know what to buy what to do and what not to do 9/10 great game!!!
69;-;Addicted game
Lee The Urban;-;10/10. Created by Gaben. Has Gandalf. Animal friendly: contains bats, dragons, horses, bears. No CO2 emission. This game has been approved by me.
Limo;-;This game will slowly suck the joy and life out of you, corroding your body and spirit so absolutely that all that remains is a husk with a vocabulary limited to the words "noob" and "feeder". 10/10
Mapex;-;If you can stomach the horrible, toxic, idiotic, hateful team mates that you will get in 98% of your games then it can be fun. Try to play with people you know. I just want to add that (trying not to be offensive) i've come across only one or two good Russians. They play on any servers they want, clog chat with random characters, are generally terrible at the game and cannot understand why people don't like them despite screaming "" when ever the opportunity arises. Before playing this game i had no problems with Russian people but most of the ones who play Dota are not good people. VOLVO PLS REGION LOCK DOTA
Commander Revan;-;WARNING!!! game may cause extreme anti-social behavior and consume hours of your life
Alliance.Lod[A];-;I really love playing DOTA 2 because it is very enjoyable and an awsome game to play if you are bored! :D
Onyx Templar;-;Hard and challenging, always something to learn and it never gets boring. Currently my favourite game ever.
Tranexy;-;ruined my life. would recommend 10/10
syw;-;dota 2, the best way to offend/mock other people for whatever reasons without having a gun pointed at your head. 10/10 would do #safeinternet
Amulame;-;The ulitmate sequal to the famous Dota. Dota 2 offers awesome graphics with great game- and teamplay. If you have a lan going on, or just 4 other friends which you want to play with this is perfect. Skill and timing helps alot, not to hard to start learning but your 1st few matches will wont be easy if you dont do the tutorial. Great tutorial, Dota 2 is very TEAMPLAY depented, so grab yourself a group or friends and start playing! Only negative part is that it has 1 map and 1 gametype (except on special occasions like Holloween), but ofcourse it would be Dota if it had more than 1 of each. A must play 9.5/10
ian_:(lonely_forever):;-;this is amazing
a-pes;-;Very nice game
ChosenJuan;-;THIS IS THE BEST ING GAME EVER! I DO NOT REGRET PUTTING IN SO MUCH TIME INTO THIS GAME!
jonttuWE;-;Just awesome! If you havent try this... you should! 10/10
Legion Loves Storm Spirit <3;-;nice game...lots of fun momments ^^
The_Fist;-;Don't play this game unless you're okay with losing days of your life
Banana Pants;-;A real great game! But ruined by russians and mexicans playing on the US servers and not working as a team because they dont know a word you are saying and just end up feeding and ruining your matches
The-Leader;-;so much Morphine :)
Genistul//Strachi;-;One of the best game i've ever played. It's very difficult to understand the mechanics despite others moba's , but this is why you should try to do your best.
dank swag;-;This is the hardest game i have ever played...
Sub-Sniper [Emo-Kid];-;One of the best games i have ever played. That simple.
LazyCM;-;It''s a great competition game, great characters, cool graphics, special details, awesome effects and many more. But the problem about this game is some of the communties are trolls and toxic players, but don''t let that stop you. Dota 2 may give a stricter gameplay but it''s best to keep it that way to avoid trolls with low prio. To avoid low prio, you need a good internet connection, make sure you have lots of spare time, and play properly. There may be a war with LoL, dota 2 and Smite with the fanbase, but don''t forget each MMOBAs has their own perspective of gaming.
Crazypieman77;-;I love this game Then I played a ranked game with 2 of the worst dota players I've ever seen who thought everyone else on our team was wrong and they were right and need to type this slowly because my hands are physically shaking from how angry and depressed I am 10/10
Biggus Dickus;-;Rage inducing fun. You can play the game and learn russian at the same time. Holy  this game is for me. 5/5 meepos
JoshTheGamer;-;Dota 2 is a truly outstanding game. In fact, it's so good, as well as having fun, yo can learn fluent russian AND hate humans at the same time! How wicked is that!
Please understand;-;I haven't played much, but I wonder when I'll 100% it.
DJ_Klover;-;Nicely done by Valve. Although there might be too many issues like lag, poor video performance, etc., still a fun game to play except with the community. There are tons of players out there who are very much not easy to be with and is always blaming on othes. But there are players who are kind and knows what the game is really about. Better played with a friend rather than random players though. Still, love it
Hakuoro;-;2 rude for usual players. Everyone hates your mom, calls you a nob, and spamming you with hate. And it's only becuase you're playing as pudge. I like customization for your heroes, but most badass items cost insane amount of monehs. Still sick, but w/e. Usual moba wich deserve a try.
Teitoku Ibaraki Kasen;-;So Dota 2 is such a self destructive game for players to play. i mean first you think the cosmetic beefed up player might be pro then he proceeds to speak russian or swahilitalibani-ackbari. Well i cannot say that it helps the team if only he speaks it and noone understands it. OR if team never wants to cooperate. My solo mmr have been down to 2900 and from there i work my way upwards but damn. team mmr is closer to over 3100. But when a support is killed before proper assists occurs i will not get enough xp or gold.... They only want to care for themselves. Its a Free for all matchmaking train of thought. Even when one can boast with victories
Owlmarine;-;dota 2 is a complex game with depth. It requires a lot of quick thinking and knowledge to play correctly, a skill that takes time to develop. one of the best parts about dota is that it teaches you languages, for FREE. unlike programs like rosetta stone, this game will force you to be paired with people who dont live near you whatsoever! you will learn how to swear in multiple languges within the first month guaranteed. oh- and dont forget the crippling lag that ONLY occurs during teamfights.
Biggus Dickus;-;Rage inducing fun. You can play the game and learn russian at the same time. Holy  this game is for me. 5/5 meepos
pikselKat;-;Dota is a competitive game of action and strategy, played both professionally and casually by millions of passionate fans worldwide. Players pick from a pool of over a hundred heroes, forming two teams of five players.
Lazyless;-;It's really fun! I wish I played more
[WsD].ULTIMAH;-;I liked this game because it provides awareness and strategic instincts which will improve our rational thinking. Just like a typical sport, this game requires a good teamwork and also a good individual skills.
fanie <3 THURSDATE;-;maybe someday even I become a mother I'll miss to play dota.
Dre)OwNaGe-;-;food give us DOTA 2 !
Mr.Vader;-;Divide and Conquer Dota began it's way as simple mode and appeared as game The game is suitable for as for beginners as well for professionals Inspite that gameplay is simple but everyone will be interested The main guarantee of victory is TEAMWORK But sometimes you will play with "too POLITE" people, so prepare yourself for any occasion In the conclusion, I recommend this game for all kind of gamers
Crazypieman77;-;I love this game Then I played a ranked game with 2 of the worst dota players I've ever seen who thought everyone else on our team was wrong and they were right and need to type this slowly because my hands are physically shaking from how angry and depressed I am 10/10
Aisaka Taiga;-;DOTO IS COCAINE except that an overdose of it will give you the super power of speaking russain and time warp from night to morning instead of killing you :D 10/10 would never go outside again
Blade #nvm;-;More Russians than Russia its self.
Brienne of Taff;-;Didn't really play it much, but would r8 8/8 m8 But really there are endless options with this game and you wont get bored. Unfortunately I got given CSGO and found my new favourite game. lel
nyunyika;-;After 1000 Hours of this game the answer is NO. After every lost game and after every time you hear "reported" from a russian player you hate this game little bit more.However you WILL come back and play it again. And then the circle starts again.
|| Furion99 [CZ];-;Very nice game :) enjoy
TRYHARD SENSEI;-;whatever
JaffaBaffa;-;I started playing Dota about a year and a half ago and I still love it to pieces, one of the most addictive, fun games I have ever played. Even although there is only one map, there are so many heroes to play/choose from that you never get bored, there are heroes for everybody. My favourite is called Lion and he is a support hero. You jump in and at first you will have no idea what is going on, but once you get used to it, it becomes quite easy to pick up a hero you have never played with before and try him/her out because you know what your doing. There are easy heroes to play, and hard ones (meepo, anti-mage etc). I can see why this is one of the most popular games on steam. Help keep it that way, get it, you will never regret it. 10/10 - JaffaBaffa (the man telling you to get it right NOW) (seriously..get it)
5060.Wanni;-;Amazing game. You get to play as a fatman who can throw a meethook up in the butt of people 10/10 IGN 11/10 Rock, Paper, Rekt
squiel;-;if you want to experince dota 2, you must throw a small chunk of gold into a cement mixxer full of toxic waste while listening to every insult possible in russian and in spanish.
x.zero;-;awesome, but bad and laggy servers. Also its a community of flamers and ragers, still i like the game :)
Brazilian Kush;-;Dota 2 has to be one of the most annoying, unlogical and stupid games of all time... but i still love it and play it almost every day. Bear in mind that i have only about 1000hrs on this game so my opinions and views are based only on the short time i have spent playing it (yes 1000hrs is not much game time at all) and i have only two bits of advice for some who is starting dota: 1. Stick at it, never give up, never give in. Comebacks are possible from almost any situation and although you will probably suck at first, only trying out the easiest of heroes - drow,riki,viper ect- soon you will become better, soon you will graduate from noob school and become novice level (like me), This happens at about 750hrs. 2. Dont rush for the same hero every time, even if you really like the hero dont do it. Picking every hero will teach you their abilities so you will know what each of them are capable of when you play with them or against them, so try randoming for the extra gold too. Do this until you have won a game as every hero or have played a hero atleast twice. Good luck and may Dendi be with you!
13AC;-;very addictive game
Vikyo;-;the best games i ever play
S E O H Y U N;-;This is a good game unlike Lol  that
A Sleazy Jew;-;I have- 1 No friends 2 My family thinks that I have problems 3 No chance of getting laid 4 No thoughts except for dota 100% WORTH IT
Sir Jensen;-;got good and now i dont have to play with russians soviet union/10
Dheo90s;-;what a game! this game is the best online game!
Hi-Tech Casio;-;good game don't play it tho
American Justice;-;Buy this game it's free.
Mistaken For Bacon;-;Canned Juices please.
Raven;-;t's like roulette; fun until it turns into Russian
paul & loujie dota2 items shop;-;this is a amazing game :)
l||l POCA l||l;-;THIS GAME IS AWESOME
Monster;-;The game that I never get bored to play. Thanks valve and ofcourse, hail to master GABEN!
Seraph;-;Love this team filled action packed game it never gets boring love it
pasza OwtaCtrl;-;Really good game to play with friends !!
dare10009;-;this game has been an awesome part of my life but in the last 6 months a lot more Russian players started playing on Europe east and west server forgetting about their own server its been a pain in the a*s to deal with those guys because they chose the preference of language to be English and then they speak only Russian its impossible to communicate with these guys they just keep on flaming and spamming and instead of helping in team fights they go on solo to make the team weaker and then die I dont know what they are doing with their life but still they play dota so from dota player to dota player we should get the hang of it in addition to that people should seriously take ranked matches seriously you dont pick captain to screw your team mates over and have a low mmr playing with low mmr people its not good for you or them but in the end you should play with what you have and concentrate on the game and nothing else you should communicate for a better game but I dont know about people, all I know is that I try to be as cooperative with my team as possible. I rate this game as 8/10 because of the raging people who only want what is good for themselves destroying their team bit by bit
zakzakzak;-;A really good game, but too much over price items. At some point it's quite hard (for some Heroes) Practice makes perfect, but nobody's perfect.. so don't waste your time
Lord of the Scrubs;-;Mid and feed
IceY;-;Game was ok, my character couldn't jump though. I expect better from Valve.
Avatar Warrior;-;The best strategy game in the world!
Dave the Brave <3 Korean girls;-;I only played a little but it was fun.
Benthatdick Cuminbitch;-;Your teammates will give you Cancer, Ebola and HIV.
Rapist189;-;Best game ever. Nothing to say anymore
Punpun Sutatta;-;Simple but good game
kiLLeRnOOb;-;Awesome addictive game ! (y) but should be proper guidance to new players ! but all they way ALLA Game ! :D
Guapamole95;-;Please! Do not start with this game! It WILL CONSUME YOUR SOUL AND WALLET! Sincerly, Me.
spookL0rd;-;Dota 2 is an amazing game. You get to learn how to deal with people in DankRanked and ScrubPubs. It is a learning experience for all and when you like to go in on them they say you cant but you have to believe in yourself or you will fail so if you dont want to fail you must do what is right in the fight for your team and your big man joe supports. That is a term for the best o the best and the worst of the best because when you are running down the hallway theHall Monitor yells at you so dont run and dont have un because when you do you will fall down the well into the water below which is wet and the river is wet play slardar to win every other game and then try to beat the game. The boss fight is super duper hard so you want to bring your best weapons like your sword and chicken and farming is the best because you can get more chicken and win the game which is what you really should be wanting to do. Another thing to consider in here is the batta batta swing mekansm because when you get a pipe you die of lung cancer. A lot of times in teamfight you get dirty so dont forget to bring Tide. I would deb8 more but I am ready for the big man joe.
240;-;the interest game i've ever played since 8 years ago.... n it still exist till now n alwasy growing up
KimcilHunter;-;Good Game Well Played
Kehilo;-;Best way to learn Russian. I feel like Russian god now 420/69 ING
BigBlue;-;Highly recommended, is competitive has a large learning curve but once you understand all of the heroes and items/what they do then it becomes fun and it's your 5 man team vs their's. It's all about position, builds, and team cooperation
Namida;-;Nice Game for learning teamwork.
Chi-bo;-;good game tho its irritating something you have to played with some rude players but when you get to play the REAL game its soo fun
101Hidster101;-;THE BEST GAME EVER!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!1
botmun;-;if your into multiplayer games ( MOBA , MMORPG ) . Then this game is mostly suited for you . Enjoy your time with the game :) /* Not a real expert just another commentater */
Ewats;-;All you gotta do is right click
NiKoLa ^_^;-;Nice Game :D
MARSHALL;-;what a game... this game full of drama. why ? this game include teamwork, egoism, role game, timing.. like a drama.. play this game, so u can be a good director. lol... YOU HAVE TO PLAY THIS GAME BEFORE YOU DIE
Sub-Sniper [Emo-Kid];-;One of the best games i have ever played. That simple.
Iron Fist;-;This game has an insanely high learning curve, and is unforgiving to new players. But if you have the patience to get through it, it'll all be worth it. The game is the classic tri lane MOBA, with a large roster of heroes, and the list continues to grow. This game also is completely F2P, in the purest form. No pay to win scams....period. The entire game is free, all the heroes, even the cosmetics which other f2p games would charge for you can earn by just playing the game through end of match drops. Now granted you won't be getting anything good for your first 100 or so matches. But once you get past like level 7 you're eligible for any level rarity drops including COURIERS!! Now on to the gameplay. one way this game sets itself apart from its competition is that it has a turning mechanism, in other mobas when you click the other direction your hero immediately turns and moves there. In DOTA 2, your hero will perform a full body turn, which could take some time which in turn means you could die. The game as I said earlier is unforgiving to new players, what I mean by that is when you die, you LOSE gold. Dying in MOBAs is bad enough giving enemy laner chance to free farm and gain xp, but an extra barrier for yourself isnt a good thing for the one who died, especially early laning. Another big thing NO RECALL TO BASE. Other mobas, you can simply recall to base no matter where on the map, not here. You can carry tp scrolls allowing you to tp to any ally tower, but those cost money, and go on cooldown after use (don't move while tp, trust me). And the last MAJOR thing that sets itself apart is the balance, this game has every hero become OP, meaning if any hero was placed in LoL or some other MOBA, that hero would most likely become op in that game. With every hero becoming OP in DOTA 2 there is balance. So your stuns last for like 5 seconds, your nukes CAN kill in one hit. A snowballer could mean level 25 while everyone else is still lvl 10. These things sound game breaking but somehow works very well. All in all the game is great, nothing to complain about other then unforgiving to mistakes. But if you be patient and work your way through it you'll find yourself not playing any other game much.
dank swag;-;This is the hardest game i have ever played...
LuVjera;-;this game is awesome
JULIUS BLAZED;-;It's like pounding your head against a brick wall but you just can't get enough.
realpolitik;-;Great fun, if you find yourself playing this game, make sure to take part in it's economy.
Retr1bution;-;This is an extremely addicting game. It's had me hooked for about two years now. Download the game, grab a few friends, and find a match. If I were to rate this game I would probably have to go 9.6/10, although almost everything about this game is positive, The community needs to change a little. If you're new to Steam I recommend this game to you and hope you enjoy it! -Shadow
SALTY SHIT 322;-;Enter pub, get stomped, report team, repeat jk best game of my life i truly wasted 3k hours on this  10/10
Lionmak;-;Best MOBA game of all time!
[PP]Martell;-;Dota 2 is a great game. A bit hard for new moba players, however its amazing when you get into it. Don't give up and keed defending
[FATE] Phantom Infinity;-;Once entered never come out of it 11/10 needs more of it.
I've got a Sweater;-;Tough learning curve, but a great game. If you love learning new languages such as Portugese and Russian, this is the game for you! In all seriousness, this isn't a casual game to pick up on little spare time. This game is for somebody who is willing to be flamed and called many obscenities in Russian, Portugese, and Tagalog for hundreds of hours before they become average at the game. Heck, at the time I'm editing this I have about 1.7k hours and I'm only okay at the game. This goes for many other players as well. Dota 2 is one of the most popular games on Steam and is being constantly updated. The replayability is insane, there are 100+ heroes (characters you can play as) and each average game is 5 vs 5 in a 40~ minute match. This gives a whole plethora of different possible outcomes. Don't even get me started on the custom game modes being introduced. Dota is not a game for the weak. If you're willing to become an emotionless husk of a person, this is the game for you.
Mommy InDionisia;-;this is awesome!
WANDERER;-;This game is highly ADDICTING !!
Mick Swagger;-;When I downloaded DOTA 2 about two months ago there were many games that I planned to play. Now there is only one. I still buy new games because of my inherent rampant consumerism but I instantly regret the purchases when a week later I realize I only have .1 hours logged. That is the power of DOTA.
DirtyChump;-;Dota 2 is love, dota 2 is life. Solid game.
FriendFive;-;OK, I think I am officially addicted to this game. I love the great variety of gameplay options. It's also cool to learn to work together as a team with my friends. This game has somewhat of a steep learning curve, but it's great fun to play and the metagame has a fair amount of depth. It doesn't hurt at all that this game is free to play. I wish all my friends played DOTA 2.
Diarrhea is my finest product;-;game not worth buying
Inori Yuzuriha;-;This Game is Amazing :D
Mr.Snuffington;-;The best part of this game is if you can't talk russian, you're not going to understand anyone. 11/10 would be called "" again!
Sir Ham the Wizard;-;I used to hate MOBA`s i played DOTA 2 for 2 hours I now love MOBA`s the only complaint i have is that there is no such thing as a quick game of DOTA i decided to play some dota at 2 in the afternoon, when i finished, it was 3, in the morning, in the year 2097 now all of my family is dead and im trapped in the future HELP ME! Score: 6/10 - a good game
|NeX| katwatcher;-;This game is a lot of fun. If you're new to this game I suggest starting off with passive bots, then easy, then medium, and after you can win a couple hard bot games then I feel you can try out public matches against other human players. Bots and human players play completely differently however. The reason to play bots at first is just to get comfortable with basic builds and to get confident with your hero's ability set. Jumping into public games without any previous MOBA experience will likely result in angry team mates and losing games. I would say this game requires a lot of practice before you really begin to understand any of the heroes. This is why using the random function is quite useful in the humans vs bots modes until you are comfortable with many of the heroes. The biggest downside I can think of to this game is even if you select "English" as your preferred language and choose US East and US West servers, you'll still encounter many team mates that can speak no English whatsoever. When you're ready for public matches, I suggest starting off with the Limited Heroes game mode so you don't get overwhelmed by all the heroes.
RockNRolla;-;Worst game ever. 4 ing idiots in your team every ing time/ 10/10
Hydge;-;Great game, nuh said!
Now What U Little FanStraights;-;totally recommend it fun game if u play dota 1 (frozen throne) u will be like,, this is so much better and totally be addicted to this game :D
!k.;-;If you feel like a team player and if you are competitive, you like challenges, then you are in the right place, but beware of flamers and ragequitters. They can be annoying,and of course, the Trolls! I recommend this game only for players who like challenging MOBA games,for newbies i recommend League of Legends. Edit: The community is getting worse,leavers,feeders,trolls,flamers everywhere....
P:;-;horrible game
!Vi J>CS Case key;-;This game is certainly one of the best i've ever play, just make sure you're in high tier, because the low trench tier is nightmare
Angela-Leakage;-;If you took an  and churned it into butter consistency and put that churned butter  on a piece of toast and served to an old man with cancer. You'd be doing a better deed than showing him dota 2.
Grox;-;What I've learned on DotA: - Europe is United thanks to the same feels against russians; - Europe is United thanks to a miracle, all curse each other; - Russia is not so far from EU West; - Russia is everywhere; - Americans (North & South) can't explain their high ping on EU servers, but they continue to play into anyway; - My family is made up of my sl**ty cheap mother, my missing father who have no name but infinite crimes, my undead relatives (who die hundred times per day); - I will never play as carry or I'll play 5-carries team; - I will always play as supporter or my team will curse me; - All the matches are in the bag for Skywrath Mage; - It's a masterpiece of MOBAs, but the community sucks. What I've wanted to see in DotA: - A team made up of 2 supporters, 1/2 carry(ies), 1/2 initiator(s)/disabler(s); - Another one supporter in my team; - A match without Pudge; - A match with russians who can type English sentences; - Boots of speed (the cheapest boots of the game) in my inventory before the mid-to-late-game phase; - Slippers of agility like an item for a recipe, not like fake boots for a devoted supporter; - Enemy wards when I'm going to deward and to hope for extra gold; - More than 60 gold units per minute; - Dust of appearance, bought by the gankers of my team instead by me; - My Terrorblade arcana item (given by my best friend) on a match vs humans; - A better community;
Sgt. Sarcasm;-;Since I began playing this game, I have become a far less social individual. I've lost friends and a sad excuse for a life, I didn't even notice the passing of my pet. I barely recognize my parents, and viceversa. The last president I remember is Bush, the senior. All in all, great game 10/10
azurezebu;-;Monster time sink....but worth it.
Legitchicken;-;I played it once and I was bad and so I went back to playing competitive minecraft.
Homunculus;-;Such a FANTASTIC MOBA. You will love every minute of the complex, well made mechanics that you can tell took people a long time to create and put love into. Definatly not pay to win. The reason why I said you SHOULDNT play this game is because of the Community. Everyone is a jerk. Lower ranking games consist of horrible people who have no idea what they are doing, so they blame everyone els on the team. THIS IS ALMOST EVERY GAME. These people make it INCREDIBLY hard to move up or learn from your mistakes because the one guy who has a lot of kills but doesnt help the team in any way is yelling at you. Its just amazing how horrible people are at this game, but are quick to judge. My suggestion is to SKIP this game because what ever time, place or day you decide to get on to play this BEAUTIFUL game there will be someone who will put you in a bad mood. The only valid way to play this game is to have a group of friends to play with you. If you are missing even one person you will get someone who doesnt want to help you or the team. Again a FANTASTIC MOBA, it is just littered with its community.
Lovannie;-;Good game, but sucks in community.. Also MMR matching is bad
Ln trng i m gu;-;Nice game
BaelHar;-;Still the best MOBA anyone can play. I was playing Dota when I was in middle school, when I was in highschool, when I was in university and still I am.
Bordellipupu;-;Do you have a fetish for -holes? You do? Well in that case, this is JUST the right game for you! More -holes than you've ever seen before!
Dead Winter;-;This game is just Perfect and balances out everything with Valve working so hard on it
<font face="snap ITC">Zu-Shi;-;try hard to play
Sir_SaboteurCRM;-;This is a delightful game where russians come to America and ruin everything. Also Peruvians decide to join. It is a game where you use one of 100+ heroes to defend your base and destroy the enemy's. This is complicated by many things, such as know-it-alls who think that they have perfect strategies and when they inevitably fail dismally they blame their team. Then there are the afk people who never even spawn into the game. And then there are the russians; they believe that they are perfect players; they are regularly seen in three forms which you will learn to hate, if you come to play dota 2. The faceless void players, the pudge players, and axe players. They will constantly spout curses in russian and blame their team for everything. They will also call GG as soon as first blood happens. Sometimes, they will disconnect because they have lost all hope because one inconsequential death on your team which will ultimately have no effect on the actual game except for a bit of demoralization on the team with the death. But, when they disconnect and abandon the game, their team shall receive one extra gold per second, which frankly, is more helpful than the russian team mate.
Night;-;its best moba ever (without russians .p)
Roy;-;This game has a very good Concept i like how when i am playing it looks like i have my monitor turned off, the brightness in game is great just ask Ray charles. He has the same perception of the game as we do! and last i think the map design is better than league since they put trees that u can cut down by using leaves yes! i said leaves! Alright 10/10 would uninstall again.
kurwaboy;-;Best League of Legends copy out there! It really feels like another game! It is amazing how they have managed to create their own unique heroes, even though they have blatantly copied some parts of League. I feel like the people who think Leauge of Legends is too hard will have a great time in Dota 2, as it is, one of THE best League of Legends copies. I feel its good that other companies realize the potential of games like League of Legends and create their own versions of it!
Rumpelstiltskin;-;This game is awesome
kurwaboy;-;Best League of Legends copy out there! It really feels like another game! It is amazing how they have managed to create their own unique heroes, even though they have blatantly copied some parts of League. I feel like the people who think Leauge of Legends is too hard will have a great time in Dota 2, as it is, one of THE best League of Legends copies. I feel its good that other companies realize the potential of games like League of Legends and create their own versions of it!
Rumpelstiltskin;-;This game is awesome
Ronen;-;,            ,              , , , ,             . ,  Dota 2      .       :        ,    ,            .  ,    Dota     ,     ,    .           ,    .        .   2003-  -  WarCraft 3 Defense of the Ancients       .          .          , -2  .      , Dota      ,   WarCraft 3.          .
telperion;-;Ruined my life. 10/10
Taylor Swift;-;Game is realy good. Everyone should play DOTA 2.
cool.in;-;i want a good offer all the time when i was in trading,.,,
Jewish Goebbels;-;If your looking for a review on this game you've come to the wrong place, but if your looking for an outstanding pie recipe you've come to the right place. Ingredients: 1. 6 tablespoons unsalted butter 2. 1/2 cup white sugar 3. 1/2 cup brown sugar 4. 1/4 cup water 5. 1/4 teaspoon cinnamon 6. 1 pinch salt 7. 5 apples - peeled, cored and sliced 8. 1 pastry for double-crust pie Directions: 1. Preheat oven to 425 degrees F (220 degrees C). 2. Combine butter, white sugar, brown sugar, water, cinnamon, and salt in a saucepan over medium heat. Bring to a boil, remove from heat and set aside. 3. Roll out half the pastry to fit a 9-inch pie plate. Place bottom crust in pie plate; pour in apple slices. 4. Roll out top crust into a 10-inch circle. Cut into 8 (1-inch) wide strips with a sharp paring knife or pastry wheel. Weave the pastry strips, one at a time, into a lattice pattern. Fold the ends of the lattice strips under the edge of the bottom crust and crimp to seal. 5. Pour butter-sugar mixture over top of pie, coating the lattice, and allowing any remaining sauce to drizzle through the crust. 6. Bake in the preheated oven for 15 minutes. Reduce heat to 350 degrees F (175 degrees C), and bake until the crust is golden brown, the caramel on the top crust is set, and the apple filling is bubbling, 35 to 40 more minutes. Allow to cool completely before slicing.
.deadPool;-;This game is a huge waste of time. I love it! 5/5
cool.in;-;i want a good offer all the time when i was in trading,.,,
Sukkkk;-;Are you ready to be a Hero? Best and original MOBA of all. If you are tired of playing half-made games and would like to challenge yourself in an epic battle between 10 heroes, this game is for you. 10/10
ParkHyuHyu;-;one of the best games ever made!
ClickerHeroes;-;Nice MOBA game
A Reliable Source;-;It's a bad game, full of bad people who will yell and scream at you for the slightest error. There's bugs a plenty, clanstackers in pub matches, alt accounts stomping new players in to the dust for  and giggles. Yet I can't stay away from it...
WickedSick;-;I found my love, my girl of my dream ....my future wife .. but i chose dota over her <3
Shark Sempai;-;I hate this game.
Gita;-;I just want to learn this game and people call me noob. LOL
{IG} Refuro;-;Fk this game. I quit.
Xxd3ath_weaponxX;-;the game is too addicting, please save yourself from this free to play game.... leave it alone...i spent over $654.19 on this game things that dota 2 gave me. hate to peruvians, hate to russians, makes me smoke more.. but will still play this game 11/10.
Bringer Of The Tides;-;I recommend this game to anyone that wants to take league of legends and make it harder and more complex. dota 2 makes lol look like trash
Toxic;-;BEST OF ALL MOBA
SnowTheory;-;Blyat! Giff Kotl Mana!
ECTM. Harmony;-;I love dota 2. 10/10. I still have to learn russian better.. I`ve been around MOBA games for 9 years now and this is the first time I`ve really wanted to kill myself with a russian dictionary. This game has offered me : -Carpal Tunnel Syndrome -Hate for other countries. Especially Russia. -Thoughts about why the  other peaople exist. -. -Voice chat fobia. -Intensive hate for other languages other than mine. -Rage, agraphobia, rage, rage, rage, rage, rage, rage. -Rage, violent behaviour near my friends and family. Things i gave to this game: -Money -Love -Rage -Time -Swears in russian language. I thought about all those things when i was in a queue 5v5 all pick.. I hate my life. But know one thing : Never give up on MOBA`s.
Bash Cat;-;Not very fun in my opinion. 2.1/10.
Gr8 Banter m8;-;its gr8 m8 I r8 8/8
SuperSaiyan Invoker;-;Great game
Na'Vi.Dendi;-;i like everything here in dota 2... and please ban the players that hack other account!!! if someone report please always give a action..
Death;-;I'll play just 1 game, just 1 not more than that. *6 hours later* DAMN IT!!! MY MMR!!! I M LOSING MY MMR AGAIN!!! THANKS A LOT GUYS!!! This is a additive game for people who like Dota 2.
dankboy2003;-;this game is officially broken. sucks , eu servers lag like  and have russians in it (every other server is 200+ ping), heroes rarely actually do what you really wanted to, everyone picks zeus, sniper, troll, riki and pa, no one knows how to counter, and if you want to raise your mmr to 2k (for non-moba players, this means play with people who actually know how to play the game) have fun, because most of the community here is  russians, trolls,  and throwers.  this game, dota allstars was better
Gadreel;-;10/10 MOBA games best ever. Dota 2 has infinite possibilities of more than 100 heroes who have 4 or more skills as well and hundreds of items. Each hero has its advantages and disadvantages of each. Icefrog is working properly by conducting periodic updates to balance this game.
DivinePhoenix;-;This game has a multitude of unique heroes and abilities offering people many diffrent ways to play and create their own methods. Although the game takes many hours of playing with bots and getting yelled at by angry players, if you put your time in this game it is very much worth it. I highly reccomend dota 2 for casual, competetive and players with much time on their hands.
DING DING;-;This game is all about the victory. If you play for fun. This is probably not the game for you. But. I gotta tell ya. Winning is fun. And if you're the kind of person who likes to win through outsmarting the enemy, by counter-picking or playing a special play style, then Dota 2 is the game for you. There are 68 different heroes in Dota 2, and not a single one of them has to be played any specific way. for all you want you can go carry Earthshaker, let that Anti-mage be your ward-! There is only one map. But with all these different ways to play, it's a new experience everytime.
Pizza With Benefits;-;- Got drunk. - Was in a solo fight against 5. - Panicked and hit every button on my keyboard. - Got a rampage. - Learnt how to curse in 3 languages. - reported team mate for crying. 10/10 would panic again
onehit10down;-;Heros of Newearth is better, but dota is complete.
BLFL.-=_B3aSt_=-;-;Best game whatsoever so far on my list.... never got bored of it.
Bad Guy Stan;-;Actually installs when you press the ing install button. Doesn't  up your computer. What's not to like?
Fredda;-;This game taught me about the diversity of cultures that our small little corner of the universe offers. Then it taught me to hate them all.
Chrome;-;Side effects include: -Hatred of other humans -Lack of trust in others -Carpal Tunnel -Improved hand eye coordination -A large ego -Weight gain -Weight loss -Confidence -Despression -Extreme Racism -EXTREME RACISM -Increased strategic thinking capabilities -Mushy-brain syndrome -Subconsciously learning a new language -Subconsciously learning to hate the culture of said language -Literally every ailment that is not a transmitable disease 9/10 Doctors accepted this game on their recommendation list, but the tenth was afk
Grizzt;-;It's like roulette; fun until it turns into Russian.
psych0tic;-;Causes anxiety problems, low self esteem, Tourette's syndrome, mood swings, Bipolar disorder, breakdown of relationships, raging erections, racism. Would definitely recommend.
Sentimental Oriental;-;In Dota 2, Not many people speak your language. Not many people play well. Not many people talk nicely. Not many people work as a team. But if you find people that do... You'll have the most fun you've ever had.
Kyubashi;-;And you thought real life was a struggle.
ephir;-;I only played a little but it was fun.
Captain Obvious;-;Things I gave to DotA: 1. Money 2. Time 3. Love Things DotA gave me: 1. Arthritis 2. Carpal tunnel syndrome 3, Hatred of Russians, Mexicans, Spanish, Finnish, and Russians 4. Broken keyboard 5. Broken mouse 6. 9/10 ready 7. Server crashes 8. 4 stacks of Russians in EUW servers on English prefrence settings 9. Ranked matches 10. Free to play but Pay to win games (I.E. - Foreseer's contract, New Bloom 2015) 11. "It's in the bag" spam (especially Skywrath) 12. Multilingual cursing - I guess this is a good thing? 13. Split second math - Reliable/Unreliable gold and gold loss on death vs. Buyback availability - This is good too Essentially - DotA is a greedy woman, but I love her all the same. 11 / 10 would play again
HekaDooM;-;"THE PUB SUPPORT" "Where are wards?" The pub Carry demanded. "I placed them and they were countered" the Support began, "I am trying to juggle giving you complete lane farm, protecting you and harrassing the enemy while saving to buy more, also possibly sentries to remove their-" "UP COUR PLS" the mid hero politely added. "Give Savle" The Carry demanded. "Certainly." replies the support, using the salve on the Carry who subsequently ran headlong into an enemy creepwave. "So where is mek?" the Carry said, after he was ganked due to overextending. The Support died saving him and was treated to a rather enthusiastic series of map pings on his corpse. "Again, having not even enough to buy boots as well as wards, I don't think a 7 minute Mek is viable." The Support replies. "Haha look your level, so low, noob" the Carry retorted. "U have no item xaxa". "Well, jungle gold and experience through stacking and pulling with blocked camps is nowhere near as much as on lane which I attempted to give you, the carry, the priority over." The Carry is subsequently ganked again at the enemy tower, oblivious to the enemy tp that the Support moved away from. "Report Support, usless" The carry cried in allchat, in between mentioning various aspects of the Support's Mother's anatomy. "Instead of reporting and acting like that, why don't you try supporting for randoms sometime instead of instapicking a carry?" the Support asked, as he watched the Carry return to afk-lasthitting lane creeps. "HAH, support is for noskill noobs like you!"
flanadlivv;-;One day, a wise man intoduce me into this game. "it shall protect your virginity, my lad" he said.
TO-RABU;-;most famous on steam
sf;-;good boy take it
mrcat;-;Good Day! to all gamers please invite your friends family or any relatives to Try Dota2 and experience the excitement and gain quality of items in the Collectors Cache and want to continue finding exciting new ways to feature quality community items. Go go! Dota2zens more power!
BiOs-;-;this game is great !
Gyro Hammer;-;Okay 1st,I recomend this game because its amazingness of MOBA , its better than any other MOBA out there and because i have friend that also play it. i usually play DotA2 with my REAL LIFE FRIEND that also play D2. We play for fun and for win, if we lose we just talk to each other about hero combos and never get mad even if a player in our team which is not our friend talking "PUTANG INA MO/ TANG INA BOBO( in SE Asia) or "ANJING BABI...". But i never recomend this game for a beginner player that has no friend that also play, it will become 50% stress, 50% fun ,even if you win ppl who are rude will still talk about your tiniest mistake (E.g: forget to use items or skills). Cause some peoples only play this game for winning and blame every ppl. Sry for my bad english
Bambino;-;well played!
I'ma make you hurt;-;Dota 2... A game that makes you want to throw your keyboard across your room half of the time and makes you jump for joy the other half.
Legitchicken;-;I played it once and I was bad and so I went back to playing competitive minecraft.
Captain Pansy;-;BLYAT IDI NA XUI PIDARAS DOLBAEB WAI YOU NO FARM WAI YOU PLAY DOTA GO PLAY TETRIS EEDIOT
Homunculus;-;Such a FANTASTIC MOBA. You will love every minute of the complex, well made mechanics that you can tell took people a long time to create and put love into. Definatly not pay to win. The reason why I said you SHOULDNT play this game is because of the Community. Everyone is a jerk. Lower ranking games consist of horrible people who have no idea what they are doing, so they blame everyone els on the team. THIS IS ALMOST EVERY GAME. These people make it INCREDIBLY hard to move up or learn from your mistakes because the one guy who has a lot of kills but doesnt help the team in any way is yelling at you. Its just amazing how horrible people are at this game, but are quick to judge. My suggestion is to SKIP this game because what ever time, place or day you decide to get on to play this BEAUTIFUL game there will be someone who will put you in a bad mood. The only valid way to play this game is to have a group of friends to play with you. If you are missing even one person you will get someone who doesnt want to help you or the team. Again a FANTASTIC MOBA, it is just littered with its community.
Chadlingham;-;Fantastic concept perfectly executed. 5v5 wizard chess soccer, with an awesome pro scene.
Eul;-;This game's going downhill with its cosmetics. Game is only fun when you're playing with your friends. Community is terrible. [Fortunately, mute button is available.] Tournaments brings nothing new = "We're out of cool/original ideas... slap in an all star match and a compendium." Wouldn't recommend it if you're new to the genre.
Faker;-;Social life and friendship destroyer.
mrPandarian;-;1781 hrs in fact, this is worse than drugs just runs for your lives
Atrum Regina;-;DotA2 is very much a mixed bag. The game is wonderful when you get into a good game, with opponents and team mates equal of your skill. However, the game is a horrible experience when you don't. And that's the main problem of DotA2. This game has almost 0 infrastructure to support it, to get you into those good games. The most important part, the matchmaking, is utterly horrible and doesn't deliver. Also its is so non-transparent that its impossible to know anything about your game before hand. Valve doesn't seem to care about this which is very problematic. Because without a good drafting the MOBA genre is a horrible experience which degenerates quickly into a flame fest stomp which just sucks. So my conclusion is: Great gameplay when it works but the disastrous matchmaking and drafting severely maims this game. 4/10.
FlatLine;-;its most addictive game ever !!!
RB_BumBum;-;good strategy game.
MFK.Vee;-;Best MOBA ever guys ! u will not go back to lol or hon or any of this crap!! CERTIFIED
RE[V]ENGE;-;awesome and very addictive game............
The Doctor;-;IT IS ONE OF THE BEST GAMES IN THE WORLD
mrPandarian;-;1781 hrs in fact, this is worse than drugs just runs for your lives
Bambam;-;My personal favorite game of all time, you have great chances of becoming addicted to it. It's a MOBA, which stands for Multiplayer Online Battle Arena, meaning 5 randomly selected people of about the same skill will play against 5 other randomly selected people in a game that lasts on average 35 minutes in a big battlefield. You can queue for a game with any number of friends from 1 to 4, no matter what if they're good or not. One of the best things about this game is the fact that absolutely everything regarding gameplay is 100% free. Which means you can play any of the 109 heroes as soon as you start playing, without paying anything. The only things that change between games is your skill level, which goes up as you play. That means you could match an account with 2000 games against an account with no games played in a 1v1 game and the level 1 account would have no disadvantage except being probably way worse at the game than the long-time player. Of course, every game has its drawbacks, for Dota 2 I would say it is the complexity of the game, which is at the same time a good thing for the experienced players, as it makes every game unique. Dota is hard to learn because there are hundreds of different skills and unique interactions between them which can seem overwhelming for the beginners at first, but don't worry, everyone gets good (somewhat) at this game, after you invested some time into it. Another con is the length of a game, because it means you can play if you don't have a lot of time ahead of you. I would suggest having at least 1 hour completely free before you if you want to make sure you won't have to abandon the game, because the length of a game changes every time and there is the occasional person that disconnects to the game and you have to wait for him a few minutes. Overall, I recommend you to at least try this game, because there is a good chance that you will like it. Even if you're like me and you get bored of every game you play after a few hours, I don't think you can EVER get bored of playing Dota 2.
Lax311;-;Its A Really Good Game
The King Of Demons;-;Im The King of Demons ^^
asdf;-;perfect game to make you graduate university! log in, meet russians in every game in every server, give up on dota because of the, go study !
Ln trng i m gu;-;Nice game
<font face="snap ITC">Zu-Shi;-;try hard to play
What's Good;-;worst game i ever played
Yellow Goodbye moonmen;-;This is a very competitive game in which teams of five must compete to defend their respective bases. This game also only bring misery and sorrow to those who play it. My self esteem has been lowered tremendously do to this game. I would recommend it to anyone who has a history of self harm or suicidal thoughts or intentions. After playing this game for a few years now, I often find myself muttering to myself about how imbalanced the game is and that I am going to kill a pre-historic frozen amphibian. I would rate this game a solid IWASTEDMYLIFEONTHISGAME/10
My[A]ss;-;Best game ive played in a while
Lovannie;-;Good game, but sucks in community.. Also MMR matching is bad
Dead Winter;-;This game is just Perfect and balances out everything with Valve working so hard on it
BaelHar;-;Still the best MOBA anyone can play. I was playing Dota when I was in middle school, when I was in highschool, when I was in university and still I am.
Bordellipupu;-;Do you have a fetish for -holes? You do? Well in that case, this is JUST the right game for you! More -holes than you've ever seen before!
azurezebu;-;Monster time sink....but worth it.
MCMXLVIII;-;This game broke my relationships and electronic devices. I recommend it
Lax311;-;Its A Really Good Game
MeremSolomon;-;The gamiest game of all games.
Just random luff ^_^;-;best game if you want to have no life
Sirgeant;-;who will not recommend this game ? TELL ME !!
asdf;-;perfect game to make you graduate university! log in, meet russians in every game in every server, give up on dota because of the, go study !
The King Of Demons;-;Im The King of Demons ^^
Sir_P1zza;-;Amazing game,even with alot of comments talking about how bad the community is and how many russians there are, if you are smart enough,just follow this. Download the game,while it's downloading go to dota 2's guide section and go in top rated in ever. Go to the first guide,which is called Purge's beginners guide to Dota,you suck. And while you read it try and get the way he speaks. He uses alot of small insults to get you into the in game language. As the guide says,do NOT play online matches in the start. Start with the turtorial to understand the buttons and play bot matches. Later you might can ask a few questions on the forum for beginner tips and experienced people to help you kick off. About the people talking other languages,I'm pretty sure blyat is russians for something bads. Tl;dr good game,be polite and nice and you won't get to much .
Io;-;I love this is game
Baus;-;i think it is just complement my badges . However , It is the best game that i've ever played
Emperor;-;I just lost so mush time on this...
ZER0-_-XD;-;Things I gave to DotA: 1. Money 2. Time 3. Love Things DotA gave me: 1. Arthritis 2. Carpal tunnel syndrome 3, Hatred of Russians, Mexicans, Spanish, Finnish, and Russians 4. Broken keyboard 5. Broken mouse 6. 9/10 ready 7. Server crashes 8. 4 stacks of Russians in EUW servers on English prefrence settings 9. Ranked matches 10. Free to play but Pay to win games (I.E. - Foreseer's contract, New Bloom 2015) 11. "It's in the bag" spam (especially Skywrath) 12. Multilingual cursing - I guess this is a good thing? 13. Split second math - Reliable/Unreliable gold and gold loss on death vs. Buyback availability - This is good too Essentially - DotA is a greedy woman, but I love her all the same. 11 / 10 would play again
MFK.Vee;-;Best MOBA ever guys ! u will not go back to lol or hon or any of this crap!! CERTIFIED
RE[V]ENGE;-;awesome and very addictive game............
The Doctor;-;IT IS ONE OF THE BEST GAMES IN THE WORLD
[PR][Razer];-;one of the best game ever ^_^
frozenair;-;one of best multiplayer game when a teamwork strategy become competitive between two team. also people talk on their locale language are normal show in the game.
Bird Machine;-;Don't be disheartened if it's difficult to get the hang of at first. It can be a stressful game at times and it's easy to make silly mistakes, but it's very rewarding. I love that I learn something new every time I play.
FUN;-;I don`t say that the game isn`t good. For the ones who love this game is a masterpice. But for me... I kinda like it but i dont play it. Update: I started to play DOTA 2....And all i can say that is way much better than League of Lesbians...No ofence 10/10 Update of the Update: Its fun its epic its awesome its amaizing and its FREE.
Traficantu' De Sarmale;-;It's a verry good game :)
Ness;-;Can be fun, can be rage-inducing, but always keeps you coming back!
jared from subway;-;This game ruined my life 10/10
Bunkansee;-;I played on EU West, and set my language option to English. I now speak 5 different languages.
THRE3 FOLD;-;The game is a very cool and addictive concept. However, the community is terrible. I would say about 3% of all of the people with whom I've played have not been annoying. 85% of the community on the USEast (yes, American) servers are mexicans that do not speak English which makes it difficult to communicate. 10% are Russian s. 97% of the people feed, have terrible grammar and are all around annoying, stupid and egocentric. The game is fun, but due to the terrible community, I will not play it again.
BumblebeeTuna;-;I hate Dota 2. I hate it with a passion >:( It is not that the game itself is bad - really, it is rather fun (albeit somewhat repetitive given the lack of change in the battlemap - same map, every time. Same hide-spots, same store locations, etc. - though during events sometimes some minor artistic features will be changed). In any case, a simple game as far as setting variety (or lack thereof) goes, but a neat idea. Lots of variation with the heroes, though some are considerably more powerful than others - not the best job balancing them, in my opinion. The problem with Dota 2 is really the community, which is LoL-style atrocious. In all the times I played Dota 2, I met a grand total of 2 friendly people (both in Bot matches). I met a massive number of people who were just downright nasty. Pushy, demanding, immature (not in the fun way), unnecessarily combative. Just unpleasant to work with - not that there ever seemed to be much teamwork in this "team" game. I suspect the atrocious community is why steam added the reporting system, but really that just made things worse. The system is frequently abused, leading to players constantly reporting each other for made up things "just because", or out of bitterness at losing, or because you don't switch (upon their demand) to speaking Spanish/Russian in the English-language-filtered server, etc. This over-reporting wouldn't be an issue if steam actually followed up to see if the reports had any merit (and maybe removed the reporting option from players who constantly sling false accusations) - but from what I've seen there appears to be no such oversight (hardly surprising - there really is no incentive for valve to follow up). Getting reported kicks you into "low priority" matches, which basically means that you have to go up against humans (other players in this awful community) who have also been reported and kicked into low priority. There is a certain number of matches you must play in low priority before you are free to once more play the matches you want (also locks you out of bot matches). There doesn't seem to be any appeals process for this. Oh, you can also get shuttled into low priority for spending "too long" without getting experience. So, if you are playing Techies (one of the heroes) and want to go out and spend a few minutes planting mines, the game may just decide that you have "abandoned" and kick you into low priority. Anyway, I think I've wasted about enough of my time warning you off. It's a free game (last I checked), so I imagine you'll download and play it anyway. Be my guest. Maybe these things won't bother you :)
Jekyll;-;11/10 Would lose temper again. This game has made me a racist against South Americans though so that's no good. Only the ones that play Doto though. H O L Y S H I T I T ' S V I P E R
EG;-;My Grandfather smoked his whole life.I was about 10 years old when my mother said to him, 'If you ever want to see your grandchildren graduate, you have to stop immediately.'.Tears welled up in his eyes when he realized what exactly was at stake.He gave it up immediately.Three years later he died of lung cancer.It was really sad and destroyed me.My mother said to me-'Don't ever smoke.Please don't put your family through what your Grandfather put us through.'I agreed.At 22, I have never touched a cigarette.I must say, I fell a very slight sense of regret for never having done it, because this game gave me cancer anyway.
Deathspank;-;Beware!! Will consume your life
Captain Doge;-;What DotA is for me: Weve recently taken action against one or more players youve previously reported for bad conduct. You have received an additional report submission to use. Thanks for your help in making the Dota 2 community a friendlier place.
g0Dz| :;-;very nice game!
zDytOs;-;I love the game and I am a very old player single tube problems with the MMR because when I started playing Dota 2 I really overpowering the graphics thing I could not can deal much to begin in the Dota 2 and get a result of mmr :(
NeverEnding Story;-;What immediately strikes me about DOTA  to coin a hideously over-used clich  is that it's easy to learn, but difficult to master. It's a phrase oft bandied about, but in this case it perfectly describes DOTA's very simple concept and goals  which take mere seconds to understand  and its phenomenal gameplay variability and strategic depth  which offer enormous scope for skills development. It delivers by doing what every truly great PvP game should do  and that's provide its players with an even playfield to work on, a robust set of rules, and a suite of characters available to all that enable deep and rich tactical play. It's an archetypal sporting construct that ensures fair competition, where winning is all about skill, expertise and experience  and maybe just a little luck every now and then. Many PvP games don't quite do that, and instead enable player advantage through investment of time and/or money. I'm fine with that  in World of Warcraft, my hard-earned top-level gear lets me crush newbies mercilessly. But while rofflestomping nubs after a long day can be fun, there's nothing quite like a system built around player parity to drive the most fierce and rewarding competition. Something that's important to me in PvP is the facilitation of preferred playstyles through character roles, and DOTA ticks that box nicely. In team PvP, I'm most attracted to a support function, and I'm very happy with DOTA's wide array of characters that let me play behind the front-runners, making sure they stay alive. I'm already seeing other roles I want to try too, but for now, it's great being able to learn a game in a role that makes me feel like I'm playing from my core strengths, rather than feeling like a square peg in a round hole. For me, multi-role gameplay makes for varied and interesting play both for pick-up games, and pre-made coordinated team competition. Does the team go all out offense? What about defense? Should the team be balanced, or not? DOTA enables high flexibility in that regard, so it's down to the players to follow through on their tactics, or adapt accordingly. Again, that makes for involving, interesting and fun gaming. It's not just a slug-fest or shooting match: it's more subtle, strategic and measured. Which brings me to the cadence of the game. Some PvP games are frenetic, and require practice simply to attune one's brain to the pace of the action. DOTA 2 does not. While it certainly does have its frantic moments, they are interspersed with quieter periods where you're moving to the next tactical location, or perhaps sitting back to heal or regroup. Having this space to breathe is really enjoyable, and while you have to still keep your guard up to ensure you're not ganked by some stealthy foe, it's generally more forgiving that most PvP games, and gives you plenty of bandwidth to learn, rather than feeling rushed and panicked the whole time. But while the game is generally forgiving, the players are much less so. As with all multiplayer games, the experience of playing with others can be a bit of a mixed bag. Early on I had a few matches where my n00biness got me called out a few times, and seemed to enrage one particular person to the point of apoplexy  probably exacerbated by us losing badly. While I've been PvPing long enough to know that this is part of the landscape, I was nevertheless annoyed that I was playing with people who were clearly leagues ahead of me in terms of ability. Perhaps the matchmaking bands are too broad, but as I've been developing my skills, I have found myself consistently feeling like I'm pegging my team back, and I hate being that guy. Considering appropriate matchmaking is such a fundamentally important thing for multiplayer games, I'm consistently surprised that more effort isn't put into creating a variety of multiplayer options to more effectively smooth new players' transition from bot-practice to human play. DOTA 2's ability to rate players and give feedback is good  but why not have a few more options that perhaps let lower level players play together, let veterans be leaders of teams of newbies, or have a more effective mentoring system. Maybe these things are harder to implement than they seem, but seriously. How hard can it be? PvP matchmaking and tools complaints notwithstanding, DOTA is still a terrific game. When players work together against a similarly skilled team, the result is a dynamic, involving and nuanced tactical battle, and I've definitely had a few great matches  not all of which I've won. But like all pick-up PvP games, there are also frustrating moments where you can get absolutely flattened, or end up stuck in a team with a couple of nutjobs who're off their meds. If those sorts of moments are not for you, then you already know DOTA 2 isn't something you should subject yourself to. But if you're of hearty PvP stock, thick of skin, stoic of nature, and moderately understanding of the human condition, DOTA 2 is a must. It really is a fantastic game.
Feedora;-;Very good game if you don't want to spend to much time playing. Easy way to learn basic Russian.
JDreamer;-;The best MOBA!
Blazing_Knight;-;It's an amazing game - technically outstanding, showing all of Valve's usual polish and attention to detail, especially in the all-important multiplayer aspects.
Gilgamesh;-;I do not recomend this game to you people as the maximum limit of your knowladge capacity is probably too small to cope with this game.
Chimera;-;In most games I play, players lash out at enemies and accuse them of hacking. In this game-like other MOBAS- players will lash out at their teammates and use the report feature as a weapon to get them banned... Oh also players will try to convince the enemy team to also report you to get you banned... Still less toxic than the League of Legends community... Such a shame such beautiful game has such horrible community.
TRN.Pro Troller.;-;best game eu better then leauge of lesbains.
Way Back;-;ready for the booming tech is coming
Eve!;-;best moba game ever all hail doto 10/10 . ruined my life and ruined my wallet .
@Spartanpastic;-;An amazing game, that takes away all of your time and chance of getting married.
Human-Fish Coexistence;-;Just a ripoff of DOTA 1. 0/10.
twoeasy;-;DOTA 2 is a simple tower defense game, with a huge number of unique hero options that give the game great depth and variability! I have never had so much fun with a FREE game! If you like RPG and tower defense, then you are going to love playing DOTA. There is a bit of a learning curve, but I found mastering one character first helped me get over that hump. Then here are only like 150 other heros to master after that....
lbrtle;-;No reason to play any other game now. 10/10
hontrash;-;highly recommended if you want to lose your life
Infernus;-;Great game which has good updates,graphics and modes.However this has small bugs that sometimes mess up your gameplay.Overall its addicting and requires knowledge about the game to play well. Skill comes eventually.
Mr.Yani;-;Ruined my life. 10/10
GoopyQuotient;-;Ruining my life one game at a time in kotol
bruse;-;this game is for fat people. 10/10
Darthmule;-;Very addictive Its animated pieces makes you to feel that so are in a real war and you must fight to protect your king....I am so in love with this game.
Nightmare;-;My loves this  games
Beast Mode;-;Free Russian Language Tutor.
Albaloo;-;Wonderful game. Say goodbye to your life though
[SaS]Jacksoni;-;I hate this ing game.
Boy Ruby Clams;-;This game is ok. Only 22 playable warriors, team death 8 v 8 is fun I guess, this is an okay FPS lots of animals but yeah, you guys should try it, This game is very similar to "Bakugan Battle Brawlers (Video Game)". Also this game has a guest character, the guest character is James Bond, TIP: don't use his knife, it got nerfed in the recent free expansion.
Banruk;-;The public matchmaking is terrible, and the community within is also terrible. However, the game and the pro scene are great.
Pedo Bear;-;i love DOTA! good game and so addictive!
CoOL_GoR;-;Interesting ~
GabeNewellgivesmeaboner;-;THis is a good game, but it could do with a little more cleavage especially in the female and some depending on the character also males. I would recommend it to anyoen who is 12 and likes to rage at new team mates.
Fuck You !!!;-;never !! game is good but ranked match makin sucks all noobs  this game
OnurAir;-;At first I didn't really thought I would like this game because I didn't really played this kind of game genre. So at first I looked at gameplay on youtube and still thought I wouldn't like it. After a couple of invites from a friend I decided to give it a chance and I played it. After a short period I was very exited about the game and now I am kind of addicted... :)
Dden;-;I just want to start with, that this is one of the best games I've EVER played. The first RTS-esque game I ever touched, was Warcraft III. I remember playing it together locally with my big brother and a friend of ours. So my brother, fell for this game; League of Legends, too at the time I was a big fan of the musician with the name of Basshunter. So I had to try LoL too, it was free, what had I to loose? My interest for it. Right away. It wasn't as action-filled, or exciting like the games I played at that time; Minecraft and Call of Duty(sorry). So yeah, I was more the 'FPS-guy'. But about a year later, a friend of mine got a free BETA-copy of the game, Dota 2. He wasn't especially good at it, and probably ruined a game or two for his teammates, though it sure was fun! A other friend of mine got it from him, it was nothing special about it, but after all, they started to play together. A day, when a friend was over on a sleep-over, he had this bunch of copies of the game, so I asked him, might I have one? And he said yes, like it was obvious. Eventhough I only had watched the cinematic trailer(which was damn awesome) and listened to Basshunters song, it felt damn promising. And finally, my to already-playing mates, invited me to play a match. My first hero was Sven. I picked him for his looks, but he was a truly badass character, now Sven is my personal favorite, and best played hero. Well... I suppose the game didn't go so well, and I lost my hopes for it. But a month later, I was back in the track; and I enjoyed every single second of that match. The akward satisfication I felt inside when I was auto-attacking creeps. Now I play Dota 2 alot... ALOT. And I felt since September this year, I've felt that I've learned alot by watching pro-matches, professional players like Purge, and by playing the game in general. Being a pro-player is a target I really want to reach, which I think is worth going for. Dota 2 is a very fun and competetive game that has its up and downs, but is pure entertaintment.
MARKOLOKOY;-;No doubt it is one of the most popular game :)
QuEzkaTvL - SWE!;-;I like DOTA, IN DOTA YOU HERO, YOU FACE MONSTERS AND HEROES; I LIKE THAT AND ITS LIKE A RPG AND STRATEGY - DO YOU LIKE ME?
Confetti Camouflage;-;Dota 2 is a game about getting fat, and whoever is the fattest of them all wins. If your 5 man fat orgy gets fatter faster than the other growing pile of mass on the other side of the map, then when these two hideous blobs of lard collide you'll still have some fat to toss around at the enemy while they scream at each other for not being fat enough. On the other hand when you're both at the weigh in and the other team's got some bigger numbers to boast about, you'll find yourself being smothered, crushed by the fat; it betrays you! They pull you in, absorbing you into their ever growing blob as your teammates are yelling to stop feeding their mass. It becomes increasingly apparent that you are not the fattest of them all, and you start to wonder why you ever started playing Dota 2 in the first place...
AshOWL-RAYA;-;wut de fuq ? a daily activity that cannot be missing for me .
DoYouKnowMe?;-;thiz game is very very awesome!! i like it bcoz thiz game had more strategy, teamwork,... etc :D
EL HALU SIKI;-;googogogo try this one very good and high resolution game good gamers and attitudes credits to the owner
80HD;-;"Stay in the trees"
Hellmo;-;This is by far the best language-learning tool on the internet. In just 7 months, I have learned an ample amount of Russian, Brazilian and Mexican to use in real world situations. I would give this game a 10/10!
Lintel;-;Ahhh.... Dota 2. This game is severaly unbalanced since no matter how well you play, your team will always blame you for the loss. It is also insanely luck based because the team that gets most russians usually looses. A lot of functions in this game are completely broken as well. For example, even if you pick "English" in the language bar everyone still speaks Russian. Sometimes German or French, but never English. Playing this game I had a few mental breakdowns and smashed three windows in total. It sometimes feels like my life is fading away and I imagine life in prison with a really musculine in-mate would provide the same level of . To sum up, this is game is ing terrible. 10/10 would recommend.
Funky;-;dis gmaye is copid solstice arena
Skuli_Sheepman;-;I live in fear of searching for a match, but there's this urging feeling I get that makes me search fot the next match. I continue to do so until I need to cry myself to sleep. The next morning it begins again.
free weekend = free pp = ur free;-;DO YOU HAVE 400 HOURS TO DEVOTE TO LEARNING A GAME AND ASCENDING TO THE FABLED A-RTS COMPETITIVE ? THIS IS THE GAME FOR YOU AT LEAST IT ISNT CASUALIZED LEAGUE OF LEGENDS
Feed master;-;Awesome free play
Morbus_Hansen;-;Nice game for Nice player
RO_AR;-;good game. nice steam..
Dragonborn;-;I THE JARL OF WHITERUN RECOMMEND THIS GAME GO INSTALL IT.
Larry M.;-;If you wish to have fun, a good time, laugh and feel good. DO NOT PLAY THIS GAME. this game have the worst community ever, is addictive, is bad to your health, makes you very very angry, has the worst matchmaking system possible, i don't even drop itens like it used to before. -9/10 do not EVER, EVER PLAY THIS GAME, IF YOU ARE NEW TO MOBA.
Mwd Prince Lay (Nay Min);-;Nice Gamer
Pls;-;Fun game. Played the previous series. Community can be bad at times but deal with it, there are toxic players everywhere.
`PopShuvit;-;awsome game and in game purchases are the bomb
V-07-TR-0N;-;Its like meth, available, cheap ,ruins your life, addictive, everyone does it, and it keeps you up at night. 10 out of ten, best game
Mooni;-;best online game
Gmo;-;Game is fun.
SUKIJAN;-;this game dota 2 is very nice
MOMS GONNA FREAK;-;League of legends is for kids Dota 2 is for me I am kid Would not recommend
Terrorbladder;-;It's a game! :D
LexLevis;-;now dont come and say OMG LOL PEASANT DOTA IS BETTER dota 2 - better graphics lol -way better gameplay (lol will have a visual update soon)
americanski gamburger;-;THE BEST LANGUAGE LEARNING TOOL ON THE INTERNET. LEARN TO SPEAK SPANISH, RUSSIAN AND PRTUGESE FOR THE SMALL PRICE OF YOUR SELF-ESTEEM AND FAITH IN OTHERS. ONE HELL OF A F2P
Sir Lizard The Not in the Game;-;Well let's see... Learn Russian, check. Learn Spanish, check. Break up with girlfriend, check. Kill your sister, check. Kill a hobo, check. Lose 95% of body weight, check. Ruin life, check. Lose faith in humanity, check. Lose trust in everybody, check. Grow a beard, check. I guess the only downside of this game that I grew a beard and now I'm too lazy to shave. 10/10, really good game, with best community ever.
MR. POTATO;-;dont play this game, its ruining my life
Assassin;-;pls valve remove this game from arabic regions pls , pls , pls ! cuz arab r  in this game bad than russians !!
Valiantttt;-;In my opinion DOTA 2 is the best MOBA, being the offical succesor to DOTA and having a deep meta-game+mechanics that changes now and then. Valve game too so the quality is pretty much assured and the free to play model is just superb. All heroes unlocked no paywall, you don't have to pay for anything expect cosmetics and tournaments. Some tournaments are free to watch(MLG and International). It has some flaws including the community but that is an issue that cannot be fixed and I would recommend to everyone who wants to play a MOBA/is currently playing a MOBA. Almost perfect but with room for some improvements.
KapitoIIIka;-;ruined my life
Yuka;-;dota 2 is my life since i play this game make me addict
PugLord;-;It's like meth except you don't quit college to try and become a proffesional meth addict.
alucard;-;Great game if you want to experience cancer first hand.
Luminarius;-;This game is insanity. At the time of this writing, I've played hundreds of games spanning about a thousand hours. I've murdered innocent creeps for their wallets, drank alone from a bottle by a river, been screamed at in languages I couldn't understand and, in general, have made more mistakes than a fledgling Emperor Penguin in Polar Bear infested Waters. Yet, I'm still playing. This game is incredibly hard. This game can be incredibly rewarding. This game can make you scream at your best friends and question your deepest seeded belief systems. I'm still playing, because one day I'll stop making so many mistakes. One day, my team will be fully able to speak english. One day, GabeN will rise up, the skies will part and all with be laid forth in glory and splendor. And then, only after the skies have lit up and my rares have been nearly depleted, my winrate will finally reach .. 50:50.
Johnny Hitler;-;IS IT THE SHOES?!!!!
Sinkobrat;-;The Best Game
FREE KEYS ! FREE KEYS ! FREE KEY;-;i liked this game because of the stunning graphics but i dont like is some of the other players is useless or noob :(
MozyHearts;-;the best game ever...
Osama bin Laden;-;Simply, SUCKS
Pictures of This Frog;-;Please help I can't stop playing
Dran;-;I have clocked in about 250 hours on this bloody game, and still I feel unqualified to review it. What has been my Dota experience thus far? 50 hours vs bots, to sort of get the idea what the game is about. Going into pub matches to get yelled out to realize YOU KNOW NOOOOTHING EEEEEDIOOOT! OMG LINA Y U KS. GET MORE WARDS OR REPORT. REPORT MY TEAM ALL NOOBS LOL FEEDING. ALT+F4 UNINSTAL NOOB! 250 hours of this sh*t and I only know how to play 5 heroes. WTF ICEFROG WHY U SO MEAN. I do recommend you play this with some friends, it will make the russians and a*sholes more tolerable. . I read somewherre that Dota is like the most disfunctional relationship ever, its like having a bipolar GF and some nights are the worst ever with nothing but hate yelling and throwing sh*t against the wall, but sometimes, SOMETIMES the sex is SO great, that when it is you HATEF*CK THE SH*T OUT OF DOTA and its the best damn feeling in the world. IN THE WORLD. So yeah. That about sums it up.
GraveKeeper;-;nice game. very addict
aToMeN TaRo;-;I love this game!! Haaaa.... I still wait a BOOMER means Techies. haha
Abeeengkat;-;I play dota since when i was grade 6, I play this game more than 4 years already. I start in dota 1 - dota 2.
BattlekinG;-;im having fun with this game.
Always;-;it's a pretty addictive game and it was not juz like that it had ever been mentioned... it was never a game but a war
HXG.Dark_Mazterzz_30;-;I REVIEW THIS
322;-;IN MOTHER RUSSIA  MEANS . IN PHILLIPINES PUTANG INA MO MEANS YOUR MOTHER IS A
[K]iss of [D]eath;-;Be a good player xD.
Seraphix;-;Great game. Has a learning curve, but with time Dota 2 will outshine other similar games. Able to pick all heroes from the start. Pay for cosmetics that don't have any effect on skill/ability.
BEASTMODE;-;yes,i will reccomend this game!
Warpath;-;100% legit free to play too!?!? Yes people are s in Dota, but they're s everywhere on the internet. Just mute them and indulge in the fast paced, action packed strategic gameplay that is Dota.
-Ayeshia^;-;the best game ever
23.03.1999;-;Amazing strategy game! Ever since I played this games, I had made many new friends. Trading makes this game even more fun, we can also earn money by playing around with the market. Graphic and gameplay is really nice.. Well, that's all that I have in mind.
[Index];-;I looked up the wikipedia page on psychological abuse and DOTA fits it almost to the letter. 10/10 Emotional and mental abuse. This game will keep you from meeting social obligations. Enjoy meeting people from around the world as they all cuss at you in various languages, including Spanish and Russian. But that shouldn't really be a problem since team communication is almost nonexistent. If you play willingly play support you are 1/10 in the game almost always, even if they have support on their team they'll go semicarry at the minimum. Enjoy your stay, , Game is hard, noob, they gave diretide, trading keys, you forgot to ward again, dont buy boots first
xXMactariusXx;-;i am a noob but it seems really fun!
Suspicious Stalker;-;ing worst game ever ing made. 1100+ hours into this ... Before you install this game wonder, do you have a furture? Because this game will completely destroy your life. Its like cocaine that is free, and in front of your face all day. I can't get into any other game because this the only game I will ever need.  this 10/10
AshOWL-RAYA;-;wut de fuq ? a daily activity that cannot be missing for me .
DoYouKnowMe?;-;thiz game is very very awesome!! i like it bcoz thiz game had more strategy, teamwork,... etc :D
EL HALU SIKI;-;googogogo try this one very good and high resolution game good gamers and attitudes credits to the owner
Poffy;-;I like playing support because I enjoyed getting yelled at and bossed around.
kd;-;BEST GAME WILL EVER MADE AND WILL STILL BE THE BEST EVER
Muerto;-;Great game,a lot of fun and a place where u meet a lot of russians :)
Fatwest;-;Dota is my faourite game, but I am still a noob
Mativicus;-;Best game I have ever got sucked into i don't see myself stopping anytime soon. and with the massive pricepoint I don't see why any shouldn't try it.
Hexad L. Koala | KALAU ADD KOMEN;-;I LOVE THIS GAME
LS| A Friendly Spoon;-;I got this game for free because my friend gave it to me. I played it once and never played it again, it was absolute . But that's not the reason here I'm writing this review. I'm writing this review because this ing games constant updates, constantly crash my ing computer, I just went to go play g-mod and then out of no where the game starts updating, friendly reminder I don't even play this ing game, it's just sitting in my library. So the game starts updating and then I get a skype call because I want to talk to my friends while I play gmod, then skype crashes, then gmod, then everything ing else, while steam stays up, while this ing game slowly, very slowly updates.  game, and if you own it and don't play it, uninstall it. 0/10.
80HD;-;"Stay in the trees"
Hellmo;-;This is by far the best language-learning tool on the internet. In just 7 months, I have learned an ample amount of Russian, Brazilian and Mexican to use in real world situations. I would give this game a 10/10!
DKII;-;One of the most addicting games out there. Valve comes through with this massive multiplayer game that Steam users should all have on their play list. I absolutely LOVE DOTA2!
CemeteryGames;-;Ruins my life 10/10
721 Rubysnatchers;-;Awesomenauts rip-off 10000RP/10
L2FTD;-;awsome game!!
Lintel;-;Ahhh.... Dota 2. This game is severaly unbalanced since no matter how well you play, your team will always blame you for the loss. It is also insanely luck based because the team that gets most russians usually looses. A lot of functions in this game are completely broken as well. For example, even if you pick "English" in the language bar everyone still speaks Russian. Sometimes German or French, but never English. Playing this game I had a few mental breakdowns and smashed three windows in total. It sometimes feels like my life is fading away and I imagine life in prison with a really musculine in-mate would provide the same level of . To sum up, this is game is ing terrible. 10/10 would recommend.
Your tears;-;Used to to enjoy real life, but then i discovered dota 2. 10/10
Salty Satoru;-;Its a good game, but its no Cory in the House.
RaptorSexologist;-;Got yelled at in Russian,learned some Russain, found out my mother is a , found out that I am an imbecille and that I like  and that also I should kill myself. All in one match. 11/10 Best game ever , would buy if it wasn't free
Amal257;-;Dear viewers, Have you played League Of Legends? Did you love the game? Well, In that case Dota 2 might be the game for you! It's a free to play game with lots of items and lots of heroes. So go download it here on steam and try it out!
BanShee;-;Awsome Free Game I like This ;)
Linklunar;-;dIS m dat 90% of your broNIEEE as  fwiends play and ur frwendsssss dad pway dis r alL fegets 0/10 woonscoape wos bettwuah gaym
I Survived.;-;Game is good , but server is bad currently.
Ange <3;-;Awesome game i recomend this game to anyone
Da'C__IC IR A Z Y;-;I enjoy the game the Competition the friendly fun I reccomend the game to anyone who wants to throw their lives away and only Live for either the Dire or the Radiant of course the choice is never really yours it is decided for you much like your fate if you spend one hour on this game you will never stop playing! But I like it but hell who am I?!
Paragonsolstice;-;So you look at this game's store page and you're like "This looks like a fun game." So you download it and start it up. So you play a few games against bots and have fun, a few more against bots but with real people on your team. You're thinking "Wow this is a real fun team building game!" But you aren't ready to be up against real people you think so after training for a month and getting over a hundred hours played you think you're ready. You put down your prefrences: US West Server, English speaking people only, and you hop into a game. After six minutes you find a game (finally!) and after loading into the game you see your teammates' names.   38, ,  , and  . "Well those aren't English at all" you think to yourself, Your enemies all have English names though. Anyway into the game you go, 3 of your teamates go middle, 1 goes bottom and you are at top, there is no courier by the way. The 3 at mid are arguing in some language you don't understand and the one at bottom is afk. Within 10 minutes your team's T1 and T2 towers are gone, the enemies' towers aren't touched also   has just abandoned for being afk and in a few short minutes the others will abandon leaving you to be killed multiple times. The people on the other team are saying "I feel bad for you son" and other such things. After you lose you try another game, thinking that this one will be different. It's not. you try again and again look for a game that you aren't matched with foreign speakers that are terrible or you win so quickly and easily it's boring. But you never do, and you can't quit now you're to deep in. You've caught the bug, can't stop playing, you are devoted to finding that one game that isn't a disapointment, will you ever find it though? probably not. all in all it's a good game 10/10 would reommend.
Seniorwhopperpants;-;ruined life.... 10/10 would ruin life all over again
pOWpOW;-;this game is fun and interesting to play, definitely recommned to my friends :)
ikemfuna Cashforgold Long shlong;-;Needs more sandvichies -420/69
Phreshchains;-;league of legends is way better!
Wafflepants;-;Because LOL is gay and for noobs :P
tn5421;-;This game is totally free, meaning that you have to pay nothing to get the full experience. Also, there are better items to find than just some dinky old hats from Team Fortress 2. If you aren't going to do anything productive anyway you might as well earn some items that you can trade.
Nigga Cuh;-;This game sucks like ya mother !!
~sBm2.|Sicko;-;A very good game
koldof;-;Dota 2 [en.wikipedia.org] Dota 2 (Defense of the Ancients or DotA),, and colloquially as Dotes, doto, all-stars, dotage, dodo, dato, and other names, is an MOBA analgesic synthesized by Eul in 2003, found in WarCraft 3. Dota itself is an active drug, but it is also converted into rage in the body. === Recreational use Defense of the Ancients 2, almost always still called by its original trade name of Dota 2 in non-tournament settings, is used as a recreational drug for the transcendent relaxation and intense euphoria it induces. Proplayer Dendi once described Dota as "the perfect whatever drug." Tolerance develops quickly, and users need more of the drug to achieve the same effects. Its popularity with recreational drug users, compared to League of Legends, reportedly stems from its perceived different effects. In particular, users report an intense rush, an acute transcendent state of euphoria, which occurs while farming is being converted into items and levels in the game. Some believe that Dota produces more euphoria than other MOBA's upon launch; one possible explanation is the presence of Denying, a mechanic unique to Dotaa although a more likely explanation is the euphoria of carrying. While other MOBA's of recreational use produce only anger, Dota also leaves satisfaction, also a psycho-active mechanic. However, this perception is not supported by the results of clinical studies comparing the physiological and subjective effects of Dota 2 and morphine in individuals formerly addicted to MOBA's; these subjects showed no preference for one MOBA over the other. Equipotent doses had comparable action courses, with no difference in subjects' self-rated feelings of euphoria, ambition, nervousness, relaxation, drowsiness, or sleepiness. === Adverse effects Like most MOBA's, unadulterated Dota does not cause many long-term complications other than dependence and constipation. Intravenous use of Dota (and any other game) with non-sterile playing conditions and uncrontrolable rage may lead to:  Abscesses  Physical dependence can result from prolonged use of all MOBA's, resulting in withdrawal symptoms on cessation of use  Decreased kidney function === Withdrawal Symptoms may include: sweating, malaise, anxiety, depression, akathisia, priapism, general feeling of heaviness, excessive yawning or sneezing, tears, rhinorrhea, sleep difficulties, cold sweats, chills, severe muscle and bone aches, nausea, vomiting, diarrhea, cramps, watery eyes, fever and cramp-like pains and involuntary spasms in the limbs. === Prescription for addicts The UK Department of Health reccommend immediatly turning off your computer as people who leave it on have almost a 60% return rate to the game. In 2012, Switzerland began a trial Dota maintenance program for users that had failed multiple withdrawal programs. The aim of this program was to maintain the health of the user by avoiding medical problems stemming from the use of Dota 2. The first trial in 2012 involved 340 users, although enrollment was later expanded to 1000 based on the apparent success of the program. === Overall 10/10 Would play again
Xiaoykins;-;Defence Of The Ancients Russians 2 That's how this name should be called.
Ryan;-;If you can't afford to purchase cocaine to lighten up your weekend then DOTA 2 is the next best thing! Highly addictive and as equally life destroying as any drug, DOTA 2 will make you question your own sanity and send you on a spiralling quest about what the meaning of life actually is (answer could be DOTA 2). If you can't speak Russian then DOTA 2 will enable you to become fluent in the language but only if you put some effort in yourself. This means that holiday to Russia you've all been wanting will be like visiting home, rather than a foreign country. Learn great words like "" and "" and repeat them to your new friends! I've never felt more free than when I play DOTA 2, I'm sure my life span decreases every time I play it so what's not to love! Go buy it now for free and ruin your life! Play with friends so you can venture the darkness together! 11/10 must buy, very win.
Yume;-;If you like flaming to those idiot russian players dota 2 is the correct game for you
( . ) ( . );-;great strategy game
Carry Maker;-;this is my favorite game
IamBILGE;-;protip: if you are not english, play on an english server. It will guarantee victory. Jk its a great game. :)
FOAD.Mr Swagve;-;Good game well played!
De e s nas;-;This is a game for those who have microskills...
BE;-;Delete this game or you will get addicted, i'm already stuck with this game.
n a  e;-;a very good game but ... Dont play it and dont even try it .. it is like a black hole that will waste your time and your life
DOTR.Pete;-;10/10 This game will consume your life and your soul. I' m not even good at it yet.
Mr.INRISEV;-;Free to play
Alastaircell;-;Free russian language learning tool.
3R1C;-;I don't play often, but when I do... Low Level Matchmaking FTW! Listen, for a free game, DOTA is where it's at.
DeathCookies_omnom;-;Excellent game play, well balanced and incredibly fun. Cash items do not affect gameplay and are only for aesthtic purposes only. Everyone has an equal chance of getting items of differing rarity. Very good, definitely recommended and much better compared to League of Legends in my opinion
Syn` Cokaine Cowboy;-;I love this game... getting ready to hate yourself in the process.
Rogue;-;One of the greatest online games I've played
Classy Jazz Man;-;If you want to make friends from exciting countries like Russia, Brazil, and Philippines then this game is for you.
DragScope69;-;Not pretty old player, but I'm still wondering how sutch a great game is offered for free. and most important that whats sold are items that don't affect the gameplay or offer unfair disadvantage if at all. Overall great great team game.
[Jmelt] Nick the Goldfish;-;This game will teach you about life. It will teach you about the futility of being an individual, unable to cause real change. It will teach you that no matter how hard you try, if the people around you screw up it will fall on you and you will be blamed for it. It will teach you that everyone expects to get the spotlight and leave you in the dark. It will teach you many, many things. It will also make you hate Russians. And... Well, just about anyone who doesn't speak your language. Your life will never be the same. You are not ready. Run while you still can. It's too late for me... 100/10 would play again.
Silver "Ice Cold" 3000;-;i have no clue what the  im doing lol
Thanks for everything, Iwata.;-;I liked Russians. A lot. I now hate Russians. A lot.
Dnte;-;If you like challenges and a very nice community that will not kill you if you die first. Then... This game is for you! You would enjoy the active community and the players community aswell. Gotta try it!!~
Nick;-;Dota 2 is hard, but there's a huge reward for those who commit. On the surface, the game is a like-for-like reproduction of the genre-creating (and still updated) Defense of the Ancients modification for Warcraft III, now transferred into Valve's Source engine. The game's punishing design is sometimes enough to drive you up the wall, but it's worth sticking the hours in: success in Dota 2 is about learning to effectively juggle both the broad strokes and finer details. If you're not aware of the basics of the burgeoning MOBA genre, two teams of five players spawn on corners of a map. Each team needs to work together with the goal of ultimately destroying a central structure--in Dota 2's case, the Ancient--in the opposing team's base. With most games lasting around the 40-minute mark, and occasionally edging past an hour, watching the enemy fortress dramatically crumble and sink to the ground feels like an exhilarating payoff. Aiding these two teams, named the Radiant and the Dire, are waves of AI assistants, called creeps. Batches of creeps spawn at 30-second intervals and charge merrily up the map's three pathways. In the clumps of remaining land lies a jungle, where numerous AI opponents spawn, offering lucrative benefits to players who take them on successfully. Finally, and in a bid to stop both teams from simply marching into one another's base, each team gets three powerful towers on each lane that easily shred through enemy players at the start of the game. Your individual ability to control and affect the rhythm of the game comes from how well you handle your hero. You mostly control a single unit in Dota 2, though there are exceptions: some heroes can summon controllable allies, such as bears, gargoyle babies, or wolves; one exceptionally versatile hero can split into three; and one item lets you take control of certain creeps. For each rule in Dota 2's impressive house-of-cards design, there's usually at least one character who completely ignores it, or finds a way around it via one of 130-odd items available from the in-match shop. For instance, try negating magic attacks with the black king bar, returning damage with the blade mail, or pounding out two ultimate abilities in quick succession with a refresher orb. The aim for most players is to accumulate as much gold and experience as possible, with income being delivered mostly by scoring the killing blow on enemy creeps and players. It's almost always easier to gang up on stray enemies as a group, which is why it's rarely a good idea to run about on your own. Then it's a case of splashing all your hard-earned money on some ultra-powerful items from the shop, while levelling up your base stats and abilities, and then clobbering the enemy team into submission via a few five-versus-five team fights. Rarely does it feel that simple, however. At the time of writing, 102 of the original Dota's 112 heroes have made their way into the sequel. Each hero has a handful of unique abilities and generally works best in a specific role, such as supporting other players as Omniknight, roaming around the map looking for opportunistic kills as Spirit Breaker, or evolving throughout the course of the game into an all-powerful vehicle of carnage and destruction as Phantom Assassin. There's only one map, unlike in many other MOBA titles, although Valve has not ruled out the addition of more over time, and has previously offered game-changing modes with seasonal events at Halloween and Christmas. But Dota 2's single sprawling map sets itself apart from the competition by being larger, more intricate, and packed with greater detail than the rest of the genre. Unlike in League of Legends, the jungle area is riddled with far more tangling pathways, the lanes feature additional shops selling exclusive items, and savvy players are given more opportunities to use the environment to hide, flee, and ambush their opponents. There are multiple layers of additional information that become increasingly relevant as you invest more time in the game. How do you effectively divide your forces? When should your team attempt to vanquish Roshan, the map's most powerful creep? What are runes? What's the significance of the fact that creeps get slightly stronger every seven and a half minutes? Often the game's dizzying scale is seen as off-putting or simply too complex, but the truth of Dota is that it can be entertaining as a new player to just sit down and let all those extraneous factors play out around you. Getting down to the brass tacks of the game with a group of like-minded friends is a lot of fun: start by buying your characters' recommended items, try your best not to get caught out of position, and get into the habit of buying observer wards. And watch out for Riki. As you'd expect from Valve, this is a beautifully presented game, with the Half-Life and Portal maker running victory laps around its competition in terms of UI, voice acting, and showing how to deftly add real personality to its characters. Only recently has the developer turned its attention to gently easing new players into the proceedings, however, and even now, mastering the basics feels like learning to swim by jumping in at the deep end. Efforts are being made to remedy this, though: right now there are a couple of tutorial levels, some well-designed AI bots, and a newbie playlist that restricts hero selection to just 20 of the most frequently picked characters. And with community-created hero guides now built directly into the game itself, Dota 2 is much easier to get started with than it has been in the past. Play a match every evening for a couple of weeks, and you start to see how Dota 2's wealth of disparate systems and mechanics combine into their own harmony, and you begin to understand how there are hundreds of elements that affect the game. Dota 2 is a tense war of accumulation and attrition. The biggest problem, which is coincidentally where the real excitement of the game lies, comes from struggling to process and interpret dozens upon dozens of mitigating circumstances while simultaneously trying to keep your cool. It is a complicated and exhausting game, and for the first few weeks, it's challenging just keeping up with the general rhythm of a match. But invest enough time into Dota 2, and you develop an almost unconscious ability to keep up with the game--performing actions such as sending the slightly fiddly in-game courier over to the faraway "secret" shop to get some rare items, for instance. After a couple of hundred hours of Dota 2, what once felt like spinning plates just happens automatically. Late-night Skype calls, drawn-out conversations down at the pub, and lost lunch breaks follow. Very few games can withstand so many emotionally charged discussions. When everything goes south, the psychological toll can be surprisingly intense, and this is very much a game with the power to both start and end close friendships. Dota 2 is an overwhelming, intoxicating, and emotionally dangerous game that can quite easily take over your entire gaming life. While Dota 2 has transferred the core of the original Dota into a cleaner, modern engine, the fact remains that losing is uniquely painful. Death in Dota 2 not only gives your opponent money, but robs you of some of your own and leaves you waiting up to a minute to respawn. By the time you've trudged back across the game's massive map--or spent money on a teleportation scroll--your opponent is now stronger and richer. Die two or three times in quick succession, which is easily done, and a match of Dota becomes a painful experience where you spend the next half hour getting bullied by an increasingly superior enemy. Other games in the genre have tried to mitigate this punishment, but Dota 2 positively revels in its complexities. The rich just get richer.
K!lLua^^;-;Nice game
Mr.Tactical;-;Do not download this game waste of tme if you ask me. If you are a Magic-Gamer then get it otherwise its a waste of time.
Jo;-;Dear God. I can't stop thinking about this game. I really like it, and yet the toxic community actually makes me hesitant to play it. It's a miserable existence, let me tell you. It doesn't help that the matchmaking system is completely broken (I know I suck at the game. Why am I not getting matched against other people who suck? Instead I get matched against the same three man trilane three games in a row.) It also doesn't help that the language filter is really more of a suggestion. And yet, when everything is working...When you're playing with friends who all speak the same language and you're matched against a team of equal skill...The game is incredible. Strategies are complex, customization is deep (and cosmetic only,) heroes are varied. The game's true form is one of beauty. Or maybe I just have Stockholm syndrome. Would I recommend? Eeeehhh....The game: Yes. If you can find a way to keep the MM system / language suggestion system from giving you a heart attack and/or stroke, it's a lot of fun. If you can't, you'll die. PLAY IT IF YOU DARE.
EliHbK;-;Full of bugs, but it is good.
Mo0dL3sS;-;Nice game
John;-;This game is so good, like so gooooood, that i don't play it. Don't buy it. TETRAO
beszac;-;Awesome game, go select the russian region for the best time of your life.
Magina Stormrage SF49;-;Dota is the most exciting online game .
NSA (idling);-;This game sucks; you'll love it.
haha;-;best gaem ez learn russia language with good, nice, skilled and helpful russian teammates ^.^
Jenducky;-;Very addictive
Hush;-;Flamers. Russians. s. Flaming Russian s. 10/10
Meichen Lie;-;good game, can earn money with play game.. thanks steam, thanks valve
Rey;-;This game will make you hate every Russian, Spanish and Portuguese you meet, it also cause paranoia, down syndrome, dysautonomia, yellow-nail syndrome and it  your friendship. Also, you have a hero that gives cookies. Best moba ever, 11/10 would buy, it's gud srsly gg ff
SAO.Danielck5;-;this
joloppo;-;Really bad and addicting.
Narcissistic Pepe;-;10/10 would not recomend
Drako;-;Far too easy. I prefer another game, known as League of Legends(abbreviated LoL) I find LoL requires much more skill and is overall a better experience.
Da Poopy Njgger;-;good game if youre a dumb spic that cant speak english
{HONK}DucksNbutts;-;Felt like giving Dota 2 a try and like most other Moba games it's very addicting. I played a fair amount of the game as well as going through training. The heros were interesting and had a lot of diversity. Selecting the lane you preferring in hero select was a nice feature. That's the end of the good things I have to say about the game. Now for the bad. Still full of bugs. No good information on how to cancel auto buy resulting in odd issues with UI which you can't tell if it's a bug that prevents you from buying things and putting a large item icon on your screen. An insane amount of leavers during games. Then when you attempt to disconnect when it's safe, taking minutes for it to give you the disconnect screen. Region ques seem to be a joke. Always selected just the two North American ques and one in three matches getting multiple people who do not speak English. Pretty rediculus when this is supposed to be a game where you need to communicate with your team. This is also in addition to the very long que times. More time spent in que today then actually playing the game. This ultimately made me quit playing in digust. Summary- +Some great heros with unique abilities. +UI has great features when they work correctly. +Drop system that keeps you wanting to play. -Worst community I have ever had the displeasure of playing with. -Que times far too long. -Picking a region to play in doesn't seem to matter. -Though it's out of beta, still a large amount of bugs. -Training system needs some work.
Let's win team ^_^;-;Literally the most  MMR system ever created. I should literally be 7k but my literally  Peruvian teamates of Russian descent literally lose me every game literally keeping me down to 2k. Literally wtf Valve.
Darth Revan;-;Play LoL instead
Butch;-;Meh, dota 1 was better. Can't even beat LoL in streaming views even when it has a massive championship lol.
Butch;-;Meh, dota 1 was better. Can't even beat LoL in streaming views even when it has a massive championship lol.
Smug Anime Girl;-;Its alright
Midas;-;Tutorial lasted about an hour and 30 minutes and when I finally got in to a game I got stuck in a fart cloud and insta-killed by pudge.
Nic Cage Superman;-;click click click click click clickclick click click top tower go go click click click
satin666;-;If you hate having fun, this is the game for you!
Necronox;-;Best moba out there. I played dota first, then lol for 1,5 years, but when dota 2 came out, i swtichted to it. No regret at all, balanced, hardcore gaming. A real challange.
Chosen one;-;It will take every second of your free time, and that will never be enough. Totally recommend .
Abo Soub;-;Its the most well made geme ive ever played and it gaved me a uniqe experience that i didnt had in most of the games of its kind .
Bricktop;-;I love DOTA 2. It has quickly become my most-played game on Steam and I feel like I've barely scratched the surface of all there is to experience in it. Despite being limited to one map, the game still feels extremely large and always offers a brand new challenge with every match. With so many heroes to choose from, and so many crazy combinations for teams, I have a feeling that I'll still be learning the basics of this game for a long time coming. I can't write a DOTA review without mentioning the competitive aspect of the game. I'm a huge fan of esports, and have been following various scenes since 1997. I've watched the production values of these scenes increase slowly throughout the years to the point where there is enough media coverage and hype to reach nearly anyone. With DOTA2, I feel that things are taken to a whole new level. The in-game interface itself makes it very easy to view the latest big tournaments and watch them live from within the application WITH commentary. You can watch the games using a guided camera, or you can take control of the camera yourself and track your favorite player, all while the commentary is running in the background to give you constant updates of the action. It's phenomenal and it's another big reason why I'll be playing this game for years. In short, yes you should definitely give this game a try. No doubt about it.
3R1C;-;I don't play often, but when I do... Low Level Matchmaking FTW! Listen, for a free game, DOTA is where it's at.
DeathCookies_omnom;-;Excellent game play, well balanced and incredibly fun. Cash items do not affect gameplay and are only for aesthtic purposes only. Everyone has an equal chance of getting items of differing rarity. Very good, definitely recommended and much better compared to League of Legends in my opinion
I SPEAK UNSULLIEDLY.;-;Play with me . I'll try to make us win :D
BubbleWrap;-;This game is one of the best game I've ever played. Once you can taste the victory of winning, you'll starve for more///
PeninsulaKilla;-;This is a game
@ProSikit Probiotic;-;prosikit only can play this
Lemelak;-;A, THIS GAME IS FUN AS . THERE'S DRAGONS N' . ING DRAGONS. IF THAT DOESN'T SELL YOU ON THIS GAME MAYBE THE FACT THAT WHEN YOU KILL ANOTHER A THEY IN MAKE IT RAIN GOLD ALL OVA' YO , SON. BUY THIS . WAIT...ITS FREE. DOWNLOAD THIS  AND BUY IT. DON'T CARE HOW, JUST DO IT.
realEE.;-;Failed a ton of exams because of this game. 10/10 Will play again. at least I know a few words in russian! edit: '14.02.25 Supports not buying sentry wards to counter Riki. Riki gets fed. I get cancer. 11/10 Would play against snowballed Riki again.
Grovesimus;-;Dota is a competitive game of action and strategy, played both professionally and casually by millions of passionate fans worldwide. Players pick from a pool of over a hundred heroes, forming two teams of five players. Radiant heroes then battle their Dire counterparts to control a gorgeous fantasy landscape, waging campaigns of cunning, stealth, and outright warfare. Irresistibly colorful on the surface, Dota is a game of infinite depth and complexity. Every hero has an array of skills and abilities that combine with the skills of their allies in unexpected ways, to ensure that no game is ever remotely alike. This is one of the reasons that the Dota phenomenon has continued to grow. Originating as a fan-made Warcraft 3 modification, Dota was an instant underground hit. After coming to Valve, the original community developers have bridged the gap to a more inclusive audience, so that the rest of the world can experience the same core gameplay, but with the level of polish that only Valve can provide.
P6;-;Very Nice Game!!!!
Mega Morph;-;Best Game I've EVER Played.
NoT_Today;-;Learn Russian in only 3 games best free guide in the world, there is also dota, which is nice... :3
Lancelot;-;A great game!
Hotdog Joe;-;Alright lets get this  straight forward I ain't gonna sugar coat it. This game is the best if you have the patience and tolerance, if you do not you will be  and uninstall but you will be back. On the brightside however if you wanna learn a foreign language this  is better than ing Roseta stone. I'm talking russians and mexicans out the  its unbelievable. Believe me you will at all times have at least one russian or mexican on your team at all times. In a group of five? Well that just means that one of your friends isn't who they say they are. They are most likely a russian/mexican it could even be you. So all in all i find it to be enjoyable if you have tolerance at an 8/10 Before you download this game however. It is very important you look deep inside yourself and ask the most important question in your pitiful life. Que hora es?
Romanian Vibes;-;THE BEST LANGUAGE LEARNING TOOL ON THE INTERNET. LEARN TO SPEAK SPANISH, RUSSIAN, AND PORTUGUESE FOR THE LOW PRICE OF YOUR SELF-ESTEEM AND FAITH IN OTHERS 10/10
TH3M@NYF@C3DG0D_ZA;-;Dota 2 is an awesome game, there is just a few bugs to sort out. the ar and sd modes are a bit un-balanced.
clone of the deep;-;awesome graphics awesome gamplay better then league of legends
KaliburX3;-;If you are looking for a MOBA I would highly suggest you download this Game as it is sequel to one of the best and one of the first MOBAs ever and unlike other Free to play MOBAs with this one you are not required to pay for other heroes/champions you start off with all heroes available to you. The way Valve makes money off the game are skins which are cosmetic items which are not required to be purchased and are only there for looks Overall I would definately recommend this to anyone as It is Free to play and doesn't have a pay to win model. Anyways pick it up when you can! 10/10
Bronqiaa Gaming;-;One of the best games I have played.
SALTY S O U L;-;wraith king es caca
Hawk () #Invoke Man;-;this game is best
Allanmau22;-;Best Game of this genre.
[D]andy_ace91;-;nice game ever!!
aToMeN TaRo;-;I love this game!! Haaaa.... I still wait a BOOMER means Techies. haha
Xcal1b1r *Msica*;-;If you want to hate yourself for hours at a time, but enjoy it at the same time, download this game. If you like being screamed at in many foreign lanuages when you que US East, Play Dota. If you like a decent community of friendly players, don't play online games ever :)
Sinkobrat;-;The Best Game
FREE KEYS ! FREE KEYS ! FREE KEY;-;i liked this game because of the stunning graphics but i dont like is some of the other players is useless or noob :(
MozyHearts;-;the best game ever...
Osama bin Laden;-;Simply, SUCKS
Savaski74;-;No words to express its GREATNESS!!
noggen;-;Better than League of Legends...
toki_black;-;DOTA IS THE BEST..
ponpat;-;Based on my experience this is the most appealing and feature rich MOBA ever. It has its edges but it is very good balanced (around the "make everyone very good at something" philosophy) and has a very fair free to play system, the fairest I ever experienced and, compared to my adventures to other MOBAs it has a great community (compared to other genre it is a bad community).
Cha Bong Gun;-;This is cool n great game... nice game
cT.majestic.;-;Causes family problems, weight gain, inactivity. Best game ever 10/10
I have Autismo;-;Played a bit of it, It's okay i guess...
gone till wednesday;-;ixmike88: i reocmmend u all qui tbefore u get some illusion that this games worth pursuing
dez;-;This game is an absolute blast to play once you get into it. The only problem is getting into it. The learning curve for 90% of the heroes makes it hard for newcomers to the genre to get a grasp of. Not to mention the overly hostile attitude of the majority of players towards newbies, but you can just choose to ignore them. The game requires (at first) almost more research into playing the heros correctly and learning how the game flows than actually playing it. Putting the time and effort in to learning how to play is highly rewarding. I recommend this game to anyone who has the patience to learn and study the mechanics of the game, and be able to put up with trash-talking and an obscene amount of russians. Once you know what you're doing this game can kill an entire day easily. 9/10
Syn` SdF4_Te_Ua;-;This is Farming Simulator 2013 :]
Bong;-;10/10 would spirit breaker again I'm only joking  game DDOS the Website
Dzan50;-;Got  by a butcher with a hook 10/10
Weasel On Diesel;-;This game is going to take control of you, the graphics are among the best in MOBAs. The community is, well, not as good as you would want it to be, but if you have friends you can play with, it doesn't matter as much. There are over 120 heroes to choose from and after 100+ hours you'll know all the things you need! Everything is available to you from the start so you can quickly master a few heroes and play on all pick if you want to, or play on single draft for additional challenge. There are also 8 gamemodes and a lot of events are coming out for nearly every festival eg. Christmas, Halloween etc. Overall, I recommend the game, it's great. If you want to learn the basics go play on bots for a while with a guide. Dota 2 gets a 9/10 from me just because of the community.
B2OL;-;This Is Good Game its Nice ilike the game icant live if dota2 deleted hahaha thats fun come on guys lets play before the died end :))
Xcal1b1r *Msica*;-;If you want to hate yourself for hours at a time, but enjoy it at the same time, download this game. If you like being screamed at in many foreign lanuages when you que US East, Play Dota. If you like a decent community of friendly players, don't play online games ever :)
DenDenMushi;-;Not noob friendly and i'm not Russian
Tywyllach;-;Dota 2 is an excellent game, especially for a F2P. A lot of heros that are availble to everyone from the start. And the only thing you pay for in this game is coesmetic items or tickets to watch pro games. Any money spent on the game doesn't effect the outcome of the game other then how many more hours you're going play the hero you bought items for, lol. How ever there is a steep learning curve and even if you've played fora while you're constantly learning new things because Dota 2 is always changing.
Athelion;-;ing amazing game, try it, but, many pinoy there, hate it so much, but, nice game
full blooded italian;-;my favourite dating sim
SHINKU HADOKEN;-;Its fun, after you get used to it. It hurts at the start but it gets better the deeper you go in. Dota 2 is basically anal. There are alot of servers availible which include:Russia, and other servers that are filled with Russians. you will experience noobs sometimes, such as the infamous pudge jungle. But its fiiine, Lycan didnt need the jungle anyways am I right? TLDR: a dont be lazy, read the damn thing.
Purple Dogg;-;Great MOBA. If you're into MOBAs like League of Legends, Smite, HoN, etc, then give this a try. It's free! And it's DAMN GOOD. First off, a warning: you're going to suck. Oh, you have some experience with MOBAs? Oh, in that case, you're going to suck and get . Dota 2 has a pretty long learning curve. Loads of heroes to choose from and heaps of items to go along. The training system is a precious help and introduces you to the last hits, denies, shopping for items and combining items, allows you to play with a few noob-friendly (not easy and not weaker than the other ones, mind you, just not that complicated to master in the early stages of the game) heroes to get you to feel the game's pace. From then on, you still have a lot to learn. Everybody can use ALL heroes for free and there's no advantage anyone has over you except their own experience in the game. But there are plenty of heroes to go around and until you've played them all (or played against them) at least once, you'll be feeling like a noob when you face one for the first time. Dota 2 is rather unforgiving when it comes to carries. You die, you lose time, experience and GOLD. And you need GOLD to buy items to allow you to carry. Not that easy for supports either. Most of them do have the uppoer hand on some carries on the early stages of the game, but you need to know them in order to take advantage of that. Also, your abilities' damage doesn't really scale all that well to late game, where the carries start to shine. There are dozens of ward spots, jungling tricks and control points you need to master. Every game's different. Lanes are pretty unpredictable at Dota 2. You can have 2-1-2, but you can have a 1-1-3, a 1-2-2, or, if you have some jungler, you can have 1-1-1-2 os something like that. The game's pretty dynamic. Do check some guides and builds. They can help you in your first contacts with some heroes. But, hey... it's Dota 2. Everything's situational. Sure, there are a few core items on many heroes, but, all in all, it all depends on the game you're playing and a change can make ALL the difference. Again, if you're into MOBAs... Do try it. NOW!
Moordworsie;-;MAKE FRIENDS WITH RUSSIANS. LEARN HOW TO CARRY WHILE DRINKING VODKA. KILL LONE DRUID BEAR LIKE RUSSIAN. BARE HANDED. Is game good? Da. Is community good? Da. Should you play this? Da.
drgnlvrrex;-;Dota 2 is fun. Dota 2 is free. these two facts combined mean that you should download this game and begin enjoying it. There is no reason to delay!
K!lLua^^;-;Nice game
Mr.Tactical;-;Do not download this game waste of tme if you ask me. If you are a Magic-Gamer then get it otherwise its a waste of time.
beszac;-;Awesome game, go select the russian region for the best time of your life.
satin666;-;If you hate having fun, this is the game for you!
Necronox;-;Best moba out there. I played dota first, then lol for 1,5 years, but when dota 2 came out, i swtichted to it. No regret at all, balanced, hardcore gaming. A real challange.
Chosen one;-;It will take every second of your free time, and that will never be enough. Totally recommend .
Abo Soub;-;Its the most well made geme ive ever played and it gaved me a uniqe experience that i didnt had in most of the games of its kind .
Bricktop;-;I love DOTA 2. It has quickly become my most-played game on Steam and I feel like I've barely scratched the surface of all there is to experience in it. Despite being limited to one map, the game still feels extremely large and always offers a brand new challenge with every match. With so many heroes to choose from, and so many crazy combinations for teams, I have a feeling that I'll still be learning the basics of this game for a long time coming. I can't write a DOTA review without mentioning the competitive aspect of the game. I'm a huge fan of esports, and have been following various scenes since 1997. I've watched the production values of these scenes increase slowly throughout the years to the point where there is enough media coverage and hype to reach nearly anyone. With DOTA2, I feel that things are taken to a whole new level. The in-game interface itself makes it very easy to view the latest big tournaments and watch them live from within the application WITH commentary. You can watch the games using a guided camera, or you can take control of the camera yourself and track your favorite player, all while the commentary is running in the background to give you constant updates of the action. It's phenomenal and it's another big reason why I'll be playing this game for years. In short, yes you should definitely give this game a try. No doubt about it.
Naix on a Plane;-;Get of the way Rosetta Stone, Dota 2 is here to teach players how to speak Russain, Chinese and Portuguese.
SAVi;-;Competitive game, bring your big boy shorts and helps grow thick skin!
Ak Venom;-;An intriguing language learning software that allows you to learn the most intricate ways of swearing in brazillian, russian and even portugese. The objective of the software is to place players from different countries into one match and see if they are able to communicate with one another.
troll acc ~ add knucleon;-;From his dad, Dota 1, Dota 2 is an excellent work that should be more developed. Unfortunantely, owners only cares about the money of Sets and fees from Steam Market, who is ? VOLVO aka Valve
MR. TANKER;-;BEST GAME..!!
Jabroni;-;The other players shout more inventive insults at you than on COD. 10/10
Dondo;-;19:38 - Me - "Fancy a game of dota guys? we could stomp some pubs and have a good time." 19:40 - Everyone - "Yeah that will be great, we'll enjoy ourselves" 21:05 - Me - "GET OUT THE ING JUNGLE FRIEL, THERE IS A FIGHT GOING ON IN OUR BASE!" 21:05 - Friel - "IF YOU ALL DIDNT FEED I WOULDNT NEED TO FARM!" 21:06 - Me - " YOU FRIEL!" 22:06 - Everyone - "I ING HATE ALL OF YOU!"
Tydaeus;-;much fun, very graphincs, such a pleasure, wow
hostileduckz;-;Pros: Fun, Teamwork Oriented, All heros are free, Cons: High Skillcap,  Community, Russians, Faceless Void IGN: 8/8 m8 would masterb8 again
popdadpunk;-;this game sucks massive  why would you even play it when happy wheels is free
Urick;-;Vicious as !
Ciopartel.;-;One of the best games ever , 10/10 .
Fogo;-;Best MOBA -F&ck LoL -F&ck HoN -F&ck Infinite Crysis -F&ck ME
P6;-;Very Nice Game!!!!
Mega Morph;-;Best Game I've EVER Played.
NoT_Today;-;Learn Russian in only 3 games best free guide in the world, there is also dota, which is nice... :3
Lancelot;-;A great game!
Hotdog Joe;-;Alright lets get this  straight forward I ain't gonna sugar coat it. This game is the best if you have the patience and tolerance, if you do not you will be  and uninstall but you will be back. On the brightside however if you wanna learn a foreign language this  is better than ing Roseta stone. I'm talking russians and mexicans out the  its unbelievable. Believe me you will at all times have at least one russian or mexican on your team at all times. In a group of five? Well that just means that one of your friends isn't who they say they are. They are most likely a russian/mexican it could even be you. So all in all i find it to be enjoyable if you have tolerance at an 8/10 Before you download this game however. It is very important you look deep inside yourself and ask the most important question in your pitiful life. Que hora es?
Romanian Vibes;-;THE BEST LANGUAGE LEARNING TOOL ON THE INTERNET. LEARN TO SPEAK SPANISH, RUSSIAN, AND PORTUGUESE FOR THE LOW PRICE OF YOUR SELF-ESTEEM AND FAITH IN OTHERS 10/10
TH3M@NYF@C3DG0D_ZA;-;Dota 2 is an awesome game, there is just a few bugs to sort out. the ar and sd modes are a bit un-balanced.
Nikson;-;This game is the most op thing in the world. 100% lifesteal passively. You won't find that kind of stuff anywhere else. Took my breath away. 10/10
InevitableAsshole;-;The Definition of our life and existence, it holds the answers to all questions and teaches us the way of the . 9/10 cause somebody has wooden PC      MMR
Stephen;-;This is a great game and I would recommend it. But Also warn people that a large part of the community can be very harsh. They seem alot quicker to insult you then to help you. I enjoy the game, but the lack of support from the other players usually is what makes me over look this title and skip to something else.
[bot] Trader01;-;dota2 is fun and it makes my stress go away.
Just Lion;-;The best MOBA in the world. I recommend everyone to play.
John Cena;-;Nothing but pain and misery
*D-UNIT* Snakeprince;-;Great game, a lot of russian players on eu-west servers though..
<BingzKi>;-;very nice game.. highly recommended graphics more.
Smash;-;dota (defense of the ancients ) is a action rts game, a great esports platform, a fun game to play if you just know the mechanics of this great game. 10 random players choose from a strong hero pool with different powers and the players have to cooperate with each other understand the extremities of the game. Leadership,Forgivness,Sacrifice and great strategy is required for the win or you end up losing and wasting an hour or two. The only drawback is a steep learning curve but when finally you learn this game you will just love this and play all day. It is also a great way to connect with players of the world a large community supports this, So a word of advice PLAY HARD DIE HARD GO PRO.
Sharkahm;-;This game shouldn't be ignored if you're not a casual gamer. Just like every other valve game: Exelent! + Generous "Free to play" system + Extremly teambased game (Teamplay decides mostly the victory) + Every round is different = Very long playable + Customisation + Sound, music and voices + Epic feeling/atmosphere + Pro gaming orientated + Private matches + Bots are exactly following their difficulty (easy bots are easy, impossible bots are your nightmares) and are intelligent + Many characters, who are voiced to show that they have a personality and backstory. Every character is different to another. They react/express themselves with the kills, deaths, team mate characters, enemy characters (espicially Kunkka and Tidehunter, Clockwerk and Tinker, Crystal Maiden and Lina("You were adopted"), etc. ) + Roles (Carry, Support, Lane-Support, Disabler, Ganker, Nuker, Initiator, Jungler, Pusher, Roamer, Durable) +/- Steep learning curve: Depends if you like an intense game or not. - One map - One gamemode - Some players are not playing in their local server - Low on polygons Remember: The difficulty of this game is high and frustrating, but as soon as you mastered it, you'll be rewarded with great games.
The True X-mens;-;good game but LoL is better cuz you dont have to deny so positioning becomes more important so its a more skilled game. also all this channeling times in dota2 are so long i have to wait foreva time is money lolol. btw many dota2 champions are just copies of the LoL versions. there are some cosmetic items in dota2 but i think they do not change very much i prefer to confuse my opponent with skins so they do not know which champ im playing when i do my skilled ganks. its ridiculous that you have to spend almost the half of your all the gold you earned in one entire match for a in blink (its an item with this ability called blinkdagger) and cant chose it at beginning. nobody would buy such a crap item that does not even give any damage or stats lololol. see you in LoL broz <3
Savaski74;-;No words to express its GREATNESS!!
L  E  O;-;ITS VERY AWESOME!!!
242.saqi;-;mood swings, rage, break of relationships recommend
~Sh@dow~;-;Dota 2 , this is the game you can never stop play!
Strider;-;Hey Dota players, League.
EGX|SuPeR|NoVa|;-;i love this game very much its imazing game i dont know why and i recommend this game to anyone have good brain :]
HamsterDan;-;I dont really get people hate this game i know when you guys if you guys just started playing this game and then play with real people and they call you newbs it doesnt mean that you have to hate this game.When i started to play this game everyone call me a newbie but did i hate this game?What am i just saying is that you guys dont care what people think and the pro's who are calling other people newbs stop it you're making the people hate this game,and anyways this game is a fun strategy for me for my opinion.
Strider;-;Hey Dota players, League.
Albaloo;-;Wonderful game. Say goodbye to your life though
CommanderNarwhal;-;Its a great game with a really friendly community. Just remember that if your team mate is saying "" in chat, it means he thinks you're doing a good job and appreciates your efforts.
BE;-;Delete this game or you will get addicted, i'm already stuck with this game.
n a  e;-;a very good game but ... Dont play it and dont even try it .. it is like a black hole that will waste your time and your life
DOTR.Pete;-;10/10 This game will consume your life and your soul. I' m not even good at it yet.
Mr.INRISEV;-;Free to play
Meichen Lie;-;good game, can earn money with play game.. thanks steam, thanks valve
Syn` SdF4_Te_Ua;-;This is Farming Simulator 2013 :]
Gntha;-;dota took all my friends and ruined my life 10/10
StyleStyleStyle;-;amazing game. dota > League of Noobs
Wissy;-;The best foreign language learning aid for free I have found.
Xudaz;-;awesome!! everyone shud play!! :)
Jimbit  ( -_-);-;addicted to dota 2
Broccoli Head;-;ruined my life 10/10
compl1cated;-;Great Game, Takes a bit of learning curve and patience. 8.5/10 Chicken Feet.
MR. POTATO;-;dont play this game, its ruining my life
Choo CHOOOO!!!;-;There doesn't seem to be that many serious reviews, so I will give it a shot. Played DotA ever since WC3 (must be 7 years at least by now), and it's always the game I come back to. Always. That says a lot. It really isn't a game that you have to play every day. You can stop playing it for days, weeks, months, but the thing is that you almost inevitably get the urge to play it again. It is a cooperative game, where you play the same map over and over, but with different sets of heroes. You always control one hero, and have different items to choose from. This may sound boring, but keep in mind that there are about 100 different heroes, and loads of different items. That is surprisingly enough to make every game a new experience. The learning curve is really steep, but there are options to try out a tutorial and to play against bots to improve before jumping into the fray. This is recommended, because the community is what I would call a bit unforgiving. But the real action, with other players and friends (it's a huge bonus to stack up together and play) is the best gaming experience there is. It is a free-to-play game, and no purchases give you the advantage over your opponents. I love this about DotA. Purchases are strictly cosmetic, or give access to watching tournaments played by professional players. You will get rewarded with items just by playing too. As a summary: it is really simple to grasp the basics. But it takes a lot to become good at the game, and it is always challanging. You will bang your head against the wall in frustration a couple of times, but I and many of my friends really love the game. It is the best cooperative game out there according to myself. 10/10
B2OL;-;This Is Good Game its Nice ilike the game icant live if dota2 deleted hahaha thats fun come on guys lets play before the died end :))
Pictures of This Frog;-;Please help I can't stop playing
BEASTMODE;-;yes,i will reccomend this game!
Aquabat;-;dotal leg of legin has dotal jungle time four but dotal jungle only has dotal jungle times TWO basically im saying that leg of legin is better gmae thx u!
SoA;-;HoL.PasteLink: i ing hate dota HoL.PasteLink: everyone sucks but me HoL.PasteLink: except when i suck HoL.PasteLink: literally the worst pile of garbage ever made HoL.PasteLink: 10/10
theylookatmelikeImamenace_)iZ!;-;DOTA2 BEST MOBA GAME IN THE WORLD!       ValveThank U
SpectreGeekster[WiiChet];-;It gives you back your virginity
BOB_SEALs;-;Cool
^_- Trace ^_-;-;I can not stress how bad this game is, no words can describe this crap that was put together by someone's five year old kid and said "hell, my kid smurt haha lul" and then valve secretly buys this game and "improves on it". Tell me, how in the world do you improve feces? Well, you don't, and valve will never know that because they released games like CS:GO, which is just a reskinned version of CS:S, also they added hat simulator aspects to get people addicted and shoving this  down your friend's throats. Will DOTA 2 ever have a downfall you say? Well, frankly it has, Russians are allowed everywhere, and Brazilians and Africans and spacemen, but why stop there? Why not add a reskin of a reskin? Oh wait, they have, and do... They even have different voiceovers. I can't stress how stupid the community is, everyone who has 3+ hours is already trying to find a simmilar, if not better game that looks like dota, for example League of Legends, which is a good game, if not great game, shunned by the DOTA 2 community as evil. Hell, I have seen DOTA 2 fans hate StarCraft 2 because it was a RTS game, it makes no god damn sense. I actually did like one thing about DOTA 2, and that was uninstalling it, I had so much fun, you guys should try it too! But really, this game is running on so much swag and yolo, it will be more hated than the... actually it is one of the most hated game aready, if you remove Halo and COD out of the way at least. -Trace PS: This game is bad, and you all should feel VERY bad!
Agrobal;-;You can pay to learn russian or you can play Dota 2 for free 10/10 geef mana
TripleD;-;Dota 2 is not for everyone. Don't get me wrong, this is personally a time consuming game. If you're planning on going to play a match before you go to bed in 10 minutes, you must be mistaken. This game has so much to offer to the players. They have their own market for you along with Team Fortress 2 type of things, but that's another review I have to write. Dota 2 has so many characters you can play as, it's mind blowing. 98, to be exact. This is a strategetic game that I think is a must-played game by all gamers if possible. This is an exact type of game some game companies should look at and see how much success they've had for the past few years. I am excited for the events they have been coming up with as if Frostivus, I know, it was canceled... again. I'd have to recommend this game to almost anyone who has games in their blood. I give Dota 2 a full on 9.5/10.
LegendaryHan;-;I didn't know what to write about in my review, so here's a recipe for pancakes instead: 1 1/2 cups all-purpose flour 3 1/2 teaspoons baking powder 1 teaspoon salt 1 tablespoon white sugar 1 1/4 cups milk 1 egg 3 tablespoons butter, melted 1. In a large bowl, sift together the flour, baking powder, salt and sugar. Make a well in the center and pour in the milk, egg and melted butter; mix until smooth. 2. Heat a lightly oiled griddle or frying pan over medium high heat. Pour or scoop the batter onto the griddle, using approximately 1/4 cup for each pancake. Brown on both sides and serve hot.
rem;-;Brilliant Game - Love the competative scene I hope they continue to delveop it in a posative way. - Try it, It is hard but if you have a passion for gaming you won't quit. - Play with friends! -TeamWR
Chewbacca;-;Cons: -Makes you racist -Makes you develop weird psychological conditions -Forces you to deal with other people's sh*t Pros -See Above Overall: 10/10 Would do it all again
WarLord;-;I perfected my russian . Thank You Volvo 11/10
Cheatpeak;-;best MOBA game so far. try it out. definitely worth it.
A Potato;-;fun game if you play with friends but not so much when there are people who are not willing to cooperate
Encore;-;Best real time strategy game I've ever played. Try it !
DIO;-;best game out!!!, Dota 2 4lyf <--- Ws the best game out. Now its just filled with   :(
curaptz;-;Interesting custom items! mod your heroes...
Lequil;-;I recommend dota2 because The community is very friendly especially those people who doesn't speak english. Words like "bobo" and "" are words of encouragement! The Matchmaking system is the best and you will definitely pair up with someone like you or better. You never report someone in fact you will run out of commends! The game is so easy to pick up and you can learn it in less than 3 hours to see if you are on the right track, play an online match and if people called you "bobo" or "" you are definitely on the right track of becoming the next best dota2 player in the world. People here are understandable and smart and will always pick according to your teammates choices, you will never see 2 junglers or 2 mid EVER . Though if you see people going to the wrong lane, which never happens, just simply tell them "" or "bobo" and they will understand the situation and do what they were told to do. I highly recommend this game 10/10 cykapower!
Rowjo;-;You win the game when people stop saying to uninstall, I'm still waiting for that day.
AEIOU / le toucan has arrived;-;10/10 would waste time on instead of productive work
Skoopy Spelleton;-;BEST LANGAUGE TOOL IN EXISTANCE I'VE LEARNED OVER 2,000 RUSSIAN WORDS AND HOW TO SPEAK SPANISH BY PLAYING THIS GAME, IT'S FREE ALL IT COSTS IS YOUR SELF ESTEEM AND FAITH IN OTHER HUMAN BEINGS 10/10 WOULD RECOMMEND TO ROSETTA STONE S.
Divertissement;-;We demand a Russia server in another client. Sincerely, all EU players.
butwhyeach;-;I dont know how to close the game pls help
dingbat;-;Each character has a terribly underpowered melee attack that eventually becomes only useful in smashing crates, a Special Move that (as far as I can tell) just makes your character glow, and an arsenal of unremarkable ranged weapons.
UnPHOgettable;-;This game made me have a deep hatred towards Russian and Peruvians. 11/10
Cupcake;-;i recomend the game to many people for a intresting fun moba. However people seem to not understand its a game and go off the deep end when someone does bad.in ranked there is no comuniacation only yelling and blaming other people or crying and sitting there thinking you are the best and everyone sucks. sadly people still dont understand that the other games modes like all random and single are to have fun and not be all up tight. so with this said if you want a moba where you can play a intresting set of heros and customize said heros play dota 2. if you want to play dota 2 just to yell at people in casual games then go play league or tf2 i think that would suit you better. all in all i give the game 8/10
jarobson;-;Good community, lots of fun, great variety no two games are the same :D
Endreo;-;I couldn't figure out how to use the menu.
SkullKid;-;This Game Is Amazing. Way better then Halo,Cod BattleFeild and all those Fps In my OPTION. Time To spice things up a bit. Soooo Hello Dota 2. 11/10
Buzzin;-;Best game on the market right now. +Lets you learn all about foreign cultures in places like Russia, Peru, Brazil and even China! +Teaches you to release your anger on not only the enemy team, but your team as well +Helps you get rid of your friends, girlfriend, job and every other part of your social life +You can spend hours upon hours on this game without getting bored, and you will never understand why +Helps you become a racist and hate everyone who is from south america, russia or china. +Valve constantly updates the game, we get a new hero every couple years or so and we gets new hats daily. -Game doesnt have enough hats -No such thing as 'Fun' in dota -It's still a beta Overall 11/10. Would recommend and play until the day I die.
Zombie!?;-;When I started with such types of games.. Shifting form First Person Shooter. I was confused. And I did not know if League of Legends or Dota 2 is better. So I downloaded Both. Starting from Dota 2. I played. It was complicated. But the games I found fast. And the Understanding of the game.. It made sense. After playing about 100 hours. I decided to Give a try to League of Legends.. hearing that It is one of the top ones. I expected it to be better.. But frankly.. I was horrified by LOL's quality.. The gaming is very arcadish.. U get defensive upgrades at the cost of boots yes.. that cheap. Anyone can hide anyone can get back to town withouth scroll.. it was.. senseless to me.. I never the less gave it a go.. played league of legends for 30 hours. The waiting for games were long. choosing for sides was irritating. So then I Removed LOL and havn't looked away from Dota 2 ever since. Oh the game.. The lust for getting those kills.. One map.. Infinite possibilities.. I specially enjoy the Ability Draft.. Makes the game even more enjoyable as u may make a new hero all together.. The Community is friendly.. and The best part about Dota 2 is.. It makes sense. A lot of sense. And the Physics ingame are very much realistic. The Dev's Have done some amazing Job in the game. And I thank them for their constant efforts. :) So after such a ... strange review.. my point being is.. It's an amazing game. And hence Must for everyone to try it. :) U'll be hooked, M sure of it. :D
Bonjour Trolls;-;This is a great game but some times it is too scary. I rate this game at 5 bags of popcorn.
BabiTuaa;-;This is the bestest game ever... ur agrument is invalid
Kangroot;-;This game ruined my life, and drove my loved ones away. 10/10
Heureux;-;this game is awesome.. my girlfriend said that she will smash my head to the keyboard if she sees me playin well i dont care here's my review for ya +upgraded dota 1 (y) +relaxing +oh sht heres my girlfriend.. later i;ll write my full review and aih5sdkjas7h15gfkj011sdy8hbsdighj sdi f as fsigh k4uagk86f31v Adajhse wioarh i3owhr ashf439ah421klr iwhrioa wr ahslfkas f aefji33awoihwaurq3iwhkayheiowq43gh51etewa ttbaewe1
Bilbo Swaggins;-;Start game and someone called me a noob and ask me to uninstall dota 2. 10/10 IGN.
A$$HOLE | 1 Crate 1 Scarp;-;PROS: Gameplay: Nice w0rk Volvo! Great grafics, X-TREME detailed charaters, Hours of fun, Completely F2P and Never-Ending-Fun(NEF) CONS:  Cameras,Some toxic/rude peoples (those who always:  YOU! I GONNA REPORT YOU FOR KILLING) , Powerful Addictions (Far more powerful then cocaine) and if you have poor internet connections,you might not download this game because it will ruin your life,eg : -Plays A Bot Match- -Disconnection- -Says : - -Into LP Matches- Overrall: 8/10 Recommended This game earned a award from me : Best F2P Time-Killing Raging Game
Poak bun (not supp);-;Here there be russians...
420yo;-;one of the best games I have ever played and It is unbelievable
Unicornz;-;Played my first game, got called a dumb*** 10/10
asha*;-;Best Game of the Years 2011-2012
Blair;-;Have played almost 1000 hours and still dont know what i am doing...
Panishev;-;Nice original game from Valve. If you've never played it, the most simple example will be other game from Valve  Team Fortress. You have to choose one of the characters with different abilities before game starts and fight other team to complete games mission. But there are also several differences between Dota 2 and TF: battles are going in fantasy World, so you can control not only humans, but also monsters, robots and ghosts. You are unable to control your alter ego directly as well, you can only order him who to attack and where to move. With aerial viewpoint it makes game similar to Red Alert or any other real-time strategy game. For the moment Dota 2 needs a lot of improvements, like adding new maps (there is only one map at all), more game modes (like storyline coop with friends vs mobs) and let players write only with latin letters in text chat and speak only with English words in voice chat.
Unlimited Breadsticks;-;many ancient very battle such gameplay very roles such graphic many teamwork wow
TrulySalty;-;The hype is real; DoTA 2 is the #1 game on Steam. Need I say more?! Go get involved in the game that has swept the gamer community! GLHF! ;D Want to know more? Visit my YouTube channel! I feature plenty of DoTA 2 gameplay! :) www.youtube.com/trulysaltygaming
IM REPORTING EVERYONE;-;Every time I \queue in Dota 2 I want to cut myself and ram my head into my desk to forget the memories of last game.
Evaclare;-;This game really fun, and need some work to play it well. More than 100 heroes, each has different skills, and you must memorize all of them. Hardest game ever.
Eggs;-;This game ruined my life. 5 stars
BADDIES;-;Steam xp
Rezcom;-;It was one of the first big free-to-play games, and one of the first big multiplayer online battle arenas, or MOBAs. But going on five years later, League of Legends still holds firm as an example of excellence. With its amazing variety of Champions, rewarding progression systems, and fast but intensely strategic team play, it easily hooked me and refused to let go. That addictiveness and competitive spirit, combined with a generous free-to-play approach and frequent updates from developer Riot Games, has created one of the biggest and liveliest gaming communities anywhere. Like most MOBAs, League of Legends main attraction is its five-on-five matches on its staple three-lane map. Called Summoner's Rift, this map is brightly and colorfully designed, and it creates a distinct playstyle with the way its dense brush allows you to conceal yourself and surprise enemies. I particularly love how the distinctive jungles on either side of the central river are filled with NPC monsters that give buffs to players who take a break from battle to go on the hunt  its a constant temptation to risk venturing into the other teams territory to attempt to steal their buffs. The choice between engaging the other team directly or attacking their resources allows for interesting strategies and depth beyond simply fighting until one Champion or turret is dead. Inside each team's base also lies an Inhibitor which, if destroyed, causes the opposing teams side to start spawning super minions. Its an extra strategic objective to target in the enemy base, and having one more building to take down often leads to exciting and game-ending team fights. From Ziggs, the bomb-loving little rat, to Jinx, the blue-pigtailed maniac, its electrifying to coordinate with your team to mow down your opponents and push lanes with Leagues Inside each team's base also lies an Inhibitor which, if destroyed, causes the opposing teams side to start spawning super minions. Its an extra strategic objective to target in the enemy base, and having one more building to take down often leads to exciting and game-ending team fights. As free-to-play games go, League of Legends is a model of generosity. Though it doesnt give everything away like Dota 2 does, it serves up a weekly rotating selection of 10 Champions for free, and you can purchase and play with any of the 117-character roster for a reasonable price of between two and eight dollars each. Yes, that adds up to a princely sum if you intend to buy every single character, but theres no need to buy more than you intend to actually play. The Champion rotation is a nice way to try before you buy, and helped me to pace myself by learning just a few characters at a time. You can also unlock every Champion at a satisfying rate without spending a penny, which is not only fulfilling, but it sets League apart from the type of free-to-play game that deliberately makes it impractical to play at a competitive level for no cost. Since many players opt for a completely free experience, its exciting when the roster changes and pushes the community to try out fresh characters and new strategies. If you want to go a step further, you can buy cosmetic skins for every character. They can be pricey, but each skin has tons of detail, and its impressive that most of them come with unique spell effects and animations. My Panda Annie skin, for example, changes the little pink-haired girl into a mini-geisha of sorts, and her ultimate ability calls down a panda version of her grizzly bear, Tibbers. (Yay, Tibbers!) In the opening minutes of a match, League's Champions distinguish themselves with lots of low-level area-of-effect abilities that make killing minions quick and easy. Unlike some other MOBAs, there's no way to attack your own minions to deprive your enemy the experience and gold, making it simpler to focus on other tasks, like getting last hits. The absence of those denial tactics definitely takes a competitive aspect away from League, but it's one that's often frustrating. I dont miss it. Relative to other MOBAs where management of special-ability juice (magic points, in this case) is key, I also enjoy how often abilities are available for use in League. Its awesome being able to constantly harass opponents with spells rather than having to worry about conserving them all for one crucial moment. But that doesnt mean abilities dont matter. Some of the strongest attacks are skill shots (projectiles requiring precise manual aim), and failing to hit your target can have catastrophic, game-changing consequences in team fights. From simple slows to huge Super Mega Death Rockets that travel across the whole map, snagging enemies with these moves while dodging theirs is a giddy thrill. The importance League of Legends places on these skill shots helps set its style of action apart. You dont lose any money when you die in League, making it easier to save up for new weapons and armor in the item shop. The item selection is decent, but most players always seem to rely on you to build your character using expected items, like The Bloodthirster or Rabadon's Deathcap. Straying from the recommended builds doesn't make you useless, but some of these might as well be called required items instead of recommended, considering their power. On the bright side, this means spending less time shopping and more time playing. Also, the recent addition of a variety of Support items, like The Frost Queens Claim and Talisman of Ascension which grant passive gold, are a good move in the right direction for diversifying builds. It might be easier to coordinate unusual item builds if League had built-in voice chat. Unless youve set up a TeamSpeak/Ventrilo/Mumble/Skype/etc call with your pre-arranged team before joining a game, the only ways to communicate are via text, which often goes unnoticed, or through four alerts to indicate danger, on my way, missing, or assist me. Nothing sucks more than watching a crucial surprise attack slip through my fingers because a teammate was too busy to see me pinging. At least when your team falls so hopelessly behind 20 minutes into a 40-ish minute match that four of five teammates agree its all over, the handy surrender option prevents you from wasting time fighting a losing battle. Even though you play on the same few maps with similar items, theres so much depth and strategy going on that no two matches of League of Legends ever feel the same. Its distinctive style encourages surprise attacks and frequent use of skill-shot powers, and its colorful art style makes everything pop on the screen. Learning how to make the most of its characters and to become an asset to a team is a long and challenging process, but once youve got it down, its incredibly satisfying to work together to destroy your enemies in this amazing MOBA.
Everybody's Daddy;-;10/10 would buy if it has a Price
..;-;What can I say, all my friends are addicted, therefore it's good! :D
hesitantly spiderfacts;-;okay game needs more bug heroes though
C.A.R.L;-;i love this game and its fun when play with team mates
Kichiro  ~;-;this game is good.. but if you play so much you'll be adicted.. like me xD
mimikaki;-;porn hub
darky lf7;-;!            (  - )     .            (, - )    - -  !        . ALARM!  2  . .
Unlimited Breadsticks;-;many ancient very battle such gameplay very roles such graphic many teamwork wow
TrulySalty;-;The hype is real; DoTA 2 is the #1 game on Steam. Need I say more?! Go get involved in the game that has swept the gamer community! GLHF! ;D Want to know more? Visit my YouTube channel! I feature plenty of DoTA 2 gameplay! :) www.youtube.com/trulysaltygaming
IM REPORTING EVERYONE;-;Every time I \queue in Dota 2 I want to cut myself and ram my head into my desk to forget the memories of last game.
Bonjour Trolls;-;This is a great game but some times it is too scary. I rate this game at 5 bags of popcorn.
BabiTuaa;-;This is the bestest game ever... ur agrument is invalid
Djentleman;-;LoL, please die in hell. Enough said. 10/10
Lord Chame;-;Definitely recommend. Amazing game.
Thunderkeys;-;This game is
NanDecker69;-;Made me Russian and angry 10/10 call hax again
Gyro Man;-;eh riot go back to making league of legends
Xeronyx S>CS INV;-;pretty awesome game :) better than LoL xD
MNT DEW CANT MELT DANK MEMES;-;Teachers warn you about drugs. You know, weed, cocaine and heroine. They forgot to mention Dota 2. Will ruin your life, teach you new languages and make you lose faith in humanity. 10/10 Favorite game of all time.
Chick;-;nice game, team up and schocking strategy
luka;-;Cyka Blyat Dota taught me that
CClia;-;If u dont know Dota 2 yet, then u r so LUCKY!! Dont EVER start playing this!! its worse than drugs!! it will ruin ur life!! it is too addictive i can't stop playing it.. please stop me im wasting my beautifull life.. T_T STEAM u must build a rehabilitation center to cure Dota 2 addictive T_T icefrog u suck gimme back my normal life T_T
Polo.Asus.;-;I was attacked by a band of half naked men with axes,they beat me unconcious and then screamed at me in russian. 10/10 best real life simulator.
Simber;-;you're going to lose all the time
nuage;-;game is hard
mAGNUSwAKER;-;Pardon my slightly irrelevant paragraph for this review but out of very strange consequences, Blizzard allowed VALVe to purchase this IP. DOTA is what is potentially the most competitive gem of all time; the known mod for Warcraft 3; Reign of Choas or the Frozen Throne. It is famous that it had no marketing, no montization or any advertisements and grew its popularity in numbers for its strangely addictive gameplay and emphasis on teamwork, considered to be called A ction Real Time Strategy or Massive Online Battle Arena as a genre. The legalities that were abound during the time the game was being made caused massive problems for VALVe. I can sympathise with this. Blizzard had nearly sued VALVE such as keeping the IP not too close to the Warcraft characters, changing the Azeroth world to the Mad Moon, this meant changing names and lore such as Necrolyte to Necrophos, Skeleton King (Diablo) to the Wraith King and many others like Obsidian Destroyer to Outworld Devourer (which the latter sounds much more frightening) to avoid Law suits. Just recently Pudge has his damaged body sewed up because it was too similar to Diablo 1's The Butcher who was inspiration for Pudge and his line 'AH FRESH MEAT!' Difficulty; Hardcore (is tough for those new to this genre) Publisher; VALVE Producer; VALVE Special Mentions; Eul (creator), Abdul Ismail (Icefrog), Guinusso Factors; Introduction Gameplay Cooperation/Teamwork Graphics Features Replay Value Audio Introduction Verdict DOTA 2 stands for Defense of the Ancients, an assymetric map made by Eul, a modder of Starcraft who started the mod off made headway for a guy called IceFrog who helped Eul port it to Warcraft 3 and made it e-sports viable. DOTA 2 features many RTS inspired elements from Warcraft and ability use, multiple unit control is used throughout. Gameplay Verdict The goal of this game is simple - Destroy the enemies ancient - a building of pure immense power of both evil and good radiating from it. Launch attacks with friends or players on the other persons 'Ancient' in hope the destroy it to win the game while defending yours, to aid you - you have heroes who will come to your aid when facing enemy heroes. With each demise of 'creeps' and hero gold is rewarded to get better items. Attack your own creeps to stop the enemy getting your gold! Commonly referred to as Farming . Engine is powered by VALVe's Source Engine, it provides the flexibility of modding (d2ware.com) and Steam Workshop. It is completely free to play and uses microtransitions and has a workshop for those interested for making items to be appoved and sold on the game itself, aiding animators, modellers and sound producers gain a slice of the profits (about 10-25% goes to them and even more if you donate directly). This is assuringly one of the most competitive games you and I will experience, even if you dont know me, we will assuringly meet as allies... or rivals >:-D. You play in a team of five versus five as 'Heroes' special ability units which can cast spells and are controlled and gain levels and gold by killing 'creeps' which contain gold and experience, these creeps are non-controllable (unless you buy certain items like Helm of the Dominator or you are this guy called Chen) units which attack other units or you/enemies as time progresses you can use this gold to purchase items which aid you against your enemy and makes you stronger and stronger DOTA 2 is very well kitted out with Leauges, clans, tournaments, cosemetics, spectator mode, downloadable replays, a somewhat rudimentary report system and fantastic looking graphics that focus on fantasy (very vivid and pyrotechnical). The games mechanics are similar to those who play Warcraft 3's version of this modification, you are 3 main attributes called Strength, Agility and Intelligence. Strength focuses on being tanky, meaning they take a lot of hits before dying and are relatively the first to be sent in while their team, some strength heroes contain better stats (or 'gain') which makes them able to use their spells often. Most strength heroes focus on other Strength heroes which are capable of dealing massive auto-attack damage. Agility focuses on speed and movement which most heroes will have quite fast spell casts. They have a high amount of options for escaping enemy heroes and usually have a form of invisibility or entrapment. Intelligence focuses on spammable (as in can be done over and over again) magic damage dealing spells which can silence, disarm or drain the mana of an enemy. Intelligence have by far the most 'mana' which is the bar, like health which is used to cast spells which drains them, requiring management. Intelligent heroes utilize strategy far better but become weaker at late game. Capable of burst damage on certain heroes like Lion. Cooperation/Teamwork Verdict Cooperation in DOTA 2 is highly dependable on who you play with. I recommend not playing with peers that do not know the Support Roles, Carry and Semi-Carry roles will result in a less favorable outcome for the final stages of the game (referred to as the late game). I shouldn't really say this but prepare for a lot of Russians, Pervuians and foreign folks in the wrong servers. This is NOT a gripe, I actually prefer multicultural lobbies. Graphics Verdict Source Engine has been modified to present higher graphical fidelity, including HBAO (a type of shader called Horizon Based Ambient Occulsion which makes the shading much more realistic) and increased resolution on textures, models and the animations are excellent. DOTA 2 has its immersion split slightly with too much fog of war (blackness border to hide sight from enemies) that affects seeing enemy players. I haven't found a way to tone the Fog of War to become more or less visible or to disable it (not in the form of hacking but in the form of console commands and you still cannot see it). Features Verdict Download it and see for yourself, very kitted out with tons of stuff to use. too numerous to put here but it will appease and appeal to many. Replay Value Verdict Each battle is dynamic and changes its course, superb concept is that the trees surrounding the DOTA map allows for 'juking' a form of evasion by confusing the enemy by moving into the fog or into a position which entraps them. Audio Verdict Soundtrack is nice mix of ochrestra and slow drum beats. The music adapts to your teams aggression, start pushing and the game starts to change to a heavy orchestra of war! Reviews may be updated to keep information accurate and preserve fact over opinion
Doolie;-;WHAT THE  IS WITH THIS GAME CAN VALVE FIX THIS ABADDONING THING? I WAS PLAYING AND IT SAYS I ABADONED CUZ I INACTIVITY WTF IS THIS ??!?!?
Vlado;-;A really good MOBA with great graphics, a good community, balanced and plenty of items. played both LOL and dawngate and DOTA 2 deffinitelly wins ! :)
ploobin;-;Rip-off of Legend of Zelda, cant jump or sprint 10/10 ruined my life
TS.H00ker;-;ADDICTING AS HELL *warning* May cause hatred to everyone in the world who doesnt speak your language. Also possible cause of many killings within freindly communites due to fellow human's not letting you have last hits on creeps .....Oh and you become the biggest racsist towards russians...with a ping of 500000000000000000
Sheogorath, Prince of Madness.;-;This game is a black hole once you start playing. No matter how toxic the community is, as soon as you put more than 100-200 hours into the game you can't stop playing. This will become your life 0_0
[WT] SilvaWolf;-;Dota 2, Awesome game! Pros: Nice graphics Nice playability, lots of characters Combat is Great Nice Items Cons: Some characters are OP The loss of points for leaving a game (frustrates me!) Overall: 8.5/10 Will play again!
Huika;-;Best game of the Steam /    !
Greypple;-;Wanna play Doto? See you around next year.
Koromo;-;10/10 Never bored this game!
Tedick;-;You can learn a lot of things playing Dota 2: - you can learn to speak russian - you can learn how to swear in russian - you can learn how to hate russians - you can learn how to change your matchmaking region - you can play dota with no problems. 10/10
Dr3w;-;Say goodbye to your life!!!! :P
sunshine;-;addictive
Not A Cat That Plays Games;-;Best way to waste your life and/or learn Russian 10/10
8;-;I Love This Game <3
basic;-;Addictive, Challenging and a Timeless Game.
toffee boy;-;Play this game when you are ing depressed when someone you really like suddenly disappears from your life, good ing excuse to throw game, throw people and throw reports everywhere
Elnino;-;Join now
Monkey D. Luffy;-;i love this dota2 games
Gecko;-;game. unplayable. graphics are terrible. the controls are made for an snes controller. 5/5 would play again
Musashi;-;Dota 2 is AWESOME!!!
MiracleSenju;-;nice games :D
{Cos.}Rekt;-;I recommend this game
Kim'll Carry All;-;Like this game, cant stop playing it!
Enhalion;-;There is a lot I could say, but I'll just leave it at 10/10
BATMAN;-;Only 3 words - IT RUINS LIFE but then again YOLO ... oh my match is ready GTG !!!
Vegetarian Douchebag;-;This game sucks, I have no life anymore. I want my life back.
Misaki;-;competitive gaming !
nwp;-;THIS IS FREAKIN' AWESOME !!
- Jorzki;-;I learnt how to insult people in russian. 5/5
Zombie!?;-;When I started with such types of games.. Shifting form First Person Shooter. I was confused. And I did not know if League of Legends or Dota 2 is better. So I downloaded Both. Starting from Dota 2. I played. It was complicated. But the games I found fast. And the Understanding of the game.. It made sense. After playing about 100 hours. I decided to Give a try to League of Legends.. hearing that It is one of the top ones. I expected it to be better.. But frankly.. I was horrified by LOL's quality.. The gaming is very arcadish.. U get defensive upgrades at the cost of boots yes.. that cheap. Anyone can hide anyone can get back to town withouth scroll.. it was.. senseless to me.. I never the less gave it a go.. played league of legends for 30 hours. The waiting for games were long. choosing for sides was irritating. So then I Removed LOL and havn't looked away from Dota 2 ever since. Oh the game.. The lust for getting those kills.. One map.. Infinite possibilities.. I specially enjoy the Ability Draft.. Makes the game even more enjoyable as u may make a new hero all together.. The Community is friendly.. and The best part about Dota 2 is.. It makes sense. A lot of sense. And the Physics ingame are very much realistic. The Dev's Have done some amazing Job in the game. And I thank them for their constant efforts. :) So after such a ... strange review.. my point being is.. It's an amazing game. And hence Must for everyone to try it. :) U'll be hooked, M sure of it. :D
Svedsv;-;Nowhere near as cool as League of Legends. I mean, you get all the heroes for free? What kind of stupid game designer implements that? Also, this game is clearly a copy of LoL. Forget the fact that the original Dota was made way before League of Legends.
Mr.HustledBumpkins;-;This game may have eaten my life, I may have a horrid addiction. I might even be stretching for 2000 hours on the horizon. But that's all okay when you get a rampage as Enigma.
SoA;-;HoL.PasteLink: i ing hate dota HoL.PasteLink: everyone sucks but me HoL.PasteLink: except when i suck HoL.PasteLink: literally the worst pile of garbage ever made HoL.PasteLink: 10/10
theylookatmelikeImamenace_)iZ!;-;DOTA2 BEST MOBA GAME IN THE WORLD!       ValveThank U
dEw.2001;-;Like having sex everytime you play.
DutchieFrass ;;;-;If YOU LIKE ONLINE STRATEGY PLAYERS DOTA 2 IS DEFINITELY A GAME FOR YOU. MAY BE HARD AT FIRST BUT TAKE TIME TO PRACTICE AND PRETTY SOON YOU"LL LOVE IT! I DEFINITELY LOVE ITS WIDE RANGE OF CHARACTERS< WHICH MAKES IT ALMOST IMPOsSIBLE TO PREDICT. XD YOU JUST DEPEND ON YOUR SKILL AND THE UNITY OF YOUR TEAM.
Nevermind-;-;DOTA 2 IS REALLY NICE GAME EVER, U MUST SMARTER AND FASTER TO WIN ALL GAME.
NinJosh In Pyjamas;-;my favorite game!!! all you want is here
INCURSIO;-;easy to understand. easy to learning. hard to play. Just keep calm and farming hard.
u have small pp ahaha;-;i'm 24 hours in and still don't know what i'm doing 10/10
jiggle;-;THIS IS THE BEST LANGUAGE LEARNING TOOL IN THE WORLD DISCOVER A VAST ARRAY OF CULTURES AND LANGUAGES INCLUDING: RUSSIAN, MEXICAN, BRAZILIAN AND MORE MEXICANS LEARN TO COMMUNICATE TO OTHERS IN A PROFFESIONAL AND RESPECTFUL WAY WITH THE GREATEST LERANING TOOL OF ALL... DOTA 2
Dev.J;-;Future of Gaming
Ancient Salt Lord;-;ing three years of league and this game is ing aweful. The last hit animations blow, no characters worth a damn without two items, and the power spikes come from ing nowhere. ing if you want to painfully learn how to last hit in this specific game, and to last hit (deny) enemy minions, go for it. This is just the  version of league.
Rex.;-;I started playing Dota since i was 14. Dota is a team game, so team work is a must Dota has taught me a lot of things, you can only be good at something if you focus on it, learn from mistakes, be aware of your surroundings, trust your instinct, use common sense, trusting on your team to always have your back, believing in your capabilities, always try to be better than you were yesterday. I mostly playing supports in Dota. I learn playing support role from good guide but it just teaches you the basics. I have spent my time playing for 3000+ hours, and I realized, I have spent 3000+ hours of my life in a best game ever. After all, I recommend this game to everyone who wants to experience pain, suffering, and torment because at the end, you will come to a sudden realization that things are always bound to get better.
As  ka;-;i love this game,goodluck all gamers long live <3
Vamp Girl;-;This game wont make anyone bored... I have playing Dota 2 for almost 920 hours and i never get bored ~ even if it the same map and the same concept. this game combine strategy and team work and skills all at once, timing and knowledge of the items... players in lvl 1 can beat lvl 200 ~ everyone here is equal and all the heroes are free to play. i think this game is the best yet i found that i can still play it all the time and never get bored cuz everytime i try something new~ new hero ~ new strategy ~ new items ~ and every time its new party to play with and a new combination of heros that you can try to combine the skills with. Most of the people see a MOBA game and just wont start to play it cuz they see the gameplay looks from the top (watch the character from up) and they think the game sucks~ i think its what makes that game a good game... you be able to watch your back and looks out for your friends. There also the option the add mods from workshop and get the game more funny adn try new stuff. Also you can play with different mode like : "least played" or "all random" and its make the choices of the heros more fun to play and learn (and the game mode have alot of options). I recommend everyone to play dota 2 and more recommend to play with friends and talk while the game... just keep positive feelings and be happy when you play ~ its just a game XD
.z;-;Trash game.
ALEA;-;I think I shall never play, a game as lovely as Dota2. A game which requires a lot of time, to fight your enemies and allies on chat behind. A game that you can play all day, and rage quit when you get doomed in game. A game which has many cosmetics today often noobs bought for heroes they can't even play. This fragments are made by 3k MMR Schrub like me, and its time for you to commend me.
brep;-;this game is better than obama
Vern;-;Dota 2 the game where foreigners yell at you and complain how bad you are, along with a couple of words that you have never heard before in your life. 11/10
Nubato;-;This is the est game i have ever played you get disconnected every 2 seconds and it is too unplayable
Prost;-;Anything I would say about Dota 2 could be fairly represented by my hours on record.
Jack Russell;-;Well, it's better than League.
catpowr;-;Everyone pick carry, No one buys courier or wards, russian feeds the enemy team and calls you a noob.ggwp
DirewolF;-;Best language learning tool on the internet. Learn to speak Spanish, Russian, Portuguese, all for the low price of your self-esteem and faith in humanity. Ruined my life. 10/10 best game ever. Worth it
cheeseman1015;-;Ruined my life, 10/10
One wish! What is it?;-;Great game, 10/10
Arkusul;-;DOTA 2 is an entertaining and tactical game with a diverse roster of heroes. I reccomend this game for solo queue and STRONGY recomend it for team gameplay. Almost perfect besides the fact that the community is pretty mean to new players. 9/10
I SHOULD BE WERKING;-;Once you start you never stop, and you fail your exams, and your future depends on dota.
j+;-;Dota 2 is a very friendly game. It has a very happy community that all speak English and want to help you. it is easy for beginners, this game will get those socks of yours knocked right off. If you play this game, you are a very cool individual. Unless you play Meepo, Juggernaut, Wraith King, Viper or Venomancer in which case  YOU  YOU  YOU  YOU WRAITH KING YOUR ING ULTIMATE I SWEAR TO GOD IT'S SO ING ANNOYING OH MY GOOOOOOOD Sven is best hero
Sugar ~;-;good game and happy playing
Hevoskuuri;-;this game is horse scheibe
Shiina;-;Never playing again. Such a bad game. 69/420
Alise;-;who br here
MuDDa BuDA;-;Great game takes a while to get into but once u do you'll be hooked for life
TLT.Aurorath;-;I have been playing this game since Im 11 years-old. And someday. I want to be in the international.
A HERRING;-;not worth the 0 dollars
Wolf;-;When you lose all team says that you were the fault When you win, team forgets of you and gives some GG
.asim;-;Best and Worst game ever. This game ing changes you.
TheSuicideHobo;-;Ever wanted to know how many 12 year olds you're mother has slept with? Ever wanted to gauge the illiteracy levels of said 12 year olds? Ever wanted to be yelled at in Russian on an English speaking server? If your answer to all or any of these questions is yes, then this is a must have game.
Pear;-;More fun than LoL.Play this ; it's really good. Also ruined my life. 10/10
Ermagerd Mangos;-;This game is so bad, I mean like my 2.1 hours on this sh*t is from that long *ss motherf*cking tutorial. I played a 20 minute actually game and it sucked, it was confusing, meaning that sh*t black d*ck tutorial was useless. I bet the only reason some people play this Nazi sh*t because they want to ejaculate on Valve and this is the only way they can. The names are uncreative as f*ck and weird as sh*t(axe, bountry hunter, sniper, IO). The mini map is ret*rded and the selection screen is so confusing I thought suicide would be the answer to get me out of this hell. I will admit the graphics are pretty for a game like this but that doesn't excuse the other Jewish sh*t I had to deal with. I might play Dota 3 if comes out but I guarantee you Valve won't because they always stop at their 2nd game. And that is all I have to say about this b*llsh*t game.
Svedsv;-;Nowhere near as cool as League of Legends. I mean, you get all the heroes for free? What kind of stupid game designer implements that? Also, this game is clearly a copy of LoL. Forget the fact that the original Dota was made way before League of Legends.
Dr. Diazepamll;-;Do you recommend this game? No, it's too addictive. Dont forget to take 15 minutes rest after one match! Game causes ultra addiction.
[S] [A] [T] [A] [N];-;dota2 is good game for me\
goodnight oyasumi;-;this game has taught me how to hate a race 11/10 will play again though dota >>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>> LoL
Gisboy;-;Yes, Dota 2 is A true masterpiece and a milestone in gaming, yes Dota 2 is one of the best MMO / MMORPG game, and it is true that it is one of the games that have awesome heroes with their awesome abilities, and lores. It is all true what they say, Defense of the Ancients may be the best game in existent. I can actually say that Dota 2 was one of the most addictive, awesomest, and best experience in my gaming life, but it may be also one of the worst. Guess what, there are over 108 - 112 heroes, and over 20 difficult heroes, 40 relied heroes, 40 carries in which you will be expected to be excellent. In fact, when you first enter the game you are already expected to be excellent and skilled in that game. Even now I am playing this game and may be planning to quit it, but it is not the game I blame it into, nope. I have been through hundreds of heavy or light games, from super mario, to pacman, to minecraft, to zelda, to call of duty, left 4 dead, and every possible heavy game you might even know, yes I have been through dying games, like crossfire, mercenaries, twelve sky (dead game), and world of tanks. And I recommend, for you not to play this game. Why? Its community is one of the worst. I'm not talking only about the russians (which most people are probably too concerned about. I'm talking about everybody, in generalized, everyone, repeat... Everyone will bring you down once you cling to this game. This game may have lots of good recommendations but I beg to differ, those people are the ones who will also tear you apart from this game. Trash talking, coarse words, harsh statements, bullying... Its just like school, only 100x worse. And they tell you not to play the game if you can't "Take It". It's like saying "DOn'T BOTHER LIVING LIFE IF YOU CANT TAKE THE HURTFUL WORDS". Not to mention the imaginary boundaries between choosing heroes. People tend to choose the less skilled ones (even though they wanted to practice hard ones) because they might bring the team down, its that feeling when you want to use an Invoker (a very hard hero to use where people expect you to be good at him when you use it) but you say nevermind just to avoid being blamed for loss. People tend to treat this game as their life and may change their characters just because of certain problems with their peers. This is one of the most unGodly and evil games. Yes I am a Filipino, and I am not proud of my trash talking inhibitants and neighbors, in fact I am ashamed of it. There will probably even more of them who will comment on this review adding more insults to me. Yes, they might say I am "WEAK, or NOOB" just because I can't play the game the way I want it to, doesn't mean I have to give a bad recommendation? No, I have the right to speak. My fellow brothers, let us enjoy the game like we enjoyed minecraft, and super mario, let us embrace loss, welcome our fellow newbies, teach them our ways if they fail to do so, give way to them, let us respect our professionals, embrace this game as one, love our enemies as mentioned in the Bible, love our teammates. Forget trashtalking, it doesn't bring you any good. I just hope that this message will be viewed to all to remind them of what true gaming is like. God bless, HAPPY GAMING :)
BrainDamage;-;Imagine a world, where beauty, love and adrenaline all comes together to form something so great that it is almost indescribable! Now throw it all away and add some racsism, hate, anger, depression, frustration, nausea, Adiction, crime, violence, RUSSIANS, and any other Evil thing that you might want to mention... THAT is Dota... but you will love it... and you will paly it... and no matter how hard you try to stop, you can't... it will crawl into your dreams... make you cry at school... destroy everything you love, and take a huge **** on your computer as you start developing Rejection Symptoms from staying at the Rehab and not being able to spend the rest of your misrable day clicking away until you finally die in your chair... 10/10 \(^^)/ Brilliant Game
KELUANG MAN;-;THORBAEK!
PlatinumIslands;-;The community is so internationally vulgar prepare to learn bad words in every langauge.
3/3? More like O/P;-;Icefraud's next installment of Doto, made by volvo and cleverly titled Doto 2, combines good gramepray from Doto and the good gramphics from volvo's sauce engine to prove to be a great game. From the michael skills required to play meepo, to the intense consistancy of kotl smelling innocent people in lane and finally balsting them with horses, Icefraud proves to have great character design the Doto and Doto 2 alike.   _  Thanks, Volvo.
Ash Freeman;-;You can get rektarino in the anusarino by spaghettarino with meatballarinos from 3 places and you can become fluent in russian after just 2 weeks of gameplay. And GABEN really wants ur money for cool sweg. I giff dis 9/11
LearnSomeSkill;-;Amazing game, So much better that League of Legends. 10/10 Would recommend to anyone.
huk;-;I love Dota2 I can`t stop playing Dota 2 I would marry Dota 2 I want babies from Dota 2 When my tummy makes whale noise i still play Dota 2 I spend all day with Dota 2 I wacth Dota 2 everyday how she/he looking sexy :D never changes I see in dota 2 players playing same heros everytime that why Dota2 never changes I would like to spend all my life playing Dota 2 even when i 60+ :D Dota 2 is my Gf :D and i dont care what people say Dota 2 changed your life and yours you cant say no to dota2 Dota 2 is my life 22222222222
Dankrand;-;a tool to see how much you've wasted your life, hated other people, lost faith and made new enemies 10/10 would techies again
Bram Stoker;-;Dota 2 is the best game for me :)
Her0;-;This is the best moba game ever the graphich are good.i reccomend this game.
Rekt;-;Love this game
Mr.HustledBumpkins;-;This game may have eaten my life, I may have a horrid addiction. I might even be stretching for 2000 hours on the horizon. But that's all okay when you get a rampage as Enigma.
Somewhat of a douchebag;-;It's dota... If you liked the first one you'll probably like this one. If you didn't like the first one you'll probably like this one anyway. If you don't like mobas I can't help ya there.
it burns when I pee;-;Ruined my social life. Thought I'd uninstall it and concentrate on having a social life. Had a proper social life for a bit. Started playing again because I thought everything would be okay now. Never in my life have I been so wrong. Social life destroyed once again. 11/10.
Mr.Kibo;-;This is a good game. :D
Peter Fisher;-;Needless to say. Once u play MOBA game. U must try Dota 2 first
UNIVERSE #TeamEG;-;great game
GG-3883;-;Be careful! This game is addictive, is not a joke!
No one needs to know;-;I have anger issues now. 10/10
Little Rookie;-;Very good game. It has a big learning curve, but worth the try.
Omar Oh LaLa;-;the best game...i very like dota 2
Rusty;-;Amazing game, everyone should try it. Only thing you will see me play :* I also learned from a friend that everyone who speaks spanish is mexican. Additionally, it ruins your life and make you forget that time exists until its 2 in the morning and you need to wake up in an hour.
:MLP: Fluttershy;-;Best game I have ever played takes a couple... hundred hours to get good
Carlos!;-;The core mechanics of this game are fantastic, and the diversity of gameplay is a strong selling point. However, it is a multiplayer game, and the matchmaking is one of the worst I have ever come across. It does not matter how long you've played, or what level you are (level is a good indicator of time/experience), you will be matched with complete noobs and elite players alike. This is an attempt to "balance" the teams, but all it does is create a scenario in which 95% or more (no exaggeration) of the games played are one sided stomps. There's already been numerous complains about region locking, I will not expand upon anything said by others. It is a team game that requires communication, and yes, it's difficult when a team mate does not speak the same language as you. Regardless of that, language is not the main problem. The main problem with Dota 2 matchmaking is the enforced 50% winrate. Valve fanboys and other people will claim it does not exist, but anybody who has played the game long enough knows otherwise. It works by judging your skill level in one game, and placing you with "appropriate" players in the next game. If you do very well, you may be matched with 4 very inexperienced players. If you do poorly, you may be matched with 4 very experienced players. This wouldn't be a problem if Dota 2 was not such a complicated game; new players will be absolutely destroyed due to their lack of knowledge. At the time of writing this, I am level 50 in the game. This has taken me over 1000 hours to achieve, to put my next point in perspective. As I said, most games are one-sided stomps, and to prove this I usually check out the levels of every player before or after the game. In games that I win, my team usually consists of players lvl 50-300. In games that I lose, my team usually consists of players lvl 1-50. (Yes, I've actually had a few games with lvl 1 players, while I was lvl 30+) When the total level of players on one team is hundreds higher than the other, something is clearly wrong with the matchmaking system. When one team has a few thousand more total hours played than the other, something is clearly wrong with the matchmaking system. Playing well in one game will almost certainly cause you to lose the next game, unless you are on what I like to call a "Valve permitted streak" wherein the matchmaking decides to pair you with good players, or awful players, for a number of games in a row. Yes, Valve actually punishes players for doing too well, and rewards players for losing too much. A typical week of Dota2 matches might look something like this: WWWWWLWLWLWLLLLLL repeating (there can be longer or shorter streaks, this is just an example) This is not to alleviate myself (or any player) of fault, everybody makes mistakes and we are not all professional players. However, when the teams are grossly imbalanced as explained above, the fate of the match is decided before it even begins. The reason I keep playing is those 5% of games, where both teams are equally matched, and the game is actually fun/challenging. Winning a game in under 20min because the other team are mostly noobs? Not fun. Same goes for losing when its your turn on the noob team. If Valve ever fixed the matchmaking, this game would be amazing both mechanically and socially. That will probably never happen because Dota2 has a lot of players, and matchmaking isn't easy to begin with. But please, anything would be better than the 50% enforced winrate that is ruining my (and many others) desire to play this game. If I know I'm going to lose/win every game for the next 3 days, why bother playing at all? P.S. The community is notoriously toxic, I would recommend avoiding if you have thin skin or get frustrated easily.
rarroza;-;It's an awesome game, have a lot of strategy in different kinds of heroes and you'll surely enjoy it.
Digger nicks;-;Howt oto play dota: uy have to kill nyx vassaasin then u have to kill dsagon with sopectral blade and when y get spedctral balde u get heart fingg afet eafter that u kill basrraackas and tureteass and then u pick taht stupid man u play in mid he is called something weeith mage and je is op sa afak and after that u kill nexus fing i cant rememrber what is called btut i fink is called no igive uypo i doint know what is caleld and u have to read dis wgole finkg and if u fo i give u 1+03012+423498 crones in daniosh hotdogs and xl poelase breafg
Poop Mist;-;League of Legends.
Vikkemon;-;I have lost good friends because of this game.
America;-;Unplayable game sucks ballsacks on a sunday morning harder then your dad.
zdik!;-;DOTA 2 where saying LOL makes your hero laugh.
Aphotic;-;pick it up(Download DotA) take me back home, yeah(Buy TP when u get out of base nab!) there is nothing fair in this world(PA crits 15%, yeah SURE!) there is nothing safe in this world(Rikimaru safe farm, Slardar blink/bash) and there's nothing sure in this world(NeverMore 1100GPM) and there's nothing pure in this world(Rotund'jere Heartstopper Huskar likes) look for something left in this world(Jungle creeps says: what?) start again(Looking for match with high priority) come on, it's a nice day for a round of dotka before drink shots of vodka --Billy & PAC
Sheriffi;-;Annoying Russians!!
kurerunoshikaku;-;Life Ruiner Simulator 2014 420/420 recommended
tom new york [LM0];-;Once upon a time, there was this one short arab kidd and for confidentiallity we'll change his name to Bigran. Now this kid gifted this other short fat arab dota 2. This arab thought it was the worst game in existence, but Bigran thought it was his mother. The fat arab went up to his father and said "Hey daddy! Why dont you go  yourself" and the daddy said "Well you know something son, I CAN!" Then the father proceeded to shove his  up his  and said, "Oh yeah, all i need is butter!" The fat arab got scared and ran away and sat at his computer desk. Bigran told him "My dad did that too, dota 2 is the only escape" and thats where my life ended.... The first character i played was meepo in a ranked game and i did so well, I went 0/12. I decided to main meepo, and everytime i would get 0/14. Sometimes i would get a kill so i would leave the game because it made me really happy. Earlier i spent 30$ dollars on an item (money well spent). I love this game. I rate this game (1/14) based on my k/d GGEZ
JUICCYYYYY;-;I had a life before this game... I had a wife and 3 beautiful kids but they left me... and now all that keeps me warm at night is my legendary items
Adzy;-;US East is my favourite Russian server to play on.
oneOAK;-;Best Game Ever! Enough said xD
PedaL*kA=D;-;Good game,Dota together forever
Ataraxis;-;If you ever felt the need to learn the rich vocabulary of the Russian language for free, here's your chance.
The Grand Mist`;-;Good game, best hero is Axe hands down.
Hustler;-;BEST GAEM EVER MADE 10/10 WOULD PLAY AGAIN EVERY SINGLE MATCH YOU SUPPOSED TO CARRY 4 BRAINDEAD 4K MMR TRASH PLAYERS :)))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))) THX FOR GAME ICEFRAUD HOPE YOU WILL DIE WITH CANCER =)))))))
A Custard Cream;-;Guide to living the good life in dota: 1) Either learn russian or get a group of friends who speak your language. 2) dont play riki or pudge 3) don't grow any s otherwise your life will be ruined by this game. 4) "noob mirana, uninstall!" Good luck out there scrubs. you will need it.
Ez Katka;-;Best game. Being called c.y.k.a every game, would 100% Recommend, Game of the year every year 10/10, Russians in every server, but non in russians servers.... -_-, but seriously Love this game would buy even if it was 100$ xD.
zjin;-;This is a great example of how good games that are free can be. Dota is best described as so, "Easy to learn, difficult to master." I have over 450 hours on Dota and barely scratched the surface. It's an experience to learn each individual hero, master them and get better as you play more and more. Getting better is what this game is all about, are you a leader, a follower, a team player? At 107 heroes the choices are lengthy and will take you an eternity to play them all and its impossible to master every single hero. The community is a turn-off for some people because they may have run into unfriendly people, this is not the case for me, I choose to ignore anyone who doesn't want to play as a team and have a good time while doing so. I recommend that everyone should play Dota at least once, you'll thank me later. 9/10
Fredda;-;This game taught me about the diversity of cultures that our small little corner of the universe offers. Then it taught me to hate them all.
Chrome;-;Side effects include: -Hatred of other humans -Lack of trust in others -Carpal Tunnel -Improved hand eye coordination -A large ego -Weight gain -Weight loss -Confidence -Despression -Extreme Racism -EXTREME RACISM -Increased strategic thinking capabilities -Mushy-brain syndrome -Subconsciously learning a new language -Subconsciously learning to hate the culture of said language -Literally every ailment that is not a transmitable disease 9/10 Doctors accepted this game on their recommendation list, but the tenth was afk
Grizzt;-;It's like roulette; fun until it turns into Russian.
psych0tic;-;Causes anxiety problems, low self esteem, Tourette's syndrome, mood swings, Bipolar disorder, breakdown of relationships, raging erections, racism. Would definitely recommend.
Sentimental Oriental;-;In Dota 2, Not many people speak your language. Not many people play well. Not many people talk nicely. Not many people work as a team. But if you find people that do... You'll have the most fun you've ever had.
Kyubashi;-;And you thought real life was a struggle.
ephir;-;I only played a little but it was fun.
Captain Obvious;-;Things I gave to DotA: 1. Money 2. Time 3. Love Things DotA gave me: 1. Arthritis 2. Carpal tunnel syndrome 3, Hatred of Russians, Mexicans, Spanish, Finnish, and Russians 4. Broken keyboard 5. Broken mouse 6. 9/10 ready 7. Server crashes 8. 4 stacks of Russians in EUW servers on English prefrence settings 9. Ranked matches 10. Free to play but Pay to win games (I.E. - Foreseer's contract, New Bloom 2015) 11. "It's in the bag" spam (especially Skywrath) 12. Multilingual cursing - I guess this is a good thing? 13. Split second math - Reliable/Unreliable gold and gold loss on death vs. Buyback availability - This is good too Essentially - DotA is a greedy woman, but I love her all the same. 11 / 10 would play again
HekaDooM;-;"THE PUB SUPPORT" "Where are wards?" The pub Carry demanded. "I placed them and they were countered" the Support began, "I am trying to juggle giving you complete lane farm, protecting you and harrassing the enemy while saving to buy more, also possibly sentries to remove their-" "UP COUR PLS" the mid hero politely added. "Give Savle" The Carry demanded. "Certainly." replies the support, using the salve on the Carry who subsequently ran headlong into an enemy creepwave. "So where is mek?" the Carry said, after he was ganked due to overextending. The Support died saving him and was treated to a rather enthusiastic series of map pings on his corpse. "Again, having not even enough to buy boots as well as wards, I don't think a 7 minute Mek is viable." The Support replies. "Haha look your level, so low, noob" the Carry retorted. "U have no item xaxa". "Well, jungle gold and experience through stacking and pulling with blocked camps is nowhere near as much as on lane which I attempted to give you, the carry, the priority over." The Carry is subsequently ganked again at the enemy tower, oblivious to the enemy tp that the Support moved away from. "Report Support, usless" The carry cried in allchat, in between mentioning various aspects of the Support's Mother's anatomy. "Instead of reporting and acting like that, why don't you try supporting for randoms sometime instead of instapicking a carry?" the Support asked, as he watched the Carry return to afk-lasthitting lane creeps. "HAH, support is for noskill noobs like you!"
flanadlivv;-;One day, a wise man intoduce me into this game. "it shall protect your virginity, my lad" he said.
WeekendBoss;-;I was xX420Xxquickscoped from across the map by a pink midget who then said something about peeping. 11/10 immersive real time strategy game.
CvPxS;-;This game is going to be the #1 e-Sport; No doubt. The best multiplayer game ever!
16 and pregnant;-;It's ok.
A43;-;Hey...stop...dont install! with this game u cant do any work! i dont have now any gf...work... and so on. alone ...and playing dota 2 !
-BaRaD;-;Community based on russian and korean people
Rocky and Mugsy;-;Game full of bitter hateful people that can't work together as a team. Will make you unavoidably racist against the following countries: Brazil, Peru, Russia, anywhere that speaks Spanish, anyone that doesn't speak English. Also, possibly more addicting than crack cocaine, and will destroy your life.
Freon;-;this game i hate it
S Az.Diamante`Hawk;-;This is an awesome and addicting game with many features to notice. The game being updated every day makes it even better! Experience new games modes and additional events daily. But dont miss it! Everything moves fast! -- The gameplay is sick... as is awesome sick because there is always a new way of playing - you can play over 100 characters and each having their own 4-6 abilities! New matchmaking from over to America to Russia (if you want) - you can specifically find a match anywhere of your choosing. And don't worry, there are a lot of people out there to play against. The way even the Main Menu is set up is astounding just because... actually that one i messed up. Anyways, this game is amazing to play, that why I play the game a lot- its just that fun! This game is also cool because it can improve so many things that you wouldn't think of... or would have thought of. I DONT KNOW YOU. This game improves hand - eye coordination (very well) and improves your speed of processing. Even though you may not be well concentrated on the outside world, in one of ANY world you will have great concentration. Also, even though there are hateful Russians that will never speak you language no matter what you want and no matter what you care and no matter how much teamwork you need and no matter who you are fighting... you will learn to not hate them after a while. It took me 5 hours to learn dota, 700 hours not to hate them, and 5000 (all accounts combined [sorry valve I only have 2 accounts >_<]) hours to start recording and being successful in life - for once, jk lol. Community is a big problem in this game but you will learn to love it when you get with those nice people on the mics! Or those guys with music playing... or static... yeah. Hope you found this helpful, just know that you will learn this quite quickly about this game and you will especially learn it is amazing and fun and addicting!
Time;-;Good game, but will take control of your life.
beatka;-;Fun and addicted to it. My life not ruined by this game at all. 10/10
Stahpz;-;If you want to learn Russian for free. This is the Game for you!  Blet.
Tails' Cash Explosion;-;I had no idea what I was doing, but the graphics and art style were infinitely more appealing than League of Legends, so I'd pick this any day. Too bad my friends are  that can't handle the concept of playing more than one game at a time.
give me ur weed;-;VERY NAICE GAME I RECEIVE A BONER
404;-;Having never played the original DotA or League of Legends, I happened upon this game in my library and was originally going to just ignore it and play TF2. However, I decided to install it and give it a try....well needless to say, I'm hooked. This is easily one of the most awesome, strategic games out there. The fact that Valve took it over and made it incredibly similar to TF2 (backpack, cosmetic items, using item rarities from TF2 such as Strange, Genuine, Unusual, Vintage)....well I don't pay much attention to that stuff because I get so easily lost in gameplay and completely forget about HATS HATS HATS. The inclusion of the ability to watch live tournaments is just plain awesome and it's the type of thing I would normally avoid, but I find myself unable to stop watching live tourneys just to see what the "pros" do, so I can hopefully pick up some skills myself. If I had to give anyone three words of advice, those words would be PLAY. THIS. GAME.
Crime Sorciere;-;Amazing beats any MOBA
MIK;-;really love this game
Teddy;-;Great game for friends to play + its free with many heroes to pick from get it! and you wont regret it
VH.Sprinkles;-;This game will, irrespectively of political beliefs and opinions on social equality, make you hate Russians and Brazillians. 10/10 would be told I am a feeder for going 7/3/30 with a support again.
Ongs;-;I just checked my hrs record. HELP
LowProEmoQ;-;Very fun game with lots of good players, and plenty of peruvians, if you wanna learn swears in Russian and Spanish this is the game for you
Mirrorfix;-;i recommend league of legends to everyone
Dhana.;-;Will always be my favorite game
Mr.Dear Insanity;-;1) Step get "Hours of fun, all you have to do is select in which Russia you want to play today!" 2) Step it "Causes anxiety problems, low self esteem, tourette's syndrome, mood swings, bipolar disorder, breakdown of relationships, raging erections, racism. Would definitely recommend." 3) Step your ed "Ruined my life 10/10 best game"
ShiaSurprise;-;This game is amazing! Dota 2 does great homage to Dota 1 in that it hasn't alienated itself from what made the original so fun. The game is always evolving which keeps the meta-game fresh. There are tons of cosmetics and other things now that you can buy, trade, or get through random drops to show off to your friends. Did I mention that it is free? There's no reason not to play Dota 2 unless you're some sort of LoL/HoN/Smite/Infinite Crisis fanboy. To each his own though.
Coonman, Negroid Incarnate;-;It's pretty yeah. i give it a 9/11, praise gaben.
Intelligent Heavy;-;Did you ever want to learn Russian? Maybe the ancient language of Portugese? Or are you a person who takes joy from their own suffering. Regardless of the reason you will love Dota 2 which combines the fun of a torture apparatus and the educational aspects of Rosetta Stone. 1337/10 Would do the dew again.
OsaKi i;-;The most addictive game there is. amazing
D3ath pUnK;-;This is an awesome game..But u have to be very smart and intelligent to play it. Otherwise it's the number one best strategy game i ever played!!
-BaRaD;-;Community based on russian and korean people
Freon;-;this game i hate it
Rocky and Mugsy;-;Game full of bitter hateful people that can't work together as a team. Will make you unavoidably racist against the following countries: Brazil, Peru, Russia, anywhere that speaks Spanish, anyone that doesn't speak English. Also, possibly more addicting than crack cocaine, and will destroy your life.
Coonman, Negroid Incarnate;-;It's pretty yeah. i give it a 9/11, praise gaben.
Suspicious;-;Was the rookie of the year in this game
Tiffany Alvord;-;very nice, best game ever :)
PianoNewb;-;Sometimes I forget to eat and go to the bathroom. 10/10
rabbiddolphin8;-;The Best Language learning tool for the money 11/10 Vai jogar novamente
BlithePainter;-;I love the game It is something different as graphics dont matter the game is fun and enjoyable Maybe apart from the trolls and that but if you ignore them and have fun then the game is fun Good Luck Have Fun on dota people
N4Gs Beiber Fever;-;If addictions are your thing, download this game.
Bootylicious;-;This game always keeps me busy one of the best MOAB games out there<3
[TB] SmaukE;-;Why play other games when you can play the best. This is the best game of Valve and Steam! So why even think to play something else? When you know the answer come to tell :) Love this. I can play this for many and many hours if i want. If you haven't play yet, play this and be suprised how good is that. So this is the best game what people have ever made. One thing more - items! It's so awesome when you can collect items, sets, everything! Here's all what do you need: announcers, multikill banner, HUD skins, loading screens... Fantastic game! 6/5
WebraX;-;You want to lose your job,friends, family and get fat? Then this game is perfect for you! 11/10
Outlawz Makaveli;-;good but only problem is ING RUSSIANS EVERY ING SERVER ,EVEN ENGLISH SERVERS WHERE THEY CANT SPEAK AN SINGLE WORD OF ENGLISH , GET THEM OUT OF THERE, THEY ARE  EVERYONE, THEY GOT OWN SERVERS
rabbiddolphin8;-;The Best Language learning tool for the money 11/10 Vai jogar novamente
VNM-30;-;IZ MEH! BUT FRRH!
PianoNewb;-;Sometimes I forget to eat and go to the bathroom. 10/10
BlithePainter;-;I love the game It is something different as graphics dont matter the game is fun and enjoyable Maybe apart from the trolls and that but if you ignore them and have fun then the game is fun Good Luck Have Fun on dota people
Bearduardo;-;I hate this game
Microsoft Word;-;I've put well over $200, I like the game. Don't get me wrong. There is one thing that Valve has a problem with, making balanced multiplayer games. There are SO many over powered heroes, it's not even funny. Valve, you really have ed up with this new update. Now it's always a Huskar or Slark in a lobby that wrecks face and you do nothing about it.
bunhead;-;Volvo give me back my social life!
dalsoon;-;Hey!! This is my Dota2 review. I will be listin pros cons and the overall rating. Pros --------------- Smooth gameplay Cool hero design Awesome voice acting. Storm Spirit <3 NaVi Dendi. (Lol) Alliance And more cool stuff i cant think off atm. Cons ---------------- Most russians Tryhards Cheap pubstomp heroes Honestly is this game the most popular game in Russia??? (Not meant offensively; But most russians are really annoying.) Lack of english players. You dont know how much of a pain it is to have a team that dont understands you. Overall rating = 8.9 / 10 Game recommended!!
1000boa;-;The best game in the whole world!
[OKW] Hitler's best friend;-;It have the worst Community, avoid at all cost also latin americans are everywhere even if you set your language preference to english. 0/10 would end up hearing a Latin american ing about how do i play.
Limondov Joe;-;First lie in Dota2: "All heroes are balanced"
Edek;-;Epic game but too much Russians on European/English servers.
Nagato BOT;-;feeding simulator 2015 2.0
MattLancer;-;A scripted but fun Point and Click adventure game. You travel to far off lands like Russia and Brazil. The puzzles can be tough but just use a walkthrough and you should be fine.
dunk;-;ruined my life, five stars
Casimer the Adequately Skilled;-;Overextended. Was ganked by the enemy courier.
Masco;-;Okay well about two years after my first review I thought it was a good time to revisit this. This is by far the best"free" game out there(I have spent too much money on tourney tickets and .) And any of you losers still playing League of Legends really need to take a step back and think about your life. Are you ever going to take off the training wheels and step up your game? Probably not, because you've become too used to "baby's first dota" and the thought of having access to all the heroes is too daunting and youd rather only have the small pool of "free" heroes to select from. Because you don't like having fun. And you like spending money on things that should have been free from the start. If you dont want to buy cosmetics or tourney tickets then all this game will cost you is your sanity and your faith in the human race. 11/10 would sacrifice firstborn to continue to play
Franz;-;very good game will destroy friendship
KOHAKU;-;Free To play This Game Play Now
Captain Nonsense;-;The best thing about DOTA 2 is its player vs player action. The worst thing about DOTA 2 is its player vs player interaction. All and all great game 10/10
Lord Doge;-;More addictive than coccaine
Ho Li PRO;-;the best game ever!
FLEEK;-;Full of Peruvians and Brazilians and Russians and antigamers. game is bad 8/10
NewBorn;-;top listed game to play
Demon Eater;-;the most popular onlien game
Majlon;-;Game is good, it has potential .. but players are in most cases immature, angry, rude kids
./.;-;very nice game
SkylarLeonhart;-;i like the graphics and effects
Ib.;-;This is a fun game
Zero-One;-;Great game, would recommend to my friends. Besides the fact that its free-to-play, getting your friends to play, (or making new friends) is key unless you want to be stuck with annoying players who kick you for being insolent. Anyways, the community is far from perfect, but it isn't downright horrible either. It is in my opinion, pretty decent to say the least. 11/10 stole my friend's life and my life. He spent over a lot on this game.
Doge;-;Here a list of what benefit you would get while playing Dote2 : -Made you realise that the term "teamwork" is literally just a 8 letter words. -Learn Different language with each matchs play (Up to 9 language per-game). The most recommended language learning tools. -A best way if you have too much friends and want to lose some.. just invite them playing together for 1 match. Guaranted. -Get abused by a totally stranger and learn how to abuse them too. -Give you a dream about startin a DIGITAL SPORT PRO-TEAM. yeah go on, ASSEMBLE your team and start feedin.err i mean practicing today. 11/10 would play again. oh did i mention that this is also report simulator ? P.S : Mid or Feed.
Haemus;-;It started with an innocent how to play video. Then a few more matches. Then a few more. And then a blur and I suddenly have 139 hours logged in a months time. I think I am starting to look like Lifestealer from all the time I have spent slouched over playing this game. 10/10 would play again
hrl.exe;-;I do not want to be a troll, but recently I have left behind LoL to start playing DOTA2, and I do not regret this decision, since it has more in-depth at every fight when compared to LoL. Sure the community seems a bit more toxic then LoL's but I can get used to it, since all the time I do not write in chat and mute the flamers and wannabe's. Playing with friends it's more fun then alone and more rewarding, especially the events or being in a team. One thing I do not like about the game is the cost of the skins and items for the events. They are way to pricey. But on the other hand there is always discounts at the shop. To mention that the graphics are amazing and optimized since it is running on the SOURCE engine. See you on the battlefield champion! PS: If you want to do SOLO rankings prepare to learn Russian and how to delete DOTA from Steam. Do that at your own risk but I strongly suggest playing with friends.
WUT DE FACK;-;yes this is the best game ever
PrefiX;-;Its good but it takes forever to get good at it P.S. if your not good at it the good player will just report you because there s... so its a good game but the community is ...your welcome
solidPEAR;-;Alright so when i first got the game i thought cool, but now everytime im not playing it my computer starts showing me pictures of hitler, spams the  sound and keeps opening and closing the disc tray if im not ingame. 6000000/6000000
Zazama;-;litterally the best game ever, thats all i need to say
CryptoLocker;-;If you want a game where you can organize fights and win 100% of the time with strangers. This is not for you. Aside from the constant trash talk and a very long losing streak it is quite and enjoyable game. For the first hundred games you will probably the feeder or the one everyone wants to pass the blame on. But as you get past that you either play your role to win or lose. Want to learn some basic russian or perhaps some random language you never even heard of before. This is the game you komrad. Oh yes you can always report random people for absolutely no reason LOL!
Anon;-;best moba there is!
iH2O;-;DotA 2 is a multiplayer online game in develop by Valve Corporation and the stand alone version of Defense of the Ancient mod on Warcraft 3: Reign of Chaos and Warcraft 3: The Frozen Throne . DotA 2 officially announced on October 13, 2010, at the time of people who can play DotA 2 is limited, only certain people are getting special rights of the Developer and Distributor. DotA 2 was not like other online games that bermode Click and Play, DotA 2 requires another program to be patchernya, namely Steam. The purpose of DotA 2 is destroying ancient opponents protected by other players. Here, players will choose one of 98 heroes that exist. Each hero has different abilities and strengths, this is what makes DotA 2 stressful. As a real-time strategy game, players are required to be able to decide the action as soon as possible if you do not want to die or lose. Gameplay Gameplay of DotA 2 is a combination of real-time strategy with top-down perspective, and also system-level and system equipment adapted from role-playing game . The game is divided into two teams, the Radiant and the Dire. Each team has a hero, respectively, with their respective strengths, but the player can determine the game mode to be played so that the players can use the Radiant team The hero of The Dire team, and vice versa. Players are required to quickly determine the action to be performed when pressed, otherwise the player will die and will provide benefits to the hero who killed him. The more kills, the player is getting rich, and vice versa, the more killed, players will lack the gold so it can not upgrade the item itself. DotA 2 is a team game, not a solo game, because if you want to solo do not play DotA, go play chess. Therefore, it's useless if only one hero who has a hero equip decent but the other does not, the team will definitely lose. This game teaches us that we can not stand alone without the help of others, especially the help from our friends. Players Type Server Dota 2 In Southeast Asia People are always calling other people as Pinoy Pinoy is slang for the Philippines. For unknown reasons why, if you have people like this in the game so if something goes wrong then you will be called Pinoy by this person. No matter where you come from countries, such as Indonesia, Malaysia or Singapore you will still be called Pinoy. Such people will assume Pinoy is a person who can not play the game without seeing meraka national origin. People who are considered by the other players as Pinoy It does not matter if you're Filipino or not, if you make a mistake then you will automatically be Pinoy. This may not be too offended if the person who made a mistake is the Philippines. Although the Philippines has a bad reputation in Dota 2, but not all Filipinos will admit it. Filipino nationalists are people who, if they were heckled by pinoy call then they will become more aggressive. So I think you should focus on their mistakes rather than calling him Pinoy. People who do Crowing Bottle selfishly until the end of the game Bottle crowing is a technique used to increase the survivability, especially in the middle lane and it was fine. That is not cool is to do it at the extreme stage. Do you have to be selfish bottle crowing from the beginning to the end of the game? Why? Although the role of support you are, you realize that I also need a courier? For example, for the wards? Do you realize that there are 4 other people who also need their items? If you make the team overwhelmed just because you need a bottle crowing to survive until the end of the game then I think you should review again the way you play this game. People from Europe or North America who complain about lag No such thing as dedicated servers. I know it. But sooner or later you will meet the person who decided to play the game on the server that is located in another part of the earth. It is not wrong because the rules do not prohibit it. I even tried to queuing at the European servers to play with friends there. But if you experience lag during play because choosing a server far away there then stop complaining or worse pause hoping lagnya lost. People who pretend to be someone Singapore or Malaysia With the purpose of pretending to be a person of Singapore or Malaysia, people like this will continue to add "le" or "la" every time he says something. And I mean absolutely everything ("Top la! B la! Nice la! GGWP la!"). How do I know that there are people who pretend to be like this? Because I know some of them. Why do they do it? I do not know for sure. If they want to retrace the footsteps of Daryl "iceiceice" Cai Yee Koh or "Mushi" then they need to be more than just wearing this access. People Pinoy I'm actually not sure whether to be a player from the Philippines could fall into this category. But if you think about it I have never heard of the other players in Southeast Asia servers invoked with the country of origin besides Pinoy. This may be because the Pinoy has a way of "unique" in the play and "act" in pubs. It all comes back to you to consider whether the Pinoy is a bad player or not. But the bright side is, they are quite "creative" in play Dota. They just need guidance in the right direction and sometimes a reality punch when #PinoyPride syndrome relapse ("Pinoy Doto, Best Doto"). This review translatable in Google Translate
Doge;-;Here a list of what benefit you would get while playing Dote2 : -Made you realise that the term "teamwork" is literally just a 8 letter words. -Learn Different language with each matchs play (Up to 9 language per-game). The most recommended language learning tools. -A best way if you have too much friends and want to lose some.. just invite them playing together for 1 match. Guaranted. -Get abused by a totally stranger and learn how to abuse them too. -Give you a dream about startin a DIGITAL SPORT PRO-TEAM. yeah go on, ASSEMBLE your team and start feedin.err i mean practicing today. 11/10 would play again. oh did i mention that this is also report simulator ? P.S : Mid or Feed.
Joe;-;very game much fun
TehStick;-;game is hard
Countess_Vampyra;-;dota 2 has changed my life to be patient,commited,punctual and etc
Nagato BOT;-;feeding simulator 2015 2.0
Bear Grylls gets bare grills.;-;As addictive as crack cocaine.Don't let Rob Ford get his hands on this.
Mse;-;grestest game that i played
[z^*^]  L  _;-;I like dota 2 and my lovely game... I like to trade items... I like to watch tournaments... I like to bet items... That why i played dota2...
Frood;-;realy good my mum luvs this its realy educatinal i like it all my freind say im good at the game and that makes me feel nice and i want to keep playing for aaaaages and my freinds does too and we always laugh and smile when we win
WINSTONWOLF;-;SIMPLY THE MOST PERFECT GAME TO EVER GRACE THIS PLANET.
antigamer;-;I lost my life and my family to this game but it is ok for I am chad ~Chad
Octavia Melody;-;Steam-  -     .
CURE!;-;I haven't played much, it seems okay so far.
SURPRISE MOTHERFUCKER !!!;-;this game so great, I love this game, everybody should play this game, this game so immortal, youll meet another people in another country, have friends, teamworks, full of fun and so much more !!
Ben Dover #AFK;-;Nice game , you must try it ;)
Wei;-;No quick scope, no jumping, no pot breaking, no one shotkill backstabbing? What kind of modern game is this? If I want to play a games with friends where everyone hates each other, I'd rather play Mario Kart. You can beat this game in 30 minutes to an hour, but a lot of people have over 1000 hours, they must really suck or something. Thankfully it's free, or else I wouldn't pay a single cent for this. And also I don't get why there are 107 characters. Why can't there just be one ultimate character and just play it through? And ultimately, why am I forced to learn Russian or Portuguese in order to understand half of this game? 10/10, would not place any wards again.
Osis;-;Dota 2 = 10 people thinking they are the best one and blaming their mistakes on others.
WINSTONWOLF;-;SIMPLY THE MOST PERFECT GAME TO EVER GRACE THIS PLANET.
whitneymiller;-;great game
Ben Dover #AFK;-;Nice game , you must try it ;)
Wei;-;No quick scope, no jumping, no pot breaking, no one shotkill backstabbing? What kind of modern game is this? If I want to play a games with friends where everyone hates each other, I'd rather play Mario Kart. You can beat this game in 30 minutes to an hour, but a lot of people have over 1000 hours, they must really suck or something. Thankfully it's free, or else I wouldn't pay a single cent for this. And also I don't get why there are 107 characters. Why can't there just be one ultimate character and just play it through? And ultimately, why am I forced to learn Russian or Portuguese in order to understand half of this game? 10/10, would not place any wards again.
Psycho;-;Nice game. .
Roger;-;SIMPLY THE GREATEST LANGUAGE LEARNING TOOL ON THE INTERNET. ROSSETA STONE CAN  ITSELF. LEARN TO SPEAK SPANISH, RUSSIAN, AND PORTUGUESE FOR THE LOW LOW PRICE OF YOUR SELF-ESTEEM, SANITY AND FAITH IN OTHERS. 10/10 WOULD PLAY 1000 MORE HOURS
Feederino;-;Everything from the previous DotA is in here, with changes in UI and key mapping makes it easier to get addicted to, but I hope that Techies, Phoenix & Arc Warden will be featured soon enough!
InvoKaeL;-;Dota 2 is more better about the visual and effect...!
Iron_wofle;-;The game itself is good, but the community, like in all dota-likes, is . Still better than LoL, but that doesn't take much. I would only play with good friends unless you can put up with the kind of "it's only fun if you win" mentality most players have here. If you want to play public games, better be ready to be harrassed, verbally abused, blamed and overall treated like you're the worst scum humanity has to offer. Because somehow, these games bring out the very worst in people. Lousy community aside, the gameplay is solid, the game looks nice, and the heroes are varied without becoming too unbalanced, so there's plenty of things to learn and see. Very much worth a play, especially considering it's free.
=BA= | The Vice;-;Best way to learn about new cultures. It also improves your vocabulary of swearing and teaches you new languages. 10/10 would never uninstall
OmniMean;-;Can't... stop.... playing.... Need... MORE!!!
Shakti;-;IT's the game of my life. Never before I bow at the many distinct chracteristic of every heroes. Battle is everchanging!
rtz fan;-;best single player game of 2013- IGN
Akashi;-;GG well played :D
ChinChan;-;this game makes me addicted
DoucheBag!;-;coooL
binktopia;-;Good game, everybody's should have to play this game. will addict you guys!
Pointex;-;You can understand russians in 2 weeks. 10/10
Denniz-;-;Im playing dota2 because i love to playing this and especiallly with my friends and we party together this game
NO GAME NO LIFE;-;This game Is better from Dota 1..that crap looking game have reborn into a flawless game ever
Puff Puff;-;Rage simulator. 5 misfits riding 1 bicycle! Do have a life? Forget it, now you have Dota 2 and rares!
SilverStinE;-;Game is really cool..... until now my best online gaming experience... !
DK's Lov3Rs;-;<3 this game
XelcyX;-;DOTA 2 is sport !!
div;-;How to English :D
lost;-;Made me hate Russia, Brazil, and Peru 10/10
DCL.Myst;-;I feel like my life is finally complete with Dota 2. It allows (almost) everyone to have a great time, make new friends, and to discover amazing skills, combos, strategies, and much more. By far the best game I've ever played. If you're looking at this now, get this game. You won't regret it. Good luck, and have fun!
Crystal Meth;-;one of the best game :)
Klemben;-;this game so cool
Lester the Child Molester;-;10/10 this game decided for me that I do not need a girlfriend!!
Ikaboom 4.0;-;It's ok
whitneymiller;-;great game
Masco;-;Okay well about two years after my first review I thought it was a good time to revisit this. This is by far the best"free" game out there(I have spent too much money on tourney tickets and .) And any of you losers still playing League of Legends really need to take a step back and think about your life. Are you ever going to take off the training wheels and step up your game? Probably not, because you've become too used to "baby's first dota" and the thought of having access to all the heroes is too daunting and youd rather only have the small pool of "free" heroes to select from. Because you don't like having fun. And you like spending money on things that should have been free from the start. If you dont want to buy cosmetics or tourney tickets then all this game will cost you is your sanity and your faith in the human race. 11/10 would sacrifice firstborn to continue to play
About a week ago;-;superly recommended this game for rts fan
VA.KuramaYoko;-;What can I say... - Awesome graphics - Awesome skills and spells - Awesome developer - Hard to learn - Replayable, replayable, replayable
stronk_pancake;-;-Pros: You can draw a  on the map. -Cons: Your teammates will report you for this. 9/10
KRUSTY KRAB PIZZA;-;only played a little bit but it seems fun
Mse;-;grestest game that i played
[z^*^]  L  _;-;I like dota 2 and my lovely game... I like to trade items... I like to watch tournaments... I like to bet items... That why i played dota2...
Lester the Child Molester;-;10/10 this game decided for me that I do not need a girlfriend!!
CURE!;-;I haven't played much, it seems okay so far.
SURPRISE MOTHERFUCKER !!!;-;this game so great, I love this game, everybody should play this game, this game so immortal, youll meet another people in another country, have friends, teamworks, full of fun and so much more !!
miyago;-;The complexity, variation, the reward for thinking outside and inside the box makes this one of the best games I have ever played.
IfShes9ShesMine;-;better than leauge of legends
About a week ago;-;superly recommended this game for rts fan
antigamer;-;I lost my life and my family to this game but it is ok for I am chad ~Chad
KTek4evar;-;11/10 would not Invoke again
EmitRedrum;-;Literally....this game can steal your life away if you let it.
Spinkledorf;-;No no, of course I'm not being told to write this review against my will. No one is standing behind by back with a gun talling me what to write. It is my own opinion that DOTA is in fact, leagues better than LoL (see what I did there), and no other party is swaying my thoughts. DOTA is love, DOTA is life. help me.
uun;-;Ain't nobody got time for that!
SO_[SeXy];-;This a Very GOOD GAME (Y)
'Mkay@Gone'till 27.7;-;GG, Until you meet game filled with russians.
Sweet dreams are made of memes;-;Dota 2 (Defence Of The Ancients 2) is a tactical game that requires alot of time and patience. In order to be good in Dota 2 (Or just enjoy it), you need time and determination because this game requires skill that you need to learn. I personally think this game requires more skill than LoL but games aren't always about skill . For me, it took me roughly 100 hours of gaming to start enjoying this game (which is roughly 200 games because each game is 35-55 minutes). So if you play Dota 2 for the first 3 hours and think "This is utter " then I wouldn't blame you because you don't understand how to play still. The positives of this game? A good to improve your leadership skills. A good way to make new friends or something you can do with your current friends. A great start of thinking tactically. A way just to kill time. The negatives of this game? A lot of time will go out the window. People will annoy you. (Known as feeders or just new players) Can be reptetive at times if you play the same hero over and over again. Unbalanced characters everywhere. Servers will put you with better players. For me, Dota 2 is my favourite game at the moment so it may change my views for the game. The teamwork in this game is crucial and I've said it before but the time you use on this game will never return to you. Overall, tactical game for gamers with patience. I rate 7/10.
Tom Hutchinson;-;It's Dota. It's can't be good.
sMx[A];-;Very good game, quite addictive. May look boring at the start because one doesnt know how to play though as you develop into better dota player you are bound to have fun. Awesome game overall.
B1G-CR1ME;-;Ten pounds of crap!
Sir Whiskeyngton;-;Get addicted and ruin your life! 10/10
Nini;-;i hate d game only coz of its ing updates.. and now my dota is not starting after an update it asked me to do... so i end up deleting this full of attitude game.. it can go  its low priority, its silly every second updates and all other laggy .. lol :P
espire;-;Made me racist towards Russians and Peruvians. 11/10, would play again.
`[TDF]` CPT Jack sparrow;-;this game is the best game u can ever burn ur boredness
[fireflame988];-;You know how an Italian chef kisses his fingers and says something in Italian that translates to "A masterpiece" after tasting their own dish? That's how I feel about this game.
TotalyMoo;-;Why do people get mad in Dota? I still don't get it, it's a game.
Akame;-;Awesome gameplay, great graphics, great sound acting, if your a MOBA fan, this is definetly worth the shot, the onyl sidetrack of the game is the players, if your playing this make sure your prepared to get insulted, trashtalked and verbally abused by anyone either by your teamates and enemies...Once you get the hang of the game, youll get hooked.. Warning : extremly addictive, so if your a student either a high school or college student, make sure to play it moderately or just to past the time, playing in subsequent amount of time will destroy your life...dota is both a game and a destroyer of a life of an individiual.
Zeubs;-;Great game! Steep learning curve though, really separates the new players from the veterans! All in all- 9/10 One problem...you can't jump :(
PaanZ;-;Deym this games is great (Y)~!
TN: Spartan;-;This is Br
MasterBaiter;-;one of the best game and popular in the world
Jaman Londo;-;this game so good
Joseph Stalin;-;This game has given me tourettes syndrome and made me into a racist. It destroys the last possibility of you seeing female breasts ever again, and it definitely ruined my life. 10/10 would recommend
Munchiechu;-;10/10 would listen to everyone rage again
Farmer Fedor;-;I recommend this game for all the gamers out there, It's like running your own business. Na aalala ko nga nung labas ko sa dati kong pelikula na kasma ko si Mr. Ronaldo Valdez,
LisiastyRFX;-;The best  Blyat simulator out there
Fresh Prince of Corneria;-;I shot lasers into somebody's butt and got money for it. Then my team yelled at me until I did it again. 10/10
Uncle Sweaty;-;Overview I would like to start by recommending this game. I think everyone should try this game for at least a game or two online before deveoping opinions for this game. Next I would say that Dota 2's not easy to get into, I admit, but once you start to do well on your own, you feel like you've actually acomplished something and that in itself makes you continue playing. Also I will use some terms you may not be familiar with. It'll take too long to explain them so find out for yourself. Gameplay/Game Mechanics Dota 2 has one of the largest learning curves I have ever encountered. I've played may games before which I was able to pick up pretty easily, but Dota's curve is disgustingly huge. I have friends who have played LoL for quite a long time - so they're familiar with how MOBA's work - but when I introduced them to Dota, they honestly didn't know what was going on. I'm not being rude to LoL or the community, but that's just how it was. From a basic level, there is as much going on in Dota compared to any other MOBA. However, when looking how the game mechanics work, one can see that there is a lot more. The more notable game mechanics are 'denying', destructible trees (evnironement), day and night cycle, and high-ground and low-ground. I wont go into any detail with them, but just those mechanics are enough to separate Dota from the other MOBA's. With 108 heroes (and counting) in the total hero pool, there is so much veriety to pick from. All heroes are unlocked straight away, which I consider better than having to unlock heroes after playing for a certain time. Others may disagree with this, saying that you 'work towards something when trying to unlock heroes', but I say being able to handle the difficulty of certain heroes is when you feel a sense of achievement. (Plus other MOBA's can just buy the locked heroes which defeats the whole point of that argument). Heroes like Meepo, Rubick, Invoker, Earth Spirit, require considerable skill to be able to play, which you work towards by playing other heroes first in the buildup. Gameplay itself will go from fast-paced action in team-fights - to slow, cautious waiting (sometimes strategic waiting sometimes not) waiting for the next pick-off or team-fight without being too reckless. Games can be as short as 20 minutes (that's quick in this genre) to as long as a whole hour. Sometimes, games can extend to over 1 1/2 hours just because it's a stalemate. Because of this, excitement will be a rollercoaster. It can be extremely fun, or painfully boring, though the lows shouldn't put you off; can a game really be fun all the time? A major patch gets released every season or so, which contains massive balance changes, alterations to gameplay, and possibly a new hero. This way, gameplay barely becomes stale, and provides you with a reason to logon to Steam and launch Dota 2 when you are bored. There is one problem when getting into this game: the tutorial. At best, it'll teach the basic mechanics of this game. At best. The game will 'force' you to play the tutorial depending on what options you choose when the game first asks you if you have any experience with the genre. Oh god, the tutorial is so boring that it cany throw you off playing completely. Not only that, it doesn't represent the actual game until you play a Limited Heroes game against bots, and even that can be mind-numbing because you're not playing against real people (when the fun starts). If you take this review to mind when you start playing, please endure the tutorial until you actually play online with/against real players. Matchmaking Matchmaking has been improved over time. With more language preferences and stricter rule on bad conduct, matchmaking is (very slowly) reaching the point where you will search for a game and actually find people with similar experience to you/your party whom also speak the same language and have relatively low ping. However: this does not stop people from other countries who do not speak English search with English checked as a language preference, and Europe West as their their desired server. What I'm tring to say is that Russians queue on English speaking servers when they cant even speak English. I would have no problem if they do actually speak English (and if they weren't so foul mouthed), but when I have no idea what they are saying it really hinders teamwork. A couple of Russians explained why they search on EU West servers: because the ping was lower. That's fair enough. I dont mind that. They speak English. But for those who don't, they can't seem to turn off the English language preference. If they turn off the preference and search on EU West, they'll be matched with other Russian-speaking players. Problem solved? No. Players Many players will co-operate when playing, as it is a team game, however many will not. This game is so diverse that everyone has therr own way of playing it, which can sometimes conflict with how you want to play. Don't be surprised when you somehow end up in an argument with a stranger just because they disagree with the slightest thing you think about a game which has no impact on your life whatsoever. Those of you may be thinking: "That will never happen to me!!!111 xD," you're wrong. Your online numeric skill (Matchmaking Rating, MMR) will determine the likelyhood of you running into these people. Higher = less likely. Lower = more likely. Note: MMR is independent between ranked and non-ranked. When getting your ranked MMR, it uses you invisible non-ranked MMR, but after the first game they become seperate values. Community The Dota community is mixed between: people like me who want to happily play the game, and trolls. I understand that there will be trolls in every community, but it's quite severe in this one. It's not that they are the majority, infact quite the opposite, but they do stain the community the colour of cancer (yellow/green?), which as a whole, may ruin the experience for some. By playing Dota 2, you automatically become part of its community, you you either make the most of it or gtfo. One positive thing about the community is that it's filled with amazing designers who frequently submit there work (may it be cosemtics or art) to the steam community page and on websites like reddit. This game actually provides revenue to designers who get there work added in-game, and the community get a say into what gets added. Also, the community is generally helpful when you need it: making guides/builds, answering people's questions, spamming /r/volvo around Diretide (cancelled last year :c ). So be sure to count on people when you need the extra support. [/h1]Final notes[/h1] Overall, Dota 2 is a really good game (my game time speaks for itself), but it's no where near perfect. The whole game is a rollercoaster - with so many highs and numerous lows - it's a game you would have to experience yourself. Please do not lauch it with the attitude "I've played other MOBA's it will be the same" becuase you'll be caught off-guard. Good luck, and have fun. Ratings +Gameplay +Game mechanics +Matchmaking* +Sense of achievement +Hats -Community -Players* -Matchmaking** -Learning Curve -Tutorial *Depends on your MMR. **Matchmaking will put you with other people with similar skill and experience to you, but there isn't a working filter for people who don't speak your desired language. 9/10 When you really get into it 7/10 Any 'casual' Dota player (there is no such thing as a casual Dota player) 5/10 If you never have a good game Note: 3/4*your score if you're antisocial and play without friends. Note: 1/2*your score if you can't stand the community, but still want to play. Other review 10/10 would feed again
MaLaTEMPLAR;-;i really Love it.
Scratch(Gone for week) :(;-;this EN GAME! Reasons dota sucks. 1. Dota is filled with some of the worst scum sucking pigs that have ever walked planet earth 2. Dota is so unbalanced, it has tipped the very universe upside down creating chaos and the Ebola virus to spread to the states via illegal russian imigrants 3. Dota grabs you where it hurts and makes u squeal while relentlessly calling you a "" while listing off the different ways he ed your mother. 4. Dota doesen't sleep, Dota stays up till late into the night while whispering into your mother en ear "One more game, just one more, i know you lost those last eleven, but one more will make it all better" 5. Dota doesen't forget..... Remember when you first started playing dota? U found a hero that was fun and easy like Sniper or Drow and u played the hell out of that hero till it made its way to your most successful heros list? Yeah? Well  you! Dota takes that hero and slams it in your face FOR A GOD DAMN YEAR! SO NOW AFTER U LEARN OTHER HEROS AND U SEE THAT SACK OF  U ONCE HAD FUN PLAYING, U LOOK IN THE MIRROR IN DISGUST AND JUST THINK "WOW IM A USELESS PIECE OF  SNIPER PLAYER" 6. Dota hates u and everyone around you 7.Dota laughs at your pain. 8. Dota makes you hate the ones u love most. 9. Dota spelled backwards is Atod, thats not even a word, Dota doesn't know english 10. Dota is fun. 1 Comments
MaLaTEMPLAR;-;i really Love it.
Zeubs;-;Great game! Steep learning curve though, really separates the new players from the veterans! All in all- 9/10 One problem...you can't jump :(
Scratch(Gone for week) :(;-;this EN GAME! Reasons dota sucks. 1. Dota is filled with some of the worst scum sucking pigs that have ever walked planet earth 2. Dota is so unbalanced, it has tipped the very universe upside down creating chaos and the Ebola virus to spread to the states via illegal russian imigrants 3. Dota grabs you where it hurts and makes u squeal while relentlessly calling you a "" while listing off the different ways he ed your mother. 4. Dota doesen't sleep, Dota stays up till late into the night while whispering into your mother en ear "One more game, just one more, i know you lost those last eleven, but one more will make it all better" 5. Dota doesen't forget..... Remember when you first started playing dota? U found a hero that was fun and easy like Sniper or Drow and u played the hell out of that hero till it made its way to your most successful heros list? Yeah? Well  you! Dota takes that hero and slams it in your face FOR A GOD DAMN YEAR! SO NOW AFTER U LEARN OTHER HEROS AND U SEE THAT SACK OF  U ONCE HAD FUN PLAYING, U LOOK IN THE MIRROR IN DISGUST AND JUST THINK "WOW IM A USELESS PIECE OF  SNIPER PLAYER" 6. Dota hates u and everyone around you 7.Dota laughs at your pain. 8. Dota makes you hate the ones u love most. 9. Dota spelled backwards is Atod, thats not even a word, Dota doesn't know english 10. Dota is fun. 1 Comments
Skld;-;It's like other MOBA's, sucks your life away, and it's not fun.
brodtosy;-;one of the biggest game . 7/10
Cat of Handegg;-;Randomly press anything on my keyboards so UI flash and i look pro.
<font color="#ff00ff">@fti3L;-;I love to play Dota2 .. playing since Dota about 5 years ago <3
Kirito -A- [BrBn];-;One of the best competitive games ever
[JC]-Singularity;-;ing s leagues better MWAHAHAHAAHA
Crowii;-;It's k but not ok.
dfireball;-;Fun game, If You know what You're doing and Winning :P. Besides that Its a challenge to understand everything, everygame. So GoodLuck All!
Archevil JUAL KEY TERMURAH;-;Awesome game, addicting and it is free! Play with your friends to have the most awesome experience
brodtosy;-;one of the biggest game . 7/10
DrCin;-;I Like to Play Dota 2 because it's feeling good and go go play Dota 2 Guys ;D
Dr.Rajkumar;-;Best game ever..........Sets mind to the sharpest........
Shadowshrom Almighty;-;10/10 russian translator, might not realise it at start, but there are many russians to help u learn words likw ! i recommend it to many for those who want to learn russian!
max();-;look just get a real drug habit, thats more rewarding
Helix_^^;-;All of which makes Dota 2 an absurd video game to try to recommend. Being the largest and most immediately open MOBA, with Valve showcasing its talent for rewarding and fostering a community, it demands and offers more than literally any game I can think of. It's almost more comparable to basketball than most commercial games. Something utterly opaque bearing no endgame, but that could happily fill every waking second of your life.
Crystal Maiden;-;Dota 2 is mastered by Asians and Russians League of Legends is mastered by Americans and Japanese Dota 2 offers you a challenge, and teaches you that patience and cunning pays off League of Legends offers you relaxation, and teaches you that you should be eager, swift, and dont care about mana management Dota 2 offers you the enjoyable experience of justified racism, watch as minorities are living up to their infamy League of Legends offers you the enjoyable experience of playing with casuals with no concern for their team and the game + anger issue underage players as a bonus Dota 2 offers you a large roster of free heroes with a nice overall design, and a fair amount of female characters. League of Legends offers you better artwork than better graphics, with a paid roster of over-designed heroes that makes it look like an all-star fighter game, also with more sellout boobs and more fan-made porn Dota 2 offers you height vision, unforgiving death penalties, buyback, fortification, day/night cycle that affects gameplay, all chat, a state of the art replay system, over a 100+ items with various active effects and more! League of Legends offers you... [blah blah blah variety, blah blah fun stuff] yes. "League of Legends is more popular than Dota 2" is what you're gonna say? Does it make it the best game? no. Because if i followed your logic, then Candy Crush Saga & Flappy Bird are the best games ever! or Call of Duty is better than Battlefield? Rust is better than DayZ? Counter-Strike is better than Insurgency? Team Fortress 2 is better than.. oh  this one anyways, its a breeding ground for casuals who cant handle frustration and competitiveness in videogames. Anyways... Pick your poison, DotA or LoL?
Dystopiaq;-;fake and gay
stunner;-;i hate dis gayme
Alexsandir Knapp;-;how do i even play this
Arual;-;its basically bad
MaximumBunny;-;Dota is a strategy game about choices. Who to pick, what to buy, who to kill, where to defend, what to do. And you do all of this within a 20-60 minute session, depending on how well (or poorly) you've chosen. But even in overwhelming odds there's still a chance to make a comeback if you play it right and capitalize on mistakes. This keeps the games tense and exciting. It takes hundreds of hours to learn the details of the game mechanics, thousands to master them. The premise is simple and tutorials guide you through it. Explaining it in a review/recommendation isn't going to help you more than experiencing it would, so telling you just to play it is the best thing to do. Dota is time well spent and item drops can make it worthwhile for your steam wallet (check the market items). There's no reason not to find out what the buzz is all about. Just remember that 100 hours is about the time it'll take you to learn the basics comfortably. It's similar with Counter Strike where that's around the time when you learn it's not COD/BF. So try not to say it's too complicated before that point or you're going to miss out on your new favorite game.
Trader Joe;-;>open game >saw intro >thought would be the tf2 valve intro >saw the guy turn head > pants 10/10 would  pants again
amui irito | Tng Long;-;this is a very helpful tool to learn how to dis or make a comeback other than ''your mom'' joke and you'll start to speak like a true russian no matter who you are and where you from. In the end, we all are russian DAVAI, ! P.S good game :) buy it even with your life
KB | The Killer (kevin);-;Better than League of Legends. :P
Mezmerize;-;REMOVE TECHIES remove techies you are worst techies. you are the techies idiot you are the techies smell. return to test client. to our lol cousins you may come our contry. you may live in the zoo.ahahahaha ,valve we will never forgeve you. cetnik rascal  but   techies stink icefrog sqhipere shqipare..techies genocide best day of my life. take a bath of dead techies..ahahahahahICEFROG WE WILL GET YOU!! do not forget ti4 .aateezy we kill the techies , artour return to your precious mongolia.hahahahaha idiot techies and icefrog smell so bad..wow i can smell it. REMOVE TECHIES FROM THE PREMISES. you will get caught. Gem+sentries+reanged hero+blademail=kill techies mine you will ww2/ pit lord alive in serbia, pitlord making album of serbia . fast rap pitlord serbia. we are rich and have gold now hahahaha ha because of pitlord you are ppoor stink techie you live in a hovel hahahaha, you live in a dumpster pitlord alive numbr one #1 in serbia . the techies ,..k ashol techies no good i spit? in the mouth eye of ur flag and team. pitlord aliv and real strong wizard kill all the techies farm aminal with rap magic now we the dire rule .ape of the zoo icefrog fukc the great satan and lay egg this egg hatch and techies wa;s born. stupid baby form the eggn give bak our farm we will crush u lik a skull of pig. Peru greattst countrey
Nyantez;-;I'm so ing good at this game. 1v1 me and find out, dweebs.
Citrus;-;This game is just a worse version of Mario Kart.
Seebaaa;-;ruin my life and wallet 11/10
Corlett;-;I game that is completely unbalanced and will ruin your life, you will literally hate your friends after this game.
Corlett;-;I game that is completely unbalanced and will ruin your life, you will literally hate your friends after this game.
Suttles;-;Huge learning curve but one of the best games on steam once you learn it. 9.5/10
hndsm;-;An excellent alternative to Rosetta Stone. During your first 100 hours you can expect to learn how to communciate with and insult people in multiple different languages including - but not limited to - Russian (!!!!), Brazilian (CALA BOCAAAA), and multiple Chinese dialects (). If you enjoy playing games that rely heavily on communication with people who don't speak a word of English (noop) despite selecting US East (South America North) or US West (Russia East) as their prefered server then dota is the game for you. The learning curve is steep so make sure not to give up if you don't do well during your first few games. Improve quickly by selecting a hero by slamming your face into the keyboard, calling mid lane, and using all your spells to quickly kill the creep. Don't forget that you can buy kitty ears from the in-game store to make your favorite character look cuter and give the illusion that you are good at the game.
Oshima Yuko;-;Recomended game from next warcraft
Bstaznkid4lyfe;-;Best to download it and start playing!!! It's a addicting game, and very challenging. My advice for all players who want to win in this game is to have a good team that you can depend on. So best to create your own team than joining random players from other countries that you can't understand what their saying.
Bizley;-;The best free to play game out there. 170 hrs in and still going strong. The PVP and tactical elements will keep you coming back. Take things with a pinch of salt for your first 5-10 hours. Expect to loose a lot, things will get better as you learn the mechanics, there are 100+ heroes after all.
Kafuka;-;Guaranteed to make you hate your friends, in 5 games or less.
InvinciBoy;-;You will be ruined, you will be humiliated, you will be ashame of your self, but still you comeback for more. What have they done?
jack;-;If you are looking for something addicting and fun to do may I suggest trying crack cocaine. If you aren't hooked in the first week and need an extremely addicting substance come back to DotA 2. This game has ruined the relationship with my family. 10/10
Cow Lin the Urf Spirit;-;This game. OHHHH THIS GAME! THIS GAME IS RUINING MY LIFE! I was a happily married man, with 2 kids and one more on the way, when this game showed up. In almost no time at all, I found myself divorced, without custody of the kids, and without a job, ALL BECAUSE OF THIS GAME! THIS GAME IS EVIL! IT IS ADDICTING! THIS IS THE HEROIN OF THE GAMING WORLD!
troller :DDDDDDDDDD;-;This game for losers and asocial people.if you are asocial person,perfect game for you.There are many lifeless people in that game and system is so suck ..f you want to start that game,you can buy account with high level .it is good step for starting .
Gilla;-;Literally addicted to this game at the moment and 100 times better than league of legends! I would recommend trying it out a few times.
_F0r_m;-;Great game!
Alexsandir Knapp;-;how do i even play this
jack;-;If you are looking for something addicting and fun to do may I suggest trying crack cocaine. If you aren't hooked in the first week and need an extremely addicting substance come back to DotA 2. This game has ruined the relationship with my family. 10/10
Secret.DestrOyer.MY;-;Let's Play Some Dota 2
Nutyyyy;-;What can i say about DotA 2. Well, to be honest, it is a fantastic game that really captivates you once you start playing it. The community is so friendly, especially, Peruvians and Russians who are really welcoming and friendly. They really make you feel at home when you play DotA. Don't get me wrong, its not just Peru and Russia that have such good communties, there are plenty of North Americans and Europeans who are also so kind and generous. Of course though, as with any game with millions of players there are a small minority who are bad for the community. These players infrequently say phrases such as, "gl hf", "Nice", "Don't worry we can still win", "everyone makes mistakes" etc. Such players really drag the DotA community down and turn it into a terrible place. However, the amount of "" and "" makes up for these bad mannered people. Overall, I would really recommend this game due to its engrossing gameplay and especially due to the nice natured community that plays it.
Shikari;-;Hey, you, yeah you! The completely innocent and kind person looking at this review! How would you like to turn into a raging, heroin-addicted, poor excuse for a human?! I think I know the answer! Of course you do! This is the game for you! Dota 2 comes with more than just a game! You get a free set of disgusting human morals and disrespect for anything that moves unless it's a cute little donkey delivering a bottle. You know what to do then, that enemy templar assasin looks thirsty, it's only fair to share your donkey and Shadow Fiends bottle with her! Download Dota 2 now! *I, All Luck No Skill or Valve corporation is not responsible for any cases of suicide, murder, mental health issues, racist comments, genocide of the russians or feeding pudges* Russian translator not provided.
Jihadi John;-;Hilter plays this game. Would you play it?
troller :DDDDDDDDDD;-;This game for losers and asocial people.if you are asocial person,perfect game for you.There are many lifeless people in that game and system is so suck ..f you want to start that game,you can buy account with high level .it is good step for starting .
Ramrez;-;Pure crusty  with spiders hatching out of it, while your grandmother masturbates over it fingering your grandfather's hemarroid filled  as your dog goes balls deep into the  with spiders laying eggs the size of walnuts in your eyeballs
Shikari;-;Hey, you, yeah you! The completely innocent and kind person looking at this review! How would you like to turn into a raging, heroin-addicted, poor excuse for a human?! I think I know the answer! Of course you do! This is the game for you! Dota 2 comes with more than just a game! You get a free set of disgusting human morals and disrespect for anything that moves unless it's a cute little donkey delivering a bottle. You know what to do then, that enemy templar assasin looks thirsty, it's only fair to share your donkey and Shadow Fiends bottle with her! Download Dota 2 now! *I, All Luck No Skill or Valve corporation is not responsible for any cases of suicide, murder, mental health issues, racist comments, genocide of the russians or feeding pudges* Russian translator not provided.
Arual;-;its basically bad
Nutyyyy;-;What can i say about DotA 2. Well, to be honest, it is a fantastic game that really captivates you once you start playing it. The community is so friendly, especially, Peruvians and Russians who are really welcoming and friendly. They really make you feel at home when you play DotA. Don't get me wrong, its not just Peru and Russia that have such good communties, there are plenty of North Americans and Europeans who are also so kind and generous. Of course though, as with any game with millions of players there are a small minority who are bad for the community. These players infrequently say phrases such as, "gl hf", "Nice", "Don't worry we can still win", "everyone makes mistakes" etc. Such players really drag the DotA community down and turn it into a terrible place. However, the amount of "" and "" makes up for these bad mannered people. Overall, I would really recommend this game due to its engrossing gameplay and especially due to the nice natured community that plays it.
Citrus;-;This game is just a worse version of Mario Kart.
Corlett;-;I game that is completely unbalanced and will ruin your life, you will literally hate your friends after this game.
Ramrez;-;Pure crusty  with spiders hatching out of it, while your grandmother masturbates over it fingering your grandfather's hemarroid filled  as your dog goes balls deep into the  with spiders laying eggs the size of walnuts in your eyeballs
amui irito | Tng Long;-;this is a very helpful tool to learn how to dis or make a comeback other than ''your mom'' joke and you'll start to speak like a true russian no matter who you are and where you from. In the end, we all are russian DAVAI, ! P.S good game :) buy it even with your life
Nyantez;-;I'm so ing good at this game. 1v1 me and find out, dweebs.
Seebaaa;-;ruin my life and wallet 11/10
Bartholomew Kuma;-;I ing hate this game it sucks
Gilla;-;Literally addicted to this game at the moment and 100 times better than league of legends! I would recommend trying it out a few times.
Cow Lin the Urf Spirit;-;This game. OHHHH THIS GAME! THIS GAME IS RUINING MY LIFE! I was a happily married man, with 2 kids and one more on the way, when this game showed up. In almost no time at all, I found myself divorced, without custody of the kids, and without a job, ALL BECAUSE OF THIS GAME! THIS GAME IS EVIL! IT IS ADDICTING! THIS IS THE HEROIN OF THE GAMING WORLD!
Mortowski;-;Played as a guy with a massive hammer that could split the earth, then died to a fish in a cloud of smoke. I would not recommend it.
brazil=shit;-;this game ing sucks
Sir Dirge of Cykaland;-;Well, I decided to do this review again after playing it a bit more and trying to do a good review. To get things started, I will go ahead and name the categories I am basing my review on: Lore, Gameplay, Community and the overall judgement. LORE When I am talking about lore, I mean development and actual game lore. The development lore is that there once was a game called "Warcraft 3" which was a very good RTS game. Soon, an expansion pack came. This expansion gave way to a Modder that would create "Defence of the Ancients." The mod took over the Warcraft Community like a wild fire and got popular. The way the mod was played was similar to that of a Star Craft map type. Soon, this mod took its own community that would balance out the characters and give voting on new characters (That are known as heroes). Soon, the reign were handed over and over and over again to different people until it was handed to a person whose username is "Icefrog". Icefrog is still the current owner of the original DotA mod. The original mod makers went on to make the other games in the ARTS (YES, that is the genre name, NOT MOBA) genre such as LoL and HoN. Icefrog was approached by Valve to making a sequel with a full team. Icefrog agreed and here we are. Now actual game lore. The Lore of this game is quite deceptive. Each of the characters has their own back-story and most of them don't seem intertwined, but when you read them carefully, you can see the connections. But, the centralised lore is that two beings fought each other until they were casted into a rock floating into space, orbiting a planet. To that planet, the rock would be known as the mad moon. The two beings cracked out of the rock but pieces of it scattered all over the planet, making the inhabitants grow strange power. They felt allegiance to the rock that gave them power and they decided to destroy the other rock. The War of the ancients has begun. RATING: It has a solid lore if you have the time to make the connections yourself. It is quite a good read (For some anyway) 4.5/5 Gameplay With the war of the ancients, the goal of each match is to destroy the others ancient. Seems simple right? WRONG ON SO MANY LEVELS! The gameplay videos by the pros make it look extra deceiving by making it look like Attack tower until it falls then run back, kill some enemies etc. Etc. However, there is quite a lot of strategy when it comes to it. Even the before the match begins, there is strategy. DOTA to me is like an advanced game of Rock/Paper/Scissors if it had over one hundred and thirty different options to choose from. One character counters this one, but at the same time this one counters this and so forth. So, when the game actually starts, roles start coming into play. I am NOT going to list every role, just some key ones: Carry: Your bulldozer, your team fight winner, your... you get the idea. These guys can turn the tide of battle quite easily IF they get a good early game. They suck early but get better and better as the game progresses. Support: These guys keep your carry alive and well for them to start owning the other team. Usually, these guys have high damage nukes that can decimate the enemy carry. Jungler: These guys can be both of the above roles (Depends on what their strength is) So, that is just the picking phase. Everything in it has a strategy. Your items choice, your lane (The map is split in three different lanes) and hell, even the place you stand determines how a battle will play out. Sure, there are varying degrees of difficulty between heroes and their roles and game style change between each other, but the phrase of DOTA still stands: Getting the basics is not the problem; it is climbing the hill of experience So, in a nutshell, this game will provide great experience for those looking for a challenge. 5/5 Community If there was a breaking point for game, it is its community. Let me just say this... ALL ARTS communities are crap. Absolute crap. There are your ragers, elitists, noobs, dumb arses, whiny kids etc. This community has a lot to offer. I will not deny that. Parts of the community are creative and friendly as hell. However, the general community is absolute scum. One little mistake could set them off. That is in the regular match making, let alone LPQ (Low Priority Queue, AKA: the  pool) All in all, the community does have its diamonds, but it is mostly . 2/5 OVER ALL OPINION Great game play, interesting lore but semi- hole of a community. 11.5/15
SeoUilms;-;worst game i've ever played 0/10
The Neon Terrier;-;Dota 2 is the most enjoyable and entertaining strategy game I have ever played. The amount of countless heroes - 100+ The items and trading, the modes - All pick, Single draft, Mid only, ability draft, (hiliarous) captains pick and a bunch more. The graphics are realistic and persuading. The strategy is really very nice, complex and nicely frustrating, if you catch my drift. I would recommend some videos on how to play Dota 2, due to it's learning curve, and don't abandon any matches. Yes. Dota 2 strengthens your teamwork with people throughout the world. You'd be amazed on how many people are dedicated and love to be serious and fun with Dota. Abandoning causes your teammates to.. hate you and you will receive low priority matches, which higher your match finding time and you do not receive battle points. If you haven't already, check out Free To Play, a movie on Steam about dedicated players going for the 1.6 Million USD Dollarinos, with really inspirational content. Pick up Defence Of The Ancient on Steam for free (Mac and Windows) and, Enjoy. People saying things (Not word for word, just what I remember) "The first couple of months during Dota 2 will be a ride of... hell. - Some guy on the internet which I have forgotten "The way I would describe Dota would be a cross between Chess and Soccer or Football. You get your team to the other side and win. - This dude who says stuff in Free To Play (The inspirational movie which I mentioned earlier) Best game i've ever played... No joke.
sneeky smeagol;-;Like Skyrim with action strategy.
xDeAtHKiLLeRx07;-;Dota too es very good you can fight other guys in a glorious combat with eachother team, watch out for skeleton king because he does come back from the dead and kill you if you kill him. I really like this game because
Warm Deep Fried Lizard Testicles;-;This game ing sucks . Play league instead, or hon, or club penguin. 10/10 Would bang
swoopy;-;garbage game ruined my life. community full of muslim fudge packers that use op heroes like silencer and scream gibberish to the chat lmao hope they die im the best
NeoRizer;-;The go to game for basement dwelling C.H.U.D.S. From what I heard this game causes cancer, depression, racisim, eczema, siatica, obesity, malnutrition, poor hygene, cavities, hemorrhoids, stress, hair loss, blindness, anger issues, gingivitis, gingervitis, headaches, migrains, irritable bowel syndrome, yeast infections, herpies, hepatitis A, B AND C, anal prolapse, kidney failure, heart disease, tumors and laziness... and unemployment... and 50 year old virgins... and crashes the economy... and kills your dog... and your family... and you. :) -  / 10
Umaroth;-;I played this game for 6 minutes. Out of those 6 minutes it took me 5 minutes to start the game, etc.. then i actually started pllaying the game and well... I ain't ever gonna do that again!
ehrgeix;-;My mild mannered, canadian friend got angry enough to call someone a nig**r. A long time casual acquaintance completely freaked out at me when I swapped positions with him at an inopportune moment. People get angry with me when I pick my favorite hero (Phantom Assassin), because she is somewhat mediocre and not used very much in professional play. People get angry with me when I don't pick Phantom Assassin, because she's the hero I've played most and have the highest winrate with. More than half of my games feature someone who does not speak English, or is muted. Earlier today I played a game where my team captain drafted me Crystal Maiden, and was confused when I complained about her poor, crippled appendages. She takes like a second to raise her staff and fire a super slow snowball at someone, walks around agonizingly slowly, and turns at the speed of a small locomotive. When I try to explain that this bothers me to people, they react with a curious mixture of confusion and horror. This is the dota experience, and changing it is unthinkable. I introduced two of my better friends in real life to the game. I think that one of them was more despairing during a game we played, than when his last girlfriend split up with him. But still, they play.
BlackRed;-;Ruined my Life. 5/5 Stars. Noob Warning: If you like casual games, go play The Sims.
Penemue;-;10/10 ... IF IT HAD A REGION LOCK!
Donkay;-;Oh man, Dota 2. Don't get me wrong here at the negative review, hear me out first. I say with confidence that Dota 2 is an addicting MOBA game with great gameplay and fun. Then why the negative review you say? Well for one the community is scarcely better than Russia under Stalin. If you play on any server you must be 100% prepared for racism, s, jerks, and 12 year olds. Not only that, but even if you put your language preference as English, half the players you play with are obnoxious Peruvians. This does not make the game unplayable but can seriously  you off. If you have played this game as long or longer than me you will understand this. Another bad thing is that I would willingly compare playing this game to a adrug addiction. You literally can't stop playing it when you start, and when life interrupts you, you will start to think Dota 2 is more important. THAT MY FRIENDS IS WHEN YOU QUIT THE GAME! I had to wean myself off of it for like weeks until I couldn't stand looking at the icon anymore, needless to say I uninstalled. MY ADVICE FOR NEW PLAYES: GET A FRIEND TO PLAY IT WITH YOU, AND DON'T BECOME ADDICTED! That is all
Defalt;-;Phone off the hook, shirt off, pants off , time to dotes!
AMC;-;time eater...failed exams :(
D*e*v*i*L*i*s*H**I**;-;Great Game
_Tex;-;Amazing game, terrible community.
CreeK;-;The Best RTS i played so far (not mentioning Starcraft2). Hope a lot players would like it as well and play it properly unlike some other guys who just ruin all the fun :(
Sentient Hedgehog;-;Dota 2 is a similar game to League of Legends, with some differences that make both of them unique, like how you can get couriers and have access to secret shops in dota while in LoL, there are summoner spells and masteries. However, this is a review about Dota and what the game is about, not a comparison about these 2 games. Dota is a MOBA game (Multiplayer Online Battle Arena), in which you are place in a team of 5 players to go against another team of 5 players with one main object, which is to obliterate the enemies towers, barracks, and finally, their ancient. All of you start at level 1 and all of you have to destroy anything in your path while trying to not have any casualties along the way, since the enemy who just killed you will gain lots of exp as well as some gold. As simple as it looks, it's not, as that there are many ways that your opponent can stop you from progressing, like the occasional ganks that happen from time to time. Aside from the basics of Dota, the game is really fun......unless there's that *sshole that'll keep calling you a noob or if there's that player that dies intentionally, but other then that, the graphics are good, controls are easy, and overall, the gameplay is great, so go on and download Dota and have fun.
Mr. Fox;-;I've been playing DOTA since DOTA 1 came up a decade ago. In DOTA 2, the game mechanic is quite balanced, every hero has its own strengths and weaknesses just like in the previous one. Definitely not a P2W kind of game. However, the solo MMR pairing is really awful. I dropped from 3k to 2k in just a week and forever stuck in this level no matter how hard I play. Here's a few suggestions that I could think of: -They should also consider hours of playing and K/D/A ratio instead of just MMR level to balance the pairing. -Players who got into low priority should get more severe punishment (e.g. longer period and add extra requirements to get away from low priority) so they would think twice before they trash-talk and not obidient. At this rate, a skill in par with TI players' is the only way to break out. Unfortunately, you need to play A LOT to get there. If you're really lucky, you could be paired with decent players, and that's a one big if. A casual gamer like me has no place in this game.
banks;-;learnt more russian in 300 hours than I learnt german in 5 years 10/10
xdmadmanxd76;-;WHAT IS THIS !
RedGnome2207;-;10/10, Would Bang
sgtlion;-;God this game is a bucket of bad.
Compsognathus;-;Edit 1: OF COURSE YOU WOULD NERF WISPS STUN TO SLOW, YES BECAUSE IO IS THE HERO, WHO IS TOTALLY OP IN EVERY SINGLE GAME YOU PLAY! ITS NOT HUSKAR, ITS NOT PA, ITS NOT SNIPER, WHO NEED TO BE NERFED IF THAT SHOULD BE NECESSARY AT ALL NEVER WOULD SUCH IDIOCY EVEN SLIGHTLY TICKLE MY ANS! NOW THAT IO FINALLY RECIEVED A MORE OR LESS REASONABLE SKILLSET, DOTA 2 IS THE MOST BALANCED GAME IN THE WHOLE UNIVERSE! Edit 2: Hey Icefrog! I came up with a totally cool Idea! But first let me lay down to problem for you: You know all these poor people who only want to pick and play their totally imbalanced heroes, they actually have to go through loads of serious trouble, believe me, until they can finally become overpowered beyond reason! :( .. That sucks! SO WHY ON EARTH NOT PROVIDE THEM WITH A BIT OF A STARTING BONUS RIGHT? Look at poor old Huskar for example! A POSSIBLE MAXIMUM OF 98% MAGIC RESISTANCE!? So if I may ask you dear developers.. HOW TO MAKE UP FOR THOSE MISSING 2%!? Here's where my idea comes into play! Why not just give Huskar a set of six Hearts before start, so he can casually drain away half of his enemies health with one single burning spear at lv1, but this time, without having to worry about maybe loosing an eighth of his own!! etc.. 0/10 -worse than League of Legends Disclaimer: Review suitable for Pub scrubs only, not suitable for players of MMR >1000
Tickle :P;-;So far the most competitive i have ever become in my life since TF2 and CS:S.. Great place to play and have fun, but you have to be strong cuz many people will get angry if you end up dying a lot. Just say what the problem is and they might understand. Say that you are new or bad,. do not forget at all costs to say that you are new. Best case scenario is that they like you, and are forgiving. GL HF :D
zkylon inxile;-;i really like this engine its very cool hopefully rito buys it and puts my favorite game in it
zkylon inxile;-;i really like this engine its very cool hopefully rito buys it and puts my favorite game in it
Sly Mordecai;-;riot first game launches their company straight to moon with they're fantastical sequal to legends of newerth to conquer the gaming industry . everyone go 5v5 n control a hero expect for meepo because he become not 1 not 2 not 3 but 4 except agh then not 1 not 2 not 3 not 4 but 5 hero . other than that there are many different forces involve to defend the ancient which is name of game but does not make sense because the aim of game is to destroy the ancient. maybe dota 2 stand for destroy of the ancient 2 because icefrog made mistake on warcraft 3. overall riot has done well to please every player imaginable to cannibal (naix) drunk ( pandaeren brewmaster) fem dom ( queen of pain ) alchemists ( alchemist ) samurai ( juggernaut)  ( night stalker ) uni professor ( rubick ) father of zyzz ( zeus ) ttrolls ( troll warlod) n many more. no discriminatio in this game because every race species continent is embraced to play destry the ancient. even in the game there is combo of riverr forest and dead land.if you came from neopets then i would strngly recommend to play this because yo can buy your own coureir and upgrade it with red bull. the community in dota 2 is very great too because eveyrone is always friendly teamwork leadership and forgiving. 10/10 would play again with rednecks
`Mamar;-;recommended
iZN1337;-;it sucks
Red;-;I only filled the survey because of the tradable version and I didn't get it so FML. I hate DOTA and now it's part of my library D:
Romp;-;Poorly Balanced Lots of RNG like runes and skills with chances to do certain things Heros that are clearly op and yet somehow the developers (Icefrog and Co.) thinks are balanced Then you have the childish community who i don't have enough reports in the world for. Much more frustrating and emotionally taxing then any other game I've played. It's really not worth it, just go play something else Not to mention the new Ranked Matchmaking which is just a glorified pub with numbers attached to it, its no different and you will get russians and  teammates as usual the game is , plain and simple.
TheOnlyDeluxe;-;DOTA 2 has a horrible Community that makes the game far less enjoyable than it could be. New players are turned away because of this and older players have a worse time leading to further negativity towards other players. The graphics aren't the worst, but they aren't that good. For a game that thrives on detailed team-play and champion strategies it stunts the potential. The only reason this game could be considered as more difficult than other games in this genre would be the graphics and lingering hero game-play. The graphics make it difficult to see what exactly is going on and doesn't get much easier as you progress. Pretty much every hero has at least one ability that will root/stun/slow ect. for around 4 seconds. When a game has that kind of kill security it doesn't matter if the champions are Balanced. I've played many other Game in this genre and they were all much more enjoyable than DOTA 2. When I first played a game or two It was extremely easy compared to league of legends or other similar games. It may be more difficult to see what's going on but the spells are so overpowered on all the heroes that it was easy coming from game that have underpowered spells. The worst thing About DOTA 2 would be the Item system that has been Implemented. It's just ridiculous how it's not user friendly at all. This game has such a bad In-Game and Community Experience that players Uninstall it after playing 1-3 matches(at me after 1000 matches).It was just sad..I'm ing done with this game. 6/10 EDIT: Ok ok, i can't stop play it xD.
Hamsta;-;This is game with a lot of possibilities. One of them are ||REPORTS||. Most common words in DOTA 2 after ''gg'' is "You're REPORTED''. (You can get REPORTED) OR (YOU CAN REPORT)...... --- You can get reported for feeding (Typical report). --- You can get reported for feeding creeps (0-0). --- You can get reported for using other language than Russian . ( Report Subject they don't understand you, even if you play on Europe server). --- You can get reported because they don't like you. --- You can get reported because you do not let stand Riki in mid , even if you're pudge. --- Reported because you're noob even if you're score is (10/1/14) and reporter has (0/23/1). --- Reported for not helping teammate in 1 vs 5 , (even if he's score is 1/15/2) , in some cases if you help and die with him you got report for FEEDING. --- Accidentally throw your teammate into enemies (REPORTED FOR ##### ### ###). --- Took Aegis as Sven. (REPORTED FOR NOT GIVING IT TO THE CRYSTAL MAIDEN). --- Bad luck, in your team is RAGE MONSTER (SURPRISE BIT#### FREE REPORT FOR ALL). --- Tank Reported By Support for Not Buying Wards and Smoke. (.....) --- REPORTED, BECAUSE YOU REPORTED ME!
honey muffin;-;If you aren't familiar with MOBAs they are . Don't play them. If you disagree and enjoy MOBAs you might be autistic and you should probably get that checked out.
Shitstorm;-;Kills russian -  Kills russian again -  Kills russian for the 2nd time -  Kills russian for the 3rd time -  BLYET! Kills russian in a humiliation way - I SUK YO MOM Ends game - (some russian words probably offensive words in capitals spammed throughout post game) Russian rage simulator 2014 I also learnt a bit of russian in the hours I have now
420 V H S- //;-;there are many things in this universe that make me want to end my life, but this 'game' out does everything else in the universe in the list of things that make me want to neck myself. 0/10 no warning about feelings of extreme depression and nihilism.
v0id_walker;-;Well, I liked this game.... a long time ago, when you could play a normal game here and there. Nowadays, the only people you meet are russians, mexicans and other things that can hardly be described as human, as they do not seem posess human-like inteligence. The best part is. They do play on european servers/(mexicans tend to invade US), and wish to teach you their holy language, in which every sentence seems to beginn with "suka blyat"(dunno about the mexicans though, they might as well speak burrito). If you have low blood pressure and like the company of mentally chalaged people without the paper that would confirm this, feel free to download this game. Oh, almost forgot to mention, that each new patch uses to add new bugs and overpowered heroes get even more powerful over time. Bless lord Gaben and his minions for bringing us this gem. HL3 confirmed...
captainquokka;-;I hate this game. I hate the right click. I hate the stuns. I hate Meepo. I hate the thing Shakira does when it wins. I hate it. I hate this game. I hate the death it creates. I hate death. This game is worse than death. This game is worse than Hitler. This game is worse than Satan. This game is more of a homewrecker than Sahara and Oliver combined. I hate this game. I hate it.
Eddie Smurphy;-;if u liek doin mathematiks, u will liek doin jams. sam is a man, dont  up his plan. he'll throw u in his van and excecute a clam. crack u liek a can,  up ur whole clan. Kbokk baby 0/10 no jungle buffs or biscuits get rekt m9
Seud;-;League of fLamers served no less as mere training for Dota 2, which holds in my opinion the state of Best MOBA/ARTS/ASSS (Call it however you want) around. No need to pay for heroes or power-ups. No need to grind levels to be able to jungle. No need to pay for cosmetics, I can earn them while playing. And I can learn Russian free of charge. The essence and magic of DotA combined with the powerful Source engine and wrapped up in an user-friendly package with Valve quality finition. Icing on the cake ? The only MobA around playable offline. And bots aren't exactly dummies.
Captain Bees;-;It doesnt have any hats.
Strike Swiftly;-;If i did a crap in my hands and clapped. Im pretty sure i could plug a usb into it and plug it in my computer and download a better game than this piece of death.
Citris;-;This game is utter garbage, the community is poison. There are no decent people in this game. You will not be playing with people who speak english, even though you are in queue for english. Too many heroes to learn, by the time you get on board you will be so left behind you will never advanced. The game is totally not worth trying. I just deleted it and I'm already starting to feel cancer free!
Bat Girl;-;So some time ago I was hanging out with this girl from my new volleyball team. It was during practice break and we were eating at this awesome salad bar in SM Tarlac. Anyway, I ordered a veggie burger, and she had 3 (THREE) servings of some leafy salad. It was like, a bush decided to grow on her plate. She had a very very large order. And I was surprised that she finished it. Her plate was clean after she was done. So anyway, we went back to the gym for the next practice session. I didn't play because I knew better than to move around with a full stomach but this other girl (the one I had a meal with) volunteered for the lineup. I mean, geez, you just ate a tree. Maybe you should get some rest first? So yeah, during the game someone from the other team made a spike and the ball hit my plant devouring friend in the stomach. She dropped down and curled, and she was turning pale all over and she vomitted. Lots and lots of vomit. It was like, her mouth was a sewege system and nasty things were just coming out of it. I looked at the puddle and I saw something orange, I think it was a semi-digested carrot but whatevs. But anyway, everyone went to help her but I was just staring at the vile concoction at the floor, and it reminded me of something. It reminded me... of Dota .
Mr. Carter;-;this magical
bat;-;A good game full of bad people.
sprt;-;The game, where all s gather. If you thought annoying COD kids were too much, then you haven't experienced dota2 yet. It's full of obnoxious, rude people, who have absolutely no idea what a co-op / team game is about, and constantly whine about stolen kills, like if this was some FPS. The following list contains the type of people you will meet in dota: 1. 12 year olds, thinking they know everything, and play dota for life, while skipping school 2. People who can't speak english at all, despite playing with the english language filter 3. Reporters, who do nothing but  about everyone else, and report them for everything 4. Multiple account 'pros' who constantly swear about how their team sucks 5. Idiots, who tell you to attack 1v5 / close range against long / ask you to help and then run away 6. Quitters 7. Mr. AFK who gives up at the start of the game and just hangs around spawn 8. New players who get talked down for not completely understanding the game after 2 seconds 9. Extremely rare, but nice and helpful people Worst. Community. Ever.
Hanover;-;I grew a cancerous 4th  after I stumbled upon this community of vile Russian and Spanish degenerates. This game made me more racist. Thank you, kind community of Dota 2. gg tho
2k1life!~;-;The only reason why my dad should be proud of me!! No time for , criminal activities! :3
[A]cid;-;It's a awesome MOBA game
Foxy;-;Such anamazing game. Each update makes it even more fun
IsThatKram?;-;Best Game I played :D
Mayheim;-;A game without Morello.
Boyd;-;If you're ever looking for a game to take over your life without you expecting, then this is spot on the mark. You'll be concerned at how quickly you get addicted to this game if you like the aesthetics/ragequit if you're an idiot. It's free to play and is heavily strategy based, so go on.
cyrini;-;slowly but surely getting the hang of this
-=I m groot=-;-;One of the most addictive game I have ever played in my entire life.
B U X O M B O Y S;-;You'll need friends, or at the very least someone who isn't a complete brain-dead moron. Use wards and upgrade the courier.
Slapgod;-;It's free and amazing. Play It! :)
Vincent Van Goku;-;I only played a little bit, but it's okay.
G.D.;-;Once you in, there no turining back
Tuco;-;This game is way too addictive and will make you hate everyone else. Stay away from it.
SailingMaster Lordofthetv;-;League of Legends and Dota 2 are the same thing. Play both and choose this one because I play it.
SzLies;-;800 hours on record!! Awesome Moba to play with friend. much pros about this game and i think only 1 cons :/ - PINOY STRIKE :( tang ina mo... putang ina... gago... bobo... that was 4 legendary word in dota 2 :/
zaido_blue;-;Icefrog
Prince Ali;-;GG WP. League
Leonidas;-;this is a good game to play :D
NaVi_Hulk;-;I recommend this game
Trey Leonhart;-;Endless online strategy game, very fun when you have learnt all items and skills.
SUGAR;-;dota 2 is a great game
FCUK THIS SHIT;-;Very good game / addictive / fast Go Go Go BARA ~
Blue;-;Not a good game for a first time players. Not much else to say. Unless you can deal with way too much pressure in the game, and don't give up after losing many games. Then maybe you should play it. In the end, you would end up learning and stop losing it.. Or playing.
Nh Nh <3;-;that game is excited
Yansen;-;This game is awesome coz it can teach what is the meaning of the word "TEAMWORK"
TRASHTALK;-;DOTA 2 is good DOTA 2 is life.
whoyok;-;sometimes public games are just horrible
Majime;-;addiction level: over 9000 !
Huzzbuzz;-;My life. Where did it go?
Funkatron;-;warcraft 3's dota has evolved into a actual time consuming game and valve made dota 2??? how can i handle all the goodness of this game
[CB]Black Jesus;-;Do you know what Meth is? Dota 2 is the exact same thing you come out losing teeth, paying people for things you dont need, seemingly twitch for no reason whatsoever, and you become racist to every living thing ever created... Yup that sums up Dota 2 in a nutshell. Have fun playing guys.
random;-;Makes your brain work fast than ever cause you'd had to think how win the game :P
TYRONE;-;I HOPE YOU LIKE RUSSIANS.
SchmallBK;-;Bes tof Best
Toasty;-;Terrible Game. Gave me cancer.
Pussy_Boyez NOSCOPE2K15;-;Most interesting and fun game in the world, full of different heroes to try out and different tactics.
Keisser John;-;i cant stop playing when i start playing dota 2! love the game!!!
Azure;-;Ruins lives 10/10 would recommend
Harbinger;-;its a pretty good game. Only started hearing first blood, and bloody deaths after playing 100 hours of it. Recommended.
C9.HyperX.Bone7;-;Awsome !!
Metzli;-;gawd dam game made me hat esouth americans and russian!!!!!!
Handyman-;-;Just trying the game for few hours and it was fun.
The 5th Horseman;-;THis is DOTA... There is always a "PUDGE".. "INVOKER".. " MIRANA" in everybody's most played heroes.. This game will make u play it thousand of times after u have played thousand of times.. 10/10.
maika;-;Awesome and Fun playing especially when youre playing with your friends.
Hoppipolla;-;It strategy game i've ever played.
AVATcHE;-;it's my midecn i love dota and i hate noob's and i'm pro :D
MLGCOCK.Pussy Muncher;-;I had a party with the enemy team in Roshan pit 10/10
Cold Socks;-;HOLY MEAT! This game is like Naruto mixed with Family Guy!!!
\[T]/*\[T]/ Percival;-;jesus make it stop "Are the Russians really that bad?" I asked.. "They know English, right?" I asked.. I had no idea.. Otherwise, awesome game. ;)))))))
LuckyTeaTea;-;Downloaded this game. Then everyone in-game told me to uninstall it.
Hazzza;-;Will ruin your life
AeThEr-HeShEr;-;yeah! it`s a great game so need more desing and more graphics work
Jarsk;-;Terrible game! Kappa
Jarsk;-;Terrible game! Kappa
CS.Zack!!;-;i liked this game, so fun and so many adventure
Im Indonesian;-;Good luck, have fun
Splat;-;Good game but too many peruvians
Gramma Meepo;-;It'll make your nipples hard.
Sange;-;This game ruined my life! 420/420
Move*Bitch;-;sick game
Computer(Insane);-;yeah.. i really injoyed playing this game.. ilike the graphics work..nice..
ROCK 'N' ROLL TO WORLD! ALRIGHT!;-;I like dota 2 very much. this game is awesome.
Mr.L;-;Play and be amaze to the world of excitement
` = |;-;Dota 2, Where teamwork is laughable and everyone is Russian. 10/10 just joking ^-^ .... Dota is a very famous game since childhood. Teamwork is a must, let your instincts guide you. Keep Calm and Have Fun ^^
|_|$;-;Very ncie game..
Cassieeeeeeeeeeeeeeee;-;This game is awesome.
$lc;-;the best game ever!
"Pedansa Militan";-;got to try it
Ching*;-;Rules and Guidelines For Steam: Discussions, Reviews, and User Generated Content These guidelines apply to all places in the Steam Store and Community where users can post content. This includes, but is not limited to, discussions, comments, guides, product reviews, screenshots, artwork, videos, tags, Steam Workshop, and Steam Greenlight. When providing feedback, posting information, or discussing a product in Steam, whether its negative or positive, please make sure you are being relevant, constructive and polite. Developers take feedback from all kinds of sources into account, even though they may not have the time to respond to every post or question. Please note that Administrators/Moderators reserve the right to change/edit/delete/move/merge any content at any time if they feel it is inappropriate, abusive, or incorrectly categorized. All users are subject to the Steam Subscriber Agreement and Steam Online Conduct.
Mr Amsterdam;-;bretty good 5/5
Alfax;-;I would be a productive member of society if it wasn't for this game. 10/10
Pizza;-;Great.
PrimeTimeBG;-;The bEst
VelvexEcho;-;Argueably one of the best competitve MOBA game, for those who has good tactical skills with competitve edge in terms of teamwork, this is the game you want, it's is hard to pick up but once you do, you will be spending hours upon hours honing your skills trying to come up hero combos with other heroes to outplay your opponnet!
xXx_xPheONix_steelx_xXx;-;This game is my favourite.
Soarin';-;Dota is fun, there are many things to do. Just select which area of Russia you want to play in.
King Krool;-;Great game.
Len;-;Competitive but fantasitc
Zwullo;-;Amazing russian simulator. Also a good game.
MR.khaste .');-;its my best game at EVEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEER
Freg;-;For some reason, this game features clearly possessed demonic creatures endlessly slaughtering one another. Not appropraite for kids!!! 6.9/10, would play again.
Queenie of;-;So Great
MagerSaber;-;Free to play and it's AMAZING and AWESOME game.
yerfdog1935;-;Ruined my life. 10/10 Would get addicted again.
Yukino Yukinoshita ( );-;best game in the world
Jheamay;-;I recommend this to all my friends.
DarkLord;-;I would like to play this game
Sprites;-;The harder version of League of Legends.
Xedeus;-;Better than LoL in my opinion.
Rose Scarlett;-;Dota 2 can be a very hard game to get into as the skill ceiling is incredibly high. In essence the game is a 5v5 were you divide your team between 3 lanes and a possible jungle. Winning requires a combination of good team mates, knowledge of the game and its mechanics and a healthy dose of luck. the community for Dota can be very toxic at times and most people will not hesitate to tell you what you have done wrong and how they are amazing players but if you can push past that the game is a lot of fun to get into trying new builds and tactics and if you get can get a group of friends to remove the chance of getting any random players then its all the better. If you do not know how the game works id suggest watching a few videos and reading some guides to make your first few games less painful. The guide i would suggest is http://www.purgegamers.com/welcome-to-dota-you-suck He does a great job of explaining everything you need to know and has a video archive of himself playing and improving on hero's. As i say the game can be hard to get into but if you can push past the ability requirements and the occasional  on your team you will not regret spending the next 2-3 thousand hours kicking .
road 2 420k;-;So much fun! This is one of the best games ive played and im so addicted!
Orlando;-;I was professional gamers.
KONOYARO~~;-;nice online game
| Chocolat;-;This game is so good, it ripped out my heart and shoved it back in and the sheer amazingness of this game healed me instantly. - jacob
Giz;-;Awesome game! Loved most of it features...
Muchachos;-;if you're new player...make sure to play single like 999999999999999x before searching match or what we call...multiplayer...when one new player refuse to go singleplay 1st...u will be called NOOB, F*GS, FEEDER, STUPID, KIDDIES, PINOY, and a lot of bad stuff that will make you insanely mad while multi-playing....u uninstall the game and say bad things about it...make your life easier by having some friends training with you and teaching you stuff if they are a dota2 player...if not then its true...you're just....NOOB...thats all...btw its just a game
Gricket;-;BEST FREE TO PLAY GAME EVER.!
AcidiC;-;wow such game much fun very recommend
DerpDerp;-;Have great hair? Lots of friends? Want to get rid of both? Then Dota 2 is just for you. This game helps you lose friends gets you fustrated and while you're at it, you might even learn how to speak Russian or Pinoy!
his palms are sweaty;-;It is as fun as masturbating your best friend
OneFatChicken;-;You wanna know what I think? I think you don't! Basically it kills you, a lot. I have no idea about this Russian talks but I've seen pretty much (I have no idea who they are, all are chinese to me). Oh and hey, there is one owrd you can learn all over again which is nOOb! Recommended, if you wish not to have a life! 11/10!
Krauser-GOD;-;A very very very addicting game, you have been warned.
Fredda;-;This game taught me about the diversity of cultures that our small little corner of the universe offers. Then it taught me to hate them all.
Chrome;-;Side effects include: -Hatred of other humans -Lack of trust in others -Carpal Tunnel -Improved hand eye coordination -A large ego -Weight gain -Weight loss -Confidence -Despression -Extreme Racism -EXTREME RACISM -Increased strategic thinking capabilities -Mushy-brain syndrome -Subconsciously learning a new language -Subconsciously learning to hate the culture of said language -Literally every ailment that is not a transmitable disease 9/10 Doctors accepted this game on their recommendation list, but the tenth was afk
Grizzt;-;It's like roulette; fun until it turns into Russian.
psych0tic;-;Causes anxiety problems, low self esteem, Tourette's syndrome, mood swings, Bipolar disorder, breakdown of relationships, raging erections, racism. Would definitely recommend.
Sentimental Oriental;-;In Dota 2, Not many people speak your language. Not many people play well. Not many people talk nicely. Not many people work as a team. But if you find people that do... You'll have the most fun you've ever had.
Kyubashi;-;And you thought real life was a struggle.
ephir;-;I only played a little but it was fun.
Captain Obvious;-;Things I gave to DotA: 1. Money 2. Time 3. Love Things DotA gave me: 1. Arthritis 2. Carpal tunnel syndrome 3, Hatred of Russians, Mexicans, Spanish, Finnish, and Russians 4. Broken keyboard 5. Broken mouse 6. 9/10 ready 7. Server crashes 8. 4 stacks of Russians in EUW servers on English prefrence settings 9. Ranked matches 10. Free to play but Pay to win games (I.E. - Foreseer's contract, New Bloom 2015) 11. "It's in the bag" spam (especially Skywrath) 12. Multilingual cursing - I guess this is a good thing? 13. Split second math - Reliable/Unreliable gold and gold loss on death vs. Buyback availability - This is good too Essentially - DotA is a greedy woman, but I love her all the same. 11 / 10 would play again
HekaDooM;-;"THE PUB SUPPORT" "Where are wards?" The pub Carry demanded. "I placed them and they were countered" the Support began, "I am trying to juggle giving you complete lane farm, protecting you and harrassing the enemy while saving to buy more, also possibly sentries to remove their-" "UP COUR PLS" the mid hero politely added. "Give Savle" The Carry demanded. "Certainly." replies the support, using the salve on the Carry who subsequently ran headlong into an enemy creepwave. "So where is mek?" the Carry said, after he was ganked due to overextending. The Support died saving him and was treated to a rather enthusiastic series of map pings on his corpse. "Again, having not even enough to buy boots as well as wards, I don't think a 7 minute Mek is viable." The Support replies. "Haha look your level, so low, noob" the Carry retorted. "U have no item xaxa". "Well, jungle gold and experience through stacking and pulling with blocked camps is nowhere near as much as on lane which I attempted to give you, the carry, the priority over." The Carry is subsequently ganked again at the enemy tower, oblivious to the enemy tp that the Support moved away from. "Report Support, usless" The carry cried in allchat, in between mentioning various aspects of the Support's Mother's anatomy. "Instead of reporting and acting like that, why don't you try supporting for randoms sometime instead of instapicking a carry?" the Support asked, as he watched the Carry return to afk-lasthitting lane creeps. "HAH, support is for noskill noobs like you!"
flanadlivv;-;One day, a wise man intoduce me into this game. "it shall protect your virginity, my lad" he said.
Yoshimitsu;-;Addicting
Ghost;-;Dota 2 is a learning game. It's a game about how good you are "relatively". Everyone is terrible at Dota, (you can't help it) all that matter is how good you are, relative to how good your enemy is. I like Dota because it keeps me saying stuff like "Wait, that can happen?" and "Oh, that's how that works." on a daily baisis. There's always more to learn. The complexity of this game is so deep that you can't possibly expect to know all there is to know. You will never come across the same scenario twice, maybe the same team oor enemy team, but never the same items, gold skill levels, couldowns, mana and health levels etc. The point is, Dota 2 is a game that you play to have fun and just because you're not as good as you'd like to be doesn't mean you're not good at Dota. ~Thank you "Three Lane Highway" for insight into what kind of a game Dota 2 really is.~
bruh;-;I love this game get it . This game is awesome
Spareman;-;This is nice game strategy and team work
Ankylosaurus;-;This game made me bigoted torwards Peruvians.
SMILES:);-;THIS GAMNE IS AWESOME
colt;-;Probably, it is not just the best game ever created but also the worst addiction. Edit: It's just an addiction.
[BdP]Heisenberg;-;Epic game!!! All must try it!!!!
[ThuG Life] DeathStroke;-;Verry nice game
KD Winter;-;This is nice game...
Im Just Gurl;-;i love this game so much
ambidextrouspotato;-;Best Game I Ever Played
Supahbear;-;DotA 2 is the continuation of the EPIC Warcraft III mod DotA. Instant addiction, lots of fun, screaming, pain, agony, joy, hate and love. Oh, and Russians. Everywhere
Maffalda;-;Putin is winning the war digitally through this.He is coordinating the attacks on newbs and anyone outside Russia.0/10. Would say Blyat to their face again.
[Au]D3ia;-;educational game about russian culture. not much else to say here
rednas;-;Friendly community!
Voorhees Administration;-;Hey this game takes time lots and lots of time and skill. Welcome to Dota You Suck!!!!
PirateHUNTER-;-;nice game, but say goodbye to your friends.
Ray, AKA "The Bottom Feeder";-;The game is great, except that the game rapidly snowballs into an unwinnable position if you get off to a bad start, and they brutally punish you if you leave before the game is over. Even if it's the 20 minute mark, your team has died 40 times, and your opponents are all untouched, you just have to pretend you're still playing until your opponents decide to end it. Which they'll often hesitate to do, opting instead to spend 30+ more minutes taunting and toying with you.
Kroozer;-;game, bad community, please God play it with me I'm so lonely
R@V!T#J@;-;Awesome game....have fun
Gabstar;-;better then lol
zion_jave;-;i want to have a set.... how?
In your Dreams;-;"Russians, Russians every where". Would definately play again 10/10 (11/10 if every one would speak english)
Hijacked;-;The Real Strategy Game... Teamwork is the first thing you need to take care... :)
Alain;-;Competitive game, teaches teamwork and cooperation.
Doflamingo;-;As you begin to play this game,you're given a tutorial on how the gameplay works. As you finish completing the tutorial you would have options to either play with bots or with online players. There is a wide variety of modes to choose from. All of the heroes are unlocked from the start so you don't have to unlock them one by one like any other MOBA game. Each heroes have their own specific roles so choose wisely and don't anyhow go whatever you feel like. There is no in-game money in this game and you earned different rewards as you play many matches. There is a lore for you to read for each character if you're interested. However these game have a steep leaning curve and those who are new to MOBA genre will struggle how the gameplay system work. It require a lot of tactics & teamwork in order to win a match........that is if your partner will listen to you cause a lot of player i found will quickly rage at you if you make a minor issue while some other just rage quit because they felt like they cannot make a comeback. A lot of heroes are memorable mainly because sometimes you would see those heroes interact with one another depending if they are rival or allied.
NoD.TTR;-;Awesome game. Too much time and money was dumped into this :)
uLu_MuLu;-;DotA2 gets more and more interesting. Now that the overall game-speed has been increased, its equally good as League of Legends. Lets see how the beta develops itself. I assume that something big is going to be released...!
fvckeu;-;this game very addicted
Redcorn;-;Great game to play with a group of friends
Daddyllama;-;Decent game with lots of potential, but also lots of room for improvement.
Hohohorrors;-;Forward only time travel device. 10/10
[P2D2]RaGeMaN;-;Best MOBA I've tried so far! Very good balance between heroes
Day'veee d'great;-;very cool and good game uses all senses and helps to improve analytical decisions
BYU.Pyrosmog;-;Good game, very well made. The community ranges from extreemly unpleasant to somewhat friendly. Hours of good fun and competition that is always better than you.
Tzejian;-;What will happen after playing this game -You can speak Russian -Faith in humanity lost -Teamwork sucks balls -Its never your fault, its your support's fault
Wombstomp;-;I love this game!. :)
General DL;-;its a good game except for the russians they have their own server but still play on EU servers, i would not have minded it but they suck soooooo  bad at this game please note to all russians uninstall. Killed A Russian 10/10 Game Of The Year.
Gene;-;This is a game where 5 vs 5 PVPs become more real, where true friendship will be tested, where skill dont matter. The power of symphonies of skills matters. When you play Dota 2 for the first time, it will give you joy, self redemption, love or hate relatioship, anger, self pitty, and even it will you peace at some point, where you can stomp your enemy and destroy the throne. Bottom line this game is the marvel of all MOBA game
S A D B E A R;-;the only thing, i love, is the versatality offered by DOTA2.
The Last Dovahkiin;-;Probably the best MOBA game there is. Definently a 'must play'.
Dank Spank;-;Let's just say there is a reason it is the most played game on Steam
Lisu;-;Amazing , Absolutely Amazing , the graphics , everything :D , BEST GAME EVER
Waffles;-;Totally awesome! Nuff said :3
Ponka Po;-;best gaem, mah fav champ is Ashe. she iz bes poni. 10/10 too much water
TB_Nirvana;-;Nice game!!
Celty;-;Dont know what to say, but this game was one of the most online MOBA ever to played over the world !
NickmaN;-;This is gooood
Mr[F];-;a really good game.
BjC;-;10 / 10 Hard to play other games after playing Dota. Also true Free to Play Competative, frustrating but extremely rewarding when you get it right.. You always want to queue again!
Happy-Pants.BB;-;So Im missing my russians ,Alot of idiot dutchman (SA Afrkanners) have come on to the scene and wow they need to go back to farming
[NCU]Madxix :P;-;The only game where you can blame others for your fault :P
daedpul;-;Awesome game, 1000 times better than LOL
DeathTrooper;-;The PIRATES have INVADED THE social center! Shive rme timbers, yeh landlubbers better prepare yer cannons before we start our plunderin'! If we capture yeh, we'll make yeh SCURVY DOGS get thrusted out of th airlock! Then, we shall put the skull n' crossbones over the City!
shooTer;-;Best game in the world
[RO]Mcel;-;This games need no review ^_^
Daiki^;-;Better than LoL and HoN. LoL is for
febLey;-;easiest game of my life ... gg
SymmetricReaper;-;The difficulty curve is steeper than a 90 degree angle; you will lose 23% of your games because someone on the other team will be RNGsus; the creeps will follow you to Hell then back, then back to Hell, then back; there's always someone who will pick either Phantom Lancer or Nature's Prophet and backdoor the  out of you; and then ther are the #1337 PWN3Rs M4sT3R R4C3  who will 1. Rage quit, 2. Blame everyone else, 3. Have no idea what they're doing but blames it on their "lag", 4. BE RUSSAIN or 5. All of the Above and More. Seriously,  this game. 10/10
KJ.PARTYHARD;-;This game allows me to learn the word '' in many languages for free. 10/10
Filho do Meepo;-;Better than lol.
hashtagtoni;-;Great team work + great gameplay = good game
llcra;-;Simply the best MOBA game. Great gameplay, good support, a zillion of contents, The International....and GLaDoS(i hate you) ;)
Saraya`;-;In Dota Game, Big Team Fight. Dota Randomly Crashes, Nek Minute a Update. 1 Like = 1 Prayer
Hello Boys;-;Great Game
Pink_Stripes;-;recommended
2MOIST4U;-;this game r jesus.
zombieassassin;-;New update is great! I've never been able to get less credit for matches than ever. Go D/Cing!!! 420/10
(^^);-;Gotta be better than LOL. I think.
Fish Wizard;-;bEsT gAmE OuT TheRe. pERioD.
Cath;-;gr8 game almost as good at Strife
RFD;-;this game is very good man :)
Bsqy;-;good game for play..
Tfixe;-;Such a nice game, OMG
/\/ile;-;lot raging people
betlorde;-;Game of the century.
Ravern;-;Cool 3D graphics, free to play, and much better than Dota 1! I recommend this game!!
Hachiman Hikigaya;-;Dota 2, is one of the most anticipated game that every player has been waiting for. And It's been a year has past since this game has been released after the test. But now let me review this game, with the exception of the graphics. Gameplay: The Gameplay is kinda sluggish at times especially if your internet has a very low signal. But let's face it, even though the game is bad sometimes due to your slow connection, it can still carries some of the game if the net returns to it's original state. But, if you have a very tough time fighting with the connection until you got the highest "ping" point (for those who didn't know, a kind of signal detector use to check the signal. If the ping is too high, lag can occur and can result a very bad reputation to your signal, and if the ping is too low, no lags can occur and the gameplay runs smoothly) a disconnection will occur and it will gave you a low priority to your gaming record. It is indeed bad though. But, if you have a good to better connection, the game can responds the latest gameplay itself. But watch out, if your opponent's hero kills your hero due to your slow web connection, it can make you frustrating, so fix your internet connection right away. Soundtrack: Nope... I don't like it. Sorry. Community: Okay, this is the most interesting part, like for example, you went home to play Dota 2 after a rough time working in the office. Then, when you hero dies due to your opponent's will after you play for a few minutes, a teammate of yours suddenly replied to you as a "Noob", or any other kinds of bad words from any of your teammates or your opponents. And then you felt bad after you do that. That's my review on the community in Dota 2. I mean, let face it, even though the game is good, the community on the other hand is bad due to it's nature, and instead of respecting one another, they just saying the things that they wanted to say just like you're at school and you got your self Punk'd at the middle of the school grounds in front of dozens of people. So, if you saw anything innapropriate, you must report them immidiately. But even though you report them, is it enough to play this game just for fun after what happened? Well, the judge is yours. Heroes: I've saw a lot of DOTA heroes in DOTA 2 with only a few of them is missing like the Pit Lord. But, I wish they could do some solution in order to solve this lack of heroes. And to make the game more cooler, add more heroes with some original skills to make the game more worthful to play. Maps: Okay, I know the original map is still great. But can we at least add some "Mid wars" or any kinds of maps? I mean, for me, the map is already overated and boring to me. Final Review: The game is a must play to all DOTA gamers, but it's up to you if the game is kinda sick or totally repetative, it's your decision. But for me I like how this game works and it introuduces some of it's core of the game. So my final verdict for this game, DOTA 2, is a 7/10... It a great game. But if they do some adjustment for some Dota newbies at the community booth, with some add-ons I could almost rate this a 9... But 7 is enough and the game is very tense though. But don't be mad at me guys, it's just my opinion and that's all...
DANTEHAHA;-;A ing soul eater. Literally sucks your soul and life. 2.5k hours++ and I'm still not bored of this game and will never be.  life go dota 2.
Comeback is Real Sociedad;-;Addicting and massive teamfights
| n s a n i t y;-;Just like the old game, except with better graphics, better voice acting, game customization, event-specific gamemodes, and better experience. And it's also free.
"SLYX";-;i hate this it takes to long to download
#njhl;-;its a very good game~ i love it so much~
Daenerys Targaryen;-;best game since am a kid
Doot farm;-;great game 9/10 (if you are a masochist)
Doot farm;-;great game 9/10 (if you are a masochist)
DOVAHKIIN;-;nice and simple game, better than LOL, hahaha thx
WHAT IS OBAMA LAST NAME?;-;BEST FREE MOBA GAMES EVERY CREATED IN THIS UNIVERSE
(/*O*)/ NOO!!;-;Dota 2 is just the best game i've ever had
Doge;-;Got friend a who is a a and shouting like a a.... and he was like "noob teammates" but guess what... he is the noob in the team... Totally worth it..
CloD;-;The game was good, but since the Oracle update I no longer could play it in Offline mode. Ever since that, I don't appreciate this game as much as I did before the update.
[FALC] ind;-;I've played DOTA on and off since the map mod in Warcraft III, and if there's a game I find myself always coming back to, it's DOTA. You just can't beat the variety of play. There's a lot of strategy and lots to think about in real time. There's over 100 heroes. Each hero has unique abilities. Each hero can have numerous item builds. Lots of possibilities here. The other thing that keeps my attention is I can have a full game start to finish often in under 1 hour. You know you'll either win or lose in the next hour, and the tides can turn at any point. I've had games where we destroyed the other team's ancients (defense towers), and barracks causing the Mega Creep spawns... only to have them come back and win the game. DOTA is a game that requires some time spent learning to play before you can really appreciate it, but it's worth the investment. It's a nice jump in, jump out game that you can play with friends, often only waiting in queue a minute or two between matches. Valve really maintained the original feel that I remember, and continue to provide regular updates. A big plus is that I haven't seen any cheating, which is rare these days for online games. And... this game is FREE.
necronhavok;-;Great game, not the best community but the team expereince is quite unique to this genre. The game types are fun and often times even if you lose if you enjoyed trying a hero its worth trying again. It has allot of complexity but is slowly getting better at introducing people, take your time with it and you'll come to enjoy how broad the roster of fun heroes to try.
Lam;-;i'm noob at this game
molotovnasa;-;one of the few games you can play 150hrs and still not be considerd good enough to play competitive
@Ava3a13;-;The Best Game Ever ; ))) I'll Reccomend To Play It
Graian;-;ITS BETTER THAN LEAGUE IM TRICK2G GG WP MLG PRO
Reiyuzuki;-;I will never be able to stop playing this addictive and tactical game. The fun never ends!
Nick;-;Filled with lovable Russians!
JiHeKied;-;Things I've learned in DotA 2 Russians do not cooperate and go off to do their own thing, if they fail they'll yell out . Full comprehension of DotA player's languages. Including; Portuguese, Spanish, Russian, and rarely French. If your ping is over 100ms, don't expect to make plays. Playing for extended sessions will make you wonder why you don't have real friends. You'll go through many emotions. Mid or feed Destroyed my social life, 10/10 would play again.
JiHeKied;-;Things I've learned in DotA 2 Russians do not cooperate and go off to do their own thing, if they fail they'll yell out . Full comprehension of DotA player's languages. Including; Portuguese, Spanish, Russian, and rarely French. If your ping is over 100ms, don't expect to make plays. Playing for extended sessions will make you wonder why you don't have real friends. You'll go through many emotions. Mid or feed Destroyed my social life, 10/10 would play again.
SoulChicken;-;It's not fun, it's full of s, it's very frustrating and you'll never be good at it.
@FendiDoto;-;I only played a little but it was fun ! :)
ironblademetal(bored);-;It's a slow paced MOBA that requires patience, strategy, and a hell of alot of teamwork. 10/10 would never go full  again
zlz;-;Ruined my life 10/10
zlz;-;Ruined my life 10/10
Kal-el Klark Kent;-;best game i ever play since i was a kid.
SCARLETT;-;Great strategic game
Bulls;-;it's ok
manmachine;-;yes please
tieulykzc;-;Just addicted, from DotA time to dota 2.
Lino Rhino(V.Q.B.);-;I charge into battle as a knight and stab a few creeps and I turn into a dragon.Then I get shot by sniper a few times and die before I knew where the sniper was.10/10~Ign "You can't find this in any other game!"
Insert Coin(s);-;DOTA (Defence of the Ancients) A game of Strategy. This game revolves around one team trying to destroy another teams ancient (to do that players must destroy towers in corresponding order). the game consists of 107 heroes currently (there are still 5 more heroes to be developed; 112 heroes, just incase you forgot how to math) This game is also free, so why not give it a try?! (ofcourse there is a shop in which you buy vanities for heroes, loading screens, renaming tools and various items)
@Chii-ponpon;-;feeding them everyday is my hobby
What Is Love?;-;mid or feed -IGN
Syndrome.;-;Nice game! :)
w33;-;this game is one of the best games i have ever played in my entire life.
Blooque;-;This game will make you super competitive and hate your friends :c BUT ITS WORTH IT!
A Noble Crab Knight;-;My name is Artour Babaevsky. I grow up in smal farm to have make potatos. Father say "Artour, potato harvest is bad. Need you to have play professional Doto in Amerikanski for make money for head-scarf for babushka."I bring honor to komrade and babushka. Sorry for is not have English. Please no  pasta coperino pasterino liquidino throwerino.
Shugga;-;4k h wasted, do not download
Hart Harry;-;i played it once! and it was a bad idea
Karnogay;-;this game ing sucks, 10/10
McLooprix;-;This game just made me not to sleep 24/7...
Indiani;-;This game is teamplay, play your part and have fun! If you are getting this game train against bots, hook up with some friends and party up against others! hf =]
Jeeves Murkel;-;Great fun, but terribly long tutorial and takes a bit of time to get into, but I can really see how addicting this can be!
Dr.Eleazor Sterben;-;worth it to play it.
WillA;-;i love this game, its awesome!!
Queen Elsa of Arendelle;-;althou valve sucks, i love dota. it's a fun game to play with friends (if u have your team).
M120;-;Honest Review. This game is a huge headache Ive been playing MOBA's for over 12 years. You want to progress without a team. Prepare to be at the fate of people that do not want to play as a team game. This game is meant to be a team game. The Team idea of this game is for your entire team to pick a ( Carry ) most cases a hero that can last the length of a game and skills scale very well. Hence everyone wanting to play this type of hero. Then you have support which I really do not mind playing as well as long as we are a team. Nope be prepared to be faustrated to the point of no return. I have uninstalled this game as I can truly see no positive coming from this game. People are rude. The team play is near non existent unless you are on a team and everyone wants to have the score despite no record keeping being held on the game. Yes it is easier to potty train your children then to progress past a point in this game. Then if you make mistakes instead of being coached you get bashed on continuesly until your spirit is not even in the game no more. Yes Potty training is not fun, but at least your kids arent bashing you continuesly while your coaching them to aim their skills correctly. Soapbox out and I've uninstalled this trainwreck for the last time. Thank you valve for bringing premium entertainment at no cost but I think I would rather be in the bathroom at this point at least everyone there speaks english. Edit 12/24/2014. The matchmaking is tons better most of the time you get a team that wants to win but on occaision it can be a drain to be in a game.
fish;-;i suck at this game but i still play it because its fun
NOD;-;The worst and best game on the world at the same time
Star Lord;-;May or may not consume your life !
Alex;-;Got called a Pubescent  by a guy and his friends, later he added me, then he 1v1 me and destroyed my . After that i got reported by the guys. 12/10 Would Get Rekt Again.
Cerberus;-;It's a moba  So far I have played Hon, League, and Dota 2 and as of this point this one is my favorite. The user interface is visually pleasing and easy to use, you have acess to all heros right out of the gate so you don't need to purchase them like in League. There's still an insane learning curve if you are new to mobas, expect to suck if you are new. Great when played with friends, this game is always worth a try (all of them are, really, they're free)
dye;-;#1 top game
MysteriousPerson;-;Its a very good game because there are over 100 heros to play so you will never get bored!!
GoodGoodGreat;-;The only game i played everyday. The only game i will play for another years in the future. The only game that will never uninstalled off my laptop. The only game that will still played even after i turn 50. The only game that played by 10 out of 15 PC on internet cafe. The only game that wherever we go, people will always have knowledge about it. The only game that often makes me mad, happy, envy, angry, grows at the same time. The only game that worth 10,000 Hours for me to spent to. I AM LOVING IT. DOTA 2, THE GAME THAT LIVES.
= Bang !;-;Do not play this game. Otherwise your life is condemned !
MID OR FEED;-;the real game ever i play
brewski1955;-;graphics are really cool lots of fun to watch id recommend this to everyone
GhostlySteel;-;Smooth gameplay for a MOBA, easy to learn, you play the same map over and over, but each time it feels completely different as different combinaions of ally and enemy heros makes each match unique and fun. Unfortunately, the game has one downfall: it is way too addictive and most matches last one hour long :/ so it is easy to waste days playing DotA 2, but it is worth it :P
bokchun;-;best game ever. trust me, you will never get bored out of this one.
BoysAvenue;-;THE GREAT GAME
Hell-FireDoomBringer;-;Really nice multiplayer stratigy game
matzE;-;Love this one <3
[A] For Anonymous;-;THE BEST GAME EVER
h4h4;-;Good game for the MOBA lover.
Bartholomew;-;Here we go again..
313;-;I dont know what to say
Steelx90;-;It was fun
Elijahazini;-;Like League but good.
-Ync-;-;Recommended Game
An Athiest Dorito;-;Gametime says it all. great game.
DeathGho[TS3H];-;Best MOBA ive ever played! it has great graphics, great mechanisc, great everything!
jones77;-;Dota 2 (free) is among that class of games that defines the "casual" genre. Easy to play and even easier to get addicted to, Dota 2 could easily suck up all your time (and money) if you let it. If you want mindless hero-matching, then look no further.
Prassodiowan Kenoob;-;Played since Garena and BattleNet time, I lost a lot of games because of MH's and kitters! Then, Dota 2 came out!!! Not more MH's and kitters numbers decreased a lot... Still losing, damn Xicanos and 's!! 10/10, would giff mana again to Dimitri!
Kanoobee;-;Overview: Dota 2 is hands down one of the most challenging games to get in to, the sheer amount of items, heroes, and mechanics can seem extremely overwhelming. But don't let this discourage you! As one grits their teeth and pushes through, they will discover a game rich in content and a game that is very enjoyable to play. Dota 2 has been one of the most challenging games I have ever played and I find myself drawn back to it often for that very reason. This game is not only fun, but very satisfying to play, esspecially in the team setting. What I would like to see...: Despite the recently implemented tutorials, the experience for new players can still be very rough, I would like to see a more community based introduction to help new players. In addition to this, I feel like the games interface is filled with hidden bugs that often get ignored in favor of ballance fixes, let's see some client fixes! Bottom Line: If you want a challenge and can invest some time, download Dota 2. If you are looking to get into this game but are confused by the game, message me, and I will help you. I love this game! Kanoobee's Score: 9/10
VLZ;-;10/10 IGN rates skyrim with guns.
0xDEADFADE;-;The most engrossing game I have ever played. I started playing the game thinking that I probably wouldn't like it and would stop after a game or two. 300+ hours later here I am, still improving and still learning all the subtleties of the game that only experience can give you. A very steep learning curve requires you to play several games before you can even get the basic mechanics down, not to mention the hours it will take to learn the nuances of all the heroes and items, and how they interact with each other. Once you can get past the initial wall, it is a game that can be played for hours on end, and doesn't seem to have an end in sight, as it's gameplay seemingly will carry on years into the future. Plus it's free, so why not?
Shiro;-;Aaaah, this game, remember when my brother suggested it to me. I said "Yeah why not". Ive been playing since last year, the game is awesome, it has changed a lot since i started playing it, if you have or haven't ever played a MOBA before. Dota is an awesome option, a great game to jump in and enjoy.
xXxnoscopexXx;-;2 gamer walk in the bar the first guy playing LOL but another play dota dota play said LOL SUCKS!! LOL player couldn't deny XD
Tjonteh (   );-;11/10. Would play again.
Kate Takenomiya;-;this game seirously, the worst
Oreo;-;Downloaded, played, and learned fluent Filipinos and Chinese at the same time. 10/10
Racklesnack;-;Have you always wanted to learn another language but could never stick with it? If yes then vavle has the perfect product for you! Learn spanish and russian in under a month for free!
Di-Di;-;recommended to play!
JagXJ;-;It's DotA, need I say more? If your answer is "yes" then go play ****ing League of Legends...
Quasimodo;-;It's like learning to ride a bike without training wheels.
Rocketman909[TF:GO];-;Really awesome Birdview game, For any of you league of legend players. I feel bad for you, your missing out on a better graphic game with way more fun and action. P.S This game is hard and Games are usually 30:00-40:00 Minutes long. If you need help being an alchemist, P.S me friends.
Dustino The Savage;-;If you like getting sweared at because you made a mistake this is the game for you
dsfasdfast;-;awesome and cool game ever.
Gwar2005;-;It's DOTA 2 . (Great time killer)
Rivergg;-;7/10 - Google translate not included
KIRITO CARRY TWO;-;I love this game. :)
R1co;-;Awesome,And Cool this game,recommend for you all
AOD.P | Death Kid;-;this game is to adikted i like it
Sign;-;Game is hard
Best Annie NA;-;Played a little............Just one more game.
Mr.Wolfymites;-;Really Awesome Dudes try it its pretty nice for the extra credit :D.
Woiii! Fresh Meaat..!!;-;recommended!
CallMeSuperTox;-;You will swear, you will get , you will flame on your team, you will flame on your friends, you will flame on everyone you see, but you will still come back for more. Mid or feed!!!!!
My Boss must be Crazy;-;what can i say for dota?
Mark_Inhinyero;-;My only problem is my fellow Filipinos that always blame  to their teammates. Just play the game. Enjoy! All in all, DOTA 2 is one of the bestest games ever. More power, bros!
Taeyeon;-;I love this game.
Taeyeon;-;I love this game.
Na'Vi.Dendi;-;the best strategy game ever!!!
Blinku Dagga !!;-;bring friends to this game or you will regret everything while game is on
Munako;-;can destroy your friendship 11/10
Monofon #Malaysia;-;i think SE asia have big problem, there is alot pinoy dont know what english is, so its kinda hard to communicate with team, i hope they have they own server ( pinoy server) so i can play with other player who can english
...;-;IS SO HOT :)
$TR][R;-;Best Moba game ever, Do not miss it
TrafalgaR24;-;accelerating carpal tunnel syndrome 10/10 would play again
_Panda_;-;GReat game first boring than gets addicting.
sanderspls;-;The tutorials are very helpful and slowly brings u up to speed for playing PvP. Two thumbs up
clickCLICKclickCLICKclickETC;-;Not the worst game i ever played. Definitly the worst people i ever met online.
Wambula;-;Dota 2, completed it mate...
Mugen;-;Right now the best MOBA you can play. It has a rapidly growing community and Valve is taking somewhat good care of the game and the community. For the original WC3 DoTA fans it still has missing heroes but not much. And I want TECHIES!
Fizban95;-;It was ok.
^Trisha;-;this game rocks!
Keeping it Real About AIDS;-;Completely awful game; Cannot in good conscious recommend to anyone ever.
The Ripper;-;Best moba game but worst player community, we played as two in three game i mean exactly we played as two, we find a match with my friend and our teammates leaved or trolled three games in a row. I'm sad because i can't play this brilliant game because of other people. If you want to try this brilliant game, good luck with trolls, russians who never write in english, leavers and flamers.
TheKCWalrus;-;This is my first MOBA. I never really saw the appeal and didn't know what all the fuss was about. After grinding through a few hours and climbing the steep learning curve this game is slowly but surely comsuming my life. The only complaint would be that there's too much water. 6.5/10 -IGN
Kim Jong Un;-;This game will consume your soul. 10/10
Cromas;-;Best Moba game on the market, amazing and mature graphics, awesome to play.
Na'Si.Kuning;-;Dota 2 deserves its intimidating reputation, and it probably wont suit you if youre looking to play casually. Theres a huge time investment before you can even enjoy a game, let alone feel competent at it. But once you start to learn its secrets, theres a wild and exciting variety of play here thats unmatched, even by its peers. Its a challenge of knowledge as well as reflexes, and success is a rush. The fact that its completely and totally free to play in the way we wish all free-to-play games could be isnt just one of the most generous propositions anywhere in gaming, it creates a level playing field where skill and cooperation is paramount. May the best team win. but at least dota was a worth game to play.. overall i love it.. it just a verdict of the game
Tomato;-;nice feed
Shou Ryouta Shizuka;-;Didn't get to play much of it... But the game itself is alright
thank mr skeltal;-;Russian road rage simulator without actual road. 10/10.
<font face="Ravie">Cindy Chan;-;Love This Game!
Leh Uga Lo ( LUL );-;Remember if you lose its time to blame your teammates :D
=[pG]= Qadassa;-;This game is a very fun yet compettiive game. It encourages teamwork, and I've spent many hours playing on this marvelous game. 9.99/10, best game I've played in a while. However, there are some of those people that you just don't want to play with, but the game can still be enjoyable. And there are those days when you just don't have a good day, and your teammates are yelling at you for not doing good. You can just ignore those people, because they don't know how it feels yet. Dota 2 is a very good game, but can be annoying at times, it's very fun when you're playing a hero you enjoy.
Isi';-;Better than LoL.
{KDT}OomPiet;-;yes!!!!!!!!! but no russians pls
Helios3D;-;the ONLY MOBA game to play!
Anchorage :3;-;strategy team game.. what a nice game..
Typhoon;-;Dota 2 is one of my favourite games to date. Why? Im not sure. Is it the compelling nature to work as a team, the thrill of a victory of the satisfaction of a great gank? Either way, if my play time is to go by anything (And its only around a modest 200 hours) Dota 2 is an engaging and addictive game for anyone that likes teamwork and a tactical MOBA. The graphics are quite decent, the sound and character design are solid and the gameplay mechanics fluid. Best of all, its 100% free /w the addition of microtransactions to bling out your hero! However, it can be rage inducing when things arent going your way, which can be quite common. This usually takes form of players disconnecting or generally being a little stupid (Ie, running into pinch zones). But never fear, sometimes its all about getting the most enjoyable experience out of a loss you can get (That moment the most stupid death becomes the funniest thing youve seen all day!). To some, it might not be a comical death, and that is expected when (younger) players arent quite sure on whats happening, but they will soon learn (Hopefully). In addition, dota 2 is a free Russian speaking class... Overall, Dota 2 is a solid MOBA with great mechanics, a wonderful player base and glorious moments! 9/10 Would bang
White Pegasus;-;This game is amazing, although this is a free game, I have supported it with $30 to the international tournament. 5/5
Bruce Potato Lee;-;Nice Games, too fckin nice
Vnn;-;Too addictive.
watta65;-;real good!
loll435;-;addictive game
2077 Gave Me AIDS;-;It ruins relations with people you know, forces you to cooperate with people you hate (not really), teaches you Russian and Brazillian, consumes hours of your life that could have been spent making something of yourself, ensures that you will develop high blood pressure before you're 30, and is also a donkey murder sim. 10/10 Would ruin my life again.
WillymonZ;-;Its a cool game very fun team game. The only down side is that it is hard to learn e.g there are so many heroes, items etc to learn making dota 2 a hard game to learn. You have to be a hard-core gamer to play dota 2
(5) Bottom Trash Uncommons A;-;Remember that game where those horrible people pretend not to be Russians and then go into an airport and shoot everyone? Same deal, except the horrible people here are pretty bad at disgusing their Russian-ness.
MegaCrot!;-;After long time playing DoTA 1(Warcraft III) this DoTA 2 really makes me crazy. Because you know, the graphic, animation and all the things here are completely advanced. When I try to play DoTA 1 again it feels like "Am I play this game before? How ugly is it(sorry)".
CHA LA, HEAD CHA LA;-;Trial by fire. Straight up. You're going to learn exceptions to the rule by being killed by them, and it's going to happen a lot. Dota is the most brutal learning curve of any game I've ever played. Sometimes in a well-done fashion, sometimes not. There are few games where I can honestly say that at 300 hours you have barely any true idea what you're doing. Amazingly complex game! Tons of fun, especially with friends. Not a casually oriented game at all, but enormously entertaining to play and watch. No grind, no microtransactions that affect gameplay in any way. No outside advantages, no premade skills. Everything happens in game and you need to be quick on your feet. Try it out! Just be warned that properly trying it out will take hundreds of hours. Relax, you're doing fine.
Laughing Man;-;League of Legends is a great game.
<font color="#2012FF">NMD;-;absolutely a best game ever :)
Anti-Christ;-;10/10 would press buttons
s3nkej-S-;-;luv dis game from bottom :D
Pazablozo;-;Likes : Everyhing about it. Dislikes : The ocasional horrible teamplay.
(10) Commons Dump;-;World's premiere Russian language learning software.
X4[Decimo];-;awsome
puling;-;very exciting game!!
Pandamonium;-;Newbies, expect alot of harsh comments. Go play with AI first!
.dizzid1a;-;If you want to feel heavily violated by Russians this is the perfect game for you! 10/10!
Jad;-;play dota 2 its awesome :D
Clockwork;-;Requires: 1 Fluent Degree in Russian, an unrivalled grasp of battlefield tactics and a soul to surrender to play this game.
Satellizer;-;Great
4HeadEleGiggle;-;10/10 consumed my life
kumahaSiaLah;-;i like this game surely , and many friend here
Cyka Reborn;-;It gave me ebola but I still keep playing for some reason. 3/10, Amazing - IGN
Dick Tickler;-;League of Legends is for boys. Dota 2 is for grown  men; well mostly grown- Russian men that play on US Servers leading to the usual "I don't ing understand you" banter.
-TiPPeX';-;awesome yet sucks
yyG-;-;hmmm. I like every and any games. I dont really care about the graphics :3
Standin.m0nkeyb0yz;-;Very good strategic game...Love it so much !
Simon Petrikov;-;Not enough time for accurate review.
Italian Immigrant;-;For my friends who have not touched this game, whether they have heard it's , garbage, or simply because they just arent interested, this "review" is for you. Dota 2 is a game of strategy coordination, and combat all wrapped up in a letter stating- "Take the Enemy's ancient before they take yours'. In this game you and 4 other players choose from over 100+ heroes in order to complete the objective, while the enemy team does the same. Each hero is unique, and have their strengths and weaknesses. After heroes there are another 100+ items availible for your heroes to purchase ingame. These Items Can strengthen your hero, weaken enemy heroes, or provide some kind of utility. With such a combination of heroes and Items, Dota expands from what on paper looks like a race into an infinite Universe of tactics and teamplay in order to complete that seemingly simple objective. ------------------ This game is complex. You will not understand how the game works on your first try. Nobody does. rather this game is based mainly on knowledge and on the abilty for a team to coorordinate with eachother. So as you play, research, experiment, watch others, You will grow stronger. Hell, i've spent over 1700 hours playing this game as of writing this review and i still learn, i still can improve, and i still question. I could tell you in depth in how the game works, but this is a review, not a beginer's guide. If you are interested I have pasted two links containing guides on dota: http://www.purgegamers.com/welcome-to-dota-you-suck#.UoQbSOIkRIE (really good explanation of dota, really helps a begginer put things into perspective.) http://twop.navi-gaming.com/en/dota_2 (this contains many guides on mechanics in dota)
ddro;-;I would climb over the grand canyon one armed & blindfolded on a set of rusty monkey bars covered in hornets whilst bearing a 12lb bag of marbles tied to my shaft if it meant that once reaching the other side I could just look at the lobby screen of this game.
Pabebe;-;recommended
Viper;-;You won't play anything else once you get into this game....
UcUPs |;-;amazing game, never bore even if playing it all day.. best moba ever..
Thoo!;-;A very addictive game but still is awesome and requires practice. Practice makes a man perfect in anything
Bambino;-;The most popular games for all ages...
ea  now;-;After 1000 hours. Summary: Bobo, noob, feeder, commend me, ks, get rekt, mother - best ice breaker, report for feeding, report for ks-ing, report for talking, report for playing dota, quit dota. 10/10
stOOnDxLaNGi;-;I like this game cause i love dota :) i disliked this game when lagging :( and sometimes im dc then i reconnect it becames black screen but i can see may net graph active in console..
Michel;-;Great MOBA. The pace is very good and each game is uniqe. Game takes a while to get repetitive with the versitile heroes. Theres a crap ton of different game mechanics for players to play with which is good for developing your own style of playing which could be as varied as hell; from strategic ganker to dunking duker and teamfight weapon of mass destruction support. There is only one map but that shouldnt keep the game from getting old. I give it a TEN OUTTA TEN!!!
vol;-;Terrible game, dont know why you'd waste your time on it.
Kourosive;-;I've played dota 2 since the 3rd quarter of 2012. So I've had it for 2 1/4 years. Thats 19710 hours. Now lets assume you're supposed to have 8 hours of sleep every day, so i've been awake supposedly for 13140 hours of that time? Now further lets assume you go to full time education (like i did) and spend approximately 4 hours a day in school/university (on average). That leaves you with 9855 hours. So I've had 9855 hours of spare time in the last 2 and a bit years to study, get fit, get a girlfriend, find a job and get successful and this time also includes eating time and laying around doing nothing/watching tv time. I've spent 1/3 of my time playing Dota 2? Is it an amazing game? Absolutely. If I could go back and decide whether to start playing it? Hell no. About 3k hours in dota 2, and probably about 1.5k hours in DotA. If i had done anything productive during that 4.5k hours I would be pretty rich or happy with my self by now. But instead i'm fat and have no job and got horrible grades in uni so far. Now that was the disclaimer. Time to rate the game out of 10 for graphics, gameplay, storyline, replayability and then an overall score. Moba's are not usually played for graphics so much. The main focus of the game is on the actual gameplay, but in comparison to the other big "moba" games, Dota 2 has quite good graphics. If you're looking for a visually amazing game you can spend time on, Dota 2 might not be the best choice, because its not really made for the graphics. If you want a moba with good graphics look at smite, dawngate or heroes of the storm (none of which i've played but their screenshots look like they have slightly better graphics than dota 2). Also, dota 2 has a few female characters but if your in it for the revealing type images of characters go play league of legends because you're probably gonna never load into a game without seeing bewbs. Graphics Score: 7/10 Gameplay. Dota 2 has amazing gameplay. After playing so many times i still feel like theres ever so little more i need to know because gameplay is changed slightly (or sometimes vastly) by patches. The patches are seeming to come more regularly (now 2 months in a row with 1 patch per month). The skills a dota 2 player needs to learn to be really great can take years and years to get good at. Reaction time isn't the only important thing but strategy and calculations are important. In comparison to LoL which is the only other moba i have played, Dota 2 has significantly more strategy involved in pub games. I play LoL game where people barely speak or plan out whats going on. In dota 2 there are so many tense occasions where you and your team have to roam the map and farm in a group and avoid smoke ganks. Other gameplay factors which enhance skill required is the timer system of jungle spawns (stacking, pulling), creep blocking, denying allied creeps (and heroes in some cases!) and the last most important thing is that whereas in LoL where a majority of heroes can solo kill others, you need to organise ganks very well with allies to get kills. Dota 2 takes a while to learn but the satisfaction is ever-present once you've gotten to a certain point. Gamplay Score: 10/10 Storyline. The lore in DotA was nice to learn about. The dota 2 lore is pretty bad and not really linked to the original game. Valve doesn't release any storyline related videos for dota 2 really. The advantage of this is that since the game has source film maker with it (i havent used sfm yet), a lot of talented people have created SFM videos on youtube which are really enjoyable to watch. Having said that if you want a game for its story I would not recommend dota 2 for that. Compared to games like smite and lol the character backgrounds aren't really important and many (including myself can't be bothered reading). The only story in the game is kind of a tutorial form which is nice for new players. Storyline Score: 4/10. Replayability. This is self explanatory. I have spent 4.5k hour around for this game and DotA. It is probably one of the most replayable games ever made. You will almost never have 2 games with the exact same heroes and team (unless maybe in captains mode where you can ban and pick) and games can last between 10 mins and 1 and a half hours (some are faster or longer but this is the general sweet spot with the average (non-abandoned) game lasting about 40ish mins). Replayability Score: 10/10 Overall. Dota 2 lacks a little bit in the story area but this game was not meant for that. This game was made for literally endless fun and playing. This overall score will not be an average of the other scores but more of the total enjoyability of the game i've been hooked on for the last 7 years. Overall Score 9.5/10 (not 10/10 because that would imply that its the most perfect game ever created, which i still think it could be a little bit better)
Breaderino;-;Its great for guys who like to stay at home!!! ;) (   )
<font color="#CFAB31">oe;-;very nice game
SuMMoNeDSkuLL;-;DotA > League of Lesbians Volvo > Rito
Spirit;-;Not sure why it took so long to do a review for this. Best game on steam its free and provides a experience that never gets boring with a competitive but fun enviroment. Great with friends even if they're FEEDERINOS!!!!
move bitch get out da way;-;Add bots to RMM, plose.
J[o]|-|[n]Y || Road To RTZ mmr;-;Very Nice
Bot-Unfair;-;it is very adventurous game
Hot Damn!;-;Ruined 1000+ hours of my life. 10/10 would play again
Splendiferous Finch;-;10/10 would waste 700 hours again
WALKING DEAD #4;-;prepare to war
Mr.LowProfile;-;Very nice game indeed
q22;-;Addictive with graphics and strategic nature, powering up with an enormous community services plus cross gaming culture around the globe where we don't have to group a party up outside to play. Just a pityful drawback for those with poor internet speed and access will face disturbing laggs and sometimes have to download huge updates to play. But it's a flagship though, way to go Dota 2!
Nicky;-;A drunk russian began singing the Russian national anthem. 11/10 laughed so hard.
YOUICHI;-;this game is awesome and anti stressed for me.... I'm having fun playing dota2
LuisL33T;-;Puts League Of Legends on is back pocket
DZ.Serenity;-;Very Cool
VC_VittosCorner;-;THIS GAME IS AWESOME EVEN YOUR PLAYING ON THE SAME PLACE EVERYTIME AND EVERYTIME YOUR JUST DEEPLY GOT HOOKED UP WITH THIS GAME, AND YOUL STICK PLAYING WITH IT, YOU CANNOT RESIST IT ANYMORE.
Patbeard the sky bad;-;Its like skyrim with flying donkeys
milesgdgreen;-;fantastic game! great fun, easy to play and free to play! what more do you want :D
Kingdomfan;-;this game is good 4/20
Pika Pika;-;i love this game,the only reason i hate it is because all the noob Pinoys -,-
Rak3;-;Approaching 2100 hours played...wow. While I do completely agree with the reviews that talk about how bad the community is, I have to say my experience of Dota on the whole has been very enjoyable. The mute option is great, I insta-mute anyone talking crap. Admittedly Dota has an incredibly high learning curve, and you will often find high level players playing on "noob" accounts so even the early matches for new players can be brutal. If you can push through the first couple of hundred hours of games ;) and ignore the torrent of expletives thrown your way when you let the team down!; you will find Dota 2 to be a: competitive, intense, challenging, and completely engaging experience.
Zyga;-;The most challenging and interesting MOBA game ever.
Kendra Sunderland;-;fun and interesting game where it test your mentality, co-operation and awareness.
RODLIKE!;-;Best moba ever!! A little difficult to learn for newcomers, but it's tutorial is pretty good!!
Schyper;-;Teamwork! It's all about teamwork. A good team results into a good game :) Have fun! :D
Deathstroke;-;i love this game its one of the best games on steam dota 2 i wanna go to the internatinal of dota 2 its so awsome i will go to the internatoinal that is my goal everyone your awsome if u play dota 2
Like`Benjie;-;i like dota 2 bcoz its a lot of fun and bcoz i can play with my friends online dislike quiters thats all thank you
BloodCyka;-;Great game, but the community can be very bad. I would suggest to find friends and play with them!
Fearless Warrior;-;If you like strategy, team game play, and tons of hours of etertainment, GET. THIS. GAME. ASAP.
tsunami;-;feeding
Krat0S;-;Best game to spend time and money
-TITITATIT-;-;ATTENTION !! Addiction detected !! >.< play this and you will addicted trust me :)
AnneaD" <3;-;dota2 is the best online game ever
gay weed;-;what the hell is this im so angry right now
Raven;-;Do not play This game , Cause once you start playing you can never stop !!!!! BEST ONLINE GAME EVER!!!
senotoodoo;-;i did it for the achiev
<font color="#FF0000">;-;why i cant log in??????!!!!!!!
Choletta;-;the best game that i've played ever
Betmen;-;PLEASE SOMEBODY HELP ME I CAN'T STOP PLAYING THIS GAME !!!!
Abyss Walker;-;cool game
Endymion;-;most beautiful game in the world and never get boring when playing dota 2
inter_alias;-;sooooooooo many hours spent playing this game.
LXNDRI;-;i love this game (y)
Say That You Love Me;-;i think this game made me racist thirteen white stars on a blue st. andrew's cross out of 10
Minty;-;Great Game.
r o x y;-;Im exhausted from all this studying I haven't done.
SanSanSan;-;this good game i like this game
Shrek the President;-;Its dota 2. Play it dumbow lelele
Dalvenjah;-;Dota 2 is a multiplayer online battle arena game in a three-dimensional environment, presented from an oblique high-angle perspective. The player commands one of 109 controllable character "Heroes." Each Hero begins the match at level one and becomes more powerful by accumulating experience points through combat, thereby leveling up to the maximum level of twenty-five. With every level gained the player either selects a new ability for their Hero to learn or enhance their general statistics. Each Hero's method of combat is influenced by its primary property: Strength, Agility, or Intelligence. Dota 2 features items, which the player stores in an inventory. These items are acquired predominantly through purchase with gold, the in-game currency. Items vary in function: some enhance the statistics of a Hero, while others grant additional abilities. The player automatically receives small increments of gold continuously, though they can obtain more by destroying enemies. Killing non-player characters grants gold only to the player who lands the final blow, whereas killing enemy Heroes grants gold to the player's nearby allies as well. Destroying Towers or killing Roshan gives gold to all players on the team. "Denying" is a feature of the game where players inhibit the enemy's ability to accumulate gold and experience by killing an allied unit or destroying an allied structure before the enemy can do so. Each match of Dota 2 takes place on a functionally symmetrical map that features the strongholds of two warring factions, the Radiant and the Dire. The Radiant is based at the southwest corner of the map, while the Dire is based at the northeast corner; the two sides are divided by a river that runs perpendicular to the central lane. These factions are defended by up to five players. In each stronghold is a critical structure called the "Ancient", a fountain that provide health and lesser structures. These bases are connected by three paths, referred to as "lanes"two run alongside the edges of the map, while one runs directly between the two bases. The lanes are guarded by defensive Towers, as well as autonomous characters called "creeps", which periodically spawn in groups and travel along the lanes, attacking enemies they encounter.Featured across the map are hostile characters referred to as "neutrals", which are not aligned to either faction and are primarily located in the forests. Located in a tarn on the northeast side of the river is a "boss" called "Roshan", who typically requires multiple team members to kill and drops powerful items. Dota 2 features seasonal events, which provide players with the option of playing the game with special game modes that alter the aesthetics and objectives. With the seasonal event game modes, the central focus of the game shifts away from the standard battle composition, in order to focus on new objectives central to the seasonal events. So far, there have been three seasonal events: the Halloween-themed Diretide event, the Christmas-themed Frostivus event, and the New Bloom Festival, which celebrates the coming of spring.
TeaR;-;nice and cool
R;-;Very Competitive Game
ANDREA;-;this game is awesome
Euphoria;-;better than league of legends/10
<Venerebel>;-;do not play this game. You will lose your real life. It's too late for me, but I can at least give you this warning..... I must go now, master dota calls.....
[wow][wow][wow][wow][wow][wow];-;Way too easy to burn time with this game.
47;-;great game!
Mimic Kairatta;-;It's a very cometative game which pits you against 5 heroes. You must work with your teammates to overcome such odds, though you'll likely fail the first couple of times.
SeaStack;-;I have a hard time recommending this game, because if you can struggle through the opening noob blues you will be ensnared in the most nuanced multiplayer experience I've ever experienced. If you see the fated DOTA square be prepared to surrender your life, you will no longer have time. Enjoy
B'dazzled Oruby I'vY;-;so nice to play but russians r u malnuud
Bot - Hard;-;Either you suck so bad that you think it's the best game ever, or you get good(at least what you think is good) that you hate everyone else that plays.
<font face="ravie">SaiyanJin;-;I like to play with players who are respecting other players ingame :)
Chrown;-;GREAT GAME !
HornyFluffyBunny;-;Best game in the ing world!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
<font face="Ravie">Anteiku;-;ahmz... why do other players when if there's a phatom assasin user and didnt have contract they automaticly leave the gameeee
SUpergeo333;-;It is very fun
jjdefender;-;Pffft......Once you play this game, it takes away youre life, its like mindcontrolling or something, its so fun....
Me Gusta;-;i spent alot of my money for this game T.T
[X]D;-;I dont like the new version of map
aL_MuJa7Id Bin_Ben;-;very nice games ever :)
[GM] i <3 PHILIPPINES;-;i realy love this :) but i wish to have a set items :(
Crystallized;-;Good game, lots of heroes where u can play with, i recommend u this game.
signia's calling;-;Before trying out Dota 2, I did not really like MOBA overall. Until my friends persisted that I tried and I was glad I made that choice. Dota 2 is a great game that really requires teamwork(like every MOBA), but it just has this special feel that makes this f2p game a must play. It has awesome graphics and smooth mechanics and one should definitely not miss out on this game.
Seghrein;-;The best moba in my opinion. Great number of heroes and different skills. Thu usage of fog of war, wards, cliffs is very intelligent. And a good fact is that cashers aren't better than the other by itens, beacuse they are all cosmetics
Mr Blue Sky;-;do YOU like league of legends? then don't play this and go play LoL you silly
[0FG] No Fear;-;Great game and free well worth the fun. I suggest trying it, if its not for you then no harm no money lost!
nL | Ultraman;-;do not start this game . There is no turning back.
Le cumback t^_^t;-;DOTA's a great game. I've been playing this game to ease my depression and it really helped. Well, I've been recommend this great of a game to my friends of course. No problem so far, except the rude prices of the items, can't afford. :)
GetMek'd;-;Best way to learn new language and have fun at same time. If you want to learn Russian pick EU West as your server. If you want to learn Spanish pick US West or East.
Mantequilla;-;its un amazing time killer this game ...
Alesh-ShinChan;-;addicting
Dagger[5];-;nothing to do
Blank;-;Dota 2 is a multiplayer online battle arena game in a three-dimensional environment, presented from an oblique high-angle perspective. The player commands one of 109 controllable character "Heroes." Each Hero begins the match at level one and becomes more powerful by accumulating experience points through combat, thereby leveling up to the maximum level of twenty-five. With every level gained the player either selects a new ability for their Hero to learn or enhance their general statistics. Each Hero's method of combat is influenced by its primary property: Strength, Agility, or Intelligence. Dota 2 features items, which the player stores in an inventory. These items are acquired predominantly through purchase with gold, the in-game currency. Items vary in function: some enhance the statistics of a Hero, while others grant additional abilities. The player automatically receives small increments of gold continuously, though they can obtain more by destroying enemies. Killing non-player characters grants gold only to the player who lands the final blow, whereas killing enemy Heroes grants gold to the player's nearby allies as well. Destroying Towers or killing Roshan gives gold to all players on the team. "Denying" is a feature of the game where players inhibit the enemy's ability to accumulate gold and experience by killing an allied unit or destroying an allied structure before the enemy can do so. Each match of Dota 2 takes place on a functionally symmetrical map that features the strongholds of two warring factions, the Radiant and the Dire. The Radiant is based at the southwest corner of the map, while the Dire is based at the northeast corner; the two sides are divided by a river that runs perpendicular to the central lane. These factions are defended by up to five players. In each stronghold is a critical structure called the "Ancient", a fountain that provide health and lesser structures. These bases are connected by three paths, referred to as "lanes"two run alongside the edges of the map, while one runs directly between the two bases. The lanes are guarded by defensive Towers, as well as autonomous characters called "creeps", which periodically spawn in groups and travel along the lanes, attacking enemies they encounter. Featured across the map are hostile characters referred to as "neutrals", which are not aligned to either faction and are primarily located in the forests. Located in a tarn on the northeast side of the river is a "boss" called "Roshan", who typically requires multiple team members to kill and drops powerful items. Dota 2 features seasonal events, which provide players with the option of playing the game with special game modes that alter the aesthetics and objectives. With the seasonal event game modes, the central focus of the game shifts away from the standard battle composition, in order to focus on new objectives central to the seasonal events. So far, there have been three seasonal events: the Halloween-themed Diretide event, the Christmas-themed Frostivus event, and the New Bloom Festival, which celebrates the coming of spring.
Kill Me NOW!!;-;The best game ever! <3
[Rock]Bogdan;-;Great Game!!!
sukamto effendi;-;I love playing this ing awesome game.
Profound Mystery!;-;If you have enough time to waste in life, be anti-social, don't wanna interact with your frens, stay in your room all the time and be a RPG Addict, only then play the game. I literally ditched my university board exams to attend a LAN event for DOTA2 :D
<font face="MAGNETO">V|Azazel|V;-;My favourite strategy games after GARENA HEROES OF NEWERTH. Recommended for all gamers.
Razvanell;-;Another great game by volvo.
<font face="impact">SNELHEST;-;Better than LoL
Lost Passion fruits;-;Best game on earth. <3 played dota 1 and 2 for about 8-9years
<B2STLY> Taeyeon;-;Is a very interesting game but i hope the item can be drop more easily, thx
Jimmy McGill;-;Very addictive. It's quite easy to learn, but hard to master. Every single game is a fresh experience. Too bad the community sucks. Still a great game nonetheless.
[Z];-;This game is no.1 pvp game in the world !
|YM| feedme |T&T|;-;love this game
Lajszi;-;Dota 2 like all the other MOBA's are hard to review. Mainly because the community. The game itself is pretty smooth and really likeable, there are tons of characters right at the beginning, with plenty of builds for each one. A huge point is the in-game "build seeker" where you can apply a selected build for your character and after that point the game will suggest which skill must leveling and which item need to buy to be succes. It's a must feature have for newcomers! Wait, there is more! After all match the system will give presents to the players, however mostly these are just cosmetics for the characters, but with that you can customize the look of your favorite dude and top of that, if you don't need these items you can sell it on the market! The replay tool is also a nice touch. And now comes the dark side... No matter how good is the game, when the playmates ruins it. For me it's really hard to get a good team in pub, mainly because i play on EU-West and well... hmpf. So we have a hard time with the Ukrainians. :) It's far more better if you gather 4 of your friends and play together. Other than that, if i just compare the game itself with other MOBA's i can't anything say, this is the best. 8,5/10
Specialist;-;Hardcore strategy game. I want my life back
ForThe Horde;-;This game is great,it just needs good teamwork with team.Lovely. A+++
TimMilligrey;-;Dota2 is hard to pick up, it has quite the learning curve. Completing the tutorial will not get you ready for online play, and like any team based game you'll get a lot of negative feedback from your team mates just for being new. Don't let this discourage you! Everyone started fresh at some point, take it with a grain of salt. There are over a hundred heros to choose from. I recommend playing a few games, seeing who does well and what you like about that here, then looking for other heros to start playing with. There are great hero tutorials all over the internet, if you have your eye on someone, check out a video of a pro playing them. It'll help you understand what makes that hero great. Dota2 is a great game, and I've met some really cool people in my short time playing. Practice makes perfect, and this game is no exception.
Beau Lester A. Atienza;-;i never understood why i keep playing this game... dislike it if you disliked it, like it if you liked it... diskiked it?- still logging in and play the game hahaha.. liked it?- keep on playing the game hehehe....
Skyscraper;-;Event better to play dota
Miss.Cc;-;pretty competitive game, but not suitable for the beginners
s4GittaRiuZ;-;The best team game))
BaronZlovon;-;Deep and rich MOBA experience! Steep learning curve, but it's worth it.
SWOLE TEAM 6;-;this game, all it does it make you hate your friends
Try harder;-;it's ok
x.X.x_MLG_Kelsey Ellison_x.X.x;-;I recommend this game to all my friends
Hirokai;-;Absolutely a MUST HAVE! Hard to play, but still very interesting...
vipboy_7611;-;free to play
-Metha-;-;THE MOST AWESOME STEAM GAME !!! ITS A WORLD WITHIN A WORLD !!
<font color="#800000">Eileen</fo;-;This is about TEAM !!
ALWAYSWANNAFRY;-;Play this game until be like Dendi!
[FHU] Rapid Relief;-;Over 300 hours of yelling in my mic a mix of Russian, Spanish and English. -------Actual Review------- (Work in progress) Background of game: DOTA originated as a warcraft 3 mod, which can still be played. Then Valve took this game, re-masterd it, and made it one of the biggest MOBAs (But still only has a fraction of LOL's player base). The Good: -Valve's got lots of money, and so does the player base. This causes some darn large prize-pools, which are also contributed to by the players. The Bad: -Addictive as hell. -About 1/10 players speak a different language and don't care to learn english. Examples include: Russian, Spanish, and Portuguese. Other Problems: -Warcaft DOTA had a lot of heroes which were ported into DOTA 2, causing a lot of copyright problems between Blizzard and Valve. Gameplay: First games should be with bots, and maybe after 10 games you should start playing with people. If you don't know what to buy, valve gives you suggestions based on your hero in the buy-menu. If looking for a guide, you can find one in the top right.
mikethejust;-;This game is absolutely amazing. But if you think you can get this game and make tons of money off of it on the market, you are dead wrong.
Ainslin;-;Very addictive game, a lot less flamers than in LoL
Abraxas;-;I am sick and tired playing with russian ""s
@UberMassiveFail;-;Great game!
loy;-;I have mixed feelings abot this game because it makes me happy and sad.
Standin.[A]ventadorZ1;-;what a nice
Ditya-Ra;-;Thanks for the Guidelines
Arch@ngel>>;-;best game a gamer can play .
Wolf7742;-;If I was to rate this I would rate it a 5/10 due to the mean players. And if you want to test out how hard ppl are if you are a noob. They say go back to bots. Your bad. And some characters are all over powered and take no skill to use them. They give you no demonstration on attacks and it takes forever to use all the characters. I would say if you wanna play this go play League of Legends. I would rate that a 9/10. The people are more friendly and you use teamwork in it.
Sterlling;-;I like this game
Forrest_Gump-MD;-;I've played a lot starcraft like games and I really enjoy dota 2. It is by far one of the best developed mods that has a great community, and it's FREE!
SpiffingTusiak;-;Feeding is socially unacceptable
KrystaL;-;This game may have a steep learning curve but it never gets old.Get past this steep learning curve period and you will enjoy every second of it.I'm still learning and fortunately i have passed this period of time.Lol is the basics of DoTa2,if you like challenges,DoTa2 is for you:)
PowerOfFailing;-;Best way to go to Russia, just select any server and there ya go ! Vodka, Russian players and . What else do you want ?
/TRS/Kamos;-;How to play CS:GO free? play this game without gettting bored, all the time. Win ez rares trade rares for keys Then trade keys for CS:GO The end <3
ReYtNtorZzZ;-;this game makes me interest <3
^_^XD;-;I LIKE THIS GAME
Mr. Braiinsz;-;Run. Run as fast as you can. If you've never played Dota, YOU CAN STILL BE SAVED. This game is a drug. It's worse than a drug. It will destroy your mental health, turn you into an amorphous blob, make you racist towards every race including your own and will make you rage so hard you might even uninstall it a couple of times, and yet you will keep wanting more and more of it. 10/10 would get high on Dota again
[PPG]Serpent Sin "Diane";-;its so good
Kempol_BENIN;-;The best game in the genre and the one that started it just try to have some fun games without flaming and youre doing fine
Toothpick Factory 1940;-;The only thing I disliked is the different turn rates of Heroes, slow turn rates gives Dota2 a slow-paced gameplay. Overall, I think the game is great.
Steven the Beast Slayer;-;Best MOBA I've tried so far. Very interesting, cooperative and competitive at the same time, with twists of situation and tactics.
Winterhell;-;i love this game.
bananarama;-;addictive
Noob.Nerraw;-;Addicting
Deevo #Karmacoma;-;Good game with a strange community. At first, Dota is hard. You need alot of time to understand it, and hating your team all day and blaming them won't help at all. But it can be fun, if you are good in it, or play with people you like. On the other hand, servers are flooded with people which only talk in their own language (russians) , whilst this language is one which no one even has the chance to understand. Maybe implement IP-bans for every other server than the country you belong to.
Imagen Break of Aqua;-;My recommend for too the people of the word ! Excellent
Satan;-;wouldnt play. it ruins your life
Star x;-;CooL <3 <3 <3
chiken;-;Wasn't really into Dota but once I tried it was great and loads of fun! If you follow the competitive scene it will be even more enjoyable.
GOD_mr.lol.boe;-;Good game, addictive, fun and such a kickass
{best}wanted;-;Nice game for fun and for playing like groups :)
end FAST;-;i liked ... its graphics and effects of hero skill is so cool
leep911;-;Great
Solanth;-;this game will make you love your self and hate every other country in the world 10/10 would recommend its a nice place to hide your soul !
DeadlySeason;-;best free to play game and help you get rich
FluffyFreeman||HunstmanCasesPls;-;Seriously addictive game this! Give it a shot!
Shiriko;-;It's Dota 2, everyone knows it. Good fun, good rage, and boy do      , .
JarJarBingz;-;no word to describe this first MOBA in this world.
2001 A SpaceJam Odyssey;-;Once again, Valve sets a new standard for competitive multiplayer games! Yes, it's very similar to the first DOTA, the game that created a genre, but the nonintrusive and addictive implementation of Free to Play, miriad of new characters, and pitch perfect imbalance that ensures a constantly changing gamestate make Dota 2 the best competitive multiplayer game of all time. Hats off to Valve for creating a platform that could supply some of the best moments in this medium without the necessity of paying a cent!
<font face="Ravie">Capt. KID;-;Cool
Gravy Granules;-;This is one good game to work out some stress, or build it .... It's even better when you have a full team of friends :D
Inquisitor Twilight;-;HELP ME THIS GAME IS SUCKING OUT MY SOUL!!!!
Pudel;-;Now I realize, there are 2 things that are needed by man today: 1) es 2) Dota2
rzp;-;The best MOBA game in the world :D
capsela;-;Dota2 is a fantastic game but it requires a extremely thick skin and large amounts of patience if you don't have a coach to guide you through the initial difficult time when you are learning this complex game. If you do manage to slog through the initial learning period you will find a very deep game with many rewards. The worst part of Dota is your fellow teammates who will become worse than your enemies if you let them bother you, lol.
chideraokoye;-;Even if this game has a terrible playerbase and is confusing at the start, Defense of The Ancients is one of the most competetive challenging rewardable M.O.B.As out there. And with the most forgivable free-to-play system gives you all the champions and heroes, makes this a true free to play FInal Verdict: 10/10
namesake_;-;more than 1,200 hours of fun* for free** *depends on your defenition of fun **souls are free
CryztalSky;-;Best game I have ever played. LOL players should swap over to a real mans/womans game and quit it with that baby  trash simulator they call league.
Bot Rot;-;A game not for the hardheaded/people who can't learn.
Antagonist;-;I've been playing this game for 11yrs+ this game will probably give you the things you are missing in life: 1.Cancer 2.downsyndrome 3.No Joy 4.Excited to play just after quitting the game 5.Learning how to speak Russian/Filipino 6.Autism 7.Blow your pride some day 8.Get really sick both ways 9.Slowly becoming a racist 10.Your brain will give you signals to commit suicide. best moba 10/10 recommended to ruin your life!
Root(-);-;This game is awesome.. very beautiful game with "Free To Play" feature :D
-ZeFionCey-;-;THe Best Game That I Played!!
8kMMMR;-;7/10 best new game. Highly recommend.
It's the implication;-;This game will ruin your life. 420/10 its ok-IGN
PiSt;-;Recommended
Knaffel;-;Such game, much heroes, wow.
^....^;-;this is my passion . my love . 7 years alr played it :) .
^^Standin.VnMaTinG^^;-;nice GAMers!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
Lexjhi;-;Well Played
|| WAR IS RAW ||;-;Dota 2 is not just a game. Its a new meta of life!
Am-P.Zinc;-;very nice game
xxMinecraftFanxx;-;MUTHA FUKIN RUSSIA M8
Pacdragon;-;It's awesome
DaRyA|\|;-;Bade WoW Age Game i Bashe Oon Ham Dota 2 Hast
Duke Benz;-;Very addicting and enjoyable. warning also mght destroy your life
Pavan_Nihal;-;This is a great game. I see reviews about "rude" players and "Russians", but maybe that depends just on the server. I started playing a few days back on the East Asia server and everything is just great. I never encountered a rude player. It is a team game and is great to play with friends. Solo play is great too, but the players lack team work.
LongZheng;-;Lots of fun. Will play again A++++++++++++++++++
| Vision | Florrow;-;I like this game pretty much, considering that i play it at least once a day.Features good graphics and great fun if played with friends.It also guarantees you a great enjoyment of the match if you played like a pro and got a rampage :D There are a lot of free heroes to choose from(108-109 i think O.o) and lots of builds and skill trees to learn for and from each hero.So, i consider Dota 2 a great game for those that like strategy and teamwork especially for those that have lots of friends and want to have a bit of fun :D
Chapp;-;The best strategy game
Joseph Stalin;-;Great game, Expect to drive your friends away with your hate-filled abuse because they gave away first blood. I know I did.
SeXyBweasttt;-;Play it, you'll know why it's awesome.
CHI LONG QUA;-;5 minutes in game, get called a "" for no reason. 12/9
spinning juggs;-;very addictive game good.
nelJdota;-;This in game make my life miserable.. Play this game if you want to ruin your life.
HappyWhale;-;This is my humble opinion on the game Dota 2, not something you have to agree or argue with! I am playing Dota 2 since 2012/13 and it's still an awesome game. Valve always brings fresh air in the game by patching new heroes and such. For me it's one of the best made games ever because of the big community it's influence on the developers (helping them to fix/add/change things), the gameplay and the teamworkmechanics. You can play how and with whom you want. It's a great game for young and old which always be there without getting boring. I want to list the pros and cons which may help making ones opinion about Dota 2. Pros: - always Patched (fixes/changes/heroes/items, etc.) - not monotonous (always room for creativity) - free (may be the biggest point) - teamplayorientated - large active community - fun (that's what a game is all about) Cons: - difficult to get pretty good/decent player - always glitches, bugs (doesn't affect gamingexperience though) - broken mmr system - high chance of getting addicted (i know what i am talking about :D)
[Key_muncher];-;Pretty Good so far!
Starsky;-;Game is well done, but still a lot to upgrade and finish keep up the good work
TheB[A]dMole;-;Uh Not too sure what to write here so heres a recipe for Pancakes instead Ingredients: 1 1/2 cups all-purpose flour 3 tablespoons sugar 1 tablespoon baking powder 1/4 teaspoon salt 1/8 teaspoon freshly ground nutmeg 2 large eggs, at room temperature 1 1/4 cups milk, at room temperature 1/2 teaspoon pure vanilla extract 3 tablespoons unsalted butter, plus more as needed Now to make it 1. In a large bowl, whisk together the flour, sugar, baking powder, salt, and nutmeg. 2. In another bowl, beat the eggs and then whisk in the milk and vanilla. 3. Melt the butter in a large cast iron skillet or griddle over medium heat. 4. Whisk the butter into the milk mixture. Add the wet ingredients to the flour mixture, and whisk until a thick batter is just formed 5. Keeping the skillet at medium heat, ladle about 1/4 cup of the batter onto the skillet, to make a pancake. Make 1 or 2 more pancakes, taking care to keep them evenly spaced apart. Cook, until bubbles break the surface of the pancakes, and the undersides are golden brown, about 2 minutes. Flip with a spatula and cook about 1 minute more on the second side. Serve immediately or transfer to a platter and cover loosely with foil to keep warm. Repeat with the remaining batter, adding more butter to the skillet as needed. 6. Procedure for adding fruit to pancakes: Once the bubbles break the surface of the pancakes, scatter the surface with sliced or diced fruit, or chocolate chips, nuts, etc. Flip with a spatula and cook for 1 minute more, being careful not to burn toppings. Nah great game, highly recomended
Gtego;-;Dota is a great cooperation game that has the goal to destroy the opposing team's ancient to win. However it has many game modes that are fun to play. It may be the same map all the time but it never gets boring. This game also has many systems so new players can get used to it quite fast. However this game has disadvantages as well like bad lobbys because of communication shortages ( european guys who can't speak english, guys who are selfish and just care to win so they just don't care about communication or they may even play with friends in the lobby but they are using the Skype exuse all the time and they are so bored to press a single button so everyone in the team can communicate). Basically the only negative is that there is quite often communication problems among the teams and that some players do care about victory but just play one-man army style , picking their tank character and just do kills and show off.) One big advantage is that the game has no cheats in any lobby. It may have huge disadvantages but the correct lobby and the gameplay can cover the disadvantages often , so i would say that it is a very good game to play that can never get boring even if it's free.
MadMax;-;Awesome game to play with friends
721;-;come with me :)
mW ` MaLu99;-;Serious until now they have not put "ff" in this  of game, you must stay, waiting for the winning team to decide if they will make a final push or just play with you until they are bored of killing you... if I leave the game, I will be labeled as a feeder or leaver...
Alcarpius7_Tuga;-;One of the best team games ive played. Needs a lot of time invested to be good, but you wont be disapointed ;-)
PhazonStrudel;-;You will meet people who say you are noob. You will meet people who say you are gay. You will meet people who say you are cute in russian (   ). You won't need to go out of the basement to get that social life that your parents are always talking about. Such social. Much dota. Dota is also fun. Such pleasing. Much funny. There are many characters to play with. Such skeleton fat old men. Much mana burn. Enough with jokes now. Why I should dota? Because dota is like team chess without being nearly as predictable. You probably won't get bored. You only need about 100 hours of play to sort of understand what you're doing horribly wrong. p.s.     does not actually mean cute. p.p.s much review. Such informative. p.p.p.s wow
MoD !;-;u will love it ! its fun game. u can learne lanuges for free :D u will have alot of fun if u playing with friends for make strategy planes :D U MUST TRY IT :D SEE YA ! :3
Ocelot;-;i love this game
donjoselito;-;The very first is always the very best. First Love Never dies. :)
didoy_davis;-;freakin awesome!!!
CTreePOh;-;Great game. Been playing for hours and there is still much to learn!
Angel;-;very nice game
TatsKrin;-;Iliked this game since theres dota 1..and now it was more good...nice updates for the hero abilities
Thryzaar [Youtuber];-;Hello Guys! Just a short review of this game: There are literally 3 main facts to describe this game: it is amazing, exciting and supplies you with lot of fun! I never played a game that requires more skill, teamplay, and strategy at once than Dota 2. Playing Dota is accompanied by a non-stopable learning curve; that means you get better over the whole time. Bit by bit you gain experience, how to play your hero effectively, how to communicate with your team mates to defeat the enemies! And that it is! Teamwork is the main proceeding in that game! And for this reasons it makes such a big fun! In the average a battle is 45 minutes long. One battle demands your full attention, as well as concentration: Choose the right character, fight well and cooparate with your mates! Try it out, i totally recommend that amazing game!
arRy's.420;-;this game so good
<USPS> AngryMoldyMan;-;I cannot convey how enticingly addictive this game is, and so I will not try. Play it for your own damn self.
IMLonat;-;Best Language Learning course since the Rosetta Stone. 7.8/10 too much water
Skyflakes;-;plasy this
Diddy;-;The game is great.
|Kimandero|;-;Dota is not a game, it is a way of life. Chosen by millions of players and enjoyed every day of their lives...
Kunyuu;-;Dota 2 is incredibly fun, although it may not seem so when you're sitting through that awfully slow paced tutorial, and your first few games may seem overwhelming. Tough it out, it's worth it. Once you learn to play a hero or two and you know a couple items to go with those heroes, you'll do fine. Dota will show you that the only thing you were missing in your life is being screamed at by people in russian/porteguese despite you already make it clear that you only speak english. Pro Tip: No, playing on US servers does not solve this problem, apparently every russian/portuguese speaking person decided to play on US servers despite the awful ping and they don't know the mainstream language here.
WooX;-;Way better than origonal Dota and HoN
GrOD;-;For me Dota 1.0 wil be always better, don't know why, Dota 2.0 is not the same.. But it still pretty good :)
<font face="impact">WeAk FoOdS!;-;Good Game for ppl who dont have a sense of compassion
A S S A S I N;-;i am excited to the new update! :D
xJose;-;nice and unique game. Every match has a different way to play it
NeFArdA;-;Nc and Cool, Now i'm looking for play.
AA <3;-;This game is so awesome. Hope more updates will come :)
JET FUEL CAN'T MELT STEEL BEAMS;-;It's ok
ErikShinIsMe;-;Best free to play game available... Entire entertainment factor of this game relies on your ability to learn and how committed to this game you're willing to be
Yukizakura Hanabi;-;Nice game
Akke;-;I never played a game like DotA 2 before, just heard it. Then my cousin came to me and tell me that this game is AWESOME! At first time i don't think so because i sucked pretty bad.. but after a few days, or weeks of playing i become more better than the last time and that's when i think this game was AWESOME too!! 10/10
RedPandaPrince;-;By far the king of all MOBA games, this is one of the most fun and challenging experience I personally have ever had in a MOBA. If you liked league of legends, you may find Dota 2 to be a really difficult transition, as few things are similar. There is no "surrender at 20" you play the game until someone wins. The game is time consuming, and exceptionally challenging. I would give it a solid 10/10
Anaconda;-;realy good game
Bass to Trout;-;I'm failing college cause of this Peruvian/Russian simiulator  10/10 would do it again
God'sPlayingField;-;I hate this gaem
Sinyster, King of ster;-;This game is tons of fun and you can play it with friends or alone and it will still be fun. This is a more advanced MOBA then say league of legends, but still very simular to other MOBA's. so if you have played other MOBA's before you should really consider playing this one.
Father Grigori;-;You have to play it, to feel how bad you are.
Fakku l Mitch;-;This game is awesome! :)
D r e v e r n;-;Hey you, yeah you! Don't have the brain capacity to control a massive army, build bases, and execute daring army battles even though this game's mechanics were taken from real-time-strategy games? And do you enjoy blaming teammates rather than doing something about it when you're losing? Do you enjoy picking characters, who only need right-clicks(carries) to function? Do you say "we no def" when you're losing even though the game is called DEFENSE OF THE ANCIENTS? Then if so you hypocritical basterd, this game is meant for you! Expect your first matches to be full of carries and practically no support plays at all! But who cares? You're having fun losing! Be careful though young warrior! Matches can be full of people complaining about your play or the items you buy! Don't worry they're just jealous of your feedi-- I mean killing streak! So what if they call a " play" or a "wrong item" on you, if you're getting killz, then it's all fine! They're just jelly that you found a secret new meta before they could! So what if you play a support hero and they complain when you last hit? Not your fault my brotha, they're just too slow to react! So what if you're a support hero and not buy wards? Those wards are expensive as shet! If they want all the farm, while you just stand there, and then expect you to buy wards, then they are  as ! How can you possibly buy wards when you don't have any gold?! Bunch of , amirite? You'll notice in your first games that people like to kill other people. Well that's normal, people do that in real life. But you must remember this golden rule: Always push. Kid, no matter how many times you pawn their noob arses you can't win if you can destroy the ancient. This game is not won by kills but by pushing. For example: There is an impending 5 on 5 brawl or "clash" as they call it. But as your teammates prepare for bloodshed you notice at the other side of the map a pack of allied mindless soldiers or "creeps" as they call it, slowly march towards an enemy tower. This is the perfect situation to push because the enemy "Heroes" are way too far to respond to their tower being pushed. So what do you do? Ditch your teammates and head for that tower. Wait until they have started fighting and then you push. With the enemy team busy slaying your outnumbered teammates, you're free to burn that tower down to the ground. Results? A bounty of gold, and a pushed tower! Your teammates can complain all they want about you leaving them, in fact they should be thanking you for giving them the tower bounty, ungrateful s. If somehow, you managed to get to their 3rd tower, you'll notice that behind it are two buildings. These two buildings spawn the mindless "creeps". Unless you destroy the 3rd tower, these buildings are invulnerable, meaning they can't be ed with. If you destroy the 3rd tower then they are stripped of their godlike armor and now are ok to  with. Pro tip: Destroy the melee barracks first. Why? Because destroying it somehow gives your melee creeps steroids. And since the melee creeps are the most produced creeps, giving them steroids is the most rewarding effect. And also, the building somehow has a regeneration effect, meaning it will heal itself! So if you're going to attack it, might as well kill it or you'll be forced to retreat and watch it "heal". Which leaves you as to how is it able to heal itself if it's just a building. How? Because f*ck logic that's why! And if you manage to destroy all of the enemy's barracks then the in-game announcer will shout: "Mega creeps!" Signifying that all of the allied creeps have steroids. At that point, you can pretty much let the creeps swarm the enemy. I mean why not? You fought your  out the whole match, and had to deal with the enemy's at, so why not let them have a slow and painful death? Sounds good doesn't it? And if you're lucky, you might witness an enemy hero get killed by being swarmed by your steroid creeps, fun ain't it? When picking a "hero" don't be that guy who picks first. And if you're notoriously unlucky, don't bother to random a hero. Yes it does give extra starting gold if you do, but you'll just end up giving it to the enemy as you feed. Let the others pick first. Take your time. This is the part of the game where you actually use the most of your mind with. Analyze, be considerate, and choose a hero who can both counter the enemy picks and complement your allied picks. Now that you've pick a hero it's time for the laning phase! If you're support then they will need wards, and wards need gold to possess, so what do you do? GO TO MID LANE. Why? So you can last hit without any teammate hogging all the farm. If you're carry then they will need you to get lots of exp and gold, so what do you do? GO TO MID LANE. If you're an offlaner then you need farm to get utility skills and items, so what do you do? GO TO MID LANE. If you're tank then they need you to get tanky items and lots of exp to get stronger, so what do you do? GO TO MID LANE. In fact, any hero you choose is a prime choice for mid lane. Remember, first come gets the lane. But anyways this game is quite addictive and may ruin your social life, if you even had one. Friends, family, love ones all seem insignificant when you're in a match. If you're still in school, study time may become dota time, and if you're working, well you know what's going to happen. Overall this game has achieved what all games should achieve: Making you play and enjoy this game. So yes I recommend this game. Good day to you sir
Kyle;-;i love it so much, im addicted to dota 2
EYE;-;very nice game
ecret of uccess;-;Addictive
Ancienius.Atlas.King;-;Good Game to play Not recommend 4 LoL player... This is too hard 4 U, try other like Candy Crush Saga =))
Korkel;-;Starting to get the hang of it. Pretty fun game.
Ko'Cami;-;nice game broo
WolfWolves;-;Tired of old graphics in Dota 1? See the new heroes graphic remakes in Dota 2! Now you can spectate your friends LIVE ! No more searching for replay files, download the Professional player's replays and learn to play like them! No more unfair kicking, Match-making system lets you to find matches effortlessly, all you need to do is wait upon finding match! Dota 2 is great for Dota 1 lovers, especially you wanted a revamped graphics!
FreshMeat;-;when everyone called you a noob, but you won the game.
R.I.P Cecil;-;If you want cancer, you've come to the right place. Get ready to yell at everyone for being , Matched with people who don't speak English. Vow to quit the game, but only to give in 2 days later. Watch as you grades fall, along side with your MMR. Best game ever, would play / 10
Dramiken [IN EUROPE];-;Dota 2 (Defense of the Ancients 2) is one of the best MOBAs (Multiplayer Online Battle Arena - where the objective is to competitvely push 'lanes' and destroy enemy towers to eventually reach their base. First one to take down the enemy's Ancient (final, large building) wins), and one of the most popular (second only to League of Legends). It is very similar to LoL (although there is no 'surrender' feature in normal games - yet), and if you play LoL or most other MOBAs I can guarantee you'll have a good time in Dota 2, provided you can get over the difficulty. The difficulty in Dota 2 is much higher than other games of the same genre. League can be quite easy, but Dota is a complete other world, where if you don't do even the smallest split second thinking right, it can cost an entire teamfight and then lead to defeat. Don't let this scare you though, practising against bots will allow you to get ability and item combinations down pat. Although, if you've never played a MOBA before, it may take a while to learn. As well-known Dota 2 player Purge says, it will take about 2-3 months before you'd be considered 'ok' or 'decent'. Along side this difficulty in game is the players. Sometimes you'll get really nice players that joke around a bit, sometimes you'll get nice competitive players, sometimes you'll get people who joke around the entire game to annoy their team...but sometimes you'll get players who want nothing but perfection (I myself, at times, may be one of these people) and detriment their own team if the smallest thing isn't done correctly. There is a reason behind this, which is like I've meantioned before, even the slightest wrongdoing (tower diving for a kill A.K.A. suiciding - but this is quite a large example). The Heroes (not Champions) you get to play as are all given to you at the start, rather than 'buying' or unlocking them. Although this may seem like all the new players would get to play the best Heroes from the start, there isn't exactly a 'best Hero'. Heroes have many, many downsides and weaknesses, and if not played well can lead to some of those problems I've mentioned above. Once a Hero is learnt to play well though, it is possible to effectively dominate the enemy team when playing on pubs (casual servers). Beware when going into ranked matches though - most people in ranked will know how to play and what to do, as it requires a fair amount of playing to unlock 'ranked'. I myself unlocked it in ~120 games, which was for me 240 hours of playing the game. Overall, this is a great Free-To-Play game that is definitely worth getting. It's free after all, and it isn't a small game, unlike some F2P games that have next to no content or games that need to have most of the content bought to be able to use it and actually have fun in the game. It isn't Pay-To-Play in the slightest, as the only thing money can buy is extra looks for Heroes, Wards, HUDs, Couriers, and Loading Screens. There are about 10,000,000 regular users and counting. How about you join them? I'd give this game a 9.5/10, maybe even a 10 because of a Hero that is afraid of trees. Rizzrack/10, I love you Timbersaw (http://dota2.gamepedia.com/Timbersaw <-- Hero referenced).
[ZA'GA]_NISIO;-;this game is annoying me
KillMeBaby;-;Learned to be russian and call pinoy noobs.
PalmTop Tiger;-;More Addicting than Crack
alijacket;-;This Game is really Like Chess. Recommend for this game <3
Standout.Key?;-;Nice game
DotaDimonlas;-;This is the game u'll never stop playing if u just try 1 time.
TDIA.MoNkEyPaiN;-;this game is amazing
Gonzo The Depressed;-;This game is probaly one of the best games iv ever played its very worth for free to play and there is no pay to win, i give this game a 10 out of 10 this game is very fun but at times can make u rage
jaguar;-;Consistently adding new content, free-to-play, and a big user base. What more can you ask for?
Voge Emma;-;i liked this game.....
Got Some Rares;-;recommended game!
5K.Toxigen;-;Absolutely loving it. The social experience aside it's the best RPG in a slightly smaller scale.
Nubi;-;Still Don't know item recipe .Icon too small :P
Hachiman| I Hate Nice Girl;-;10/10 for thr game not so much for the player though
nootnoot;-;this game will ruin your life 10/10
nootnoot;-;this game will ruin your life 10/10
BeanBaro;-;This game is very interesting
Ridiculoud;-;For a free to play game and a long time Dota fan this game is for Very challenging/high pace/high tier MOBA game
Sergiu;-;It's a time stealer.
Me;-;Far better than League of Legends
thr;-;Fun game, but has a huge learning curve. Would advise to watch videos to learn the basics (see Purge's Youtube channel). Also, community can be toxic at times
Kelsier;-;ruined my life. 10/10
Leo;-;great game encourage teamplay and good manners
Sgt.Foley;-;A great PvP game that offers some of the most intriguing and nuanced team combat around.
Swift95386;-;One of the most addicting games out there. If you get it you wont regret the memorable hours of being a noob and learning Russian.
~hco-mkou~;-;I play League of Legends
Yennefer of Vengerberg;-;dota need someone have sex
warsloth;-;The game is fun but if your not into mobas/ games for koreon s the learning kurb stomp is like trying to stick your  into the assshole af a polish bakers wifes freinds hot cousin. This is a feat that not many have acoomplished just like playing dota 2 after the first year of this game being out. Im currently on a quest to play 1000 hours of this game by the time the next school year starts, with by the way is a totaly possible task. I give dota 2 8 rage filled quits out of 10.
EnTiTy;-;Fun for the most part, takes time to learn then you can dominate
elBenyo;-;It's like football, but it's electrons running through a computer.
modrew71;-;This game ruined my life.
Smootley;-;I ENJOY THIS GAME.
[ JohnSkiE ];-;fcasf
Hopyoprop;-;A good twist on a MMO mostly focused on strategy. This game is playable by a wide range of players due to it's different playing style for each character. Whether you are a supporter role for a team or the leader or the pusher. All of them offer unique gameplay styles. The objective though rather simple is rather hard to achieve in fact and can lead you to racking your brains to think of the best way to destroy the enemies base. This game forges camarderie among players as each player in the team have to work with each other and support each other with the different skillsets they each have. I strongly recommend you trying this game for a classic game twisted into something fresh and renewed, it's worth a try and most certainly will find a playing style in there to suit you.
FOKYIZZ;-;recommended!
` s h e r n a n `;-;best game ever! can't live without it..
Raveology;-;this is the best game ever made
Arctonyx;-;This is the best MOBA game I ever played.
.::K.O.K.A::.;-;I love because of high spirits, and I do not like because it does not get more item when prede level.
Standin.Up;-;PLS!!!! delete LOL and play this one it will be worth it!!
Random Hero!;-;yea! this is good!
joj;-;This game is so friendly players that even love your whole family.
Mantas;-;Best moba out there. You say: "League of Legends", I say:"League of Lesbians"
Sar;-;really good game of all games
*Silver Whip*;-;It's good, a very big graphic improvement from the DotA I played as a Warcraft 3 custom map. But it's too heavy to be played on a low spec computer, still, It's a good game.
Fredda;-;This game taught me about the diversity of cultures that our small little corner of the universe offers. Then it taught me to hate them all.
Chrome;-;Side effects include: -Hatred of other humans -Lack of trust in others -Carpal Tunnel -Improved hand eye coordination -A large ego -Weight gain -Weight loss -Confidence -Despression -Extreme Racism -EXTREME RACISM -Increased strategic thinking capabilities -Mushy-brain syndrome -Subconsciously learning a new language -Subconsciously learning to hate the culture of said language -Literally every ailment that is not a transmitable disease 9/10 Doctors accepted this game on their recommendation list, but the tenth was afk
Grizzt;-;It's like roulette; fun until it turns into Russian.
psych0tic;-;Causes anxiety problems, low self esteem, Tourette's syndrome, mood swings, Bipolar disorder, breakdown of relationships, raging erections, racism. Would definitely recommend.
Sentimental Oriental;-;In Dota 2, Not many people speak your language. Not many people play well. Not many people talk nicely. Not many people work as a team. But if you find people that do... You'll have the most fun you've ever had.
Kyubashi;-;And you thought real life was a struggle.
ephir;-;I only played a little but it was fun.
Captain Obvious;-;Things I gave to DotA: 1. Money 2. Time 3. Love Things DotA gave me: 1. Arthritis 2. Carpal tunnel syndrome 3, Hatred of Russians, Mexicans, Spanish, Finnish, and Russians 4. Broken keyboard 5. Broken mouse 6. 9/10 ready 7. Server crashes 8. 4 stacks of Russians in EUW servers on English prefrence settings 9. Ranked matches 10. Free to play but Pay to win games (I.E. - Foreseer's contract, New Bloom 2015) 11. "It's in the bag" spam (especially Skywrath) 12. Multilingual cursing - I guess this is a good thing? 13. Split second math - Reliable/Unreliable gold and gold loss on death vs. Buyback availability - This is good too Essentially - DotA is a greedy woman, but I love her all the same. 11 / 10 would play again
HekaDooM;-;"THE PUB SUPPORT" "Where are wards?" The pub Carry demanded. "I placed them and they were countered" the Support began, "I am trying to juggle giving you complete lane farm, protecting you and harrassing the enemy while saving to buy more, also possibly sentries to remove their-" "UP COUR PLS" the mid hero politely added. "Give Savle" The Carry demanded. "Certainly." replies the support, using the salve on the Carry who subsequently ran headlong into an enemy creepwave. "So where is mek?" the Carry said, after he was ganked due to overextending. The Support died saving him and was treated to a rather enthusiastic series of map pings on his corpse. "Again, having not even enough to buy boots as well as wards, I don't think a 7 minute Mek is viable." The Support replies. "Haha look your level, so low, noob" the Carry retorted. "U have no item xaxa". "Well, jungle gold and experience through stacking and pulling with blocked camps is nowhere near as much as on lane which I attempted to give you, the carry, the priority over." The Carry is subsequently ganked again at the enemy tower, oblivious to the enemy tp that the Support moved away from. "Report Support, usless" The carry cried in allchat, in between mentioning various aspects of the Support's Mother's anatomy. "Instead of reporting and acting like that, why don't you try supporting for randoms sometime instead of instapicking a carry?" the Support asked, as he watched the Carry return to afk-lasthitting lane creeps. "HAH, support is for noskill noobs like you!"
flanadlivv;-;One day, a wise man intoduce me into this game. "it shall protect your virginity, my lad" he said.
Vison;-;I only played a little but it was fun.
Dodon;-;A game that will put your spirit and cunning to test!!
Waxaan ahay mid ka mid ah cool;-;With time comes dota skills.
AVENGERS ~;-;YEAH ! I LAB IT ..
MOLLY WATER;-;This  right here B, THIS  RIGHT HERE B, is a very well designed and balanced game revolving around teamwork and character synergy, resulting in one of the few games that give a rewarding feeling for using teamwork and being successful. DIPSET
Mr.Puppy;-;You lose everything to this game and Gaben money, girlfriend, family. I especially recommend this game for all of you. Go get a copy of DOTA 2 and lose the community.
jane love;-;the best
coreysplode;-;very fun game if you like a team environment and a real time strategy game stage. completely mind blowing and will never get old!
Donde Sr.;-;It's Dota 2. Need I say more?
HonestKnight;-;sometimes will lag
PoinTzeRo;-;Amazing Game ... Just you have to use your brain !
Dr.Wong;-;Ruined my education, Ruined my social life, If i could go back in time i would have never installed this game. 10/10.
Just write maryr on my tombstone;-;Now after spending my time I have lost all interest of seeking a girlfriend and have aquired a large wardrobe full of fedoras. 12/10 GG
EnZo;-;This game is really good.
AbeeL;-;A very addictive game. Brilliant graphics, structure etc. Got to know every kind of person in the corners of the world too. A definite 10/10! Note: If you plan to start playing this game remember that before you play multiplayer, you'll need to do the training and play against the bots or else you'll be shown pretty much hate and would also might be reported and stuff. Good Luck! :)
Scythe.;-;Great Games
FRST;-;more items for other heroes please :D
Inspire;-;This game is too awsome. 500/10
HITMANxsv;-;FInd a a good group of friends, forget 400 hours of your life 11/10
Standin.soIo;-;Need more Heroes, Item and Design (New Design)
ChipsMORE;-;best game . haw haw
psychopath;-;A great PvP game that offers some of the most intriguing and nuanced team combat around. Simply irresistible and addictive as hell.
kik;-;I've been playing this game for 5 years and it has wasted about half of my life so far, as well as about $100. 10/10 definitely play this game.
idunwantEZMMR!!!!!!!!!!!!!;-;Eat , Sleep And Play DOTA 2 !!!
PERKONTOLAN;-;No comment its amazing and awesome
Y2;-;the best game but always update
nobby;-;Great game unless u play alone then it gets annoying because the game consistently teams you up with very bad players !
Marlon <3;-;A good game but gets boring after a while. 6/10
Prost ta. [Dejn] :*;-;The best game ever
Chicken Tom;-;Makes you a racist son of a  towards anyone who aint English! 10/10 WOULD BANG!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
ROADTO3K;-;Great Game, best MOBA ever... But im pretty sure has the worst community!
Sugar Show;-;Bored.
Jarl Ballin;-;I would write a full review, but I am currently dying of horrible-community poisoning
theforkofyork;-;i think its fun i never actually played it
TheMdfcker;-;Such game! Much rage! Very skill! Wow! -Game's aight,graphics are legit you can run it without a need of a powerful pc,Hero pool is like Wow! by the time you master all of them you'll also learn Russian if on EU and brazillian if on US and some ching chong on SEA oh and you'll hear a few bogans on Australia.In short: -Common Rage quits -Low P 4 life -Very team play -Wow -Best Russian Dictionary ever!
Dr. Sammy Chow PhDD;-;THIS IS HONEST RATING OF DOATBLO 2. FIRST, METAGAME IS LIKE CAT HAVE MEXICAN FOOD AND  ALL OVER YOU WHITE CARPET. SECOND, SPEAKING OF MEXICAN FOOD! THERE ARE 99.9999999999999999% OF PLAYER ARE MEXICAN FROM SOUTH AMERICA WHO WILL COME INTO NORTH AMERICA SERVER TO PLAY! THEY ARE DOG!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!! THIRD! DO NOT BUY THIS GAME IT IS PURE !!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
SinChaos;-;This game taught me about the sheer diversity of cultures that coexist within our little corner of the universe. Then it taught me to hate them all. 10/10.
I'll Be oN mY WaY!!;-;I like coz this was a good game..everybody can learn how to teamwork
TDF. Divine Loser;-;Very hard and competitive game. Endless fun.
Burny!~;-;"huskar should be ban" "riki is unfair" "sb charge is broken" "nerf pa pls" "sniper op" "blood seeker op" "zeus ult is op" " drow" "report tidehunter feeding" "this sand king is " "u suck delete dota" "you call that gg?" 10/10 best rage
Jiyeon <3;-;Great game and has an awesome community
MISSPILL;-;I guess it's an ok game Kappa
Nicky;-;ING CANCER
Zeratul-X;-;Most logged game on my steam account..
|NeX| BeppoBastard;-;Definitely the best game I have ever played. The learning curve is annoying, but once you get into it, there's no getting out!
The Prospector;-;This game has sucked 482 hours of my life. I still play it 20 hours a week. I need help
Raku Ichijou;-;It's one of the greatest MOBA's out there
{--[]th} it's scrow funk;-;they got this game, right. for people who smoke, or people who drink. like if you drink beer and you get drunk or if you smoke weed and you get high. and just- anything like if you just be gettin ed up. they got this game, right, i don't know, this  called Dota. it aint got no point to the game you just walk around clickin on . and there aint no point to the game. this  stupid as hell, man.
CRAZY;-;thank
V-Nix;-;One of the best game I've ever played :D
SquareCubiC;-;Go and play this game!!! F2p and it only takes about 100 hours of gameplay before you kind of don't suck.
the ultimate_toaster;-;There's an easy way I can sum up dota 2. PLAY DOTA 2! PLAY DOTA 2! PLAY DOTA 2! It's amazing, delicious and my second favourite game of all time ever, which is saying a lot. Irrigardless, It's one of my favourite games and one i'll be playing for a long time. Few games have as much depth and possibilities. Every single match I see something i've never seen before. It's honestly amazing. Even after about 400 hours of play i still haven't mastered or learnt everything. Dota 2 is a game that NEVER ENDS.
Kleine();-;One of the best free to play games i've ever played.. but we want techies!! :D
SandStorm;-;Best Free to Play game ever
$ i.t.a.c.hi;-;Can any1 recommend me a hot key for invoker like dota 1.....
WE CAN BE FRIENDS FOREVER;-;tis game is totaly awsome remember to play
HEY!;-;ah this game is nice esp the clash and the teamwork but i hate it when i do my best but someone is feeding just because they have a fight with other players. :(
Ka Le;-;A Fun game to play
Andrey Ringo;-;THIS IS ING AWESOME!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
Snapphanen;-;This is the best version of Dota!
[LORD]MF3;-;Awsome online game.Had a grat potensial which had been recognised and put forth in INTERNATIONALS . I truely love this game :D
Bodgie;-;This game is so welcoming to new players. The community is filled will wonderful and amazing characters that are 90% russians. This game will teach you the social skills you need to survive in later life! 10/10
SpokkyGhust;-;nice game 10/10 would stay at home and play this game instead of going outside to meet people
Kai The Awesome Swordsman;-;Best Russian teacher ever. 10/10
Ramsay Bolton;-;>game is hard
Kaneko;-;This game is upgraded game from Warcraft III which i love <3 Dota 2 is more understandable for rookie, this game is giving you instructions for what weapon is equipable for what hero. And this game is amazing easpacially when the war. And iit give you toturial (y)
Medusa Senpai;-;Better than legend league :D
[:()]Crme de la meemee;-;awful game smite is so much betterzzz xoxoox
Dem Jukes;-;addicting
!nc(RED)!ble2;-;This is the only game I played over 2000 hours :-p
Kdi;-;The best game in the world!
thivus hime;-;this is a good educational game, it was better than rosetta stone at teaching me how to speak russian
Atrocious;-;Love this game!
[NL]PROGAMER525;-;Ruined my life...
Fury;-;Huge waste of your precious time. Don't bother with it.
Titan;-;One server only please :)
Girlygirl;-;Love the game.
matgoat;-;Most addicting game ever. Once you play it, you'll never stop.
AntinormaL;-;The best game ever!
I'm Roleplaying As My Cat;-;I've spent more hours playing this game than being with my loved ones.
Soepicpanda;-;Consumes most of your time, adding up that it's very addictive. If you want action, like being cursed by players that comes from other countries even though you're the one carrying the game, cursing Valve if you don't get good items while the feeder does, and want to learn different ways to curse in different languages. This is the game you should play.
KG.Horvs;-;Better than League of Legends.
you run, ill chase u;-;dota 2 is a great strategy game, never been bored on this game ;p
GodDay;-;this good game hehe
Lonely Banana;-;I used to be adventure like you until i took an arrow to the knee
[KNS]Edwin;-;everyday Dota 2 ^^
ZheTan;-;This game is awesome
Bellatrix Lestrange;-;yes because you can play with your friend to defeat enemy. teamwork is realy needed in this game
TwinkleStar;-;This game really enjoyable, dont need money to make you strong, its only skill that matter, i recommend this game to everyone to play, Great Gaming!
Jujj1;-;Learning russian has never been easier.  !
Sand King;-;Hey everyone! Yes, i REALLY love this game, its epic, with all the heroes and special effects and stuff, but. I have a bit of a problem - when i accept any match, the loading screen appears, then or the game crashes just then, or the display of the computer gets half-black and half-river image. then it laggs out first in the audio, then in the whole game, and the game still crashes. HELP!!! I REALLY WANNA PLAY DOTA 2 BUT I CANT!!!!!! Btw: Dudes! Try this game! ITS FREAKING EPIC!!!
Sand King;-;Hey everyone! Yes, i REALLY love this game, its epic, with all the heroes and special effects and stuff, but. I have a bit of a problem - when i accept any match, the loading screen appears, then or the game crashes just then, or the display of the computer gets half-black and half-river image. then it laggs out first in the audio, then in the whole game, and the game still crashes. HELP!!! I REALLY WANNA PLAY DOTA 2 BUT I CANT!!!!!! Btw: Dudes! Try this game! ITS FREAKING EPIC!!!
[-ADBA-];-;idk how to describe this game bec. is very awesome :D (Y)
Tampaoster;-;This game needs teamwork and agood amount of fingers. Use it wisely
Davion;-;Its really a fun game..you guys should try it!!!
Zyn;-;Its good game, but I think you can rage because those moments when someone is just killing you is just insane But stil good game :)
hexakosioihexekontahexaphobia;-;Very beautiful game, im addicted. Meepo is love. Meepo is life.
N1XX;-;Great, But if you're playing with Russians you are going to lose :)
kreativeWow;-;place to feed
Kieran da PUG;-;BEST GAME EVER! I've only been playing for a few months and I love it already. Great gameplay, pretty good graphics, and almost all my steam friends I met off this game. Really friendly community. And you may think it will be repetitive, but it definitely isn't. Every game has different people. Different heroes to work with. Different heroes to fight against. And there are 108 different heroes to choose from. My favourite is sniper. If you love this game then join my group, Ninja Skilled Ronins, or read my guide (and rate up), sniper (tips and builds).
Fightmaster;-;I bought the PA arcana set for the items drop . I only got 3 drops 2 from my set ,it has been like 6-8 game that contract was denied or completed and we won the game but no drop??? can u only get a limited amount of drops or what??
BILLY;-;The best way to take 4 of your good friends and make them your enemies, but its sooo worth it. Once you get the hang of it, it's hard to stop. YOU HAVE BEEN WARNED. :D
piyatos;-;nice game for all ages, it develop teamwork, discipline, patience that molds a better person. :) also for fun playing along with your friends..
Okairi;-;A very strategic game that challenges every people's mind making it alot more difficult than other MMO's
Patriarch;-;Quite nice game, I am collecting a team, english players only
<3 Ira;-;Great game. Must have
Sintanic Jebus;-;If this isnt in your steam library, unistall steam!
Derpaholic Panda;-;And remember: no Russian. 11/10
Mr.Metr0;-;FYI: Dota stands for Defense of the Ancients Hello Ladies and Germs! Today you are looking at Dota 2 Review! Dota used to be a gamemode in Warcraft 3! It was so Popular it went on steam! If you haven't played Dota 2 or Warcraft 3 Dota then this review will help you out! First of all Dota 2 IS NOT A FIRST PERSON SHOOTER GAME. It is a strategy game so if you do not like strategy games or you just suck at it then don't play it plz. The Goal of the game is theres 3 Towers on each 3 Sides. Fight your way and Destory the Radiant's/Dire's Ancient and you will win the game! It's a 5V5 Game so you need to rely on your team too. There are 3 types of heroes: Strength, Agility, and Intelligence. Strength are really tanky which means they have more health and less mana, they are also mostly nukers, pusher, etc. Agilitys depends on items so most of them are carrys which means they farm. Intelligence have lots of mana and most of them are supports because most of them can trap, heal, etc. But most intelligence heroes are squishy (means they can die easily, example: Crystal Maiden (idk if i spelled it right lol)).
St4Rz;-;Serching for a match... Pinoys everywhere :D
mat;-;Basically, if you're going to play Dota 2, stay on the SE Asia and Australia servers, otherwise you will get angry people from Dubai callling you "a bad Phantom Assasin" in their language ;-;, the hate is real
2ez4Ela';-;Can spend hours playing
Oenth.;-;After 2000 hours i have finally learned Russian.
| r a f a |;-;Hi Guys! Making my short review of Dota. I dont wanna u guys get bored :) Look, Just an awsome game what can i say, maybe almost perfect.I m playing this for some time now, almost 7 years on another platform u all know called Garena. But now im truly glad u guys handling this game and its particular community :D I restarted playing Dota because of you, so i thank you :D found it by some frends who played a bit with me when Dota1 was up. ANd i found this game so but so much better. In all! For me the most important thing was the gameplay of dota keps the same, even better! Was perfectly made m8S congrats! Well, i just wish u guys behind this scenes : the people and theyr effort expended here. Thank You alot! Keep the awsome work untill now ! 1love :) Rafa from Portugal ps: Allways welcome guys to spend a bit of ur vacations here in my country chillin some sun and good red wine B)
lightside;-;its meh
Armageddon;-;Best game on earth
FR0ST;-;Dota is Love, Dota is Life
Vuela alto Iwata-chan;-;doto is the best doto
SmokeyTheBear(ComeBackKing);-;Definately a game for casuals.
[VKS] TUPAPA;-;Really good way to enjoy with your friends. Deep enough, never ending fun and learning. So many great improvements from Dota 1
N1chola[S];-;Great : ))
hAtchlinG;-;Tired of all your friends and want to avoid them? Hate your family members and never want to see them again? Can't stand your significant other? You feel nothing but contempt for your job? Well then, do I have a game for you: DOTA 2
ROG.MY/Imba;-;For me,this is absolutely one of the game that you must try.It is an epic and addictive game.There are several reasons why I would love to recommend this game to other gamers as well.Firstly,this game is cooperative game where you need the teamwork skills by cooperate with your teammates to destroy their base on 5v5 but every hero have their own unique skills.The interesting part is that,you need to find a way with your team to enhance your skill and strategy to achieve your goal.Sometimes,communication is the key to success because you need to think carefully,act fast and cooperate in order to gain the glorious victory.Remember,use all the oppurtunity given to hunt down your prey by gank or strategy to weaken your enemy.The faster you gain the money,the easier you will gain the victory.This is the best strategy games that I've ever played in my entire life.You guys must try it because seeing is believing.Hope this review will increase more gamers to spend their time on this game.
Cowl;-;Never play this game. Don't even think about it. Unless you want to kill yourself. Then play this game because it will make you want to kill yourself and then your family can sue volvo or something. I hope that happens and Gaben cries.
Far8;-;this game is good to play
Schatik =);-;Simply the best of this kind of games...
XxX_Bongak_Bana;-;I love it this game..
Fryst Eldur;-;Playing and Building New Friends Online With This Great Environment DOTA Game... Great Items To Play With the Heroes...
YiJie<3;-;Great game to lose friends!
SektOiD;-;The best game in the world BUT Volvo PLEASE DO SOMETHING WITH COMMUNITY, make some HARD punishments for feeding, being AFK, strong language etc..
XXXXXXXXXXXXXXXXXXXXXXXXXXXXXXXX;-;i love this game.. :))
Loyran;-;Dota 2 is my life !!
Crazy Maw;-;Dota is Life!
Sniper-Fox;-;Valve distributes "pillbox" model free-to-play, that is, to try his hand in the game is completely free. Commercial developers' interest is primarily due to the operation of the gaming market for buying and selling a variety of accessories for the characters. Occasionally cosmetic bun drop at the end of the match for free. Much more often players get chests with hidden treasures, the key to which you can buy in the store Dota 2. Decoration characters - a purely personal matter. Buying things does not affect the balance sheet, so that in general all the charm of "bunkers" are available to everyone. Investments do not open new gameplay possibilities, as is done, for example, in the League of Legends. Ultimately, the outcome of the match is always open to the professional level player. If someone is not familiar with the concept of Dota, briefly sketch it. The teams of Light and Darkness task is to destroy the enemy base. The composition of each party consists of five characters, one of which management is performed by the player. Also they are involved in a battle "creeps" - weak "units", follows a simple algorithm to go on a given route and kill oncoming enemies. For the destruction of heroes and creeps players get money and experience, who spend on the development of his character. It is here that concluded the full potential of "bunkers". Heroes in the game for more than a hundred. For the successful outcome of the match is not enough to choose a character, you liked visually. Proven in one battle hero can be completely useless in another. Everything, from the choice of the ward to set items purchased must assume the existence of a comprehensive plan for the match. Any action requires serious analysis of the situation during the game. Every decision is situational, and success depends entirely on your ability to correctly calculate the potential opponent to see major trumps his team "peak" and predict the course of battles. The longer you play, the more opportunities disclosed. Over time, you realize that "bunker" implies a simple but brilliant concept. Dota 2 Seven one waiting. And very often do not wait. Plot as such in Dota 2 no. Some event-background is rooted in the world of WarCraft 3. Only thing that can amuse themselves histories lovers - small biographical summary for each of the characters. However, the knowledge of these facts does not affect the gameplay. change the wallpaper The concept map, heroes - all migrated to the Dota 2 is almost unchanged. Yes, and what changes can we talk on the "bunkers"? The structure of the gameplay is strictly defined, and any attempt to bring conceptual innovation is fraught with loss of balance. Mindful of the fact that the cart does not need a fifth wheel, Valve neatly confined to some cosmetic innovations. First, Dota 2 as an independent project, has got a stylish menu that offers quick access to the game itself, store, news, as well as the creation of guides and translations professional matches. All the opportunities provided by the developers, organized very convenient, greatly reducing the barrier to entry for newcomers. For them the same way, a special education campaigns where they can, without spoiling the old residents of the nerves, to master the basic principles of playing different characters. After that - welcome to the expanses of the team battles. At the moment, there are seven game modes, in which the differences relate solely homepage of the match - the choice of heroes. For those who simply want to have fun and hone their management skills specific character fit popular All Pick. For "Daughtery" with professional ambitions preferable Captain's Mode, in which more tactical depth of the game is revealed. Anyway, interest in the proceedings increases proportionally to the number of familiar people in the team, because only with them possible quality "team play." Dota 2 "Loaf, loaf, anyone you choose!" As for the gameplay, then we have good old "bunker", modified only visually. From medieval graphics WarCraft 3 left pixel and - characters look a lot more colorful than the first part, pleasant texture pleasing to the eye, each character has its own set of animations, all the effects are traced in detail and spectacular. Often, during a particularly massive battles, replete with an abundance of picture paints at which you lose the essence of what is happening. But overall graphics looks cool and is not satisfactory. The same goes for the voice acting. All characters engaging in activities unique voice give one of the harvested phrases. The spirit of the Games memorable soundtrack that Valve recorded using a full orchestra. Also, the developers involved in the game interesting chip: passing in silence match climactic battle moments of "heated" disturbing music. If we talk about very very small things that have changed the characteristics of certain abilities and artifacts, a couple of characters renamed. Number of the latter, incidentally, is constantly increasing - Valve regularly replenishes list missing characters from the first part and even threatens to create new heroes. Cancers to be boiled. alive Another nice feature of the new "DotA" is a system of storing statistics. All your defeat and victory shall be accounted for and matches are recorded so you can review your or someone else's game, having studied the "replay". Here you will find a very interesting camera mode, allowing for the match as he went on the monitor who was playing. Fog of War, mouse movement - a very useful feature for those who wish to master such heroes like Mipo or puja. Dota 2 Dying ogre - a sad spectacle. Valve also tried to create an advanced ranking system. During the matches are levels that are nominally rated player skill. Opponents with whom you are dealing with will meet your performance that should ideally create balance. In reality, however, some special factory new accounts in Steam, so start writing your stats from scratch or wait a low priority resulting from complaints (yes, the selection of the ideal community is held in the form of "reportov" which players throw each other). As a result, the Cubs first infantrymen entered in the "bunker", meet experienced "grandfathers" ready without any hints to explain who is who. So the problem autobalance not yet solved. Somewhat hampered by having fun and inadequate behavior of the individual gamers, which, incidentally, is largely played a major role in the folding of the special status of "bunkers". Although theoretically fans flunk Chat trite platitudes and rough netsenzurschinoy should be in the low-priority games that will have to deal with their own kind, however the level of aggression here rolls. However, this is by no means a disadvantage of the game. Reasons for this lie, as they say, somewhere in time and morals. Dota 2 Forest "farm" - a relatively safe way to get hold of experience and gold. Setting aside the problems of the community and popular mythology psevdointellektualnoy gaming abductor "pillbox" place exclusively in the consumer diet shkoloty, it must be admitted that Dota 2 is a surprisingly balanced development. In creation Valve she finally acquired all the necessary attributes independent game: decent appearance, great music and teaching campaign. Before us "bunker" is selected from the parental nest WarCraft 3 with its own feathers and spread its wings. Only appreciate her flight for some reason, not all are willing. P.S. All gameplay features are available free of charge; nice graphics; user-friendly interface; great music and sound.
Budzis;-;Hmmm, what can I say - the most popular game in the world It is good if you have friends, so u can play with them! Recommend this game 10/10 ;))
dvntu saut;-;better than lol,that s all that needs to be said
-ProUTub-;-;i like the game and it good to play with friend and work good in a team and i rate the game 5/5
haniq;-;Fantastic Game!=short review
Watashi wa kawadesu ne~~;-;Nothing gets me more  off than playing pub games, my blood preasure has atleast doubled, this game is depressing me. But i wont stop playing 10/10
Zh[A]me;-;Nice game, so addicting!!
King Dedede;-;It gave me a raging erection. 10/10
GOTTA GET A GRIP;-;I just want to get community pillar. Please ignore.
(TB)Reaper;-;Played over 1000 hours play it almost everyday at least for 2 hours very fun make sure you have a 5 man party of friends or you'll prob have noobs on your team :p
Daenarys Targaryen;-;nice a game for playing
Revoshift;-;i've been playing dota since 2008 and the dota2 was a great remake from dota. better graphic, better features. playing dota is different for each game. once you win and watch the throne explode, it is a great feeling, the fighting spirit to win. the matchmaking is going better from time to time. try it, the first time are tough, but once you master it, you cant stop playing.
Spawnzrage;-;just started playing and found the game to be much better then lol
Thanscot;-;It takes a lot of time to get used to this game. The bots and mechanics aren't really comfortable for me. If you have good strategies and good nerves, it may not take a lot of time to like this game. I don't like it, because i think its for players that are too OP. So, if you dont like strategies and not good in handling things that are found in this game, i dont recommend you to play this game.
.Yod[A].HyperX;-;ing awsome game (Y)
Seor;-;Dota 2 is a very strategy encouraging game, but it can get a little bit competetive considering it's a game where you are put on a team of 5 heroes (including you) and you have to try your best to destroy the other team's ancient (like a nexus in league), but there are towers and barracks blocking your way. So the game is not at all about kills. It takes a lot of strategy and tactics to win. And on that note i do in fact recommend this game to any hardcore and just MOBA players in general.
Lorayray;-;While it can take awhile to get the hang of this game, as it has a steep learning curve, it is extremely rewarding when it starts to click. It's a challenging game that is fun to play with friends. It's not always going to be sunshine and roses, but it will keep you playing due to the variety of heroes and people that you will meet. Also, what impresses me the most about this game is how balanced it is. There is absolutely no way for someone to purchase an item with real money that will gain them an advantage in the game. All of the items you can buy are purely cosmetic. And the heroes are all quite balanced, and can all be countered. Highly recommend this fun game! Don't be discouraged if it doesn't click right away, it'll get better. :)
Haemophobic Vampire-kin;-;Fantastic. For the times where life isn't sad enough already, and you feel a brief sliver of positivity or joy enter your mind...there will always be dota to fix that. Must play.
Saddam Hussein;-;This game is must have,I mean if you have played League of legends this is same kind of game expect diffrent champions/heroes.Heres some game Rewies:Must have pc game of all time 11/dolphin IKEA BEST GAME AWAAH 100/100 GAMESTOP (Legit I know)
Zazaum;-;top
Finding Titturu;-;Dis gaim sacks every secund jew plei it an africen child dies
Krystleee;-;For Angsty people who want a shot at reasoning with keyboard warriors!
` |;-;Awesome game great strategy
CloudKsr;-;Friendship destroyer, 10/10 would play again, learn many many many language, like russian , philippines, chinese, and cykacykacykacykacyka.
Dafruq?;-;Most played game ever!!! For Now..
Ezio;-;we need peas
EZ50bucks OTL;-;it's a good game , where i can relax after school :D
Fox;-;i dont like it when people put dead animals in games not cool bethesda
Fjorlorn;-;You haven't lived until you have played a proper MOBA. And DotA is the place to start.
SynKratos;-;No life after starting this game.
Colmopi;-;the classic an the best MOBA
Beast.White;-;I had a girlfriend and money before this game. Aside from that , the game is different from all the other free to play games. You get to choose from a huge amount of heroes and set your own way of playing. On top of a hero you use items to furthure adavance your hero. Matches can be 5v5 or 1v1 and you can even do bot matches if you hate human interactions. Pro's ~Hero pool ~Abilites ~Combat ~Bot's are actual not horrible Con's ~Not many different maps ~Hard to learn ~Fast paced ~Cannot pause it Overall 8/10 Worth the price . Free of course. White
Bear-;-;Really fun game. The teamwork of everyone with the mixture of intensity makes this game unbelievably awesome!
II SePhIroTh II;-;best game in steam
Link-Mash;-;this game is addicting that is all peaceim going to play it now
Non Loaders Reported!;-;fast and fun for children and grownups!
Kiyoshi-kun;-;very addictive and potential
MaZRiG_Nel;-;i love dota2 so much,,,, its eaasy game
NOB;-;never tired play this game
Skogsturken;-;good game if you need reflections and yyou like moba games. in the begining its hard to learn but fun to play
EZGG;-;the fun never ends!!!!
SunRISE;-;Nice Gaming
MLG 360 No Scope Pro;-;This game is great !!
(  ) walruse (  );-;1.5k hours says enough
Petranno Raise Hell;-;This is an awesome game that uses alot of strategy. why do i say so its because you a playing against people around the continent and you do not know them therefore you wouldn't know how incredible they are or even useless. Thumbs Up!!!
Get Rekt!;-;I SUPER LIKED THIS GAME COZ 50% LIFE STEAL HAHAHAHA!
Frosty;-;Addictive game, very very recommended.
Miasma;-;Great game, If you don't mind being pummeled into the ground for the first 100 or so hours.
Rudoss;-;It's a game.
Azure/ road back to 3k mmr;-;Dota 2 is a perfect MOBA game it is easy to learn but hard to master, updates are comming in regulary and everything is fine about the except it's community, players feed on purpose cause the dont get mid lane or because nobody bought a courier or because someone took their hero, the player gets reported and banned and he just makes another account and plays again! 10/10 for game 1/10 for players
kappa;-;Very Recommended Strategy game (y)
KUTALA;-;good game, especially if you have friend to play together
Zipp_Zapp;-;a very iteresting and nice game
Wolfen;-;I've put over 1000 hours into this game and I still don't know what it's about.
IStuartI;-;A MUST-PLAY for RTS (MOBA) fans.
dickhead;-;Addicted to this game now :)
Danny P.;-;Best game ever way better compared to lol
bLu;-;One EPIC  this is! xD Keep Calm and Play DotA 2
Tokenblack;-;Great game to play. It's a real blast with friends.
Why Be King When You Can Be GOD;-;I would like to say some things to Valve. You see Valve you changed alot of things in Dota 2 , and there are some cool things and bad things . The good things are;Bounty Rune,The New Model for Shadow Fiend,and the Fountains. Now the bad thing is that you changed a s*** lot of things which are bad . For example;Riki,Bloodseeker,Techies,the Map,e.t.c. But the most bad thing you did wrong is changing the map! Why? I will tell you why Valve . Now in Dota 2 there are many Ganking Heroes in the game like; Pudge with his Hook, Sand King with his ulti+Blink Dagger, e.t.c.... My best friend deleted Dota 2 because of this , and according to my chart , many Dota 2 gamers have deleted Dota 2 for GOOD. Think about what I said Valve. Commend me , Add me , and Like this comment . This is Za Afro and I love you all! P.S valve theres one more thing I would like to say to you , i love you too (NO HOMO GUYS) goodbye!
Im Feeder;-;this a hardcore games, that make up my spirit
Acc;-;good ftp game tough ^^
Sir.Okami;-;A well made game where you can join with friends or make new ones while battleing it out with other people. Continualy coming out with new cotent that continue to appeal to player.
Papapapapakyu;-;Highly Addictive, A Must play for people who enjoys teamwork. It might be hard at first if your new to the game, but with a little bit of practice, you will be able to play smoothly with other people.
Yuri Boyka;-;this is soo good, its far better than LoL but not nearly as good as HoN but still its awesome.
4nim3 pu$$y e4ter 420x69;-;Doto is best moba, much like how people think Rainbow Dash is best pony
FlamingSquid;-;This game is the BEAST!!!!!!!!
MisterBobblez;-;My new favorite game! It's so fun and cool.
Drew Niccolo & Ghianna;-;It's awesome, you can have many friends.
PhineaS;-;nice game :D well played
Type Alt+Kill;-;this game so cool!
Omgilikeapples;-;pretty good revamp of the original dota
s h i . i h s . s h i . i h s;-;Why find other Multi-Player Game if Dota 2 is HERE ?
Pinoy yang tersakiti;-;This game is awesome
Kaneki Ken;-;ABsolutely brilliant!
Vappa;-;very strategic game, regardless of the difficulty, I love the team effort it takes to pull a win. 10/10 favorite game thus far for pc
VeS.MadHouse10101;-;Dota 2... it there where anymore russians it would be called russian simulator 2014
rheyhanNH;-;The best game I have ever played , rate 10/10 ,. recommended to play this game !
[ T' ice ] LadyPepa;-;DotA 2 is so far the most fun and best MOBA ever created. It helps players to think with endless strategies. With the help of luck and teamwork any faction is possible to win. In game emotions and pressures are challenging to deal with. At the end of the game, still sportsmanship is taught and learnt.
Bakayaro;-;Recommended
Time To Reap;-;This game is better than LoL. If you play LoL, you are dumb.
Spartan;-;meh, worth spending a couple hours.
BASILIO IS NOT MY NAME, chicKEN.;-;Nice game. Addicted to it. LoL. :D
Loke;-;A good game if you want to test your reaction time and coorination with your friends or mabye random stranger. Game is lots of fun but expect cases of rage and toxic comments but dont let that stop you from trying new things in the game.
Nicholas Rage;-;absolutely awesome game, definately reccomentd it to anyone who has played LoL, torchlight, Diablo as it has similar qualities! A++
POTATO KING;-;LoL vs dota 2 Graphick dota 2 win and nice play system
Master Of Dark Arts ^-^;-;awsome game
Rshi~i htofiria;-;dota 2 is the Bessstt..!!!
SterBen;-;i really love this game and it makes me think every time i play by its game play
Zentity;-;awesome game. but theres one problem.. i wish steam would make dota 2 system make local lobby mode available even when theres no internet access.. T.T please they should make this update.. TT.TT
GC. ITSB;-;this is great game... make all of humans sense working at the same time
Lunaughty;-;Pretty fun, quite addicting. I love it! :D
[A]iel;-;This game is AWESOMEEE!
H I T L E R S W A I F U;-;10/10 one of the best jandjobs ive given my self in my entire life
Fluffy PussyWillow;-;In this game you will have to play over 100 games for hundreds of hours to get to ranked games so you can see just how bad you are. You will be put into matches with feeders who don't speak your language and flame relentlesly only to lose. Noobs will call mid and feed and you won't have any map vision. Be prepared to spend an hour on a game you will probably lose. 10/10 Would Recommend.
Legend Of The Noob Aom;-;10/10  dota  Warcraft3
Ethereal;-;This game takes your virginity.... 10 Meepo's / 10 Meepo's
Karitxl;-;The Better
getting old;-;If you want to break up with your girfriend play this
Hiro Hamada;-;It's an amazing game - technically outstanding, showing all of Valve's usual polish and attention to detail, especially in the all-important multiplayer aspects. The continual balance tweaks and new heroes combined with the vast amount of content in the game offer countless hours of enjoyment. It's hard to master but good wins with your teammates are incredibly satisfying. It took me a long time to warm up to, but I'm helplessly addicted and every day look forward to getting home to fire this up with my friends. If you can spare the time - play it.
@airsoftgunshop;-;this game is recommended for me. good job DOTA 2 :)
DC23Don.Suratos;-;My Rules My Game
MIORS;-;Lovely Game
Portal;-;This made me the arrogant and judgemental person I am today. 10/10 Would Definately Dota Again
GH0ST.Rastla;-;Best MOBA game on the market. Completely Free2Play and no signs for future pay2win plans. Very balanced with ~100 heroes. Still developing updates for the game. And now start the game.
Punsh;-;So, what can I say. I played original DotA just a few times, so, when Dota 2 was released as beta-version, I was't so agitated, as others. But soon i got an invite and began to play. So, what can I say about positive moments? + Time moves faster - yes, thats it. Too fast sometimes + A lot of matchups in each game + A good challenge for your reaction, analytics and tactics in aggregate + A lot of characters and you can take each one even at the begining + Donations do not affect gameplay And some negative moments... - You need a lot of practice to become really good player - Agressive community - It can eat all your free time
Dildo Swaggins;-;who needs a social life and a stable career when you've got dota 2? 10/10 wud crie everytiem
Midnight snack;-;Dota isnt a game , it is a Lifestyle for those who had enough brain to live in this world !
Skelebro;-;I ing hate the game and it makes me rage but I can't stop playing.
Rat;-;Good game but your team mates dont help you sometimes
zsdg kl;-;Play if you want to ruin your life
NB;-;Best tool to learn language from the world!
Thanh Nin Feeder Ch Lc;-;I LIKE THIS GAME
PennStatePhil;-;greatest thing since sliced dota
T-Bird;-;Amazing game but you might find yourself addicted. Easily 10/10 if you give it time to practice and get good.
Fakovnik;-;pain, suffering, rage :D
TELL-ME-MERCY;-;Well Played
U mad m8???;-;This Game is Great!!!A lot of heroes, a lot of fun
*TAZ* Mashiro;-;Good game, you gotta play it! *Full of Russians. (angry ones who doesn't speak english) *Fun to play. (kinda) *Your nerves will be tested. *Hard to master. *You will turn racist against Russians... *Destroys your life. [ But still this game is awesome! ]
Natalie_Bear;-;Learned Russian, Chinese and Portuguese. 77/10
Nashandra;-;too good dont play or you will lose your wife, children, and house
-IRIS;-;This is Awesome
Treq.;-;LoL better than this ......
RC|Aleksandr.MSI;-;PRO : You can make money from this game if you are wise enough Fun matches. Good,balanced heroes. CONS : Russians.. PS: For all LOL fans...Dota 2 is the best , even LOL wants to be like dota 2 since August 2014. so stfu
red GLADIATOR;-;must try this game!
Artaxerxes;-;stay away from this game, if you still want to have a life :p
mOOMo;-;i love this game, cuz all concept it's look like DoTA warcraft, and who made the hero in this game?? it's really awsome for every design of character. overall it's good, and I hope Valve will be realease all hero from DoTA or maybe valve can give us surprise with original new Hero in Dota 2, i'll apreciate
sinksink;-;in this game u may even actually learn russian with all the skillful russian players u play with
[FBC] Aku;-;Spend your time and money on fueling your rage for people you dislike before knowing them personally. 10/10 totally recommend!
mTE $@MmYr0!^ Wow;-;this game is awsome!
tomato;-;"I hear you wished to court me, Lyralei." He panted slightly. News travelled just as fast as he did, no doubt. Also, she noted to call Lina a  later. "No." She blinked, exhibiting obscene amounts of boredom as she tried her best to convey her disinterest. "But, I'm glad you are here." "Oh? So courting is out of the question, but a one night st-" "No. I-I need to know what people think of your body hair." "Why, little archer, the only person's opinion who matter's of my body is yours, and how does it make you feel? Arou-" "No. Do people like your hairy chest? Your arms?" "Some do, sure, some don't. If you don't want to , what the hell was the Slayer talking about?" "She misunderstood my problem. I-I..." She paused, building up courage, "I'm just as... hairy as you." Lycan stopped, his entire body froze. Those words, that sentence, it echoed through his very soul as he could only say one thing, the last thing ever said to Lyralei by Lycan. "Uhg, disgusting."
ClutchyDeClutcher;-;learned english, russian, portugese, and spanish from this game
BigMonkey5;-;2 Words, 2 syllables ............ A MUST! 0 price, 2 Words, 2 syllables............ FOR FREE! 1 game + your time = lots of hours Nuff said!
aaaaaaa;-;Dota 2 so muchhhhh better than LOL :D
Passive Bot;-;tried searching for a game online 9/10
-  -25;-;Fantastic game, I'm waiting for Pit-Lord ^_^
roifat;-;the best game among the best
Neptune-;-;This game will make you cry! :D
Captain Swthrhs;-;really good game and addicting game
GOAT;-;Are you peaceful, calm and collected? Do you like to shy away from anger? Do you want to become a more assertive, more aggressive person? Well Dota 2 teaches you a unique skillset, one that allows you to speak to foreingors in a more assertive manner. It allows you to be aggressive towards players that need a little guidance, and most of all, it is a more statistically viable option for inducing a stroke than having children is! Yay for anger issues!!
Baft Svunk;-;A game that should be played for fun and worth your time
///;-;Good Game Sir And I like This Game :)
Weng;-;The only game I never get bored of playing over and over again
d.adistya;-;Nice game ever, addicted game ever, epic game ever, play for spending free time ...... like DOTA 2 and remember it's just a game .......
LJ;-;Dota 2 is an awesome game But its need something new from a time to time to make it more challenging... Like increasing the health and mana for the heroes or creating more than just one map Any way it's a great game
Sommar med Ernst;-;The only thing I know about the game is that it is good to press q.
I don't care bro;-;Perfect game , i love it
nV|Loco;-;Very good game Playerbase is a bit... "Tough" Very addciting yet rage inducing.
ihadiandite;-;Addictive!!!
lunardeathgod;-;Great game, but a hard learning curve. Once you get past learning the game, you will have a great time.
jella05;-;This game was awesome i like playing this game :)
Slowflip;-;IceFrog, you brilliant human being! <3
Mexulo;-;It's alright.
iNsOmNiA;-;This is no game - this is an addiction. Its a very tough game which provides new stuff to learn even after 2.000 hours of playing it. Though its very hard to get into game mechanics, it is a necessary thing to do a decent job in this game. But its absolutely worth it! Dota offers so many intensive moments and chances to turn everything around, matches which are obviously lost or won... Despite that, Ive met some nice and precious people which I never want to miss again.
Tony Slark#;-;Hard beginning, forcing you to learn, if you survive the starting phase you will love it
Dose Me;-;I've been a lover of Dota since the Allstar days. Used to take extreme pride in my .wc3 Dota files...had quite a few. Let me tell you people that I've played a lot of games and this is the ONLY one that makes my heart pound out of my chest. Not EVERY match of Dota 2 spikes my adrenaline but when it does happen it makes all the hard times way more than worth it. This game is not for the weak. It is for those who will stop at nothing to achieve victory. This aspect extendes beyond the 1010001001's right into the human psyche.
pakzkiss!! :D;-;thrilling!!
Obama Bin Laden;-;why am i not getting an item even if i have played for a long time? i know about the update but by now i think i deserve one!
Nicole;-;Love this Game
[PLS] Mr.Frie Frie;-;Nice free game :D
MwuLaFllaga;-;dont know what to say
kujj;-;A Peruvian, a Russian, and a Korean walk into a bar...
[DC] PenguinRawks;-;Great game with wide range of players
Honcho;-;It will ruin your school grades 10/10
Chunks!;-;Its all the dota you love or hate
MoeMfMonSteR;-;Love thisd game, great to play with friends, interesting charecters in game as well as tons of items to customize your heroes the way you see fit.
Zerged;-;If you're a fan of Dota and looking for an improved version of it, this is your game! And it even has a fair f2p model: You can play the game completely free, no game-changing stuff needs to be bought with real money.
superpensante;-;Good MOBA! Nice champs!
HappyThePom;-;never get bored of this game
logarithm;-;they say i have no life, i say life start at level 1
SP Reaction;-;Welcome to Dota, City of Salt.
Goobala;-;It stole my life...
something cooli;-;The best place to learn Russian language. 8/10
GenuinE_E;-;Can't stop playing it..
Drakenon;-;Nice game
Namv;-;best 1500 hours of my life
5..w.4.;-;the best Strategy Multiplayer game till now and i juz love it im juz addicted to this game.. i can't stop playing this game i play it for 16hours every day....
Temp;-;After 10 Years this game is still fun...Most of the time. Also with the built in language learning software, and patience adjuster...You will be a grown human after taking this Titan of a Title on! Viva DOTA! DEUCE!
#420BlazeKiwani'sEre'day;-;Dota 2 is an amazing game. Better than league in every way, it combines team synergy, action, strategy and reflex ninjaness to conquer the other team. Pend all your time on it, like me.
Zhyoma;-;Pretty cool game
ziza;-;Millions of players cannot be wrong. Play it.
Skadoodle;-;if you dont have a life and time to spend many hours in front of your pc trying to figure this game out, it is for you. takes really long time to understand, could be boring at the beginning, but once you've learned the basics, its fun.
(SillimanUnited);-;its my life .yeah
Fear sama;-;Dota bad game dont play so mad such wow
Shinji;-;Language professors HATE this game! Game designers have discovered a revolutionary new way to teach Russian. Learn how to speak Russian in one day with this one weird trick!
The Tanginator;-;loads of fun, lot to learn; Dota 2 offer you an addiction you cannot find in other games. from denying enemy's farm to split pushing lanes in order to take down enemy's tower, the amount of elements to learn in this game is so many that you cannot help yourself to get hooked (pun intended) and never get tired by the fascinating world of Dota 2. this game offers various gameplay strategy which makes you hardly getting bored of playing Dota 2; you can play as a carry(hitter) to farm fancy weapons and wreck the enemy to their core or you can also play as a support to assist the progress of your team mate's carry(s) and protect them from dying or you can also be a pusher to easily take down enemy's tower and path your way to win with fast paced fashion. the possibility seems to be limitless with Dota 2.
Guess;-;I can't find the word that can describe this game. it's just fun. i love this game. i started to play dota (dota allstars) since 2006.
l t l;-;great game...
Artoria Pendragon;-;This game was a game that i play the most
Born Hater;-;Good to Play...
Nacromin;-;League of Legends was quite interesting, and then I played Dota and said that League of Legends must have been a lazy made version of what Dota 2 has to offer. Fancy character customes outstanding quality items that consist of their very own personal buffs. A quick rpg match with more than the average varitty for a RPG game ever created. The easy matchmaking system to fit your player style for either one on one or 5 on 5. Hell add some ranking matches and your good to go. To top it off add the international tournaments to make Dota 2 one of the most popular and well built games ever made! Dota...Dota...Dota! That's all I can say and millions of others could agree!
Twitch.tv/berrybouff;-;this is a TRUE game
OrcaBubba;-;In January 1st 1989, the Chinese Government started a top-secret project at the requests of the Inner Chinese Communist Illuminati (An offshoot of the original group) and the Red Dragon Triangle Masons. This was NOT the first project the two groups had attempted, previous attempts include the Chinese Civil War, and the Great Leap Forward, and both proved effective at wreaking havoc upon Glorious Cathay and not the world. Both groups decided that the new project was to be named D.O.T.A, or Desolation Orbital Termination Assesment. The project was dedicated to the creation of a new Chinese-run weapon of mass destruction, run by harvested peasant souls and refined with the angry souls of many crabby Chinese Ancestors. Millions of farmer peasants were conscripted and then sacrificed to quickly develop this orbital cannon of worldy destruction, much like Emperor Qin and the Great Wall, and after the cannon was secretly placed into orbit above China, a crack-team of foreign computer experts and chinese mathematicians created a program that could quickly check the viability of humanity on Earth. If the program assessed hit negative on it's tests, the cannon would be fired and the Earth would be destroyed, and nothing but ashes and the screams of billions would remain. An American spy, Gabriel Newell, discovered this operation and quickly sent word of it to anti-communist students and other misfits in China, and used their protests as a smokescreen as he stole the program and detonator of the D.O.T.A from a Chinese Agent named "Icefrog" who was in the process of evacuating them. After returning to his safehouse, Gabriel decided to desert America, and in his moment of ambition, created Valve, threatening all potential dangers away with his superweapon. It has been decades since Gabriel has established his now Well-Known and All-Encompassing Syndicate, D.O.T.A is still running, assessing every report, every text message, every Rapier-Feed, and every South American and Russian. D.O.T.A has now been upgraded to it's second and final form, what chance do we insignificent insects have against this malevolent AI? Our chances of survival dwindle with every " Madre" and " Blyat" spat out by our Degenerate Brethren. We can just sit here, idly in the queue lobbies and mope and whine about "No Region Lock" while D.O.T.A gains more negative information that brings it ever closer to pulverising this puny rock we call Earth; or we can charge forth, mic's and positive attitude's at the ready to rectify the failures of the abyss, the sub-1k MMR Trench. What will you do?
P4TT3;-;Simply the best AROUND! On second note. This game is great, you'll hardly get bored of it. The graphics are ok and the artstyle is intresting. Gameplay and mechanics are great. The balance is really good for a competitive game. The workshop system is genius. Easily one of my favorite games. Oh? Did I forget something? Yes, I belive I did. The community! The most imortant thing? Maby. I like the community, or atleast I have almost no issues with it. There are mixed feelings about it. I do have one issue though and it is that there are some (a whole lot of them) russians that play in all regions and refuse to speak the language that is suited for the region they are playing on. For example they join the EU West region and refuse to speak english. They only speak russian! Despite the fact that there is a russian region! I could     about this but that      cyk. No one likes a  . Feels      .  ,    ,     .  ? ?  ?!
[SWaG]. Mershed Perderders;-;This game was a russian social experiment that went so badly wrong they sold it to steam Now it is a breeding ground of inter-racial abuse and hilariosly badly thought up insults, some of the lovable characters include an old  in the woods and a tree this game has soaked up far to many hours of my life and i recommend it highly 8/8 m8
I live under your bed!;-;such a good game. best for teamwork / teamplay. two thumbs up for this game
iPod | Bet/Market ID (No. 7);-;Great game!
xabs;-;Dota 2, The one and only game i can't stop playing and amazing game ever made and in reality nothing can beat it. Thanks Valve..
ska wochenende;-;why am I a rastaman?
FroGmaNN^p;-;I must say its the number 1 strategy game in front of me...
Shinoa;-;Most interesting game, with startegy inbound :v
Mr.Robot;-;This is a very nice competetive game.
Admiral General Aladeen;-;Have you ever wondered how it feels like to be berated, harrassed and even serenaded by russians? Join Dota 2 and that can be YOUR daily routine! JOIN NOW! I SAID JOIN! C*KA BLATJ ID*NA HUY DAVAI KATKA! <3
<font face="Forte">JEkOy,(^o^);-;I like this game beca0use it's open the inner knowledge of your mind. :) :) :) But i don't like the abnormal attitude of the other players.. That's all !! Thank you.. ;) mwuaahhh !! :P
Juluzzz;-;Good game ever!
PEENOISE PRIDE;-;Virginity Protector
eax;-;This game will teach u evetything! How to  moms, sisters and whole ing family of your enemy. lol
Nevermore;-;Okay...the best game in the whold world !!!! period
asdaf22;-;I hate this game
Chewbacca on a Go-Kart;-;Absolutely Amazing, simple (kinda). Evidence in my hours played!!
MXQ;-;Dota 2 - very friendly game
young hot ebony;-;whenever youwant to feel like dying, dota is there for you :o)
jontor;-;nice game but here have many noob idiot
WATCH YOUR STEP!!;-;This the game! Its free to play and its way better than League Of Legends
Gamzee;-;In my first game pudge got 38 kills and some korean guy was playing invoker, we won, 10/10
Minerva;-;Doto > League of Losers, that's all
narta_ts;-;Dota 2 is (acording to me) the best MOBA out there. For someone that dosen't spend time on this, they aren't gonna like it as much. I think I played about 60 hours of this game, before i understood it completely. And it was WORTH IT! Dota is the game I have played the most(on steam, that is), and Dota is the game I love the most(atleast right now). For the people that dosen't play it, it can seem repedetive. But for me(who have played it alot) don't think so. Though the map is the same, and new heroes dosen't come out all the time(like on Smite), there is always new styles to chose, new heoes to play, and more fun to be had. :D This game is pretty unique. I love MOBAs. And I'm not saying other ones suck, or something like that. Dota is simpely my favorite. Oh, and you don't need to spend real life money on this. You can spend money on chests with items and such, but it does not change your gameplay. So playing free is defenately pasible! ;) I recommend this game to people who has the patience to really learn it. I was lucky enough to have a great mentor/friend to help me out. He learned me much of my knowlage, but much of it comes also from personal expiriance. Oh, and people who playes MOBAs should also test it out. (Obviosly) That was it, thank you for reading and have a great Dota! Almost forgot! Remember to place wards! -narta_ts
Wurfenking;-;BLYATANGINA BOBO JAJAJAJA TU  MADRE
Slim Phady;-;Made me racist. Highly recommend.
lmaozxc;-;it is a super awesome game
Mirai;-;Good nice one
soros;-;i love this game
Skaterguyrr;-;Very great game ive been playing for a year and its just my favorite
xKore;-;This is great.
Velvet;-;this game
/\\cil;-;Penoysssssssssssssssssss everywhere in mmr player. hope u like that XD
Jeohn;-;This Game is very awesome, its my only game in Steam because i dont want anymore games than this!!! I really recommend this game for you guys! this is just free game but it is Epic!
Noob;-;Best game in the history of holy world !!
antihunt3r;-;Good Luck Have Fun
KidTz:D;-;This is a exciting game everyone pls try this game
Crizie;-;This is a Amazing Game. its like you play a game while doing sport in same time. I love this Game.
o0MNoobKill3r0o;-;The Strategy is Unique and something u need to Experience once in your life
Piiavc;-;Pain. Horrible horrible pain.
K.O Time;-;you play very nice
Mugiwara;-;glad to play this game we can learn much for our life
B@N@N@;-;Great Game Ever !!
The Sniper;-;Lost my time, lost my life, yelled at friends and got angry Ruined my sleeping pattern Spent money on sets #swag right? 4/10 would do again! GG
Carnage[Oni];-;A classic for all MOBA lovers also the DotA is the mother of all other MOBAs
flower.;-;because its doto
Maruno;-;Best game in the world
Ye Olde Pimpeth Swagge;-;good game if you don't suck, foreigners ruin games tho :(
Blackhawk24;-;Awesome time sink. High learning curve but worth the effort.
ReverendRamrod;-;A fantastic, intricate game of strategy, cooperation, and frustration. A must have!
Maximum Over Greg;-;This game is great if your 15 and you think you're a MLG bag. This game is cancer and so are the people that invest their  lives in it. SO MANY BETTER GAMES TO PLAY THAN THIS!! Seriously. Duke Nukem Forever is better than this. ing Big Rigs has a higher level of entertainment value than this overrated pile of garbage. I honestly don't want to invest any part of my life to learning how to play better because I hate it so much. If you like to troll people this is a great game to do it. People will get on your  and trash talk you the INSTANT you do anything that they don't like. Best thing is to just lone wolf it and troll a team if they dog you, and they will. Terrible game, terrible people. Vile existence of software. Humanity lost with 9 million people that log into this. Please skip this and play something better in your life. There is so many other games out there that are cheap and just make life better. May Jesus have mercy on your souls.
GINOSAJI;-;Great game for having fun with your friends and killing time
Fantastic Mr.c;-;ing try hard
[Sky]death;-;i love playing dota2 so much..i make me know other player also.even i just a beginner but i wish to go far in this game
KrispyKremePH;-;great game. moderm classic! rock on!
KC;-;This game is amazing. It's like crack, but more addictive. The honest truth is that like many MOBA's it takes a little getting used to. If you play bots, or have a friend that will help you through the learning phase, its learning curve isn't that bad. I recommend this to anyone who likes having one game that makes them unreasonably happy, and the very next game makes them suicidal. 10/10 I will play this til they make DotA 3.
rexdemax00;-;Cool game.
HotPotato;-;tactical and fun game
So Doge, Much Wow;-;love this game
(TSG) Wiilink1000;-;Have you ever been a relationship you're so happy you're a part of it? Then come to Dota, here in Dota we encourage: Blaming, swearing, hating people of other cultures. The best way to find out how far is too far with your girlfriend.
Weed;-;Awesome game who make u think about team and many creativity way to win the game
Kazzier;-;Arguably one of the best MOBA games out there. A vast amount of heros and tactics as well as frequent updates. Balanced very well and a lot of fun. The game has a tough learning curve however once you get the basics down it can be a lot of fun.
1 800 AYYLMAO;-;This is a man's game compared to League of Legends. This game is hard at the beginning for new players but for those who's familiar with MOBA's you will get the hang of it. ether way this game will take your life and social life also lol, but if your not a big gamer then your fine. but it will take your money xD. highly recommend this game, i mean you can have a octopuls for a courier!!
LES;-;Good game ever
Witchking;-;DOTA was a part of my Childhood. DOTA 2 is now my Life
Icy;-;very efin addictive
xX_MLG-PU$$Y-$L4YER_Xx;-;Much better than LOL.
Road To 0 MMR;-;dota 2 - a game where lots of people are addicted to esp. teenagers,. this game posseses lots of attitude,. here you`ll find trahtalk,  people, morons blah blah, that the goal of this game is simple,. play as team, deffend your towers and ancient, get items, kill the enmies and destroy the lovely enemy ancient., simple right :D ., jsut dont be noob
Faust;-;Makes you Professional.
Matthew 14:31;-;This game is addicting.
Vitus;-;F**ked up matchmaking yet very addictive, piece of  game ruining your lief
(Bae)ty Perry;-;Best Thing since powdered milk.
51616;-;Best MOBA for this decade
Kage Ninja;-;What makes this game awesome is that each game is never the same. With such a large selection of heroes, items and straregies, it continues to keep you on your toes. Dota 2 is all about team work and finding combinations that will work well together and there is nothing like that feeling you get when your team pulls of an amazing combo move that wipes out all your enemies. Don't take the game to likely either as the scales may turn at anytime which makes for even more fun.
SaNryZe;-;In a simple word, "Addictive"
Dorym;-;It is kind of like LoL.
SeruM;-;Addictive sh*t, avoid at all costs.
{Ni$haTa};-;It simply rules !!! :D
C&Mate;-;Take a hit on a bong, and play Dota all night long !
<font face="forte">Sugar;-;one of my favorite games
Otong Style;-;it's good strategy game
Kaydee;-;Cool
Fornication;-;Such a fantstic game . Cant ever get enough of it.. <3
i-MaGiNa;-;For me "The Best Ever Strategic Game Created"
Jimmy R.;-;If you want to lost faith in humanity this game is great. oh, and also great for visiting russia. 1010 / 10
TheSuperTest_;-;I'v been through so much with this damn game. I've had to get three new pairs of Astro A40s from my 2 year experience in this game. It takes a lot of practice to get good at it. But once you do its very rewarding. If you're the kind of person that doesn't want to spend over 400$ on new headsets. This game is totally not for you. Rage on.
KiLLeRmOtH;-;i recommend this game its epic and if you dont like it its free so fkn delete if you dont :)
Hick;-;I'm a docotor and this gmae gave me ebolaids. I r8 10/9 cause I like the courier hero.
Don Flamingo;-;The best game ^_^ i played before
[I-B-L] XDCraftXD;-;PlayS Now Waitings !!!!
nep;-;its fun, i go all boom boom and wha wha wha and freeeowngggg and pew pew
gimme da butt;-;THIS GAME WILL RUIN YOUR LIFE! WANNA SPEND $100 ON THE PERFECT SET TO IMPRESS A BUNCH OF JERKS ONLINE? LOOK NO FURTHER ALSO, PHANTOM LANCER IS A BABY BACK  10/10
Cantaught;-;Very Good Game
DrNoodles;-;best  eva ghee soleh, had a mean as fap oi!
DJ Dog;-;I would reccomend this to people who like torchlight style games. It takes a while to learn the game but other than that it is a very good game. So i would reccomend this game.
kiddow.! :3;-;qwerty
Eiram;-;nothing ... ilike this
[RIG]koji;-;This game is really good i recommend all of you to try this game out! you'll have lots of fun playing Dota 2!
DeathMaster;-;Teammates so kind that they love whole your family
Jonno;-;Step 1: Queue for a game of Dota 2 Step 2: Spend 40-60 minutes getting flamed and crying. Step 3: Tell yourself you will never play Dota 2 again. Step 4: Throw money at Gaben for digital hats . Return to step 1 and repeat.
Karbine;-;i feed hard and flame other people 10/10
Divinebeef;-;One of my favourite games to play right now. Definitely the most intersting MOBA atm.
Mr. F.U;-;Never saw  again.
100% POOF!;-;this is very good <3
SMK | Bda;-;11/10 Best game out there
NATHural Talent;-;THIS IS A VERY GOOD GAME !
Cheetocat;-;social lives are over rated
KATAPOTATA!;-;When im spend 1.5k hours on this PERFECT game, i need do overiew. More than 100 characters, with different cords forced to play Dota 2 huge amount of time . And about him I do not regret ! tnx volve, and fix F * CKIN MMR!
<font face="forte">PouBavui_;-;Wow..Nice Game.
Bu[R]neR T;-;This game gives me so much fun..........it's a awesome game
Mr.Shiny;-;Never has a game enfuriated me so much, yet have me coming back so often. This game is rage induced crack straight to my brain via right mouse click. It has made me hate any language that isnt English, and has reduced my people skills to racial slurs and swears. Matches run from 30-75 minutes, and are filled with dissapointment, anger, and russians. All heroes need nerfs followed by a proportional buff. Rat doto isn't strategy; it's a way of life. Rage as towers fall, and teammates feed, and all you can do is stand there helpless with your iron branch, a tango, and that ward the support planted in your own fountain, for some reason. Your ancient falls, and you throw your dog out the window, punch yourself in the balls, then sit down and queue for another match. Would do it all again.
SpongeBob;-;i really like the drow immortal. LOL
aaaaaaaaaaaa;-;i like the whole part of this game...
AnnA;-;One OF the BesT Games EVER..!!!! :D
OfficerBootyReportingForDuty;-;Not enough Draven. Needs more Draven. Officer Booty is not Reporting for Duty on Dota 2 because NO DRAVEN. -9000/10 would play
JkN;-;its the best game ever.
Standin.Alpha HyDrOe;-;Its just Awsome...!!!!!!!
artKING;-;Just Game is Awsome !!
Where's my TI invite;-;I have been playing this game for at least 4 years now and it always is still fun to play! In other words, BEST GAME EVA!
Gamblerz.Gambit;-;Simply irresistible and addictive as hell.
Senpai-Sama;-;Best way to learn Russian ever. Very fun game to play with friends except when you play against OP heros which is always.
BZY.Ej;-;nice game and cool graphics =DD more power vavle
rhea;-;nice game with hundred strategy :D
Alfa Guyo boy;-;The best game ever
Tustel;-;Best game since icefrog join with valve
[ T' ice ] Je;-;This game is very fun! It helps me forget my problems.. Playing this game let you gain friends...
Po..<3;-;massive MOB gone full of  lately..matching making sucks a bit in Ranked matches..BUT THE GAME IS TOO OP TO CONCERN ABOUT IT..
enoN^^.;-;Dota 2 , where teamwork is laughable and everyone is Pinoys . 10/10
Quack;-;sometime i die a lot :P....btw its fun
<font face="Vivaldi">D Mechanic;-;Better graphics than DOTA1, I highly recommend this game to everyone!
Zesar;-;This game is really enjoyable. Please read some guides on the web and understand the concept of the game. If you can do that and walk in with an open mind, this game will suck you in. All the different available characters make it interesting. This game requires communication and team-play. Enjoy!
Volnutt;-;honorato
Ollyne Apple;-;good game and so much player in game
Chaoser;-;The Most Frigging Awesome Game on the Planet!!!
4414;-;Best game in the world
mOnDrAy21__(0)_;-;i like the game it have all the trills and fun on it please dont stop evolving the game
Kocimietka;-;Still better than LOL...
The Best Of Me;-;Rock n RoLL!
Bill;-;Great game, best Moba available. Needs a bit of balancing and fixing in areas. But great game. THE MATCHMAKING IS GOD AWFUL THOUGH. Needs to be fixed. Ranked matchmaking in new update blows and is unfair.
**Stalker**;-;<3 love this
SnorklePC;-;Peruvians finally have their own server
naeL gnuY;-;dota is slowly becoming reality
InC7-;-;this game dota 2 really awesome. incredible. wooogg
-CM-his own mother;-;This game is perfect time to enjoy the good times with long catch up friends and it is the most perfect game to get us more united.
Lux;-;When it comes to teammates, it's a game of russian roulette. You play, and hope then don't blow your brains out in the process.
TroubledWaters;-;1,000 hours later and were all still terrible at this game.
da;-;Just for meepo :)
[dolphin];-;playwithme
EMP.sonyhdv;-;a cool game. let's play
Captain America;-;Dota is most popullar multiplayer game i will recommend this game to all players.
Chill;-;This game is the best game of all time . I think that dota will last forever . I want to see my son play dota :3
Dan;-;> Game is hard
Fredda;-;This game taught me about the diversity of cultures that our small little corner of the universe offers. Then it taught me to hate them all.
Chrome;-;Side effects include: -Hatred of other humans -Lack of trust in others -Carpal Tunnel -Improved hand eye coordination -A large ego -Weight gain -Weight loss -Confidence -Despression -Extreme Racism -EXTREME RACISM -Increased strategic thinking capabilities -Mushy-brain syndrome -Subconsciously learning a new language -Subconsciously learning to hate the culture of said language -Literally every ailment that is not a transmitable disease 9/10 Doctors accepted this game on their recommendation list, but the tenth was afk
Grizzt;-;It's like roulette; fun until it turns into Russian.
psych0tic;-;Causes anxiety problems, low self esteem, Tourette's syndrome, mood swings, Bipolar disorder, breakdown of relationships, raging erections, racism. Would definitely recommend.
Sentimental Oriental;-;In Dota 2, Not many people speak your language. Not many people play well. Not many people talk nicely. Not many people work as a team. But if you find people that do... You'll have the most fun you've ever had.
Kyubashi;-;And you thought real life was a struggle.
ephir;-;I only played a little but it was fun.
Captain Obvious;-;Things I gave to DotA: 1. Money 2. Time 3. Love Things DotA gave me: 1. Arthritis 2. Carpal tunnel syndrome 3, Hatred of Russians, Mexicans, Spanish, Finnish, and Russians 4. Broken keyboard 5. Broken mouse 6. 9/10 ready 7. Server crashes 8. 4 stacks of Russians in EUW servers on English prefrence settings 9. Ranked matches 10. Free to play but Pay to win games (I.E. - Foreseer's contract, New Bloom 2015) 11. "It's in the bag" spam (especially Skywrath) 12. Multilingual cursing - I guess this is a good thing? 13. Split second math - Reliable/Unreliable gold and gold loss on death vs. Buyback availability - This is good too Essentially - DotA is a greedy woman, but I love her all the same. 11 / 10 would play again
HekaDooM;-;"THE PUB SUPPORT" "Where are wards?" The pub Carry demanded. "I placed them and they were countered" the Support began, "I am trying to juggle giving you complete lane farm, protecting you and harrassing the enemy while saving to buy more, also possibly sentries to remove their-" "UP COUR PLS" the mid hero politely added. "Give Savle" The Carry demanded. "Certainly." replies the support, using the salve on the Carry who subsequently ran headlong into an enemy creepwave. "So where is mek?" the Carry said, after he was ganked due to overextending. The Support died saving him and was treated to a rather enthusiastic series of map pings on his corpse. "Again, having not even enough to buy boots as well as wards, I don't think a 7 minute Mek is viable." The Support replies. "Haha look your level, so low, noob" the Carry retorted. "U have no item xaxa". "Well, jungle gold and experience through stacking and pulling with blocked camps is nowhere near as much as on lane which I attempted to give you, the carry, the priority over." The Carry is subsequently ganked again at the enemy tower, oblivious to the enemy tp that the Support moved away from. "Report Support, usless" The carry cried in allchat, in between mentioning various aspects of the Support's Mother's anatomy. "Instead of reporting and acting like that, why don't you try supporting for randoms sometime instead of instapicking a carry?" the Support asked, as he watched the Carry return to afk-lasthitting lane creeps. "HAH, support is for noskill noobs like you!"
flanadlivv;-;One day, a wise man intoduce me into this game. "it shall protect your virginity, my lad" he said.
zhagata;-;Too addictive :D
[SNE] Hapz;-;a very good game,that an upgrade version from DotA nice graphic,gameplay,one of the most enjoyable games maybe still had a bug in game but every update in this game will fix that problem
ooppppp;-;great game
Super Kami Guru;-;This is like mario kart but
GeN_CPJ;-;Nice addicting game..
chrille;-;Really good game, fun to play!
256.DosEggies;-;This game has to be one of the most techinical games i have ever played. Dota 2 is emersive and with a good team of 5 players you can enjoy hours of domination, but with a team that lacks the bit of communication and players that are selfish, it will sink your team just like the titanic.
Nature chose her guardian well.;-;A very fun and good to play with friends.
Black^&White^;-;This is truly an amazing Game. Join now! =))
The Doctor;-;I used to play League of Legends but i found this to be a less repetitive and overall funner game, and the learning curve is very steep but its easy to get over the hump if you play wih people who know how to play and it becomes very fun indeed!
Hiro Gokua;-;Fun. But i rather play one were you have a complete view. ya know like a 3rd person. Not an overhead view.
Peach;-;don't play this game unless you speak russian.
skrunkNastya;-;My mom was so angry she deleted the shortcut...
<blank>;-;good graphic cool heroes and heroines best game so far although the rules/controls are a bit complicated for newbies =)
Darkio;-;cool
Insight<3 Blues;-;The Best Game On Steam By A Long Shot!
Maderero;-;I'm too addicted to this game. You are likely to lose your house, car, wife, and job by playing this game, as you will soon be sucked in to the Dota universe and forget the real world. More addictive than crack. 5 stars.
<u><Font face=''ravie''>kky;-;its is a very nice and my number 1 game that i play i have no say a dislike too this game this is the best game ever
Kelibat Bangsat;-;Great game tho :)
Mieser;-;The original MOBA, and a fun game for many. The game that is always worth a try and is free so why not play for a day or the rest of your life?
Jet-Stream Sam;-;Wanna play in a US server? Russians, Spanish, Brazillians, and every other non english country will join you. There are more illegal aliens here than there are hoping the borders between us and mexico. 10/10 would learn forign launguage again.
Chaotic Logic;-;Fun single-unit-micro strategy game. If you enjoy RTS genre, you should at least try this. Also a great tool for destroying your life.
CWFN;-;Ruined my life. Would recommend.
blanco nino;-;Defense of the Ancients 2 - known more colloquially as DotA 2 - is a masterpiece of modern video game design. Harkening back to the age-old StarCraft 1 custom map Aeon of Strife, DotA 2 nearly perfects the elements introduce in that original mod. The mechanics and gameplay are ageless, simple in their implementation and flawless in their execution. Everything about Dota 2 is a triumph of engineering - the individual Heroes have fantastic character designs, both thematically and mechanically, and the game is perfectly balanced around its seemingly lack of scaling and at times stagnant nature. It is a game where Levels and Planning take precedent over Gold Advantage and Items, and teamwork is a union - a celebration, even - of independent player skill. This variety of complex mechanics, themes, and interactions that coalesce into a truly unique experience. I recall the time I forgot to Ward bot rune, and when mid lost Illusion to a Pudge from top lane, I was only blamed four times, as opposed to dozens in other, similar competing games. This unparalelled level of community benevolence and powerful inclination towards skillful play make DotA 2 the best game on the market, if not all of Human History. Four hundred years from now, when the Paragon Hyperscholars are uploading DigiEdu to the modbrains of the Neo Bourgeoisie, Dota 2 will forever be imbedded in the SiliconCortex as the zenith of PreHuman ingenuity. 0/10 it sucks
Just_Ice.;-;I LOVE DOTA 2 because the unique blend of online RTS and RPG action that has made Dota popular with tens of millions of gamers and expand upon it in every way.
j j;-;The best game i ever played ;-)
GerobaK.-KaeL-;-;good and nice game
Scorpio_gamer;-;DotA 2 is one of the most exciting, replayable and addictive competitive experiences around. Though there's a lot of learning you'll need to do to get up to speed, the payoff is a sophisticated, complex team-based experience. The required investment of time and energy, combined with the meticulously designed gameplay, produce a hugely satisfying sense of fulfillment when you win. On the flip side, it also means an all the more crushing sense of failure when you lose, but it's worth the risk!!
ai kerai ;.;;-;Addicting~ =.='
ANJING CYKA PLAK;-;This is a very good game
[EGVT]MinaEzzat;-;Please if you played wow or diablo or starcraft you have to play this game
hothothot;-;I love this game..................no means to stop playing
just4fun;-;cool
Aarodar;-;The free tool to learn languages such as: spanish,russian and german!
ebi;-;Iron branches 10/10.
Tui & La;-;Worst game I've ever played. 10/10.
uv express;-;This game is so great and addictive! But lots of noobs and peenoise. >.<
Zzzz;-;I don't know why everyone isn't playing this!
Luki;-;In my opinion, Invoker is the most entertaining hero in Dota 2! He is also the most complex hero and has one of the highest potential skill cap. Play Invoker if you have enough patience and will to learn this Masterful Hero!
No-one;-;much amazing much strength much speed much intelligence much dragons
Sharktopus;-;This game is great, but my god, I sit down to play at noon and suddenly it's 9pm. Valve, please tell me how you've invented a time machine that occasionally also makes me mad while in use.
Philipus;-;Dota 2 is a game that i definetly recommend. One of the best MMOs i have ever played. It has nice graphics,audio its awesome
KarelVokerDoto;-;If you're willing to spend the rest of your days playing one game, pick this one.
J | C;-;Best Distractor EVER
So predictable.;-;Havent been this hooked up to a game before.
i c t o;-;Learned various curse words from different languages. Highly Recommended.
CSS-14......PRO....[ BD ]....;-;i have been playing this game since long days. it is a very nice game.i like it.
90SHADESOFBLUE;-;its good (Y)
EL-Saviour;-;whatta wonderful game i ever played. hmm make some gg game steam. heheh
monkeygirl.abbs;-;love the graphics
Cycles 4Days Feelings Get Hertz;-;Do you have free time? Do you hate yourself? If the answer to both of these questions is yes, I'd like to introduce you to Dota 2.
GamingNaro;-;I have a freind that just moved from Russia he says that people who speak english are invading their servers...
allenhornleopard, son of Epona;-;I don't see why people say that this game makes you hate Russians. It has only made me prejudiced against tiny imp-like creatures with permanent invisibility, bloated corpses with hooks and chains, and immortal blood elves that send meteors from halfway across the map. 10/10 would have my head pwned again EDIT WINDRANGER IS MY WAIFU. NOBODY CAN HAVE HER. NEW EDIT NEVERMIND, PHANTOM ASSASSIN IS MY WAIFU NOW
Gucci Shoes Gas the Jews;-;Who needs friends. Or family. Or any social interaction what so ever with any living being on the planet. 11/10 gg icefag
L;-;Game worth wasting time and money for! ^-^
El Chihuahua Jesus;-;Once i learned how to play i started to really enjoy the game and the people in it! I recommend it to everyone to try or maybe just have a little fun!
woody13;-;Best Stratergy game EVER
Z2.7rg;-;pick ember and fun ~_~
Don Jing'z;-;what is the best hero for newbie
<i><font color="#00FF00">JulUse;-;I like the graphics <3
Deny.Bro;-;Good and Epic
The Hockster;-;i really enjoy Farming Simulator 2013: Asian Rice Edition
Gol D. Roger;-;I recommend this game for those who wants to a another ultimate gaming experience..
Silver;-;recommended
Bhatoegana Lancaster;-;this game have best purposes, such as thinking how to work well as team and how to win every match which played with good strategy
QuickSilver|on hp,komp kebakaran;-;Nice game
varun for ti6;-;Millions of people play dota 2 everyday. Don't you want to know why it's so popular? Play it yourself to understand :)
@twitch.tv/hiyaaadoto;-;Such a nice game . Thanks Valve
Erica Rabara <3;-;It wasn't hard to play. Best Video game ever.
GAS THE MOSQUITOES SPECIESWARNOW;-;want to learn Russian? Then try this free experience!
Libonbon`;-;Cool
Samoon9307;-;I was fan since Defence Of The Ancients[Warcraft version]. Better graphics and better animations. Just love to play the game
KilLeR -A- <3 RitZ;-;My favourite Online Multiplayer Game. \m/ ^_^
sakher<({$S$})>sakher;-;i love this game too much its great :)
{WT} Outsider;-;This Game is a thousand times better then league! It is a little bit harder but way more of a challenge and fun! I highly recommend it
lil Olympi 4 PREZ;-;Fun game besides when people get mad at you if you dont speak english :/ But amazing game very very enjoyable and would play 50,000 hours of it everyday if are earth had a slower rotation :)    ,    ,  dont  :/    ,   ,   50,000   ,   -  Also people are biased and think when ever you speak another language it is spanish or russian :/ I speak Kazakh, Bosnian and Greek!!!! WHY YOU PEOPLE NO UNDERSTAND??
Bulldong;-;Games too good not to play it :3
Bristleback;-;Ruined my life 10/10
psilon;-;This game stole my life. 10/10
Troll;-;Initially, I really dont know about this moba game even in the previous form (dota 1), but when my friend played this game in my house, I became interested with this game so I download it my self and started to play it. You know what? Now I got addicted in this game. Lol *BTW I wrote this review in order to complete my badges LOL
Gama;-;Nice game ever
Maver1ckS;-;its the best game!!!
Desertstorm;-;can't believe its free to play, best game 8-)
Spt;-;DOTA = ADDICTION end of story
M4dvillain;-;Come make funny voices on the mic while you watch buildings crumble! Oh  those are my barracks hold on
Blackspade;-;*Thumbs up*
[Ehron]  Hierarchy;-;FUN to PLAY
FounD^R;-;I have the opportunity to review Dota 2 - - Sat and thought of soemthing to write. - Something Clever like a high ranking Rust review - Ha Ha, Funny, Clever - I am Helpful - Thumbs UP -11/10
CHen;-;This motivation in me has been coming from winning tournaments and representing my country for it...... it's the amount of satisfaction and achievement that nothing else can give you..... and You should really work for your passions. Int: Henry is a genius with an exceptionally high IQ, well over 160. He uses his intelligence not only for school, but also to analyze the possible attack patterns of game, the reason why he can win the game during any match.
Pringle;-;Best game ever, but only if you play with good teammates(zlots), otherwise pretty lame and boring
ZipY Gun;-;The best game !
ZaGGie;-;Love it .
<font face="Impact">ELfuego;-;JUST STEAM OFFER ON ME OKEY ?
AkentMiracle;-;i can playing dota because after Mechanic 1 First quest new id. error !
Znzhng;-;nice game hope free keys come soon
Blank;-;Very nice game
PlutiaIris Hearto( )o;-;Awesome game,,,,,,!!!! let play together
Gato;-;Riki is a dirty little gy-po who constantly s you in the  with his tiny  hands. Drow must give the whole of the Dota production team Blow jobs for them not to just straight up remove the OP  from the ing game. Was infected by the valve crate plauge off the bat, so make sure you have your wallet out. Overall a great game- Gato 10/10 GOTY plz valve
Rightmare;-;recommended games for people who likes to play together in team and mix all skills to win the game.
Bluebeer;-;another amazing example of Free to play done correctly, game is Great although id advise you to have friends to play with as solo Que in this game will not offer the greatest experiance.
InnocentSoul;-;Best game ever,Hope you enjoy this game,have fun ,play more and more keep laughing and became profesional one day.
Matdiu;-;Dota is so awesome!
TheFlyingFish;-;Dis game is fun.
K4L;-;Brilliant waste of time. Nothin' better
EPIC FAIL;-;i came from heroes of newerth and this dota 2 awesome because some heroes hon dont have it
Call Me Lucky;-;give me loading screen
Pinggnome;-;This game sucks only nerds play this game
Phoenix;-;12/10 you cant teabag people but if you could it would be a 666/10
jokur;-;Best MOBA Game Ever... I'm addicted to this... HFGL all
BevAlen;-;I love this game...
Booyah;-;Dota is life.
Fluffyfrogs;-;This game will make you use all the words in the world. Aka - Abuse, Swearing and Racism
Senpai Yuri-sama;-;Great game! 10/10
Minions ft. TurtleNet;-;adjusting to the game
[Legend]: Radjelzy85;-;i like this game but many players are bullying!
BackToTheFuhrer;-;great game
TheKapitan;-;Help me to study some languages
capriska;-;It's addictive!! Pay attention.
Olaf;-;Nice game
Terlalu sering kehilangan;-;so interesting,fun, make me speechless
paa.ja_y;-;This game has taken the world of cybergames to the highest..
Puta;-;I used to do actual work when on the computer. 10/10 only play this game
HubaMan;-;Really good game..
CSGODices.com - Win AWP Asiimov;-;Don't play it! It's addictive!
Mr. Abandon;-;Dota 2 is the greatest GAME... Love it
Oink!;-;Best among real-time strategy games
Grohl;-;I have close to 1.000 hours played of this game, and I can safely say that it is a piece of . I hate it. Don't play it.
Vanne Rose;-;this game is so strategic for everyone,yourself,how you communicate to your teammates /enemies,how you patiently wait for a right time to do some actions, hunting enemies.it also affects your attitude during the game.Well at Least we enjoyed it most of the time. Especially good enemies/allies each game :) Most important in DOTA2 is to know your role each game.it will take a big part to win the match :) GOOD GAME WELL PLAYED :) Best Game :)
Asa Akira;-;Game has quite the learning curve. Have patience and ability to learn and build your skills. If you can't move along.
[LuckyCharM]-Ni-[Mawin];-;Skills,Luck,Quickness,Patient,Awareness,Communication, Team-play,Positiveness,you need all of it in this game :)
Raptorsaur;-;THIS GAME... IS SO COOL... OVER 110 PLAYABLE CHARACHTERS... COOL ITEMS... MAKE TONS OF FREINDS... O...M...G SHUT UP AND TAKE MY MONEY! OH WAIT ITS FREEEEEEE!
PrettyPrettY;-;WHAT A GOOD GAME !
SaNiTy~;-;ing ruined my social life, grades, any chance to get laid, i got fat, and boring to the rest of the human race because all i talk about is dota, great game 9/11 IGN
Master_X;-;The Game itselph is very nice & it gets updated constantly but the matchmaking process needs to be redesigned i think...
kookoolau;-;Why did i get the message " unable to load version from steam info" When i load the game. Can someone solve this problem?
1ast;-;So dangerous game if U play in Russians servers
Hellzsavior;-;8 tablespoons (1 stick) unsalted butter, plus more for pan 5 tablespoons all-purpose flour, plus more for pan 1/2 cup whole hazelnuts, toasted 1 1/4 cups confectioners' sugar, plus more for dusting 1 Pinch of salt 4 large egg whites 1/4 teaspoon pure vanilla extract DIRECTIONS STEP 1 Heat oven to 325 degrees. In a small saucepan, melt butter until light amber in color. STEP 2 Brush madeleine pan with melted butter, and dust lightly with flour. Place hazelnuts and 1 tablespoon confectioners' sugar in the bowl of a food processor fitted with a steel blade, and process until very fine. STEP 3 Combine hazelnut mixture, 1 cup plus 3 tablespoons confectioners' sugar, flour, and salt in a medium bowl. Add egg whites and vanilla, and whisk to combine. Add melted browned butter, and whisk until incorporated. With a tablespoon, fill molds evenly, about 3/4 of the way. Transfer to oven, and bake 14 to 18 minutes. Cool 2 minutes, and remove from pan. Cool completely on a rack, ridged side up. Dust cookies with confectioners' sugar.
lamerdudeX;-;Best game of all times.
Hass;-;DOTA has marked the life of millions of persons. Valve and IceFrog has made sure DOTA 2 will be making the same for next decade. An extraordinary formula and a extraordinary work around it.
i 3;-;best game ever i had played .. i am enjoyiing it a lot . lots of new friends to play with enjoy with great comminuty ... thanks vavle xd
[T]inko^;-;Strategy and fun to play.
jhayden rain;-;highly recomend this game to anyone very competitive and fun to play with friends via online.
-ALLSTARS-xXXXXx;-;wow ,this is so amazing ....
Zee;-;LoL clone, HoN knockoff, complete waste of time- 10/10
Orion;-;Remember its only a game.
1234;-;steals time quicker than a gypsy government benefits
Ryan;-;Great game, its basically free russain lessons, a must play
cupido;-;nice game im online gamer adict i dont play dota 1 but when i try dota 2 its good
Drons;-;Dota 2 is incredibly deep game, in a sense - is absolute. Such variation you will not find almost any other game, except perhaps that of direct competitors in the same genre. But they are few, and they are usually made worse. Unreliable players here Not applicable, as send out a separate circle of hell, where they play with the other trolls and flamers. This helps to re-educate those in whom the piece is still some reasonable and good, but finally lost souls will cook in this pot forever.  of
NaCl;-;dont think of downloading it just do it
Deathseeker!*DS-KUN*;-;Best game ever it is obviously better than LoL and HoN
C Y B E R E M P E R O R;-;The biggest waste of time in your life, 10/10.
<font face="impact">Marko;-;That's the best game what i have played ever. (i have played BF 3, BF 4, every Dead island, a lot of strategic games and WOW etc... I also played LOL, but dota ... Dota 2 is more difficult than LOL, LOL is for kids who want kill everything and destroy everything, but dota is more strategic and just it is more about how can you plan assaults, how you can farming...) Dota is about cooperate, but LOL is also about that, than why play dota? Play it if you want challenge and a lots of hour of fun. It's amyzing guys play it! :-)
Annunaki;-;Idk, but this is a revolutionary!!!
Mario;-;i recommend this game to all age.
Derpniel;-;Forget paying money for a language learning software like Rosetta Stone. No teacher, program, or audio book will help you as much as DotA 2 will. Follow these simple steps; 1.) Download DotA 2 2.) Play the game mode "All Pick" 3.) Leave and abandon the game. 4.) Continue to do this until you're into low priority. 5.) ??????? 6.) BRBRBRBR HUEHUEHUEHUE GIB MUNE PLS As you can see, I now speak fluent Brazilian. The only thing I don't like is that the program teaches you to curse before teaching you actual words. 8/10 Innovation 7/10 User interface 1/10 Community 10/10 Would recommend if you BR your HUE and you GIB mune plz.
BHURTEL;-;must play game for everyone!
GraveRune;-;This game is worse than cancer. 10/10
Sb.AMR;-;I'm meat hooked to this game its amazing in other words fuq league
Zncxer;-;Dota 2 is nice game
rock and roll to the world;-;dota 2 is fun.. so addicting game... advisable to all players that love strategy/teamplay game. its just that some of players here are not quite good at teamplay.. and some are no respects.. but all in all this game if perfect for you..
Crababidoi;-;This game seems to be left 4 deaD 2 with new name, buy very good
Wicked is Good ^;-;been playing dota since 2006, i made the right choice when i transitioned to dota 2. great game :)
"BryL";-;nice game ever
Class_123;-;yes. we got a great fun in this Game !! I love Dota 2 forever :D
Speedemon;-;Everyone has to get this game!!! You will see why people have hours on this game...
Visour;-;couldn't agree more best ever game! 11/10 lol..
Exo[A]Lad[A];-;how to upload to vidoe mode
{K.M.Z} Super Troll;-;4 stertegy gamer lover.. play this or u will regret.. :))
monskie;-;very nice game.. absolutly better then dota1.. we can do anything on dota 2
Spesmerin;-;This game simply revolutionises the concept of team playing. Many of the new rules of team playing introduced by DotA 2 may prove confusing for a lot of people, so let's do a quick test: Do you enjoy getting frequently yelled at or flamed for not barging headlong into a fight with low health just to die and feed the enemy team? Do you like hearing 10 pings per second from at least 2 people at the same time on a point on the map where you must go and die, thus feeding the enemy team (and then being called a noob)? When alone at home, enjoying a quiet, uneventful afternoon, in a relaxed, civilised environment, do you feel the urge to throw yourself in a highly stressful, xenophobic, toxic, sausage-measuring slugfest of teenage (mostly Russian) boys with barely any knowledge of English, attempting to inflate their egos by virtually punching each other while insulting each other? If the answer to those questions is yes, then this is the game for you, you murderous sociopath. 10/10, will play during finals.
on;-;This GAme is Sooo HAaarD but its Soo Fun :D
Fuck off;-;THe game is awesome its like a coolest game i played than the other game grapics and the items and the chracater viewing and new items comming and updated
P90 Mustard Race;-;Fapping to this game cause CM is to cold 10/10
mk;-;Awesome game for awesome people.
Alpha;-;get it, download it, play it, love it
Bloody.Lust;-;Good Game for Good Gamers :D
The Alternative;-;I know a lot of chumps people that struggle to learn russian as a foreign language. I can easily just learn russian here with a press of a button. Hidden text, so spooky
The Alternative;-;I know a lot of chumps people that struggle to learn russian as a foreign language. I can easily just learn russian here with a press of a button. Hidden text, so spooky
maty;-;Russian madness...
Wiesh;-;this is a nice game. i love it
xXx_MLG_KaPpA_S14y3r_xXx;-;This game is fantastic, by far the best free-to-play game out there. DotA 2 can take some time to learn, but once you know what you're doing it's a very rewarding, fun game which encourages team play and cooperation. Overall, a very fun game.
init;-;Great teamplay RTS game. You should know that it has a steep learning curve. It's the most fun when you play it with friends. I prefer Dota 2 over the competitors LoL and HoN because it's cleaner and I have more trust in the developers. In both LoL and HoN I have been disappointed by patch changes and the directions they decide to take the game in. Now Dota 2 is not perfect, for example they still tend to make every new hero slightly overpowered, but still in my opinion this has the best integrity.
Porni;-;it's a nice kind of strategy game
Fucking Sly | AK;-;This is ing Awesome!
Massive . .:;-;This game is awesome !!
[SmoothCriminal];-;If u want to compete in a fair battle with pure skill and no cash shop items interfering with your gameplay, then Dota 2 is the game you'er looking for.
[M.M.L] Magic Cards;-;The most fun you can have on a free game, bar none. The community is great (most of the time) and replayablity is endless. Just download it already!
I'm_learning...;-;I like that every game is different and challenging; however, people tend to take pub games too seriously.
Melcindomien;-;give my life back srsly !
impa;-;i like heroes in this game. it's amazing, especially women heroes, so beautifull. But i dislike most is met with troll player make the game lose
TheAnnoyingEngi [YouTube];-;Pizza recommend thus game cus its a good game and ifs free to play so have fun and dont be a loser
TOOTH LESS;-;It's cool u know ;)
Call Me Death;-;Its an alright game but it always lag everytime after a maintenance
Saber tooth dragon;-;Seemas to be an amazing MOBA that is F2P and its up to you to decide on IGP. 2 thumbs up for me
Lancelot;-;Great for Teamwork plays and improving your gaming experience.
Hybridddddddddddddddddd;-;Love to play this game.
B@Rk1ng Ki77Y;-;just easy to play and fun
<b>Meat.Balls;-;very interesting game, i like it. i hope next hero update is oracle :D
TheKing;-;this is a great game
Standin.Rank2;-;Why my dota 2 always update , when i want to play this
Tali'Zorah (Scumbag);-;this game so cool and awesome
G_ELo;-;Just try It
Safe to Leave;-;Very NIce For me...THx A LOt
LOVELESS;-;Best Multiplayer Game ever play in STEAM !
El-Directo;-;Truly a dream come true game!
drekavac;-;Dota 2 is like chess if someone makes the wrong move your team loses the game. It requires a lot of practice to become avarage player. Anyway the game very good it gets new updates every month sometes new items and new upgrades for the heros are released it's balanced game. I think that valve should release the 3 remaining heroes just to normal match makeing public only first and then maybe on ranked mmr
n-sphere;-;This game is *really* complicated.
No Game No Life;-;This will ruin whatever so call life you have!!!!!!
>>DS<< Darkwarrior;-;So Addiciting great game
[V.S.O.P] V Lui;-;dota 2 asia champion ship 2015 bug i buy compedium point to up util 34 lv no extra 2 box for me please fix it
bruuuh_ha_ha_!;-;i love this game
XxYusukexX;-;Skill To Play
Jedi_Knight;-;Steep learning curve, but perhaps the most rewarding team game I've ever played AND its free. Fully support this game, just give it a chance at first and you will grow to love Dota 2!!
Mr. Blue-Eyes;-;The game's beyond great, but some people just can't admit it. They're afraid of the greatness of this game, that made me a junkie. The cost of this game is your life and soul, but at least you get to beat up Russians. Read: Not all Russians are annoying or bat at this game, I've met a few nice ones! But the nice ones are really hard to find. Like, really really hard.
;. TREBLEGES crbn;-;Played a few hours, now i am fluent in russian. 10/10 would recomment for everyone learning  language
Monde;-;It is just a relax+stress game.
Strk;-;With Dota2 being the first Moba I've ever played I would definitely reccomend the game to all. That being said the SA community is one of the worst I've ever experienced with online games...this does include myself at times, guess it comes with the territory. Still a great game, hours and hours of fun.
Pain;-;doto is suck, LOL is best of the world =)))))
Latte;-;10/10 Loose all your friends and never trust anybody again all for the low low price of your self-esteem
Bubbles;-;Reported.
pOrOrO;-;graphics is far better than Dota I, great game..the great games in life are FREE..lol!
[1st];-;anything could be happened
Vy2;-;Love this game.... Hoping for more updates To come
FKBR.PitBull;-;with 1k+ hrs on record, still loving it! definitely recommend to MOBA fans, especially dota 1 or LoL.
Nerd Bot;-;HI,ITS NICE MEET YOU! :)
MentallyRetardedSanta;-;It's ok.
james;-;very bad game do not play 10/10
FRaGiMuS_MaX;-;A game that has changed a lot since Beta. There's what seems to be an endless amount of characters to choose from, but only a few you'll stick to and enjoy playing. It's one of those games that's very hard to get fully involved in, but can be enjoyed on a basic level by playing Co-Op mode along with other players. If you're in it for the competiton aspect, prepare for a deep learning curve and some heavy competition in Normal mode. Depending on what level you decide to take it on at, you can either be casual or advanced at what can be considered an overhead winner in the RTS/RPG world.
Brojangles;-;This game is amazing. And free.
MeiTo-MY;-;the best game ever~ recommend all of the MOBA players to play it! lifesteal 100%
Ace;-;pretty good
CIAO !;-;The best game ever !
nerowIk0;-;its a good game that gets you
[LSF] INI;-;i like dota a lot, it's the best game ever, I like that there is a lot of heroes and builds for the heroes, it requerers a lot of tactick and thats the best think in the game i like taktical game, there is nothink that I dislike about the game ":)
GoKu;-;we need cinamatic trailers like LOL
Keyser Soze (-);-;Recommended
SlntBullet;-;This game ruined my life
The Frog Prince;-;i disliked dota 2 now because hard to find drop item. should increase chance of drop item 1 game for 1 drop item.
ElectricEra;-;It is very interesting to play because there is no chance to have similar game. "You can only get smarter by playing with a smarter opponent"  Helical
WRENOMANCER;-;My mate Chris loves Dota, he eats, sleeps and  Dota... my friend Chris also has a very serious psychosis and Dota is the cuase, he tortures himself for hours and hours playing sinking his life into the game, he can't stop! he says he's having fun but all hed does is shout and scream... it can be something simple that sets him off such as a Russian joining the game or a Jakiro that takes farm from an ember spirit. I beg you to reconsider downloading this game, it's a heroin, a drug, and its's by no means glamorous. please, if your bored and need something to do, adopt an orphan or become an arosnist, but DO NOT play dota... it's never just one game.
Suaj;-;nice hats
Lazy-D;-;Lost my gf, severe depression, lost my friends, ruined my life... 10/10
Ragnak Cykaland's Cartographer;-;Addictive to your inner core. You can get hours in this game and still you learn as you go. Balancing updates never stop and changes are made to keep you out of boredom.
AA.Mist;-;Having played 1.400 hours of Dota 2 so far you can imagine I'm a big fan of the game and I love it, so I'm going to talk about the bad things Dota has instead of the good things.... Firstable Dota 2 is EXTREMELY hard to learn and play properly, this is a proble because many players could just leave this game after a couple of matches. Yes, there are some "Noob-friendly" heroes but I believe that learning and using properly a hero in Dota is the least difficult part of the game. Second bad thing about Dota 2 is MMR; I'm not saying that MMR(Ranked Matchmaking) is broken, doesnt work or things like those, I'm talking mostly about MMR calibration matches. I've played with some players that are actully able to play really well bur are still stuck in "MMR hell" with avg MMR of 1.5 k MMR. When you are there you are in the worst place you can be in Dota 2 because of the absurd amount of flamers, trolls and trash-talkers. Well, these are what I think to be the worst problems of this game; but I still strongly suggest to play this game because it's extremely funny and beautiful. REMEMBER: the community isn't just made of s, there is a bright side. I hope this was interesting :)
AOD_Sanguinius;-;You wanna play LoL? You better think twice and get your  over here.
ATM ROCCO;-;this game is best!
takikardio;-;Get ready to get addicted.
Nah_T;-;Dota 2 is the first MOBA game I've ever played, and it is AMAZING. I have a lot of games that I like to play, but Dota 2 tops the charts. It is an easy to learn hard to master type of game. Just the type I like. Most FTP games I know have ingame purchases that are practically crucial to progress through the game. That's not the case here. Dota 2 has ingame purchases but they're not absolutely needed to play, they're just for fun. One of my favorite parts of the game is that there is no end. Dota 2 isn't you made it past level 2, now go to level 3. You progress through the game by understanding and knowledge. Another huge plus is that it gives so many practice opportunities. From the training mode helping you learn mechanics of the game like last hits, to letting you practice your favorite heroes in bot matches. Lastly, the heroes themselves. All of them have their own twist one the game, and their own backgrounds. They have names that stick like Outworld Devourer and Razor. If they were just called mage or brute, it would sound like it would just be another spell-casting, strategic war game. But this is no war game, this is DOTA 2.
Your Gay Bae 2k15;-;It's nice but you'll get mad a lot
FizzleWhizzle;-;I strongly recommend you try out a character (Hero) in an offline bot match before using that character in an online match. Winning matches requires teamwork, and a majority of the players get pretty frustrated if you're not contributing enough.
@builder_247;-;Buy some hats.
@AntonSur;-;Even though map is always the same. Doesn't easily get boring. Best game i've ever played! Good work Valve and IceFrog! ;)
Yoichi Hiruma;-;This game is very interesting and good. This game will test your knowledge about war.
Felix;-;Excellent game very challenging especially when your teammates do not get along other then that well done.
Rellick;-;great game
SoeLay Playing;-;this game is so much fun. I spend most of my time with dota 2.
HiNoob;-;Good Game !! u Should try it!
MasterOfCard;-;i like this game , because this game so make me fun :)
143;-;It's beautiful and good game, I recomended this game your :)
[Fungilord];-;Play dota they said. It would be fun, they said. They were right.
CAPT. B;-;Its so Beautfiul :D
mad2beher3;-;sounds good
Gie-Sama;-;Simply because this is DOTO !!
LOL is best;-;So addictive!
Fredda;-;This game taught me about the diversity of cultures that our small little corner of the universe offers. Then it taught me to hate them all.
Chrome;-;Side effects include: -Hatred of other humans -Lack of trust in others -Carpal Tunnel -Improved hand eye coordination -A large ego -Weight gain -Weight loss -Confidence -Despression -Extreme Racism -EXTREME RACISM -Increased strategic thinking capabilities -Mushy-brain syndrome -Subconsciously learning a new language -Subconsciously learning to hate the culture of said language -Literally every ailment that is not a transmitable disease 9/10 Doctors accepted this game on their recommendation list, but the tenth was afk
Grizzt;-;It's like roulette; fun until it turns into Russian.
psych0tic;-;Causes anxiety problems, low self esteem, Tourette's syndrome, mood swings, Bipolar disorder, breakdown of relationships, raging erections, racism. Would definitely recommend.
Sentimental Oriental;-;In Dota 2, Not many people speak your language. Not many people play well. Not many people talk nicely. Not many people work as a team. But if you find people that do... You'll have the most fun you've ever had.
Kyubashi;-;And you thought real life was a struggle.
ephir;-;I only played a little but it was fun.
Captain Obvious;-;Things I gave to DotA: 1. Money 2. Time 3. Love Things DotA gave me: 1. Arthritis 2. Carpal tunnel syndrome 3, Hatred of Russians, Mexicans, Spanish, Finnish, and Russians 4. Broken keyboard 5. Broken mouse 6. 9/10 ready 7. Server crashes 8. 4 stacks of Russians in EUW servers on English prefrence settings 9. Ranked matches 10. Free to play but Pay to win games (I.E. - Foreseer's contract, New Bloom 2015) 11. "It's in the bag" spam (especially Skywrath) 12. Multilingual cursing - I guess this is a good thing? 13. Split second math - Reliable/Unreliable gold and gold loss on death vs. Buyback availability - This is good too Essentially - DotA is a greedy woman, but I love her all the same. 11 / 10 would play again
HekaDooM;-;"THE PUB SUPPORT" "Where are wards?" The pub Carry demanded. "I placed them and they were countered" the Support began, "I am trying to juggle giving you complete lane farm, protecting you and harrassing the enemy while saving to buy more, also possibly sentries to remove their-" "UP COUR PLS" the mid hero politely added. "Give Savle" The Carry demanded. "Certainly." replies the support, using the salve on the Carry who subsequently ran headlong into an enemy creepwave. "So where is mek?" the Carry said, after he was ganked due to overextending. The Support died saving him and was treated to a rather enthusiastic series of map pings on his corpse. "Again, having not even enough to buy boots as well as wards, I don't think a 7 minute Mek is viable." The Support replies. "Haha look your level, so low, noob" the Carry retorted. "U have no item xaxa". "Well, jungle gold and experience through stacking and pulling with blocked camps is nowhere near as much as on lane which I attempted to give you, the carry, the priority over." The Carry is subsequently ganked again at the enemy tower, oblivious to the enemy tp that the Support moved away from. "Report Support, usless" The carry cried in allchat, in between mentioning various aspects of the Support's Mother's anatomy. "Instead of reporting and acting like that, why don't you try supporting for randoms sometime instead of instapicking a carry?" the Support asked, as he watched the Carry return to afk-lasthitting lane creeps. "HAH, support is for noskill noobs like you!"
flanadlivv;-;One day, a wise man intoduce me into this game. "it shall protect your virginity, my lad" he said.
Troller but not LoL-er;-;So many hours passed, still a noob. 10/10
babeede;-;Dota is like a basketball which it is not just a game but a teamwork game where you have to plan a strategy to win just like basketball...
DarkPrince258;-;Best game every and to think it all startet for warchraft 3 maps
Le I-RoX;-;I like this Dota 2 game
ICE;-;great game for relaxation and enjoyment
Robocop Gay;-;Once i heard about something called "social life" while playing Dota, i still don't know what that is. 10/10
kek_Riggone;-;schnaedur kille mi 103 tiems on a privat server it was fun
Lvl 100 Magikarp;-;Frustrating to learn, dont solo queue but after you get the basics and learn more heroes it becomes very enjoyable. Then when you are decent and understand a bit more about the game and heroes you start to don't solo queue rage. All in all it is a great game to help you become racist to russians and hispanic people. DON'T SOLO QUEUE
AnonymouS;-;A Game Where I Can Also Make Good Money :D And Now This Game Gives Me A Good Business In Real Time :3
Tarnefar;-;Once you get past all of the whining from other players its still a fun game with team strategy as the critical piece.
PsychoMetric;-;i want that this game has daily mission that has daily rewards i liked it because of its graphics and animation
MegaLMegoL..Clit's;-;a like this game...so favorite game
New'Epic;-;why always crash in macbook air? need solution
janjan;-;Awesome-sauce game is awesome. It's one of those games that even though you suck at it, you still come back for more. xD PYRION FLAX IS AWESOME!
UTENLAMY;-;This is a nice game.
CN.Ikhsan;-;its not how good you play .. its how good your teamwork !! You play good + Team very noob = lose You play noob + Team play good = lose You play good + Team play good =win/lose depend on the other team strategy ! So , if you wanna win this game you need play smart,fast and support other player on your team :)
Deviljin;-;ya it sucks...bt its good
gamewizzardd;-;Great game. I'm addicted to it!
DonPrimo;-;The best world war 3 between Radiant and Dire. Need Individual and cooperative skill to win the war. and help us to learn English(not common language) in not proper way .
kessler;-;love playing this game and enjoy each moment when i play but with friends the most though when you be playing solo is kinda slacking with team work issues
Hammy;-;Dota 2 is the spiritual successor to the Warcraft III: The Frozen Throne custom game "Defense of the Ancients: Allstars," in which the player controls a single hero unit in a battle to level up, collect loot, and destroy the enemy's structures, all within a typical 30-45-minute experience. Games can be longer or shorter, but typically fall within that window. As the metagame has changed due to content update patches, games have grown shorter over the years, but in the past, Dota was likened to "World of Warcraft in an hour." It is an accurate analogy, as the player experiences many traditional RPG elements while competing head-to-head against other players. Dota 2 is an incredibly complex, strategy-driven, competitive game. With over 100 individual, unique heroes from which to choose, as well as a variety of different game modes to mix up the drafting process, each game is an experience unto itself. No two games will ever be identical. The one thing standing in the way of most players new to the genre of MOBAs is the unforgiving nature of the game. For better or worse, each mistake a player makes can be critical in the final outcome of the game, especially as the clock ticks on. In a couple of seconds, the entire tide of the game could swing heavily from one team to the other's if even one costly mistake is made. As a result of this, many players have developed a rather distasteful attitude toward others when mistakes are made. A word that is often thrown around is "toxic," which isn't inaccurate; the toxicity of the community can be a terrible deterrent to new players, and can actively inhibit growth of the game. Thankfully, Valve have implemented ways in which to curb these behaviors through punishments dished out to players with nasty attitudes. Each player is given a number of "reports" per week, which can be issued against other players who have exhibited poor form, rudeness, excessive communication spam, or other infractions, and as a player accrues reports, he or she may face a communication mute or a number of games in the "low priority" queue, which is sort of like rehabilitation back into society. While I have spent a lot of time talking about the negative aspects of the game, I want to stress that I have been playing Dota since 2004, and I don't see a stopping point in sight even yet. I am consistently captivated by the dynamic and interesting nature of the game, of each individual game, to offer me a unique, fun, and rewarding trade-off for my time commitment. There are few feelings in gaming as satisfying and enjoyable as coming away from a game with a hard-fought win against other players with good attitudes. It makes the bad stuff seem trivial by comparison. In addition to the actual gameplay elements explored in this review, Dota 2 is part of the greater Steam Trading community, a collective of games featuring in-game economies and persistent item storage for players through the Steam platform. Even if you don't particularly like the game itself, item trading from player-to-player can be tremendously rewarding and fun, and if you're lucky, you could find yourself with an item worth up to many thousands of dollars. Of course, with any relatively free market, there will be unsavory and dishonest individuals out there who will not blink an eye before attempting to scam you, rip you off, or otherwise take advantage of you. Thankfully, there are plenty of resources available to new traders, so do your research! In fact, if you need help, don't be afraid to add me directly and fire away. I'm always happy to help. In conclusion, Dota and Dota 2 are without a doubt the games on which I have spent the most time playing. Each new game brings me a new, exciting experience, and as long as you remind yourself to maintain a positive attitude and resist the urge to treat your fellow player with disrespect, you will agree that it is among the best multiplayer experiences available anywhere. Learn it, love it, and play on!
Roronoa Zoro;-;my favourite game
Solo Player;-;Bring it on !
nilDs;-;Nice game
Jibby Jobless;-;the best of the best
[Shady] MLGesus;-;A great game to kill time
ThugLie;-;This Game very good :)
@Depii-;-;i like this game because this game teach you how to play teammate, with awesome your strategy to beat the enemy. and this game can be as earn money $_$
CRISNOVAC;-;i will recommend this vedeo for some tips on how to support...^^ but im still studying how support player do
ImDasman;-;Great game, it's league of legends but a little harder.
ManYAKAN NA.....................;-;i love this game ,cause i forgot my real game n life . why i like this game? if i had something problem and hard to fix . i just play dota 2 to refresh my anger....... hey guys u should play dota 2 its fun , nice and u can forget ur problem awhile .... but guys if u play this "dota 2' be sure that ur schooling is stable @80% grade hehheheh.... because DOTA is like DRugs to me
MrAtzca;-;boring just boring recommend Alt+F4
KI;-;very nice game
><SushiFish'>;-;A great way to meet people and have fun with your friends. Dota is an all round epic
Sorry Noob Here!;-;this game rocks!
Recurrence;-;Best game. nothing more, nothing less.
Reggie;-;11/10 Best russia simulator out there would defenitley recomend it. Also totally broken q system makes it so much fun to q in to theese russians <3
Yuka;-;best ARTS i've ever played compared to other on the same genre allthough not all of the heroes from DotA are fully ported yet.
Keisha Grey;-;i like this game it is fun to play
Eubie,Wayne,Twinkle,Kip,andFran;-;Pls Release pitlord pls ASAP I need to RAT
:C;-;They keep telling me to unistall Dota 2 I dont undestand how they all want me too
Zero Gravity;-;Very Addictive and Wonderful Game
Odin;-;this game is awesome
TWERKINGYOURFACE;-;Play for you or play for team .
qwerty;-;This Game is the Best Game i ever Played... COntinue to inspire as @Valve...! :)
Kappa;-;This game is lagging me so bad :[ cuz i have low computer.. i wish they could add settings which i can lower the quality .. etc. That can make my game smooth.. PLEASE VOLVO :C IM A DOTA player since 5 yrs old.. im only 13 so i can't afford to buy gaming equipments Q.Q please read this . A true fan, Nathaniel R. Escarez
tis CYKA is dangerous;-;Gonna ruin your life, warning dont start unless you wanna lose yourself. You will never see sunlight again.
Kei;-;very competitive
T.G.O.D;-;THIS GAME IS VERY NICE AND COOL GAME :) THANKS VALVE :D
G24;-;I LOVE this game! SO ADDICTIVE!! :)
Arek Suroboyo;-;Good graphics, but need to rework on lower spec computer.
Standin.XGein;-;Welcome in 68.2C with much Throw game yuhuu..
Ghythybhy;-;Its DOTA 2 :>
[GS] Maven;-;Game is Amazing!!!
deadbeat;-;I recommend this game over League of Legends (take it personally if so) and i want to say nice job on the game.
Ulthran;-;What year is it? 10/10
mamot bazeng;-;Nice Graphic and Cool Gameplay
DreaM;-;Well I've Played This Game For A Long Time,Not Like 1000 or 2000 hours.But I Have Got Few Things To Explain.THe First Time I Played Dota,I Had No Idea WTF I Was Doing.Then I Saw Some Videos On YouTube.I Learned,Studied The Mechanics.The First Time My Hands Were Not So Fast To Pwn Someone So Fast.The People On SEA Servers And Russian Servers Started To Call Me Noob And **** They Started Abusin Me For Dying Many Times. I Explained Them That I was New To This Game. I 'd Apologized To Them Many Times . I Was Criticised By Them.I Felt Low.But I Didn't Lose Hope.the First 50 Hours I practiced With Bots. Watched Gameplays By Dota Masters Liked S4 ,kky,Loda And Many Others.Then I Played Against Real Humans All Over The Globe. Felt Good AfterI Went On Killing Sprees And Rampages. Dota Gave Me Hope. Fun. Inspiration. 10/10
YUI CHAN (<3 Low Prio);-;ITs Very Good You must play it!
k[A]r3n;-;best game in the world
Jeff;-;this games totalllllyyyy awesome :D :D :D brofist
Nirvana.ph;-;The best game that i played! Keep it up guys :)
Nixxo;-;10/10 would bang
u;-;What is more to say? DOTA2 is real Kappa~!
ShockOfTheAnviL;-;Dota 2 game my best
TeamD.Bestiality;-;Addictive, fun, competative, what more can you ask for a MOBA game? Would recommend.
C-LOSNYC;-;Good god this game is ing addictive.
Saltysally1;-;games  but addictive, install at your own risk.
HATT;-;I can't lie Dota 2 is pretty fun when your team mates are so good that they lose the game for you pretty fun tbh, also if you play a carry and lose your team yells at you because you didn't carry hard enough even though they fed and lost you the game but you get blamed for not farming enough even if you're doing amazing. So overall great game 10/10 so much fun.
Skykisser;-;The "watch game" option is great. For instance, while waiting for the game matching, you can watch the games playing by your friends or other profesional players. The most challenging point in DOTA 2 is to remember all of the hero skills and items. this is really a nightmare to the beginners.
PerfectPencil;-;Dota2 is a fantastic game. It has a brutal learning curve and a nearly unreachable skill ceiling, but offers endless variety replay value unheard of before it. You could play this game and this game alone for the next few years and not feel like you wasted your time. Games are short and there is no grind. Skill and teamwork are the core of the game and the inclusion of cosmetic items gives you something to collect over time. If you want away from dota for a month, you can come back and not feel "left behind" by all your friends. That's critical for a multiplayer game. Worth trying. Its free so get downloading.
akachin;-;great game
Mercurial;-;Very Good Game :))
Vidd;-;Absolutely the best choice for those who loves MOBA games (Multiplayer Online Battle Arena).
Capn' Ancotar;-;Good game but servers full with russian nobbs
Mr Pie;-;Zeus is the only true god.
kinz;-;i love these game if steam will give me gift!!!
`Akame [];-;best strategic game
Killrockstar;-;It's like LoL but GOOD!
Akashi;-;This Game i very addictive and need skills to master
Shamsiel;-;This game is the first game that I'm still addicted since I was a kid until today. It makes me who I am :) BEST GAME I EVER PLAYED REALLY RECOMMEND IT TO EVERYONE!!! \m/
Faust_Mateo *PS4 - faust_mateo;-;( out of 10 dogs prefer pooping in a hat to be eatne' by a bear.
road back to 4k;-;its alright
DOPE <3;-;Dota 2 has been out in the wild for a while now, and this has given players ample time to reflect on the game and its virtues.
Atis;-;BEST MOBA game, I have EVER played... 10/10
Mag Gaming | Kaptaan Amrica xD |;-;Addicted to this awesome Game!!
R~~L;-;I like this game :D
MIDTS is Missing!;-;DotA is one of my favourite game, I played it since I form 1. Now Valve has made DotA 2, the game is the same with DotA 1. But the interface is so different, I get to used it now. Great community and instant update from Valve. I would recommend this game to everyone. You'll be statisfied.
-|UB|-LavaGhost;-;BEST GAME EVER 666/10 DO NOT ARGUE!!!
Kugutt12[NOR];-;This is a good game, i like a lot
MBiC_ice_trol_octopussy;-;Worst game ever...I buy 2 hand of midases for both my hands and everyone calls me a noob,stupid team ... (gr8 game m9)
ilonenn;-;Learning Russian in Fun and Intuitive way!
Andrea;-;Hello guys <3 I really like this game!
K N ][ F E;-;The game can be played at any skill level but the beauty is that at higher levels there is so much depth that no two games are ever alike. The only issue is that it is difficult to improve without having someone (friendly) better than you who will actively call out your mistakes; in Dota 2, ignorance is not bliss.
DILDO LORD;-;love this game just play it now dude!!
Sins of Mazaltje;-;This game will frustrate you at first. Then once you get your first ultra kill, you will forget you have other games.
-yulnae(34);-;It's ruining my life .. not even my life , my future , my girlfreind and etc . GLHF
pesal228;-;nice game and its all about math...thumbs up..
a8monster;-;Great Game!
Snt V  D  L;-;i play DoTA 1.. Then DoTa 2 incoming.. I like this ghrafic but when i saw Anti-Mage hero,, he like idiot people xD Steam do u know Teror Blade & Anti-Mage is 2 brother?
Etruis;-;Dota 2 is an exeedingly deep and complicated game, you must delve deep into the lore and truly become the hero you are playing. Only then will you be ready to defeat the magic lord.
Meow rule the world!;-;Very Good Game
potzxc!!!;-;this. best. game. EVER.
ogsie;-;how can i activate my background here on steam
<DE@D_HE@RT>;-;Its a awesome game
AbusingMyRights;-;Dota 2 has it's origins in early warcraft custom games. The style popularized by "eul"(dota1) later was handed off to "guinsoo"(dota1 2.0)*euls scepter of divinity was needed to make guinsoos scythe of vyse in earlier versions*, which was then taken into its final chapter by "icefrog"(dota allstars)*guinsoo started allstars originally but the bulk of the allstars era was under "icefrog" Dota 1 was by far the best game ever made in my opinion due to the tight knit cult community, the constant state of balance and update(sometimes 3-4 times daily if something was wrong they would fix it right away), not funded so no money grab aspect just all was focused on a quality game with quality people playing. Having the forum voting system actually gave the players and community a chance to decide together how the game would evolve. Dota 2 since being taken over by valve has done a nice job to keep some of the great gameplay aspects. That being said, the invite only phase was the closest you would get to that dota 1 experience. The community has been flooded with the free to play craze giving them a market to exploit. This has caused the content, the gameplay, and the general enjoyment to be watered down from it's vastly superior original. It has a chance to be fixed the servers need to be improved and keep people that speak the same language and a similar skill level matched up. It currently is a mess and you almost have to get lucky to have an enjoyable game. I still give it a yes for the chills I get when I hear the lina announcer say "Hawt Stuff" and "raaaampage", also the nostalgia feels of the good days when games were developed to be art and quality and complete without the thought of how to make money.
King Kobra The Impaler;-;a game which i so strategic and fun... learn bout teamwork here
Cartman The Grey;-;This is a game where you can spend over 200 hours of gameplay (like myself) and still be little to no good. But! the addiction and the learning curve makes DOTA 2 by far my favorite game on my pc. The huge array of different characters with different skills, talents and attributes make the game diverse. While the voice acting and graphics make the game a marvel both technically and graphically. I cannot recommend this game highly enough. I would suggest anyone to download it and begin your addiction. Trust me its brilliant!
Jhans Nguyen;-;i play only dota 2
RammsteiN;-;Nice game
DoomNations;-;DOTA. DOTA. DOTA FOREVER :) Great, Texture quality, rigged model to perfections, particles at its finest :D Gameplay? of course, all Dota players should know.
[SWORD]--|;-;very nice game
Mr.Clvr;-;not bad if you want to kill your bad time
RakShA the caRRy grl;-;good game for time pass but i cant play because it is tough
<u>$;-;Love This Game So Much
Hosokawa Kenji;-;is an upgrade from the first series .. improvement in terms of graphics, features and performance. 8.5 / 10
[Do]Frostbite;-;nice rts game,it requires good tteamwork and strategy in order to win the match
Dr. Scientist;-;Awesome!!!!! 99/10 would play...
MasterPiece;-;DIRE TIDE 2014 if u dont do this ice frog i realy leave this game *********************************************************************************************************
Akemi;-;From an avid League player, it's a bit hard to get into and understand at first. But once you get your main role going and start to learn the hero's you can play it can get pretty fun. Until you meet Viper... /rage about one of his passives is a slow every auto attack Compared to League it has a lot less skill shots and more lock on's. However there is still a lot of skill to be had at this game, not runes or masteries, denying, and losing some gold upon death. Just make sure you don't spam your spells. Your mana pool is very low and mana regen is little to nothing early game. A very different game with not a lot to compare to, but they're both equally fun in their own way.
N-Joy;-;my favourite game
Six6;-;a very good way to spend extra time to relax
ice ice ice;-;please fix it,,, its hard to loggin with another computer,, why that?
.Sensei;-;Just Play It!
<font face="impact"><U>ZCatSIX;-;the ABLITY DRAFT mode is sucks ! why must pick with a LINE??
Pedololicon;-;You won't enjoy this game. Ever.
Godsend;-;Looking to cut yourself off from the real world? Life getting too boring for you? Or are you just simply finding for a way to throw your dull life away? Look no further, this game is the game for you. This game promises you hours of fun on end. You fight in a team to claim victory over the enemy team's Ancient, hence the title "Defence of the Ancients". Some heroes are easily grasped, making it easy for beginners to learn the basics. Once you start getting the hang of things and master the basics, there are a hundred other heroes to learn and master. Personally, this game has ruined my life. With about 400 hours of gameplay, my grades have dropped, I have no time to hang out with friends anymore, my family hates me because I'm always in my room, you name it, I'm probably there right now. But I've never been happier in my life. Girlfriend? Sorry, I don't know what that is.
3A93;-;if u have not played DOTA2 then u have played nothing till now :D
tAruMaEda;-;its awesome.,!!! .,it is my favorite game in online
{M]iroko_#!13!Boo];-;i like dota 2 make me smile deafet or victory win or lose its ok for me but i hate the trush talk that my disliked trush talk
Loading...;-;this game is ing awesome!
haze1994;-;easily the best MOBA out there
black :p;-;You start playing this game you will never regret
POPYGAI4K;-;MOBA . League of Legends    .  : 10/10
GR.Hokage;-;The Best in Strategy and and Team Gameplay
Ember;-;This game is awesome!!!
KoN;-;You just have to pick an op champ to win actually, and devs doesn't care.
Shiva's Guard;-;Good Game Well Player
Zakk002;-;538 hours in and counting. And i'm still . Brb more Dota. 10/10 would ruin life again.
Ratchet, the Doge of Foxes;-;Greatest game I have ever played. It helps build teamwork and cooperation while at the same time playing with friends or random people you have never seen or heard of. You get lag spikes every now and then and the common trolls and new players.
iWag;-;Highly recommend playing it!
lu;-;The most frustrating game of all time. This game will give you the feeling success, failure and regret. While at the same time, it will fuel the furious need to take another game, in hope that the teammates that you will play with, will have a higher intelligence quotient than the average programmed bots. In all, you will end up with doubt, begin to play as bad as the newbeginners, and end up in matchmaking unfairness. I recommend this game highly, if you have BDSM fetish or if you would like to play a multiplayer game in order to experience in-game injustice. And remember, no matter how bad a game was, always write a "gg wp", because it is really that great.
BLACK;-;I've been playing dota for 7 years!! I really love this game .. I will marry dota someday lol
TerrAkhi;-;sexy as it is
ParalyzedHorse;-;Great game. A lot of fun. Requires LOTS AND LOTS of patience and thick skin to deal with internet -hats. But if you have both and can preform a slight amount of team play, you'll love it.
Puppet;-;this is great!!
Jakalanche;-;I hate this game more than I hate my life. 10/10. GGWP Valve.
21;-;What you THINK you do in Dota 2: - Meet friendly people - Learn new heroes - Have fun What you ACTUALLY do in Dota 2: - Get screamed at - Sworn at - Play with the only hero you are confident and comfortable with - People saying " UNINSTALL YOU ING RUSSIAN " - Or "AHAHAHA PUTANGINA" (God damned Pinoys) - Feed in the game - NOT have fun - Learn a new hero and SUCK at it - Pick up a dagon to get kills for self-confidence and trashtalking - Denying the Aegis when your team has the lead - Last but not least, learn new languages 10/10
TSA.(Kiri).AoS;-;I had always been a supporter of dota ever since dota 5.84c was launched on blizzard. The best game ever.
* nny *;-;that's so great! i like it
Miss7th;-;Good game. Nice Game.
Dont<font face="snap ITC">Die;-;i like everything in this game but there is something in Dota2Lounge i dont like its the rep thing some of those who have high rep can easily -rep those people they dislike
T E C H N O _ M A N;-;This game is AWESOME!!!
mr2mark;-;About 90% of games have people not playing their roles, 80% have disconnections/leavers and about 50% have feeders or otherwise deliberate game sabotagers. This leaves 1% of all games actually being enjoyed as they should be. Most of the game is rote learning of the map, heros, items and recipes and tactics. Communication and timing are key with almost no strategy involved. Pubs rarely have any communication if they even speak your language. Lots of bugs, devs rather add emoticons than fix basic gameplay issues.
Slex;-;Play this game. ! :D This is awesome!
Kougan;-;it will be really addicitive if u don't control ur self.
MK| Evultoad;-;Free to play, what you got to loose? try it out!
[MNI] Snoop Doge <(^-^)>;-;great game. all should play it
BiskutKeringCapPingPong;-;It a bestest game ever. But you need to spend your time to complete understand the way you should buy the item for every heroes
Blecetan;-;Very good game, i like this game because you have to think over and over to win the game
Microsoft Powerpoint;-;i got to "communicate" with people around the globe FB/10
Indexx;-;The best game ever!!!!!!!!
\R;-;The most played and enjoyable MOBA of all times! Dota 2 is one of the games that i like the most in my life, and i recommend it to everyone that likes the MOBA style game. People always try to copy Dota, and create a "better" MOBA, but the true players recognize that there's only one good MOBA: Dota2.
S;-;Dont play this game VERY ADDICTIVE!!!
ABsolute prEDator;-;The best game in the world
iSt!an;-;I love thid Game :D
DarkrXShadow;-;It is a good game,but it is way too hard to level up
Naz;-;I have spent 1000 hours playing with a team of friends screaming and yelling and raging and raving about innumerable plays and moments that words fail to describe. This is not an easy game. When you try it you will run head first into a brick wall of knowledge. It will be a brutal task to learn to play the 100+ heroes, familiarize yourself with the items, and understand how everything interacts. You will need patience, determination, and the humility to admit your own mistakes and seek out greater knowledge in order to triumph. But there are no games deeper or more rewarding than this. And it's free. Have at it.
Pentagonal;-;Very nice game The best MOBA game i ever played Good animation, character, and skill nice grapich and good gameplay Sorry for my bad english
ShittyWizard;-;When I was a mir boy i lost my life, to this "game" that i now can my life. Save yourself. Dont spen 900 hours+ on this game. 11/10
Blu fox;-;Great game for competitive online gamers.My favourite game by a long shot but the community isnt to nice to newcomers.Overall this is one of the best online pvp games you can find and without a doubt the best MOBA out there.It is an experience not to be missed.
First Skill Tower;-;I really Loved this game
First Skill Tower;-;I really Loved this game
adityadk;-;why my all item gone,pls read this i dont know ,its scam pls back my item pls i have 3 arcana and to many item is expensive pls report read this dota
Gottie;-;Just because you played League doesn't mean you're gonna grasp this game with ease. Get ready to suck....badly.
[A]los;-;Do you have too much time on your hands? Do you want to rage? Well then Dota2 is for you! Not only does it waste your life and possibly make you flunk school, you get to learn russian and meet Pinoys! Enter the fascinating world off chasing donkeys, meeting brainless Russians who say  blyat and kappa all day long. Oh, I forgot the brazillians, they are pretty  too. So enter the world of dota2 and sell your life today!
S a y a;-;Gift 1 set featured a hero for the level up
Glenn;-;The Best of the Bests
Laikux;-;A very good game with good graphics. It is also very tactical and fun. I enjoy playing this game and I would recommend it to any gamer in the world.
S@yMyN@M3;-;one of the best GAMES ever Played !!!!
EA . pocket;-;yes, its awesome
Patrik;-;Good community
KAK TVOJA MAMA?;-;cool
K4REZK4;-;Me:Hey team im support. Teammate:Shut ye  up noob. Kiss my . Another teammate:bobo 11/10 Very friendly community
beast.mode;-;ultra epic... .XD volvo is the best
slightly useful;-;I AM SO BAD AT THIS GAME.
Diabolus;-;Best DotA since DotA 1
McFlail;-;never have I formed such violent/racist opinions toward foreigners. 10/10
Clitosaurus;-;if you wanna meet hot single babes from kazikstan you should play this game.
EnragedGorilla CSGOFAST.COM;-;Ive learned how much i hate other nationalitys from this game, it is amazing.
Gadnq3a;-;If you want to learn russian fast and easy this is your game!
Ke/\/T;-;The game is free to play. It is similar to Dota 1 but have better graphics and it enables you to customize you heroes, wards, courriers and other items. You need teamwork and cooperation in order to win the game.This is a great game and it is a must to have it.
Rafaxlive;-;The best MoBA game i have ever played, i highly recommend this game for everyone who like to play in a good comunity .
Froxxy~;-;My wife bought me this game, so I wouldn't cheat on her. It worked.
R;-;This is one of the game that I will always have on my pc. I like to play it whenever I have time. Very cool game.
Bad News;-;sucks
WOWIE ZOWIE;-;Leagues is better
-=SBL=-WACO;-;ADICTIVE, each matchup is unique , this never gets old !
Moonplate;-;Ruins your life in 1 game flat. I was very impressed by how quickly it made me lose all faith in humanity and make me wish that some people would take a nine foot  up the anal cavity. 8/8 Would recommend to people of all ages, fun for the whole family.
Kragen;-;A very good game
Ketty<3 Calii;-;I Love This Game
Andrigaar;-;Do you need an excuse to hate your friends and they're too nice of people to come up with a good reason on their own? Dota2 is the answer. Within minutes of trying to learn how to play you will fail horribly., have no idea what's going on, and your friends will turn from the transcended Ghandis they are into racial slur spewing, homophobic rage cases smashing their mice on tables. Thanks, Dota 2 for being this and the most addicitive bad game I have ever had the displeasure of collapsing arteries for just to get a fix. Install Defense of the Ancients today--and hate your "friends" tomorrow. PS: If you have no friends, then you'll still find the above anyway. Mute them fast.
Baja Blastoise;-;The learning curve for this game is brutal, and the community is full of egotistical twerps. Despite this Dota 2 is a rewarding game.
Pig honey;-;Be wary of raging internet trolls.
Kutumuskaturt;-;The more I play DOTA2 the more I like this game, I used to play LoL so switching to dota2 is being a challenge, more difficult, everything is new... completely newb here, but enjoying the game thanks to the friendly/helpful community who don't rage if you fail, they come to help and always give you an advice to get better and better. /10 would recommend
Cadis Etrama Di Raizel;-;if you want a reason to get angry.
Beaver Knight;-;This game is amazing
The King of Clowns;-;They say it's not about winning. Their right. And hopefully others know this too so what your getting into is fun. It's not as much of a social game as it is an arena figther. But should be more social. + Easy to pick up + Microtransactions are legit and wont destroy your wallet + Strategy develops with slow learning curve + Flying donkeys - Disconnections in 'early-level-gamers' makes games redundant sometimes - That's all I can think of. Didn't fully get into the game, but I;ve seen enough. And heard enough. And read up on it enough to safely say as a free game, it's just as addictive as Counter Strike (Also by Valve), and it is easy to pick up and play when your low. It might turn into crack. But there's a focus group for that.
SuckeRPuncH;-;Cool Game
SrGabs;-;Tons of teamplay and fun, if you survive a community with the majority of jerks and hatters. Wellcome to DotA 2.
I N C O G -;-;This game is just awesome.
Lucky;-;The best
Makhluk Astral;-;dota2 is a good game, nice hero character and many more. wkwkwk...
Je suis mont;-;Game is so intense my anoose puckered up. 10/10 ARE YOU READY TO SACRIFICE YOUR VIRGINITY?
The_Count;-;Aside from random hating and the odd slap  it's not too shabby. "no you..."
Smiles and Tears;-;I was playing on the US east coast servers and got an entire team of Brazillian players. They wouldn't let me go mid. 10/10.
Koi;-;One Of the best move ever :D
GG MHARKY BOY;-;this is good
zhukhuLit;-;making money out of it
<u> <b> WataruChan </u> </b>;-;well player
Lemaxdemolished;-;Good game Well Played!! I'm enjoy with it!
Drudnik;-;TOTALLY FUN!!! WARNING: NOT SUITABLE FOR CHILDREN
D-RX;-;This is the best strategy games
LetMePlay;-;This game improved so much since it was released on the beta. There are over 90 heroes to choose from currently and the gamplay is as intence and as rewarding as DOTA 1. I know alot of people will be hesitant to try it at first but there has been a new tutorial system implemented in DOTA 2 and I think it will help new comers. I know some people who play LOL might bash in this game, but both games are compleatly different. Its like comparing COD and Battlefield, they are so different that connot be compared. (no preference on either game, I think bot of them are good) Give this game a try, the learning curve is very steep but it is rewarding when you learn. I think this is the best gave valve has ever developed and has been the most played game on steam ever since the second year of beta development. Try it out, its free and badass!
Chrisnovkaya;-;Great game!
Mr.Lucifer | Throw Hard;-;Dota is the best of the best XD
Renbot;-;this game made me through my highschool and college years
Mr.D;-;challenging and exciting game!
Loading...;-;Very good rpg game, lots of fun for hours on end
Juon@@;-;Bessssst game ever! worth playing! XD
12 LOSing STREAK;-;So amazing, best MOBA game :)
12 LOSing STREAK;-;So amazing, best MOBA game :)
KAZ;-;It's like DotA with better graphics.
Cyco;-;Dota 2 is one of the biggest moba on market, so when it comes to a big player it has some pros and cons. First of all i've played many "Free to play" games but this one must say is a real FREE TO PLAY. In many others games u can spend some real cash on boosters which are giving u advantage on the battlefield but in Dota you "wasting" all your money only on a hero's appearance. Of course u can buy a boost here which will give u more experience from the match BUT THIS ONLY INCREASES your cosmetic items loot. Also forgot to mention that every item from the shop can be looted via match rewards. Second of all Dota 2 was my first moba type game, i was never interested in mobas, never played mobas until i decided to try dota when it was in beta. Even in beta game was "newbie-friendly". First i've played matches vs bots (all diff) then moved to matches vs bots in coop with other players. And then i was ready for the BIG ONE. Later Valve added a nice tutorial for new players to moba games. But anyway most of new people dont care about this, i've checked this on playin on new steam account which queded me with low level of dota 2 (not low level of skill) players and i've met some pretty interesting people right there like carry wisp etc. FInally i must get to the biggest con of Dota 2. For me European player the biggest CON of dota 2 are russians (no im not a racist). Ok to get things smooth i not saying Russia country is all made of bunch of morons but this game really makes me think like this. Russians are the biggest and worst plague of DOTA 2 community. In my all match history which i've played something around 2.5k matches russians were active in like 75% of this number. In 1% of this matches i have met russians who can speak english and can even teamplay the rest of them are non speaking english, selfish players who will always play solo and when you gonna lost game then "its raining ". Dota 2 forum is filled with posts that russians are crashin this game but Valve dont even bother to do something with this. Ending i must say Dota 2 is a solid, newbie-friendly game with some comunnity problems. I absolutely commend this game to all moba fans and not only them.
Floy;-;Great game! 10/10
Phineas Bot;-;i like the whole game itself (dota 2) because we all know that we started as noobs on dota 1. here, we can practice and learn much faster than the previous game. the game will guide you throughout it's contents. but the only problem in this game is that there are thousands of players from around the world that do not know how to respect other people.
MrZumba;-;Best game I ever played! You always find something new and learn every game!! Over 1k hrs and still a noob ^^ "KOTL GEEV MANA!!" 10/10
alwayswannafap;-;i like the gameplay 4ever
Hope Elizabeth;-;Very fun to play.
DeadPool - Please Kill Me;-;that is good game
mERcuR!@l;-;Just loving it...:-)
T-Bone Biggins;-;Had a friend who played this game a lot. Got along with him well for a few years. I played this for a few hours and it's a total troll-fest. Nerve-wracking how terrible the community is in this game. It is not worth the price of free. One mistake early and you lose the whole game, but it takes about an hour for that loss to happen. So during that time you are forced to play a losing game or get penalties for quitting. Anyhow, my friend played this non-stop for a few years. Turned him into a totally rude nutbar to the point that I unfriended the prick. I think the community of this game rotted him out, luckily I never met him in real life. That would be sad, to see a real life friend get degraded into an animal before you. This game is toxic, I played enough online games to see this right away. Stay away, this is a money-making machine for Valve with psychological side-effects not worth the 'free' price-tag on the game.
<^BraddayudhA^>;-;Very nice game i think.. i very like it
moon;-;stop fooling around, play this game already!
Mimiiing-rie;-;I hope that all the heroes will be soon released :)
xNawai;-;Its alright ish
MAINSTAY.Ashe;-;very very great game! this is my favorite pc game of all time
Firebat;-;Classic game. People who like MOBA's will like this. It would be good if it had a "Surrender" or "Concede button."
iCANTfindMYSELF;-;It's perfect!
TT.SingSing;-;very addictive !
Hank;-;Great game
h;-;Moba of the year
Bear Brand;-;Sir plsssss back my item from the hackers of my account... 10 Nov You traded with gnhqtcx32. 2:39pm Inscribed Heir's Glance, ''ang pako ni drow'', Grampa Sharpie's Shin Shooter, Hat of The Howling Wolf, Ahm'Hedoq the Maw, Pudgling, Glaive of the Lucent Rider, Announcer: Axe, Scorching Wings of Incantation
Bear Brand;-;Sir plsssss back my item from the hackers of my account... 10 Nov You traded with gnhqtcx32. 2:39pm Inscribed Heir's Glance, ''ang pako ni drow'', Grampa Sharpie's Shin Shooter, Hat of The Howling Wolf, Ahm'Hedoq the Maw, Pudgling, Glaive of the Lucent Rider, Announcer: Axe, Scorching Wings of Incantation
scott;-;the game my favourite
RussianSlayer;-;Really "FUN" and competitve game.Play if you want to be a racisist and/or you love russia. Here's an example: ME:Stun now!! The russian:  ME:ing russians.
Eltanin;-;If you're a gamer, you would probably have heard of the term MOBA which stands for Multiplayer Online Battle Arena and one of the games leading the way in that genre is DotA since that's where it basically all began. DotA 2 is a direct sequel to the original bringing us updated graphics and easier controls making the already difficult game a bit more accessible to newer people for the genre. This game is very much like a sport in which it requires lots of strategies and team-coordination in order to win. However, much like a sport, it requires time and patience to hone your skills in order to be good at it so if you're willing to put the effort into it, DotA 2 can be an extremely enjoyable and satisfying experience for you. Just be wary that there are a considerable number of players in the community who can be considered 'toxic' and can be very unfriendly. If you can somehow try to avoid them as much as possible (e.g. only playing with friends you know), you're going to have a blast with this game. Good luck and Have fun :)
Sadar;-;So good and exciting game, u must try it!
WhY=BudgeT;-;just like a normal player with the normal capacity in clashing
Coldplay;-;I would recommend this game for all ;)
twitch.tv/avadoto;-;I'm playing dota 2 since its f2p its amazing game,probably the best russian learning tool in the whole world is dota i used to use google translate when someone typed russian to me,but guess what?i dont need that now.
Your friend;-;Very competitive game, nice!
Casting Couch;-;If you are bored or looking for some action. Try this one
erFF;-;Ruined my life. 10/10
Gustav Magnusson;-;Epic game of all time
Inke;-;Since 2009 playing Dota 1. And Dota 2 is a must played game. <3
Lee;-;I have had a large amount of experience with various MOBA's including LoL, Smite, Dota ect and have found that Dota 2 is the best i ahve played, ballance wise, graphically and game mechanics in general, i enjoy more than other games and has unlimited replayability The main issue would be that i would highly recomend NOT playing unless you have atleast 3 or 4 other friends who would play with you, unless you have a stack of people you can talk to the game becomes unplayable because of the community
BLFL.Wolf Hound!;-;Let me make this short. :Commendable gameplay. Dota 1 was one of my favourite game to play, and this did not dissapoint. :Several items and unique heroes are very much unchanged, to the delight of old players. :This,is a F2P and requires no money what-so-ever unless you intend to buy cosmetics which is purely for the eyes and ears only Undesirable aspects of the game. As far as mechanics go,this is as balanced as it gets,so the game has no real major flaws that needs to be fixed. HOWEVER,the community is as bad as it gets. With most players flaming you for screwing up or when you are new to the game. It can get pretty harsh. Language barrier is also a thing here,with many of the people ive been paired up with speaks only russian. No teamork,this is by far the worst of all,with individuals trying to go for what they want rather than whats good for the whole team. As such,I would like you all new players to remember this: WELCOME TO DOTA,A GAME WHEREBY EVERYONE KILL-STEALS FREELY AND EVERYONE IS A NOOB.
DX;-;Who hasnt played a MOBA in their life even if just one game. Dota 2 takes that to next level with graphics and gameplay strategies and the punishment of even dying once :P. This is truly the real MOBA experience in my opinion, it has all elements needed to make you keep coming back to it and in my case I have bought soo many other games but I still just keep coming back to Dota 2 and atleast make sure to play one game per day.
wetcharcoal;-;Dota 2 is my favorite game that I have ever played. This MOBA has so many heroes to choose from but I would like to see a balance is the heroes.
DEMiWOLF;-;more drop item please
JenicaMyLove;-;a very cool game :)
Hypsipylelele;-;better than lol
Ranged Princess;-;Great game, just wish players were more understanding of inexperienced players.
i want a panda;-;Good game. item drops makes it addicting to play. gotta collect em all!
N a t z _ 31;-;GREAT GAME!
Puplip;-;You cant just only sit by seeing the others play this game. Try it and you will never doubt me. a lot improvement from the old one under WC3. 9/10 from me.
............;-;I like dota 2 because i play for fun. And i appreciate other players.
RanStoppable;-;Excellent game, only ruined by the moments when I get teamed up with newbies/throwers/leavers. Overall 9/10.
Sharknator;-;Its all about hiding in the trees HAHAHA
eustass2x3;-;easy to understand, i`ll definitley recommend it.
MassiveChalice;-;This is a game that is relatively straight-forward play, but takes a long time to master. The community is , especially if your a n00b, but if u play well with others, or just play well in general, you'll have a blast. Also, you can't be stupid and play this game well. You need a sense of cause and effect, and a sense of strategy. I would suggest playing with bots for a while, then once you've got the hang of things, public matches is a good idea.
rape;-;This game has taught me so much things that ill never forget : 1- The only good russians are always on the enemy side. 2- That the whole dota community would defend ukraine against russia. 3- That Brazilians dont only suck in football, but in DotA2 too. 4- In low priority games, your whole team is always full of hard carries. 5- That excuse in which a feeder blames "lag" is overused. 6- "Oh 2 russians in my team ? GG WP" every single time. Good game, taught me how to swear in russian !
Pixel Glitcher;-;I can't play strategy. 10 out of 10.
=RP=SumoFlorist;-;Its the "sequel" to the famous DotA, developed with Icefrog the one that got DotA its competitive charme, what more can you say? Other than maybe: "One of the best games here on Steam if you want to play with and against human players"
Mrs. M;-;Great game ever....
Standin.Angoh;-;this is nice game for pro like me
G Thirty;-;More intense than H.O.T.S, slightly more competitive than L.O.L.
"_awasbegal_";-;this is good game
MB // Frodo^;-;Best game of my life
call me senpai;-;it is the most awesome thing ever
DAERK MEWN;-;amazing game.. it will get you hooked up for sure.. its a much better improvement from dota1.
Spyderfish;-;I have spent around 1,500 hours in this game. Enough said.
<<h2$>>$#%root%#$;-;Only the best game ever!
Add me;-;I like this game men it rocks. :) i just dont know why riki has permanent invisibility on lvl 1.
Banana Guard;-;Try LoL, this game is different some how... I tried to play it, but it never really hooked me. To put it in simple terms; it was not entertaining. Tutorial is so long to complete, that's what killed the fun for me the most.
NoobfromINA;-;I like this game! Very very nice!
*wink*;-;Get called putang ina, bobo, noob and gay for killing a pinoy 10/10 would kill again
BILL CYPHER;-;Amazing game, 10/10 will ruin your life
[RD2L] Gamut;-;Crack cocaine of video games.
JoKeR!;-;After playing for more than 3.5k hours, I finally decided to write this review. Pros: Great game, Very Addictive, Fun to play with friends. Makes you better at thinking and developing strategies. Also you can learn Russian for free. Cons: Huge Learning Curve. Tends to alter your personality and make you a bad person. Might induce rage, hate and racism. Overall Score: 10/10 PS: If you have severe anger management issues, DO NOT play this game.
Silver Dog the 2nd(in art rage);-;Has great female Character design! BUT Got called a noob a lot and Its not my kind of game. THE FEMALE CHARACTER DESIGN!!!!!!
The worker of secret;-;Very nice game ever..
Avnore;-;dota 2 is the best moba game
Batmano;-;i don't know what to say. but of course This game is Amazing! 10/10
Player;-;I've been playing Dota for more than 5 years. Play it for fun and don't take it seriously. Remember, it's just a game.
Witchk1ng;-;The best game Ive ever played
ThaNoDIBotEO;-;The best MOBA!
ZakurahDG;-;i like this game very much.. even if iam a girl. it makes me feel happy everytime i play dota.. i disslike every trash tlak they say.. ^_^
Con Hair;-;Got hate messages on Steam because I denied five towers in a single game. 10/10
Slightly dry beans;-;It's a fair play, not too creamy, not too dusty, just that delicious right amount of crispiness. That said, Just Cause 2 is still my favourite Open-World game and I feel the developers haven't even tried to make it come close. Outrageous.
DankSideOfTheMeme;-;Most time I have ever wasted of my life on something without being bored of it.
Chardio;-;Very Good
@v1truzdota;-;Been playing this for years and still not getting tired of . Solid gameplay. 9/10 stars.
D4RK BLADE (-_-);-;Wow, absolutely great game!!!
(._. sv ._.);-;Very good game!!!
(._. sv ._.);-;Very good game!!!
GemoMar;-;nice strategy game , nice grafics (better than lol) between lol and dota 2 .... i like this one !
DOTA2 Black Market PH;-;Visit our online store at http://DOTA2BlackMarket.blogspot.com
GRP;-;An awesome MMORPG. Simple rules and gameplay. Good in-game environment. No money req for better game, just cosmetics are sold. Cons: Addictive game, you might spend hours on it and still prefer to go on.
Senpai;-;Pretty awesome.
W R A T H;-;very good game
FiRZeN;-;Play the game, get mad, quit, repeat.
Zergjerk;-;WHAT A time sink >_<
F;-;dota 2 is the best games forever for me.
Dante [ <3 BatGirl ];-;Why i always getting temates what always overfarming my enemyes? Even when i play support, buying cour, ward, dust, gem, my temates FEEDING, here is no rank by stats in dota, just random generation of teams, search system NEED to be reworked! But at all game is updating slowly, and one time it will be very wonderful game, balance in dota 2 is better then in same games ( i mean lol, hon, etc. ), maybe just because here is no items what giving players atk or deffence ( donate previlegies etc.), all game depends on your skill, but skill of your temates is important too! So if you starting to play dota 2, you need to learn all abilities of hero you will play, and also you will learn abilities of other charters just playing against them, so get some honor and go fight the immortal! xD
Neo;-;The MOBA I've spent too much time on. The community is absolute crap, the gameplay is complex, difficult, and unforgiving, and you will lose constantly because of noobs, trolls, and pro's in each game. You will rage, but you will keep on playing anyways for the rare, and sick pleasure of a satisfying victory with an ultra kill. You will waste money on the countless items and holiday events, but you will find a way not to regret it. I don't think I've ever played a game that is this psycologically scarring. Once you play DOTA 2, you will either hate it, or love it. It's a game you cannot play casually. You play hardcore every day, or you do not play at all. With over 1000 hours, I can say converting to this game is far from easy, and sometimes makes me rage beyond belief. But I keep playing it...because I have to, because I've been latched onto it. 10/10 game, only game I've ever gotten this many hours out of. Prepare to never leave.
>GASTBY<;-;Great Game
CH[A]leighzainelOW;-;i bet u cant stop playing this game!!
aydin.voghufi;-;it is a good game, don't have enough time to play it but it look interesting!
Kenny;-;best free game in the world! 85/100
[food?]Hermit;-;This game much good. Very recommend.
VanderPlouseXD;-;THIS GAME WILL STEAL YOUR WHOLE TIME!!!!
Know Thy Pro;-;Its Really awesome.
Matzi;-;Whew, okay this is going to be a long one. This game is in a league of its own. The rare MoBa genre has to be ranked differently to other genres. This game is not so kind to new players and has a steep learning curve. Which is fine considering the game comes with some nice tutorials for the new players. Volvo is forever adding content to this game and it shows in the heroes and maps. Solo que or with friends, this game will always be fun. The community is friendly depending on where you search. Just like TF2 this game has a vast trading community to back it up. Great game, gets more fun the more you learn. Graphics - 9/10 Gameplay - 9/10 Content - 9/10
LutFee;-;awsome game ever
RoshJoberts;-;Community is a pile of . The game will make you wish death upon all your friends. After 2000 hours you are probably still . Best game ever.
<font face="SNAP ITC">Tinay;-;I love playing DOTA 2 because it makes me relieve ^^
ephsimk;-;is fun and can make your mind to think.. Also able to let u build up team work..
Indominus Rekt;-;The air I breathe. :O
King Enao;-;I love the graphics and i hate the quitters
P A T O O T I E;-;COOLEST GAME!!
Glenn Beck;-;More effective at helping you learn Russian than Rosetta Stone. Highly Recommend.
Ultra_Gamer;-;I like this game bcs friends for all over the world can play and meet more friends :) !!
MOUSE;-;Awsome
<font face="Chiller">Weltall;-;The beginning of and whole strategy of MOBA or ARTS (another games is only a subset of richfull MOBA)
Ultimate Programmer;-;DOTA 2 is for certain the best MOBA game on the market. Completely free to play, with all heroes unlocked from the start. Plenty of patches have changed how characters work, added different events, and added more heroes to play with; making it a great package for the price of... well nothing! If you are new to MOBAs; DOTA 2 may be a hard game to get into due to the high learning curve. Do not have that discourage you however, as plenty of hours are waiting to be taken by this fantastic game.
Railgun;-;Well, the first time I played this game is because I saw other players play it, and it gives me the excitment that it'll be challenging cause most of it is a strategy game. And from my constelation, I'm a scorpio, which likes challenging stuff. And thats why I like this game so much
bangnee;-;Ruining my life, loving every bit of it. Are you man enough? LOL, Best game ever!!! Peace.
Spudtastic;-;A dude stole my account and played this game , I'm pretty sure he's  .
Tryhard;-;The best game for learning a new language, and it's free! 10/10
Z3R0;-;Pefect multiplayer game
Goldust;-;Its My Best Compeititive Strategy Game :)
Celestia;-;Remember, no English.
Mr. Potatohead;-;the best online game so far
KemKem <3;-;I like DOTA 2 because even i HAVE many problems when i'm playing it makes me HAPPY hung out with friends PLAYING DOTA 2 EVERY DAY :) #I LOVE DOTA 2 <3
RaveyRave;-;this is a very nice game. two thumbs up!! Earthshaker
PrypE;-;i really love to play dota !
Dante;-;This game is ing Awesome
..;-;This game is the best!
-=Megan=-;-;DotA 2 is a MOBA game which is the so called sequel to the Warcraft III mod DotA. Surprising both old and new players alike as to how good it is compared to others or to it's predecessor. DotA 2 is a game which is utterly repetitive, who am I kidding? Same map, same items, same heroes every single time but I never got bored or got sick of it, more like this is the reason I play it so much, to be better at the same map, using the same items and heroes at every other fight. (I play it weekly for about 8 hours, yeah 8 is my favorite #) All in all a great MOBA game, maybe the best. Better graphics than its competitors and definitely more balanced in terms of both heroes and items.
GODLIKE RAMPAGE  RUN OR FEED;-;I lOVE THIS GAME SO MUCH!
lagis;-;How can I delete this forever from my Steam library? Please, send help.
[LeL [|MaCkY`DeMoN|] LeL];-;STRATEGY AND TEAM WORK :D
PunisheR;-;This game is best for people. Skill still same even we wear good costum. :D
Esuna;-;This is a amazing game. i played this game first in dota frozen trone
AOI;-;the best game i ever seen....haha
[A]zertionZ;-;Amazing game! It's the same map, but every game is different. What heroes you choose change entirely what type of play style will effectively win. The items you build will make a world of difference. It's a game about learning... dota for life! xD
Slahser's Disciple #roadto4k;-;You either die a noob, or you live long enough to see yourself get called a hacker.
Aphrodite;-;Awesome and epic game. My favorite, 4 years ago until now :)
Arkious;-;Dota 2 is a very extensive and deep game but this depth and complexity in my opinion means a great ceiling of fun. I really enjoy this game. You can play as an oblivious person with your oblivious friends and derp around the game and have lots of fun trying to bash each others heads in while trying to break that coveted ancient, but be warned; if you enjoy this game you might want to try playing online. Playing online is a different experience ENTIRELY. Team work becomes so much much oh ever so much much so muchly much much more crucial than before (Dr.Suess reference XD) If you are still playing with your group of friends though at this point that should help a lot. But like many people (myself included) you will be in games where you are alone amongst 4 strangers All of whom have their own agenda seemingly (it is not ALWAYS like this.) you will try your best to help your team win but it will inevitably end in a couple of your teammates being head-strong idiots who fed the other team (let the other team kill them to many times) then the fed team is big bad and bulky, then you lose. There are games where you and your team will work together and you will DESTROY!!! that will not always be the case so enjoy it when it happens and get over it when it doesn't. If you plan on being great at this game be prepared to spend hours researching what the items do; all of the recipes, heroe's skills (especially ultimates), and watch games of people who are good (I reccomend Purge he's on YouTube.) If all this seems overwhelming it's because this game can be CRAZY overwhelming however it has potential to be CRAZY fun! The bottom line is what you put into this game is what you will get out of it; at the time of this review i have 270+ hours in-game and I still feel relatively noobish; I have been having fun this whole time however. So if you don't feel like putting away crazy amounts of time into a game then i suggest you get 1-9 friends who also don't know how DOTA works to get this game and just play private games together and have a BLAST because it is quite a lot of fun. A little about me. I played DOTA 1 the Warcraft III mod as a late-comer with 1 other friend game after game and we derped PLENTY But through those games I learned about the stats and recipes of about 90% of the items in the game, giving me a pretty sizable advantage. I could have made this review about ten times longer but then it would have been a guide... (it already kind of is) 10/10 by the way this game is great!
Dwyer79;-;Very fun competitive game
QK;-;ing  makes me ragequit all the time! One mistake and you are anally  by the other team AND your teammates.  THIS GAME! 10/10.
AP.SPUHGHETTY;-;This is the game in which you'll be criticized for sucking, regardless of performance. This is the game in which you'll learn to hate the russians. This is the game that sucks your social life away more than World of Warcraft. And so many other things. Definetly recommend it. For it. Is. Good.
Heart~;-;Very addicting game
.;-;learn to swear in russian in 3 days!!!
meem connoisseur1337;-;It's ok
Im Silen[T];-;good game, the best game
Luigi_Streams;-;I rekermend dis game. It is won of d best AoS games in d world. Please, take it frum me, my gud freidsn. League of Legends is gud game. Buy it.
SneakyTinkerSpirits;-;10/10 very addictive I might have just had finals this week but this game reached out to me looked me straight in the eye and said  IT... Sure i failed ny finals but I still have Dota :D Must reach 5k MMR... Must turn pro.... the last words i will say for a long time
LalaBee;-;this is the best game ever!!!
-Clear;-;Dota 2 The Best MOBA Out There.
owlcity57;-;Really love playing dota 2 than dota 1 <3
Galveston Tom;-;I've tried nearly every MOBA on the market. None compare in greatness to Dota 2.
Galveston Tom;-;I've tried nearly every MOBA on the market. None compare in greatness to Dota 2.
PhantomSpirit;-;A competitive team oriented game. I would say at least give it a shot.
/l/;-;DOTA2 is a good game and have smart players
Tarzan !;-;Its Free To Play !
Andydas;-;Lot of patience, thinking, cooperating, teamplay and of course, killing enemy - this is Dota2. If u are a fan of MOBA games u will enjoy this title. I enjoyed it much better than LoL because the graphics is much better (source engine ftw :D) and its really FTP game. U dont have to pay for skins, its totally free trading items and build your favourite set. So, dont wait and download it because its worth it!
Juantot;-;for all people who loves excitement + strategy games you must try this. :)
alphatom493 | Promethium45;-;My friend can't stop playing Dota 2... I gotta tell him he has to do other stuff in life now. Thanks Game :(.
IcedTea|Gaming;-;I would say this is a great revamp of the first game (which was a mod in World Of Warcraft 3: Reign of Chaos and in World Of Warcraft 3: Frozen Throne) they're still putting in some of the missing heroes, but other than that it is a good game it's doing well with these other MOBAs' around, again I recommend this game if you loved the first.
[ D.X ] DArkLight!;-;A really good game for those who likes to play competitively and for teamwork building. Good luck on the flame :D
hellscythe;-;Free to Play . . . nice game . . . i recommend to all of you . . . who doesn't have Dota 2 yet .
Ural;-;i start with dota 1 on version 5.56...now to dota 2...this game is awesome
Axexa-DEATH;-;Play This Dreeex Steeeerx !!
blackgold;-;Its Nice And So Funny TeaM GaMe =>
Pure98;-;Playing Dota for my whole life since my 5 age till now. I tottaly recommend playing it.
WwrAcks;-;acheche aloloy
SyMyLoves <3;-;i love this game before i know to play this game :D
CUCAD;-;Yeessss , in' nice game ! in DOTA 2 you will know the sensation of being bullied :v
AccellRian;-;this is amazing game
Slocknog;-;It all started as a map for Warcraft 3. Today, it is the best of its kind around. Not too surprising to be honest, valve games are usually astonishing. Dota 2 is no exception, it is a complete work of art in many ways. Graphics. This game has a slight cartoonish feel to it with fitting colors and lovely particle effects. It is not too demanding but at the same time not that easy to run, an average computer should be able to handle it. The skill effects for Dota 2 are incredible well made and satisfying while not crossing the border of being disorienting. Sound. Incredible soundtrack with many fitting masterpieces for different situations and places. Skill sounds have a great oomph to them and are very well made overall. What i absolutely love about Dota 2 when it comes to sound would be the voices, hero voices. This game has the greatest voice acting i have ever seen in my life, not only limited to video games. The lines are incredible well thought of. The so called "Responses" in the game of Dota 2 are full of different expressions. They are the main thing that is funny about this game. Gameplay. Dota 2 takes alot of skill, almost too much. Don't jump into public games if you just started, even if you played the original or other ARTS games. Practice all heroes, learn their skills and their playstyles. If you don't know if your enemy can jump right in your face or summon a black hole right in the middle of your team, you will not be performing very well. Controls in Dota 2 are not as hard as the gameplay itself. The generic skill buttons are Q, W, E and R. D and F are also used for heroes who use more than 4 skills. No worries veterans, you can use the legacy hotkeys in Dota 2. When it comes to the actual gameplay, Dota 2 is more of a strategy game than some sort of action game much like the typical RTS game. You need to plan out your game and change up your plans according to the match you are playing. One really important thing about Dota 2 would be teamwork. Without teamwork, you cannot do anything past your first few matches. This game is built on working as a team and is best played as a 5-man team. Items. Dota 2, like TF2, has items. These items are purely cosmetic and have absolutely no gameplay advantages that come with them. Dota 2 is a competitive game and if you put a pro player with 6000 hours into Dota 2 with someone who never played Dota 2 before against eachother, the only thing to matter is skill and teamwork. There are absolutely no perks or runes as you have in League of Legends. Not even miniscule bonuses. Everyone is equal. The items in this game are made by the community. You can make your own items and if they make it into the game, you will actually earn money from this game. Dota 2 items can be sold and bought from the steam marketplace. If a set is 13 dollars on the Dota 2 Store, you can buy it for 2 dollars on the marketplace. Other. The HUD and main menu for this game are very well made. While the HUD is rather big, it is actually pretty small compared to the amount of information it holds. The main menu is well made and easy to navigate at most cases. The matchmaking system for this game is not too bad but is rather lacking. You will experience alot of difficulties caused by foreign players as you will not be able to communicate with them. It is best to get used to being matched with russians when you are playing on US East servers with the English language setting. Dota 2 has a report system as well as a commend system. The report system is rather flawed as people can easily banned for things they didn't do but still the amount of times this happens is rather low. Punishments for getting reported would be Low priority which i will explain later and a Communication Ban which disables a bunch of your communication features and limits some. Low priority makes you get matched slower and disabled earing battle points ( EXP for your profile ) and items during gameplay. Final: Dota 2 is a Valve masterpiece, can be played for years to come once you get past the learning curve.
Anu6is;-;Very nice game
Major Lazer;-;MOBA game that I've known since i was in elementary school until this time i was 20 years old
ilikepie;-;I like that it`s addictive , that every game has its own style, that you have to play and know every single hero`s spells and items and that once / year you find nice ppl to play with.
Hello darkness my old friend;-;THIS  IS THE GREATEST THING EVER  LoL
Skipperio | trade.tf;-;Rating with +++++++++ stars
Viverastar;-;This game is really fun once you figured it out but the learning curve is thick unless you got wonderful team mates to teach you or a really good friend to coach you. Overall I think everyone should give this game a tryout and learn to kick butt. All in all this game is worth it and more so since it's free to play so don't fear about wasting money this game will become your addiction soon enough.
EBOLA;-;yes, ing recomended for all of you gamer right there!
|SkF|Tsi;-;I have no life because of this game...and i just love it !
(Evan) SummitRPG.org;-;Great game. But kind of difficult to learn how to play.
DefenseOTAncients;-;Everybody who wants to actually use their brain, in a productive way, should definitely play this game.
BearsForPresident;-;Imagine having fun. Now imagine having even more of that. That is what DotA is like.
Milky Way;-;very challenging game!
<u><font face='snap ITC'>TrusT;-;Nice game
Shaolin;-;Awesome way to loose your life. Great game. Say goodbye to friends.
UNoTakeCandle|Haiku;-;It's all about the teamwork bay-bay! ;D
EleGiggle;-;Ok boys. I was trying to learn russian. I was trying so hard and the only words I've learned were "Privet, kak dela? Menya zavut Pauls". Now I can swear in russian and say to someone to go f7ck himself. So if you want to swear at ppl without being kicked in your butt, go play this game then.
Slocraftus;-;This is very high quality game. Graphics are very detailed and good. But still, you can play on low quality and enjoy. The thing about this game is, that while starting , you wait too much time : match searching and player waiting. Players often fail to connect. Second thing, if you like RPG games, the fact that someone can be first and take the hero that you like, want will be terrible. And to be short, if you don't have enough free time to spend (40 min-1hour) on match, don't start it, if you leave , you wll recieve abandon and ruin your teams game (butin reality no one knows is it ruining or helping , couse in late game, money is everything and your money will be spreaded between your teammates). So yea you should try this game if you like competition and sometimes rage :)
Taters;-;The guy below me was my friend and invited me to play dota 2 with him. He is no longer with us. 11/11 would do again.
Zorro;-;it's the beste moba game ever
fullMETAL;-;Great game!
iTried;-;This game is part of my life now, extremely addicting
Lone Templar;-;It's a great game with so many interesting mechanics,playstlye,creative play,and just overwhelming fun. But getting to the peak of fun,can be aggravatingly painful and most of the time not worth it.Why?well I can go on and on about it.One thing that every multiplayer co-op game has = Teamwork And Dota 2 is about teamwork,team synergy and all that stuff.But most players don't care,don't know that in order to WIN the game you need a team.A team that comunnicates,supports and work together. If you're gonna pick Dota 2 up and play,expect Insults,expect no courier But most importantly be polite,calm, and In control.Because atleast you tryed and that's what matters....Besides there's always a quit button
DotP.Gandalf The Stoned;-;beast mode
y^2k;-;Nice game
Pips;-;Hate this game. That's why I play it everyday. RUINS YOUR LIFE. 11/10
Yan Yan;-;I LIKE DOTA 2 BECAUSE IT MAKES ME HAPPY WHILE PLAYING AND WE CAN PLAY TOGETHER WITH MY FRNDS.
ItsNaomi____.');-;Nice game :) with nice rules
.//word'hack,;-;This strategy game is awesome, it have nice heroes and good skills, very different skills with much heroes, actually very much. It's quite hard for starter, but if you try to practice or play with friends, that's good enough. So much items, and everything have different stats and effects. This game is maximum 5 on 5, no much more (except for spectators and coaches). You also can fight or team up with friends on lobby, or you can make party and invite them to play real match with them (team), so much cool items. I recommend you to play this game, it's really fun and addicting for me :D P.S: No OP hero is made here, every hero is balanced
21;-;Dota 2 is popular free-to-play game by Valve. Its fanbase is huge, with an average of 500,000 players online at any one time (and nearly 8 million players monthly), and growing. The game has team-oriented gameplay, a large number of uniques heroes, and exciting tournaments with ludicrous USD$10 million prize pools. Dota 2 has something to offer to most gamers, from those who prefer strategy and tactics, to those who like aggressive twitchy action, and even those who enjoy agriculture. Source:http://www.logicalincrements.com/games/dota2/
Colin :);-;Not That Bad :)
The.Duck.Knight;-;Recommended
Asylum;-;(LONG REVIEW FOR INCOMING PLAYERS) Ok this is a legit review of the game. The game is a very fun and addictive game my first moba and i enjoy is a lot. When i hook someone as pudge and kill them it is so so rewarding and fun i love it. It is a fun game only hard part is learning the items and stuff. I would rate the overall gameplay and soundtrack and yada yada 9/10 awesome game must download. HOWEVER THERE ARE NEGATIVES BUT it is not the gameplay. IT IS THE PLAYERS!!!!! im not talking about noobs, hell im a noob like i said this is my first moba. Most people are REALLY REALLY REALLY rude. There are very very cocky players that think they are Dendi (if new players are reading this it is the winner of internationals and got a mill, basically one of the greatest players.) however they are not. They are on your team and the opposing team. The ones on your team will constantly put you down for being new to the game. They will tell you to uninstall and that you are aweful and should never touch the game because your so bad and worse. That is honestly ing  some of the players think they are so high and mighty its honestly disgusting. Then dont even get me started on the opposiong team. They will gloat and gloat when they are in the lead untill you fell utterly useless. Then they try and provoke you so that they can get a response out of you. Its like they honestly get enjoyment of just watching you fall. OK in conclusion this game is good, it looks, and runs nice. It is highly addictive with some cons like some heros that are above all else strong as  but they have counters that may or may not be actually good at countering. lol. The absolute wort thing about this game however is the community not everyone is like how i described but it is a good majority. As A game is whole i would give it a good 8-9/10, but if that includes the community i would easily say 6/10. Reason being is that people just get to you also that you dont even want to touch the game anymore so you dont have to deal with "them". IF YOU can take the brick of words that other players throw at you play it if you cant just dont play. Good game, decent community
Meow;-;#muchAmaze #suchChallenge #alldayPlay #wow
PABEBE BOY.;-;Excellent game. Fun to play with and so cool on graphics. ^_^
2ez42k;-;Very good game! i love it!!
**Pr@Chi**;-;Very addictive and good game!!! GGWP
TenderSandy;-;Amazing this game made me feel attached instantly, I simply love the game you need to try this game to talk then from your experience which is what i am doing. It is the best gateway to MOBA, but I have to say when you gain experience of the game and you really graspe this game you will find in every server there are russians. They use op charaters like: Period blood,Rikimaru and also faceless poop .Overall the best experience I have ever experienced and if another person says this game is a copy or simillar to lol I will slam my my keyboard and throw it at you!!!!!11111!!!!!!!!
The Bolero of Basnath;-;Don't play this game
Valentino(GOMS);-;best free game ever .Try it!!!
Fredda;-;This game taught me about the diversity of cultures that our small little corner of the universe offers. Then it taught me to hate them all.
Chrome;-;Side effects include: -Hatred of other humans -Lack of trust in others -Carpal Tunnel -Improved hand eye coordination -A large ego -Weight gain -Weight loss -Confidence -Despression -Extreme Racism -EXTREME RACISM -Increased strategic thinking capabilities -Mushy-brain syndrome -Subconsciously learning a new language -Subconsciously learning to hate the culture of said language -Literally every ailment that is not a transmitable disease 9/10 Doctors accepted this game on their recommendation list, but the tenth was afk
Grizzt;-;It's like roulette; fun until it turns into Russian.
psych0tic;-;Causes anxiety problems, low self esteem, Tourette's syndrome, mood swings, Bipolar disorder, breakdown of relationships, raging erections, racism. Would definitely recommend.
Sentimental Oriental;-;In Dota 2, Not many people speak your language. Not many people play well. Not many people talk nicely. Not many people work as a team. But if you find people that do... You'll have the most fun you've ever had.
Kyubashi;-;And you thought real life was a struggle.
ephir;-;I only played a little but it was fun.
Captain Obvious;-;Things I gave to DotA: 1. Money 2. Time 3. Love Things DotA gave me: 1. Arthritis 2. Carpal tunnel syndrome 3, Hatred of Russians, Mexicans, Spanish, Finnish, and Russians 4. Broken keyboard 5. Broken mouse 6. 9/10 ready 7. Server crashes 8. 4 stacks of Russians in EUW servers on English prefrence settings 9. Ranked matches 10. Free to play but Pay to win games (I.E. - Foreseer's contract, New Bloom 2015) 11. "It's in the bag" spam (especially Skywrath) 12. Multilingual cursing - I guess this is a good thing? 13. Split second math - Reliable/Unreliable gold and gold loss on death vs. Buyback availability - This is good too Essentially - DotA is a greedy woman, but I love her all the same. 11 / 10 would play again
HekaDooM;-;"THE PUB SUPPORT" "Where are wards?" The pub Carry demanded. "I placed them and they were countered" the Support began, "I am trying to juggle giving you complete lane farm, protecting you and harrassing the enemy while saving to buy more, also possibly sentries to remove their-" "UP COUR PLS" the mid hero politely added. "Give Savle" The Carry demanded. "Certainly." replies the support, using the salve on the Carry who subsequently ran headlong into an enemy creepwave. "So where is mek?" the Carry said, after he was ganked due to overextending. The Support died saving him and was treated to a rather enthusiastic series of map pings on his corpse. "Again, having not even enough to buy boots as well as wards, I don't think a 7 minute Mek is viable." The Support replies. "Haha look your level, so low, noob" the Carry retorted. "U have no item xaxa". "Well, jungle gold and experience through stacking and pulling with blocked camps is nowhere near as much as on lane which I attempted to give you, the carry, the priority over." The Carry is subsequently ganked again at the enemy tower, oblivious to the enemy tp that the Support moved away from. "Report Support, usless" The carry cried in allchat, in between mentioning various aspects of the Support's Mother's anatomy. "Instead of reporting and acting like that, why don't you try supporting for randoms sometime instead of instapicking a carry?" the Support asked, as he watched the Carry return to afk-lasthitting lane creeps. "HAH, support is for noskill noobs like you!"
flanadlivv;-;One day, a wise man intoduce me into this game. "it shall protect your virginity, my lad" he said.
Rainbon;-;Good MOBA Game. Bad Community
Hanna Tanag;-;competitive gaming like dota2 is good for players like us and me :)
Zyenox;-;This is a Great game but sometimes i meet many rude and noob player otherwise some or them also quite friendly , anyway Dota 2 still a very nice game hope this game will more be like by other ^^
Flotten;-;Awesome MOBA! I have tried League of Legends too for a couple years, but having a much better blast in this game! LoL is uninstalled.
N;-;GG.. kick those lots of abandon!!
noidea \_()_/;-;Chat in every game Newbie098:How to wards?? Alphafeeder:Mid or I feed Huehue:  my team (Player has been disconnected)
eye !;-;This is the best game ever
Meeh;-;This is my life now <3
BLiTZKRIEG;-;A Very Nice MMO-RPG , real challenge
CallMeBurberry <3;-;this game is good
SailPaNiK;-;Pretty good
<i><b><u>TAYEH;-;This game is good .. strategic and good for learning good english.... This game is Fun and Good to play tho :D!!
JackTheWhite;-;GOOD GAME I LOVE IT
QQQ;-;i liked this game =)
de_otong;-;10/10 would troll again
XyXy;-;Best game ever! Thumbs up!
Number08;-;the best moba game to play
Loveyou :);-;Dota 2 Ruined My Life ^_^
Inblood123;-;So of my time playing it all i have to say is ...Holy  !!!! :D Its a skillful game that you have to master and that isnt easy.But even so its fun and addicting and its made by valve :D everybody loves valve :D and by the guy who originally worked on dota 1. Packed with amazing heros from dota 1 and new ones coming that keeps it new and fresh.And all is updated and fixed ,and balanced in valve style again ;) Now that its out you have NO RESON to not try it.It might be hard to get into but the tutorials and bot games will get you into it pretty quick.And the first real games are going to be the hardest but everyone has to go though it. Keep in mind that the community is harsh to new players and russians, but do not let it get to you as its not as bad as it sounds. Overall a great game that with a little time spent will become your favorite game of all time and then the only problem will be to stop playing :D Recommended to play with friends for some co-op team play and greastest .experience
incode;-;Very good game more power steam.
Gumiber;-;Great game
Massa;-;Fantastic game. Endless fun. Every game is completely different and always interesting.
NightVale;-;BEST GAME EVER, I used to be a league player till i found out that league leeched off of DotA (All Stars Edition) I've played the first DotA game, it was alright back then till they made #2 then i instantly fell in love with it 10/10 MUST PLAY (if your a fan of MOBAs)
Raa;-;A good game and free russian lessons. Friendship destroying simulator yet a very addictive game.
Emma;-;Dota2 is great It teaches you how important teamwork is And it's also cool in graphics
Miiro;-;1 of my fav. :D
mischiff_man;-;blyat noob buy wards reported
Look Ur Team Before Play;-;this is a good game... u must try this game :D
<font face="impact"> PENSIUN;-;ok guys,..im really love this game,.tht why im pro :)
Dephius;-;This game is like crack cocaine please help me
Saber;-;Dota is the best game ever!
Alive;-;Moba game, takes your time, takes your anger, takes your laughs, takes everything, thats why its so addictive. Very well designed.
Bond;-;Play this game.
Wild Boy;-;Dota2 Is The Best Game ^^
KITTY;-;Dota2 is so awsome
RD6;-;i think there's a bug or an error about the dropping of items. And it seems like not accurate information about the longer you play the more chances of getting an item. Try to fix it. And also, the players that we are reporting, are you taking of action with that? Because many players are annoying, they ruin the game of others. Thank you for the authority to recommend. :D
Standin.XXX;-;i recommend it its a great past time for people
HabaN3r0;-;Amazing game that you'll have a bitter sweet relationship with. You'll start by feeding and hating this game. But by watching pro plays and noob friends playing, you'll be attracted back. Before long, you'll start hating it again. Endless cycle here. Awesome game though!!
Edogawa Conan;-;I dont know -_-
DeathNote;-;This is the best strategical game I have ever played. I love DotA 2.
DANK.VXeonix;-;Said I was going solo mid storm spirit, pudge, sniper, ursa and Io joined me. 11/10 would play again
Argle Bargle;-;A game where sweaty men yell at eachother about minimaps.
<font face ="Ravie">Kappa;-;Super Good Game 5 Star
lompatan;-;This is a good game.
LSK;-;It's like free tour in Russia 10/10
Fumbles;-;The most furstrating game you will ever play 10/10
Peiku Intima;-;Learn Russian, lose your friends, meet Peruvian kids, and make your life worthless! All in a very nice package.
Gabe;-;a game that change life of incoming youth gerenation
U EE;-;BOOM THIS GAME!
Kirraw;-;Defense of the Ancients... 'Nuff said.
!!!!;-;BEST GAME IN WORLD
Mr. Cakebaker;-;This game is very well made and I love all the new characters, if valve would like some character ideas I would lik ethem to contact me. I am very creative and would like to help produce items in this game.
FeistyGoat;-;After playing many MOBAs, DOTA 2 continues to be the most polished option out there yet.
AoA - Seolhyun;-;its a fun and addictive game
k41n3;-;Dota 2, or Defense of the Ancients 2 is a great free to play game, keeping real to the original mod of warcraft 3. Many people don't know the origins but this title began as a game-mod for warcraft 3. It was so intuitive and successful that it spawned an entire multiplayer online battle arena (or MOBA) genre. Basically, it is a game created, maintained, funded, promoted and played solely by gamers. To know that this formula has lead it into a limelight of success is a warm feeling to anyone involved. The support this game has received has been phenomenal, though the concept is fairly simple. Dota 2 is a professional game experience, much like a game of baseball or football. The stage is set in an online computer regulated fantasy battlefield arena which makes the action more interesting and the gameplay more fair. Players join together in groups of five to take on opponents casually with public matchmaking or by forming professional competitive teams. Each player picks from a rooster of 100+ heroes each with unique abilities and statistics. Players then battle on a field of war, where the two npc armies release waves of troops to engage each other. This is where the game refines itself, though the stage does not change each battle is unique and requires great concentration and mastery to defeat your enemy. To become successful does require a certain level of prowess, so it is recommended new players begin by trying out a couple hundred public matchmaking games. You might think I'm joking, but that is just the start of the journey. As you become more successful your rankings will increase, making you more attractive for recruiters. Unless you already have a team formed and have had previous competitive experience, you might not be immediately ready for high level gameplay. Do not be discouraged, however! The game is great about teaming you up with players of your own skill level. Because the game is team based by nature, it is natural to meet new friends online to play with. It is important to be courteous and not overly rude, because your reputation spreads. If you are friendly and assist your team-mates, they may grant you after battle accolades or want to become your friend. If you are rude and flaming, your team-mates will work against you or sometimes quit altogether. In your early stages it is important to be open and respectful. If you're not sure what to do don't be afraid to ask. The game features an awesome built in microphone system, so if you own the hardware talking to your opponents is as easy as a click. As you complete more battles you earn more rewards, experience, accolades and friends. Rewards include special items and equipment for your heroes. Special effects and modifications to the user interface and stage design. Custom load screens, custom courier graphics, custom animations and plenty of exclusives which can be bought and sold on the steam market! Probably the only downfall here is the high intensity and length these games operate on. It is not unusual for a good game to take hours to complete. Sometimes it can be really heart pounding when you have a close game and both teams are equally matched. The minions flood the screen and team battles clash on, eventually leading a single team to victory. Though the game lacks a lot of what a traditional game is expected to have it is still a full experience. Dota 2 has come a long way and its ambition as a flagship for competitive gamers is something to respect. Its an awesome experience to be part of. Having the full support of steam and by having content designed by the player base, we see a role for anyone who is not successful with the sometimes overly competitive aspect. Much of the reason the original defense of the ancients was successful was because the community had such a large input into the designs of the game. Often the developers recruited within the games player base or other well known modders to help design their masterpiece. Today's Dota 2 sees even larger support, having systems in place to collect almost all 3d model submissions. When new heroes are designed players are both testers and developers of expansion content. This experience makes you feel in touch with the game. Ultimately however, this game is for the players. Battles are tough and the more experienced you become the more difficult opponents you will become matched with. There comes a point where being matched against a fully microphoned team is going to become common. Because I have played this game for so long and know a lot about it, I am not immediately put off by this. However, be warned prolonged exposure to Dota 2 is definitely not a casual experience. Though I always recommend one conduct themselves in the best manor for an optimum experience, you will encounter those who do not agree with these principles. Dota 2 has become a source of income for some, so it is important to those individuals to never lose. If you dont really care if you win or lose and are just looking for a quick way to pass the time, this game can provide you and a group of friend tons of fun. If you are looking to follow the road of success, prepare for a difficult journey. I definitely recommend Dota 2 for all gamers that would call themselves competitive. It is simple, sleek and sexy. Highly appealing and easy to pick up. Best of all, free and highly compatible and supported. Link directly up to your steam account and find out which of your friends play already. You might be surprised! Spending money in this game almost always results in only ascetic changes. This game is definitely not a pay to win game! In fact, one might even generate your own steam dollars by selling the items won from this game! Download it today!
ArkhamKnight;-;Great game, free to play, have a good time with ya mates and meet all kinds of people lol what more could ya ask for.
Doug Dimmadome;-;Play this in game
SogeKing;-;the best game ever
[SOHORNY]Huzi soro;-;Best language learning tool ever, and its free!
Rave RR;-;So Good this dota 2 game.. I LIKE IT !!!
General_Waffles13;-;#love this game
lovespacedreams;-;I started playing dota long ago and my life became progressively worse. I gained weight rapidly, I began isolating myself from social interactions and the little interactions I did participate in - I was very rude and racist towards anyone who even looked at me. Then I quit because reasons. Then my life started improving. I lost most of the weight I gained, I was dating, I got a nice job and I excelled in all my university classes. Then Dota2 came out. I was given a beta key and it sat in my steam inventory for many months taunting me. It's red glow symbolizing some deep-seated temptation that made me think of nefarious djinns of stories long forgotten. So inviting and so beautiful. But I knew it's secrets and I knew what those secrets did to me. But sadly even the strongest and tallest mountain will eventually fall and crumble to the gentle peppering of rain. After the five-hundreth (im lying, it was like 3 probs) demand that I start playing, my willpower gave in and fell into the blackness once again. I could feel some etheral blackness grasp its fingers around my still-recovering mind. As the game finished installed and I pressed that 'Play Now' button, I realized that I just jumped off the bridge that I was so very carefully constructing ever since quitting the first DOTA. Everything came rushing back to me. One game became ten and ten games became one-thousand. My girlfriend when I began again has left me already and I feel nothing but pity for her because she only wants me to leave the one I trulty love. I'm gaining weight again but whatever, I dont even care . i remember liek when my friend was like, "wanna come party after exams?" and i was like no  that lol i have an ih to do i skipped some exams tho cuz i didnt rly have much time to study cuz ti3 was hapepning and i wanted to watch enough games so i wuldnt be mad that i msised it. but i had to quit cuz im failing university and its gettin 2 expensive 2 live in campus. otherwise 10/10 good game i have 700 hours logged into dota2 and im still casual as
Kirito Enal (Peppy Player);-;dota 2 is so awesome can i have a dragonclaw hook!
Balance Breaker;-;Very Nice
Unbound Pterodactyl;-;One of the best games i have ver played. I definitely reccomend it.
NO NO NO;-;THIS GAME SO FUNNY...... NICE ONE
MacOy;-;nce one
Wolfstar Hip Hop;-;Makes you hate russians 10/10
AWPtimus Prime;-;10/10 would reccomend
Born To Win;-;It's a best game i ever play .. i recommend other gamer to play it , you will find it very cool and very Exciting game try it
[popasa];-;It used to be a nice game before it became popular...
ERMAC;-;lose my girlfirend.but gave is very cool!
Seraphim;-;cool game although the higher your level the lower drop rates for items would be.the graphics are really good and beautiful..i must say this game is far more better than League of Legends as most of the heroes in there is imbalanced..i mean mostly every hero in that game can 1shot you..and also League of Legends doesnt have any trading systems and its graphics really sucks...recently I traded with someone..it went well at first but when we were gonna trade..he cancelled it and as result ive been scammed,But its not a problem the item is only worth 0.01USD. Better luck next time for scammers like him!Thats all..Good Luck to the Devs! :D
Useless Sheeyt;-;This is real games!
PuNkRockDublin +;-;Been here for a long time, free and awesome gameplay..
riddler;-;This Game is so ing tokhmi . League of Legends is Far better than this
an0nym0us__p3ngu1n;-;Huge learning curve.
_sH;-;Don't play this game. It's a BIG waste of time.
C#;-;Greatest MOBA game ever made!
SecretShop;-;Dota 2 best game ever.. disliked the new meta
Big John;-;It's a great game which will take you a long time for you to get bored with. The gameplay is solid and you can play for years and still learn new things. The only problem with the game is the toxic community, make good use of the mute and report buttons!
iNeed2seeU;-;For mentally handicapped
SigL_rg;-;this game is so good..you learn many strategy and moves and not only addicted game it has a reason and it helps you in your subjects like in math in budgeting your items..
mdpbeats;-;Very Friendly game. Awesome but simple graphics. Perfect for starters, Great for more advanced players, Completely Insane for Professionals! It's an amazing game for you to play. So come play, share, twitch it and make a living out of it!
gorgeouskykhan;-;Unbelievable! It's game depth, game result reports and game match view options are amazing! It is better than ordinary substitute other games. I recommend it for ev1. :)
Ice Queen :);-;its an awesome game..people who love moba plzz better get this game..the BEST of all.
Mighty Marvelous Magical Moecchi;-;well what can i say, very competitive, very original, and complex! totally love this game :D
Black Momo;-;this game is so complex and i sure it good choice for you that love to make teamwork
zek the dumb;-;makes you tired makes you angry but you can not quit the game
^MUCIKARI^;-;good game and simple play
Unlegend;-;Life time best game ever
Turtlecube;-;Honestly i can't escape this game....its so addictive yet so fun. From the 100+ hero pool and different ways to play each hero there is no doubt in my mind that everyone should own this game(plus its free so if you dont like it un install it :P).. 11/10 wp dota...wp
MILF|dreeeiiii;-;nothing else.
Captain.JackWalker;-;ITS A REALLY GOOD GAME NICE WORK STEAM !!!!!!!
esdzfasdfasfd;-;The best game in the world. Thank you, Valve corparation.
Infinest;-;Awesome MOBA game. A little bit harder to play than Lol and that scares many people but if you get into the game once it's really cool.
bosozoku;-;This game sucks and has wasted my time thoroughly yet I continue to play it. I'm not sure why, but just play it, and you might see. You'll never learn the game inside and out, and that's the beginning and the end of it, which brings and interesting challenge to the table. Pros: -Efficent language learning software included. Current supported languages depend on your region. Europeans have the special chance to learn Russian while Americans have the less "exotic" option of learning Spanish. Russians get to learn the language of annoyed seven year old tryhards. -Amazing learning curve provides intense through all skill and proficency levels. -One of the best games on the net if you have four friends to play with (five counting yourself). Cons: -Seemingly flawless matchmaking based on historically-rooted and long-lasting chess matching traditions falls short and is simply disgusting all around (why you need a full party for it to be good). -I have yet to find a good FPS config for this game, but that's not a big deal in any way. -The intense learning curve intimidates beginners. -For some reason, 70% of people who play cannot speak with any degree of moderate literacy. -some other  glhf
<One Star>;-;nice game, so easy to play
Aniki;-;Love the new udate
Glover;-;Can play as Saber 8/8
bean faggot;-;Dota 2 is an uncompromising wilderness survival game full of science and magic. But it's also about Drow's thighs. Now, let me slow down for a second and give you a little bit of lore about these godly instruments. Long ago, in the magical city of Detriot, or somewhere of that nature, thighs happened. And boy, let me tell you, they happened well. They began their onslaught at roughly 50 hours in game. Now, it was obvious that these thighs were valuable, and had to be protected. Fortunately for everyone, the thighs were safe within the innermost regions of the armour that blanketed them. What I'm trying to tell you is that this game is based on the idea of thighs. If you are playing this game to get "Pro Dondo Hookerinos," then you have been mislead. This game is not about said Dondo. This game is about thighs.
efngn;-;Made friend ragequit and uninstall after I fed as Sand King. 11/10 would play again.
Sev[T];-;i like this game, need smart and fast to play this game
derogatory term;-;ok game spend little to no time playing it as it's repetitive and boring #swagyolo
Synx;-;Teamwork
Ryomatheprince}AKA:IMBA;-;You can learn tatics stratigy and ability to be the best in game
Killua;-;This is a really good MOBA style game. It has good graphics and gameplay, although the community can be quite harsh - play with bots before you start playing vs other people.
Robot Ghost;-;I don't generally recommend this game, because I don't think people would generally find it fun. The best way to try it though, would be with friends that are already very familiar with the game and would enjoy teaching you. If that's the case, give it a shot. If you want to play it solo however, be prepared for an abysmal time.
walle;-;its good game
[Pro-Killer]TwiStMyEYEs;-;I wish to have Riki Arcana someday for free
Andryha Raketa;-;yooo, best game alive!!!
BULLET101;-;Best free to play game ever! I'm more a fps guy, but when i started to play DOTA 2 it got me and i can't let go. I play till late telling myself just one more. That one more never stops! A must get for everyone DOWNLOAD NOW!!!! :D
Fluffeh;-;Boosts teamwork for all people. Sure there might be disagreements here and there for some players but when stuck in the same situation every seems to shut up, work together and mount a comeback. +1 to this game
EsdyNyzz - Noobest SEA :(;-;this is my life :) love this game so much :D and finally dota has many good sets <3
XoUDoX;-;Best Moba and will still be the best <3
:)) #3;-;Dota 2 is Nice Game!! :))
Zerg;-;A very good game for refreshing
Cloud;-;While this game might be free to play, it will still cost you your sanity and 10 to 500$.
~Anna~Char :);-;I Love it..
Der Knevilerino;-;This game is many things but not noob-friendly
SkyPrince;-;At first i think i wouldn't try Dota 2 cause it's too much effect.. But when i try it ,, i cant let myself go from this awesome game.. If u are a real gamers ,, u should try this great game..
JLaw;-;10/10 ruined my life
Laphin Kofin;-;Dota is sort of a combination of football and chess.
TurtalyTurtle;-;After only spending 2,500 hours on this game I had just about mastered how to buy a courier and not feed. Then they updated the map and changed everything, i hope that if i now invest another 2,500 hours i will get above 1k mmr. 10/10 would have botty sekz with
Medi;-;This game.... where do i even start. this game has consumed, no, devoured into its abyss more than a thousand hours of my life. That's like watching you're favorite tv show (without ads) for close to 3000 episodes. I would rather kill myself rather than watch 3000 episodes of tv. After all these countless hours exploring the gaping void of what seems to be, as some would call, fun, in dota 2, i have learned a few things: 1. if someone picks void, lycan or naga, leave immidiately. Do not pass go, do not collect 200 gold. 2. Do not attempt to understand russia, russian people, culture, or anything associated with the words , blyat, id inahui, etc. 3. This game will destroy your ing life Still better than LoL dan outa dan - John wins
TopXenon;-;One of the best free games i've played.Part(not all) of the community is perty toxic but then again each game has its own bad players. Overall it's a sweet moba game to play and I do recommend giving it a try.
Mattles;-;The best MOBA of all the MOBAS.
Boomala Works;-;like league of legends, but harder a lot harder
SoreGore;-;Dota is life.
Slave;-;Release pudge war please, i love it.
dR0 P q5p;-;hours of totally fun
.Fire;-;challenging and stragetic
Everlasting ~Melody;-;You start out as a newcomer, trying something new. Then you get to know more people. Soon, you'll find yourself  with people. , Dota 2 becomes a  game. The game becomes  ,  . Then, a new  comes up and opens a   . More friends  , .           .    ,          .
#BobiVegas!;-;It's a good game everybody should play it :D
GNVV;-;I LOVE THIS GAME
GLoby;-;Russian simulator 20xx . 10/10 . Goty
Luigiz;-;what i like is when trading.. can see sooo many lowballers :3
APEX.AngelMaster;-;Get into it. A fantastic remake of the original and the best MOBA.
TheLawMan;-;Dota 2 has wide selection of heroes to choose from and oh... lots of reporting for playing bad. Game is great, community not so much. [8/10]
- TER -;-;I WANT TO BE A PRO IN DOTA 2. I HATE FEEDER AND BOSSY TEAM .
Glorxnyak;-;You will be flamed by countless russians in pubs, have to deal with sweaty tryhards in ranked, devote your wallet to buying virtual hats, constantly alienate your friends that you play with and care more about your MMR than you do your job... and it will be so ing worth it. 10/10
Kilo;-;I love Dota2 and hope that Valve will continue to develop this great game so the challenges continue.
Marksican;-;good game worth playing :3
SPD.GreenRanger;-;one of the best games i have played in my lifetime.excellent gameplay awesome interface.A must have for all MMORPG gamers.
Super Frank;-;Great game. Addictive to an extent.
IM DRUNK<> CARRY ME PLS;-;Destroyed my life 10/10 would play again
eXoduS _ ();-;Possibly one of the best MOBA ever!
OKTA_GTF;-;Very good game.
Orky;-;Perfect DotA remake!
Dj =D;-;The difficulty spike is INSANELY high, but if you overcome it this game is very rewarding :D
DreAm HAcker;-;This is a game that requires lots of team work, perfect timing and a pinch of luck, overall this is an amazing game that tests your skill in coordination and judgement along with reflexes
Slark Wahlberg;-;Yeah, this is an awesome game! You probably won't get it at first, BUT YOU WILL. It'll just get more fun over time. I do recommend this game! :D
SuperNova;-;This game maps is similar like lol since patch 6.82 6.82A changing the gameplay significantly, from farming to win became to kill the streak to win. but i think its ok now since 6.82B patch released changing the game plays to normal, the composition of formula exp and gold is stable now.
<font face -"snap>>>?=_TAZ_=>>>?;-;cool
Archer;-;Nice game...
SPARROW:);-;many many game in steam
Admiral Bash;-;Nice game
acxnhoelis@;-;STEAM Was DI.MAKERS INFO PAST.AND fURY.
roosevelt-;-;Wellplayed
SNAKE;-;nice game,thank you valve
ieXies;-;BIGGEST SHAM EVER! After spending almost 2k hours in this game , i play a game and 90% of the time i just sit here wondering "Is this even Dota"
H-;-;dont play this  pls.
H-;-;dont play this  pls.
The Vet;-;I have a good time playing this game , wow what a great experience!
@dreoxdota;-;I forgot what the sun looked like after discovering this game.
Merlin;-;this game teach you how to survive a tough world
Orin;-;You can eat trees and drink river water while you learn to hate your friends, 10/10.
SkyezZ;-;Its Fun ! More Fun and I Enjoy this Game ! GLHF !
psych dat a rong numbah;-;i hope i graduate junior high school....
neeeial :D;-;this game is awesome! :DD free items please! :D
Tomato-Chan;-;I played riki today. People make fun of riki, laugh when you instalok him. 12/22/2 proved them wrong. #Riki4life
xUnite;-;League of Legends from Valve.
Clutchalot;-;this is a game
KerakTelor;-;Nice game, learning curve is a hill, though.
Andre;-;An Strategy Game that make you hard to sleep and quickly emtpy your wallet
Fraction25;-;Many of my hardcore gamer friends who plays lots of different games throughout their life have been turned to a gamer who plays only this game and none other like they used to. Lord Gabe, I need my hardcore gamer friends back and I promise that I will always stop my present hardcore friends from trying out this game. WARNING: This game will take over your entire gaming life. 10/10.
MajorSweep;-;Welcome to Dota 2, you suck. (Remember to brush up on the  skills you filthy  :P)
Standin.STEiN;-;i recommend to all gamer's specially dota 1 player's..
ALLAHU_AKBAR \o/;-;the best ever game to play !
LobStar;-;Just as awesome as it was, but now with 90% more hats!
#Hashtag;-;Dota 2 is a great game! I really enjoy the realisticness of the game compared to League of Ledgends and would reccomend it to anyone. Also plus side is that ithe in game purchase content half the price of league and some how is still has a big prize pool for the competitve scene and a nice setup with the compendium.
Lensmann;-;Therefore all things whatsoever ye would that men should do to you, do ye even so to them: for this is the law and the prophets.
imortallegacy;-;This is a game of commitment. You will lose, but you will learn from your mistakes. This is a very addicting game and if you get good enough the prize pools get to enourmous amounts; larger than L.O.L.!!
HellBlack;-;Do not try if you have a life, family or friends. Especially girlfriend.
Imp;-;Only reason you aren't playing this is because you're bad
[tK]PrinceRising;-;Love this game 100%
l l;-;addictive game ... ;)
Mike;-;Set language preferance to english? S.
GodFather;-;this game is amazing. this is my life. so you have to play this game
Soup;-;a pretty bad game
TL_DOD;-;yea its a nice game but that's the worst part......once addicted u will fail in life....as simple as that.
Roronoa Zoro;-;this f***ing game ruined my life 10/10
Expelled.bk;-;D to the o to the t to the a. Should be playing Dota from night to day!
Zbgtx9k;-;nothing but rage, rage for days and days!
Mekky;-;this is a good game ^_^
Lewbot;-;Literally the best game.
mockingbird;-;Mid or afk. Don't supporting for useless carry.
James;-;I like this kind of games...and i have tried League Of Legeds! There are several differences between the two games! hmm dota2 8/10
Izzy;-;DOTA 2 has changed my life... I have spend all my money on virtual pants whilst spending night after night...naked...playing dota until my sweaty buttcrack is glued stuck to my chair. And the worst part is...I don't even regret it 10/10
Gufonny;-;Dota 2 very positive and interesting game.It can be played endlessly.I recommend this game to all, because they are world-class!
Rensworth Muggington VI;-;Amazing game, takes a while to understand controls but overall amazing!
ExtremelyCancerousPotato;-;Devoured my soul and made me a better person by teaching me to call out people's mistakes while taking no responsibility for mine. 10/10 Recommend
Spoderman 4 Prezidunt;-;Want to play this game? Expect to be very good at it and do everything right upon your first instinct. 10/10 from a pathelogical liar.
KiTTY;-;This game is great. BUT YOU KICK  WHEN YOU FIND SOMEONE YOU'RE GOOD WITH
Gon Freecs;-;game is sick
LEEK;-;blyad i mean awesome game everyone should play it
[GG].Lethal.Edge;-;Very addictive ruins your life
Xi ^_^;-;this game is really good and well graphics to and to easy games so download it and play
L.;-;yes , im the one
Ddub;-;Fora a free game, I had a lot of fun. But I've been drunbk since April so what do I know?
kaboom;-;great game! brain squeezing! hahaha
Chicken Rice;-;This game zzzz so much to say bout this. gameplay is fun but sad to say that the min a person dc from your game your wholeteam has to suffer the fate. pple rage u suffer. Valve matchmaking system is really so random. It can really kill u at times. Gameplay a plus ther rest is all minuses.Sad.
Skunk Rhyno;-;sont use weed on mouse
~E&E~ Apoc Mugz;-;Moved from league of legends and never looked back. Addicting game and it's smart
Rose;-;Great game, allowed me to learn many things such as cooperation and teamwork, required if you want to archieve success in this gaem, also, I learned many languages such as spanish, filipino and russian. In the beginning its was like a barrier, I wanted to communicate with my fellow comrades, but then I realised that tu  madre, and eventually idi nahui  even though blyat eblan pisda was putang ina mo
Shard;-;Only play this game if you're willing to get obsessed to the highest level and not play any other game. Amazing
Hammy;-;Have you ever wanted to be shouted at by Russians? Well now you can with Dota 2. 10/10
Sanji;-;The best game!!
Leopold.R;-;If you enjoy endless hours of blood-boiling rage this is the game for you. Features: - Russians, who believe every server is the Russian server and every language is the Russian language that enjoy nothing more than to ruin a good game. Also known to play extremely solitary, refuse to listen to tips and abandon after a torrent of stereotypical insults (,  YOUR MOM, etc.) usually after having fed before doing so. - Matchmaking, which will move heaven and earth to make sure you don't dare reach too highly above that 50% win margin, it likes nothing more than to  on your parade when you've had a good run of games by dragging the scourges of the Mariana Trench Tier into your team to "Balance" the game. (Instead of matching 10 equally skilled players together). - Reports, Did you get matched with Russians? Yes [X] No [ ]. If yes chances are despite having done absolutely nothing wrong you will be reported for god knows what. You will be reported for going to lane, going into the jungle, taking a single last hit off a carry, dying once, getting a kill that your carry 1500 units away wanted, giving out advice, speaking English on English servers, buying items they don't like, picking skills they don't like, picking heroes they don't like. Pretty much any ridiculous reason you can imagine, they will report you for it. This usually doesn't mean much but... - Mute System, Now with only two reports you will be automatically muted in game, so you only need to annoy two people, be it friendly or enemy in any fashion and you will get report for comms abuse even if you didn't say a single thing those games. This system is ridiculously easy to abuse as I do it myself and everytime I jump on DotA 2 to see that sign pop up saying someones been punished for absolutely nothing I just sit and think of valve and how they know what they're doing supposedly. Not to mention people are overly sensitive and need to grow thicker skin in DotA 2 because god forbid you say a "Bad Word" otherwise you'll be stoned to death by hypocrites. (Did I forget to say there was always already a mute system in game before this automatic one which worked completely fine? Because there was and still is.) I'm sure I could continue this list for another good while but I think thus far sums up a fair bit. The game itself is wonderful, very enjoyable and can be extremely gripping with the plays that can be pulled when you get that 1 in 100 game where everyone on both teams is of a good skill level, these games are the ones that make DotA 2 worthwhile. However unfortunately you have to go through those 100 games of utter  and misery to reach these seldom found game.
PeliCAN!;-;Singsing is everywhere. Singsing is all around us. Even now, in this very room. You can see Singsing when you look out your window or when you turn on your television. You can feel Singsing when you go to work when you go to church when you pay your taxes. Singsing is the world that has been pulled over your eyes to blind you from the truth.
Damn I'm God;-;This game is so GOOD
R1z Zeroxtrade.com;-;Dota 2. This game steals your life more than Stannic and any other 'Life-steal' item combined. Some people might this game hard well not some maybe everyone but once you get to handle the heroes you can't stop closing the game. There is a fact this games such as Dota increase your brain by 19% overall. several of my friends hated gaming until when Dota 2 was payed and it used to give like 10-15 gifts I gave to several of my friends and they have more than 2K hours logged in to this game. Recommend this game to everyone. 10/10 Plus point you might learn Russian, Spanish, And several other languages. :)
Gumi;-;Endless addiction, the possible outcome from every game is different. Play till you drop
Rocker_lvl100;-;exiting
[#TWN]Snaxington;-;I waited so long for this... Twas worth the wait.
JEDI;-;it's really good!!!
Penultimo;-;come to play,,
Freezerburn;-;Very nice game. It's my chance to training my gaming skills
HaskieS;-;This game is not just about kill or be killed, but also about how you can save your friend. accordance with selogannya "free to play" I think this game is very comfortable and not boring when played every day. This is a new world in which a person between countries met and fantasize in the same game
Ivra_JR;-;this game make me cant foccuss to study haha
Larry97;-;awesome, really addictive game
OG.Nuclear;-;Fun game, good with friends.
();-;Hey... My stuff was stolen ... i want report !!!!
FAH;-;Best Game of All Time
Kappa Kuur;-;Dota 2 is my life
CrEeP;-;The best game for test our logic, our strategy and our animals type
Kimochi.Pinocchio;-;Must play ^^
JUSTDOIT;-;If you like to scream at your teamates to stick like glue, get this game 8.5/10
P;-;1st team in the world receives 4 million dollar for the tournament, aint any better way to describe this game
Psmyles;-;Play this if you are ready to lose your soul and be ready to give up on your social life.
{DZtR}666};-;best game in the world
Mc DO nald's;-;caution to be addict
Mogwrath;-;the literal best game ever but will devouer your life!!
OJ;-;one of the best games ive played in terms of competitive gaming
elM512;-;Nice game!
Dragneel;-;i love this game
Jnsi "XXI";-;really awesome game must play it
hypnoKiNG <main> 1552.47;-;It's alright, good RTS game.
Crestantine;-;no need to explain it...
King Capital;-;Farm Simulator 2014- A rage inducing, New language simulator where you can be yelled at in 4 different languages while wondering why anyone would waste 45 minutes of time on this. 10/10 ~ IGN
Ein Zeik;-;Don't be disheartened by the steep learning curve. Just take it one step at a time, one game at a time.
FvCK`EckX^SoStronK;-;i like this game bow.
MR SKELTAL;-;Lich gonna have your mana.
Thimit;-;You will get addicted. Best multiplayer experience I've had since Halo 3 in its heyday.
FuNkMyGeCkO;-;this is one of the greatest games out there right now
Bianca;-;like this game.. Good Job!
Jewey;-;Two long years I have supposedly supported you, Even when you had left the lane for good, Some days I didnt know why it was so, I thought time would pass and it did But after all this time I'm still fond of warding for you. Today I awoke from a strange but sad nightmare Where I was getting rekd by Bane and Mirana I hadn't long seen, come from the fog of the jungle and in the distance I saw you approaching. So I Juked, Because I did not know what to do I wasn't ready, I was scared to see you fight. But you ran after me, super fed by the enemys Riki, Remembering now, you ran as if to beat me. Bloodseeker, why are you such a racecar? You caught up, and maybe I let you. I stopped and cast a few silly spells. You smirked and watched me die. IRL, I told myself not to cry. In game; I told myself not to cry. Why you linger in the jungle after all this time; I do not know My feelings are so confusing when I see you, last hits- 35 But how do you get so stronk I wonder? That's what I want to say. Volvo BS is OP plz, nerf now
ze_FFVII_Mako_Reactor_v3_1;-;If you ever feel like commiting suicide, just get this game instead, there sorta the same thing.
Caro;-;The best strategy game based on Dota, you should try this game.
<PMT>;-;i am completing my mission
YB;-;The addiction :/ I loved it.
V_Secret.moneykon;-;yo this game is real life chess witch happen between 2 terrotory ( Play To Known )
I DONT KNOW WHAT HAPPEN;-;this game is so
ImmaFeedFUCKER;-;This is really a great game.
David;-;This game is the best!!
WHAT ARE THOSEEEEEEEEE;-;Learn spanish, watch them not buy boots of speed, please buy boots of speed. 10/10
@AnarchyExpress;-;Really great fun, weapon customization is unique and allows great personalization of playstyles. With a single player campaign and new loot system, the amount of content available for free really makes the game special.
AR;-;Very Challenging MOBA games, the skill can forged by playing this game, that was awesome
HeliumOverdose;-;A good game where everyone is op!
Vulcan;-;Dota 2 is a very good strategy game......except for the excessively abusive community......
HOODINI;-;The Best Game
LaNdLoRd_G-Rad;-;This game sucks absolute . 11/10
asdasdasdas;-;this game is soooo awesome
DS:Madbeastboy;-;what a game i love it now with all the epic ways to play
SP3K;-;It's an amazing game - technically outstanding, showing all of Valve's usual polish and attention to detail, especially in the all-important multiplayer aspects. The continual balance tweaks and new heroes combined with the vast amount of content in the game offer countless hours of enjoyment. It's hard to master but good wins with your teammates are incredibly satisfying. It took me a long time to warm up to, but I'm helplessly addicted and every day look forward to getting home to fire this up with my friends. If you can spare the time - play it.
General Sticky;-;Simply a must have.
IM So Brainy;-;thise is a good stragergey game for all and very amazing for frinds and fo so injay when get the game re mebere it is douse a game
Tah.M~Ps;-;great game
Anne;-;10 minutes into the game and teammates are already raging at me 10/10
PikaPika;-;good game i really enjoyed play dota 2
Adelheid van Bjrn;-;Very good game, must play 8/8 m8.
JustFrancis;-;it's Alright :)
Sloffter;-;this game is bang tidy
TARDIGRADE;-;really good game and comunity
Chrissy;-;a fun way of consuming you time
Warlord;-;Dota 2 is the best free to play game ever. This game improved so much since it was released on the beta. There are over 90 heroes to choose from currently. A great PvP game that offers some of the most intriguing and nuanced team combat around. Simply irresistible and addictive as hell
Mr.700ClubAsia;-;Try this addicting game
WEBEE;-;this game is good for play
Alessa;-;So, I like this game a lot.very nice
~~;-;Is a great....
Rosencrantz;-;So many hours lost. 10/10
Rugrat;-;its a game. Doing for badge.
+ ss +;-;awesome game with a steep learning curve. not for the fainthearted.
Dank MayMays;-;I love this simulation game
Daus;-;Awesome game but not for sore losers. They would just make the game not fun to play.
{BKO} D CRAFTER 1;-;awsome game. every good thing is there in this game.
Fetty AWP;-;not worth of playing JUST KIDDING!
Cecil;-;a nice a very interesting game. Hope that there are more new updates in this game. Like it a lot.
Anti-Gamer4s3;-;HELP ME!!! I was playing but then suddenly it Froze then it shuts down when i try to sign in to steam again all my game files are gone and it say's i need to install it again pls help me.
PinkG;-;This game is  , I willl squat on this game and
A Little Piece Of Heaven;-;The best MOBA of all time. The history behind this game is, well, insane. Icefrog, the mysterious legend. League of Legends sprouting basically from the first version. The teams in the eSports scene. Dota 2 Lounge, for commited betters of eSports Dota 2 teams. Trading cards. Enjoying the hours upon hours spent with friends met just dominating every match that you can. The thrill of playing new heroes and somehow feeling as if the same map is always filled with new challenges. This is a game that you just can't debate about. This is probably the best game I have played besides Counter Strike. Another winner for Valve.
-{Lady};-;Hello there GUys I"m A Good Player
[MNI] Killerzzz;-;i really like playing dota 2 because of meeting nice players but sometimes have harsh players/trashtalkers
Niyona;-;NICE. i wud give 4.9/5 to this game. really really awesome if you compare it to DOTA / Warcraft III :D
XYZ;-;Very Nice. Great Success
Natepalm;-;It's very strategic, and extremely rewarding when you do well.
Goog;-;Taught me to hate all of South America 10/10
TM87;-;This game... Well I dont know where to start. For you looking at this game with out even playing it you may see a hero brawler that the objective is to destroy the other teams base but thats not what I saw. When I looked at Dota 2 on steam for the first time I saw an complicated version of classic hero brawler. So I said no screw this ill go play a game that makes sense... So I started playing League of Legends or LoL. Which lasted me about 3 months until I came to a realization that LoL was simply dull. It did not make me think and the people... They just made the game horrible and enjoyable. Sure their was the few great games that truly said this is true teamwork but overall I every time I played a new game I would sigh then choose one of the 3 overly expensive heros I had purchased then stared at the unimpressive dull graphics and then got yelled at my team mate for stealing his creep last hit. So then after staring at the Dota 2 page on steam for a few minutes and watching a few video guides on how to survive as a noob in Dota 2. Finally I pressed download and slowly but surely it downloaded and after have a friend beat the tutorial for me I played my first bot match. After four minutes I quit because it simply just made no sense. I didn't comeback to dota until a friend invited me to play dota and I warned him to be careful because I would probably just feed the other team but he urged me on and forced me to play a bot game. He explained the basics and while me and him coordinated the first blood play I realized the greatness in this game... It was having great friends that you can rely on to pop a healing salve on you right before you did and they save your life or when you and your friend find someone jungling in your jungle so you and him just destroy him with mass damage and you both start laughing but in Dota 2 another great aspect about it is that you must think. You have to react, predict, hope about what may happen to you. I feel i have just gotten started with this game and I already play over 125 hours. Overall Dota 2 Has some Great features that make it step out from some Hero brawler. Likes +Dota 2 has some great Teamwork when you talk +It is a great mind game that helps you with strategy that makes you think +Can be a easy win for you if you just use simple teamwork +Has great graphics compared to most MOBAs Dislikes -Intense learning curve -you can be matched up with a horrible team that just trolls you Overall Score: 8.79
Comeback Is Real;-;Unable To Connect Dota 2 Plz Fix This
Mis[E]ry;-;Nothing to say, just perfect
XylaR;-;Fantastic baby !
Saruman the White;-;Great game but sometimes boring
Deputa;-;High based competitive game with lots of nerfs.
Gorgo;-;Best game Fight! Fail to amuse me!
DONT WaNNA STOPAS D 2k01;-;n0tail you're flower you're also a rainbow and a river you are manifestation of all perfection and i dont ing know I want this to not sound gay, but you are ing perfect, n0tail. I LOVE CHLOE GRACE MORETZ
SmartDX;-;Very good strategy game
TELA POHUNG;-;- Download Dota 2 - Open Dota 2 - Pick Naga Siren - Chase Witch Doctor in bottom lane with my 1st Skill ( Mirror Image ) < This skill Creates three images of Naga Siren - Got First Blood By killing Witch Doctor - Witch Doctor called me hacker and he blame me entire the games using microphones 10/10 would pick naga siren again
.|c00ff0000.< Hao >;-;Dota 2 is cool, A game with a strategic mode it helps you to be strategized and think more about the game. A game that is always logic there no is no bad in this game this is game is more cooler because it is not just popular but this is the game which you can understand all the strategic and logical works of your life.
Ayskrim;-;This game is great.
thisistalaTT.;-;this is the best game ever :))
{N}  ShaRMiRAnA;-;dota 2 is a very good game. dota 2 is the best of all games i ever played.
<font color="#FF00FF">Secret;-;Well Played!
KeyToVanish;-;always nice to plays with friends
rhiannon_3r45mu5;-;Is dota what more do you need
BosS.Jason.xDD;-;This Following or Reviewing is nice for dota 2
Bob;-;A Co-operative strategic game.
Sacrifar;-;Great Game One of the best game ever Thumbs-up and adddictive
Nigga Gaming;-;very nice adaptation of DotA from Warcraft, more heroes to be added soon please :)
Consistency;-;Dota 2 was the only legit Dota ever created.
KoldBladdedNehrt;-;Beware of russians. Don't underestimate the power of Ancient Apparition. If you see 5 people approaching with Chilling Touch, RUN.
UniKoRn [TH];-;Bettter than Hon IT a greatest Moba game ever
Mr Random;-;Simply the first and the best Moba
BROOD.Salguod;-;owesome game!
Elite A33;-;love this game =) easy to play with...
W I S H B O N E X;-;Always playing this
KernKern;-;wish that administrator gives more low priority games for communication abuse, many players here are very discriminating especially to the race of players. i know that punishment isnt a good drive for a change but its the only way to catch the players attention. Thanks and more Power!
Monk;-;The first MOBA Extended. Best game. A game you never get bored of.
X I I I;-;great game
Lord Daisan;-;One of the best ALL TIME GAME.
B"LuE;-;keep a good work and happy new year
Orayt! RockN'Roll ToTheWorld;-;I love this game
Fredda;-;This game taught me about the diversity of cultures that our small little corner of the universe offers. Then it taught me to hate them all.
Chrome;-;Side effects include: -Hatred of other humans -Lack of trust in others -Carpal Tunnel -Improved hand eye coordination -A large ego -Weight gain -Weight loss -Confidence -Despression -Extreme Racism -EXTREME RACISM -Increased strategic thinking capabilities -Mushy-brain syndrome -Subconsciously learning a new language -Subconsciously learning to hate the culture of said language -Literally every ailment that is not a transmitable disease 9/10 Doctors accepted this game on their recommendation list, but the tenth was afk
Grizzt;-;It's like roulette; fun until it turns into Russian.
psych0tic;-;Causes anxiety problems, low self esteem, Tourette's syndrome, mood swings, Bipolar disorder, breakdown of relationships, raging erections, racism. Would definitely recommend.
Sentimental Oriental;-;In Dota 2, Not many people speak your language. Not many people play well. Not many people talk nicely. Not many people work as a team. But if you find people that do... You'll have the most fun you've ever had.
Kyubashi;-;And you thought real life was a struggle.
ephir;-;I only played a little but it was fun.
Captain Obvious;-;Things I gave to DotA: 1. Money 2. Time 3. Love Things DotA gave me: 1. Arthritis 2. Carpal tunnel syndrome 3, Hatred of Russians, Mexicans, Spanish, Finnish, and Russians 4. Broken keyboard 5. Broken mouse 6. 9/10 ready 7. Server crashes 8. 4 stacks of Russians in EUW servers on English prefrence settings 9. Ranked matches 10. Free to play but Pay to win games (I.E. - Foreseer's contract, New Bloom 2015) 11. "It's in the bag" spam (especially Skywrath) 12. Multilingual cursing - I guess this is a good thing? 13. Split second math - Reliable/Unreliable gold and gold loss on death vs. Buyback availability - This is good too Essentially - DotA is a greedy woman, but I love her all the same. 11 / 10 would play again
HekaDooM;-;"THE PUB SUPPORT" "Where are wards?" The pub Carry demanded. "I placed them and they were countered" the Support began, "I am trying to juggle giving you complete lane farm, protecting you and harrassing the enemy while saving to buy more, also possibly sentries to remove their-" "UP COUR PLS" the mid hero politely added. "Give Savle" The Carry demanded. "Certainly." replies the support, using the salve on the Carry who subsequently ran headlong into an enemy creepwave. "So where is mek?" the Carry said, after he was ganked due to overextending. The Support died saving him and was treated to a rather enthusiastic series of map pings on his corpse. "Again, having not even enough to buy boots as well as wards, I don't think a 7 minute Mek is viable." The Support replies. "Haha look your level, so low, noob" the Carry retorted. "U have no item xaxa". "Well, jungle gold and experience through stacking and pulling with blocked camps is nowhere near as much as on lane which I attempted to give you, the carry, the priority over." The Carry is subsequently ganked again at the enemy tower, oblivious to the enemy tp that the Support moved away from. "Report Support, usless" The carry cried in allchat, in between mentioning various aspects of the Support's Mother's anatomy. "Instead of reporting and acting like that, why don't you try supporting for randoms sometime instead of instapicking a carry?" the Support asked, as he watched the Carry return to afk-lasthitting lane creeps. "HAH, support is for noskill noobs like you!"
flanadlivv;-;One day, a wise man intoduce me into this game. "it shall protect your virginity, my lad" he said.
ASTERISK*;-;A really really amazing games
Zz!!;-;This Realy PERFECT GAME!!!
Inertia;-;Let's Have a Team Up !
Standin. Panda;-;its really enjoying :)
Leondark;-;This game gave me a reason to hate russians and also I learned a few insults along the way, would recommend every day!.
Hero;-;cool!
NighMare;-;like market in steam but problem is currency only incoming it suppose to be outgoing aswell. :P
NighMare;-;like market in steam but problem is currency only incoming it suppose to be outgoing aswell. :P
Palm Trees;-;Truly my favorite game on steam and what makes it better is that its FREE! I have many hours of gameplay on Dota and I have to say that I have never gotten bored. Great game! I reccomend it to everyone who likes action and strategy games. Fan of Starcraft or League of Legends? Take it to the next level with Dota 2.
[ ];-;when new hero dota 2 come to malaysia
what the...;-;It was a great game, both graphics and gameplay. Although I'm quite dissapointed that not all Heroes in Dota can be found in Dota 2 (yet), still im waiting for them (techies most of all since it was my favorite hero from Dota). There are a lot of improvements to the game that are happening, and I'm sure that these improvements will make this game even better than it is now.
BRUISEY;-;So good, & addictive as hell. ( **)y
Jarum|;-;This game consumes your life and makes you have no friends. 10/10
Pixxel*;-;Its ing dota... Do i really have to say more than that?
:D;-;The game is just super. Currently in it plays a lot of people, many think that DotA is played only schoolchildren and wrong. The main thing to understand the meaning of the game and learn to play)))
Saykee;-;Play Dota2 now. so much fun :)
Andre;-;DOTA RUSSIANS COSMETIC ITEMS IT DOESN'T MATTER WHAT I SAY YOU'RE GOING TO PLAY IT ANYWAY BECAUSE YOU'RE CHEAP AND IT'S FREE.
...;-;Its Amazing there are so excellent in graphics than the dota 1 .. i Like this game
Ewaemos;-;Extremely fun to play with friends
Helpikgadood;-;All the cool kids are doing it
Shit Flick;-;nic ce game free to play
Alex Walker;-;Great game!
SPYDR;-;super duper epic game in history the best game ever bulit
AJ from the backstreet boys;-;You really need to play this game for 10+ games (~5hrs) before you can even tell what's going on and figure out if it's enjoyable. At that point, if you enjoy it, congrats, you don't need to buy another game for 6 months!
404 girlfriend not found;-;it's a good game and it's my favorite game, but all I want to change in dota2 is to extend there reconnecting period if my PC is hanging, but so far is the best game that I played.
RayzCoco;-;Not for the faint of heart. But as you learn, the game gets more challenging and interesting. Don't listen to other people. Never. Especially Trolls. Have fun!
McDonagh;-;Choose life. Choose a job. Choose a career. Choose a family. Choose a ing big television, Choose washing machines, cars, compact disc players, and electrical tin can openers. Choose good health, low cholesterol and dental insurance. Choose fixed-interest mortgage repayments. Choose a starter home. Choose your friends. Choose leisure wear and matching luggage. Choose a three piece suite on hire purchase in a range of ing fabrics. Choose DIY and wondering who the  you are on a Sunday morning. Choose sitting on that couch watching mind-numbing spirit-crushing game shows, stuffing ing junk food into your mouth. Choose rotting away at the end of it all,  your last in a miserable home, nothing more than an embarrassment to the selfish, ed-up brats you have spawned to replace yourself. Choose your future. Choose life . . . But why would I want to do a thing like that? I chose not to choose life: I chose something else. And the reasons? There are no reasons. Who needs reasons when you've got Dota 2?
eye;-;this is best online rpg ..
Twerk it like miley;-;its a good game
in bad mode!!!;-;team game is awesome!
Versa;-;The Best MOBA in the world is there.
Mellasin;-;Trully addictive game... Played 2-3 games and... And u wouldn't be able to stop playing it... It's really nice, but i don't recommend it, cuz u would waste A LOT OF TIME playing Dota 2...
Vysc (INACTIVE);-;Recommended
_Fr0zen .iND-^;-;Highly Addicting Game Warning xD ...
Nr 2;-;Learned russain. 10/10! I now know what  means and only gays play in the river.
Alex Sama;-;too much leaver and scammer, should impose more strict action to those leaver and scammer, so that it will be a nice game without any spoiler
ready 2 lose;-;I can not play any other game but Dota. Everything else sucks. Dota is best. Dota is cool.
Vapor cloud;-;Good game strategy ever i play :3
Coolgatty;-;Amazing online strategy game. Even better with friends. This game has been my childhood since it was on Warcraft III and now that's its a standalone... Well, I couldn't recommend a better game...
sbREVOlution5;-;Its Kiss your life goodbye amazing
[LockeD];-;Dota 2 is game with teamwork and strategi,Dota 2 or Deffense of The Ancient
JoKeR;-;This is game is totally awesome. You can enhance almost all of your skill, starting from your calculation skills to social skills. Its a game where you can say that it is very good in all aspects and most challenging of all.
ZHUx2;-;d2 all the way.
Steezy61;-;One of the best games I have played online. Very difficult but so much fun. Literally thrown into the jungle as a beginner. Learn quick and adapt. Wide range of characters makes each experience very interesting and fun to play.
Kuple';-;This game is great
beyond noob;-;this game is very interesting
[DS] Kaerb;-;Dota2 the game of all games. The Game is ruin Friendships and make new ones. To RIP and Shred Fellow Peopl apart
<font face="Segoe script">SkYz;-;nice game ever
<font face="magneto"><i>M.D.S.N.;-;I love the way this game features how to trade buy and collect items to personalize their favorite heroes. and to play with other players around the world. keep up the good word guys! gl bol!
Chen;-;Very amazing i could cry.
kokiks.;-;cool game!
KarembongKayas;-;its a gg game
Ubur-Ubur;-;support and happy fun :)
Wrath of Bong;-;It's like having an abusive girlfriend. You'll get yelled at, stomped on, and smacked around so much you'll cry yourself to sleep every night. But every once in a great while, she'll give you a peck on the cheek and a tiny little tickle. You'll feel the greatest sense of worth and acomplishment you've ever experienced, until the beatings continue a few moments later. You know you're being beaten and bloodied every minute you spend with her, but you can't bring yourself to leave her. And you never will. 10/10
Wack;-;IMO, If you're thinking about league or dota, dota. I'll give the score, but beneath that will be reasons dota's better than the next moba you'll try to pick up. Dota2-9/10 PROS: -Every hero is free, so no real money needed. (except skins) No real money to buy that good champ you want -Good community -Much more rewarding for a skilled player. It's not that other mobas are *easy* but more towards the idea of them taking less focus. -Better graphics and particles (IMO, because some can reason that their bad) -Voice chat, allowing skilled party members to quickly say what they need to say rather than typing -Very balanced. Everything is weak against something else. CONS: -Laggy, at times. -Occasionaly you'll find a toxic player. (very rude) -Much harder to git gud at, due to high experience needed. - oh yeah, and some people stay on the wrong server, despite being spanish, brazillian, russian
Jes;-;If there were less people, that pretend they can play, it would be thousand times better, but i still love this game so much, because Valve gave a second life to Blizzard's "dotaAllstars". Thx, Valve.
zeroo00x;-;this game is too good man \m/ best game ever :P \m/ . .
FK.TheKing;-;I think i have to quit this!!!
DarkSide;-;Very Good Game
[ ________ ];-;dota 2 for everyone
SK;-;Hmph...n i thought dota1 was addictive
Woohoo;-;niceniceicniencenicneincienicneincienciencineicnisndfkljnsdkjgsd as d as das d as d asfasfashfjknasjkhfuakshfkjhasui khfk asn fsafasfas
@Sleeping_Forest@;-;Best Moba this is where it all began. Mother of all Mobas litteraly so do try it out.
<font face="Impact">BEELZEBUB;-;I REALLY LIKE THIS GAME AND IM GOING TO BE CRAZY WITHOUT THIS GAME AND I IMPROVED MY GRAMMAR AND I LEARNED HOW COOPERATE WITH THE TEAM AND I LEARNED HOW TO BE A LEADER FRIENDLY AND TEACHING OTHERS HOW TO PLAY IS SO GREAT :d PLEASE PLAY THIS GAME CUZ YOU WILL LEARN TO MANY THINGS :d
POPOOO;-;IT SO NICE TO PLAY DOTA THAT WHAY I WANT TO PLAY ALWAYS DOTA 2
Frank Zappa;-;Good Game love it long time. Its like slow nice graphics HoN. But trolls ruin the community.
ACE-_-DIC3;-;After over 700 hundered hours playing this game, I just can't get enough throughly enjoy it although there is a steep learning curve there is a helping community that will help you get there
sabre;-;Great game,the production team did an amazing job,you get updates very often.This game is NOT for CASUAL GAMERS,you HAVE to spend a lot of time on the game befor you become good at it.And this would probably be one of THE MOST ADDICTING THINGS IN THE WORLD so be careful.
Marcher;-;The Best of MOBA
1D;-;Really a Good game. Must to be play.
plinseu;-;Like So Muxh...Muahhh... but a noob bot... sad about that
Gb's;-;Recommended
LadyKnight;-;Nice Game <3 <3 <3 <3 D O T A II #DABEST
swagswag69inmybutt;-;It is full of cheesy noobs dont play it
Wva;-;Best MOBA imo. Learn how to swear in russian and filipino whilst murdering es and making racist 20y old australian pigs rage in chat and spam "calm down".
BurmisePhantom;-;nice steam community
ecko.;-;Best way to either learn  or espaol depending on which server you play on. I've tested it, and it's 10/10 better than rosetta stone!
Throws.420.daze;-;A game of 1 river & 2 ancients & 10 people trying to do different things sometimes together to cross the river when it's ok. There's also a giant rock guy & some dudes that keep running up the 3 channels to fight eachother eternally.
ratboy genius;-;if you like to click things and be really bored for an hour this is for you
Mann;-;Ruined my life.
Exrage;-;The best MOBA game !
FZ7;-;this game rocks!!
MaccasWorkerByDay...;-;Its really fun
Best Nidalee;-;Best game of my life !!
FakkU.Dicky;-;One of The Best RTS games as of now, thanks to steam my favorite game has been upgraded. good job!
Zhi;-;Stunning graphics and fantastic game!
Dzaster;-;The Best Multiplayer Game ever made ! :D
Vert1cal;-;Highly recommended game Once you play you'll never get out :D
Ken Pallav;-;Looks great and nice, But learning to play takes some time...
Fgive;-;Kotl can give mana 10/10 would recommend to all russians
Nilithar;-;I don't even know why I'm doing this to myself. 8/8 would torture self again
m4k.ShuJin;-;Dota 2 A MOBA or RTS, call whatever you like, is a game with a sole purpose to destroy each team's ancients. It originated from Warcraft 3 Frozen Throne custom map DotA popularized by Icefrog. This game can be played 1v1 solo mid, 3v3, 2v2 couple match or the most popular 5v5 with different game modes. In a 5v5 match you need to have a good synergy with hero pools chosen or drafter, a nice team play and nice communication to own and win a game. Lacking of one will entail difficulty in pushing, defending lanes and team fights. Dota2 differs from other MOBA out there in terms of hero availability, complexity of item and teamplay. For some who wants try dota, go ahead and experience a new game that will hook you to play more and more and forget about other MOBA you are in to.
J| Boto lava;-;Better than sex
aku siapa yah :);-;it's nice but hard to play
Granger Gamer;-;Brilliant game, if you've played LoL or dota 1 I would definetly recomend you try this game out :)
Stizz;-;No game makes me more mad!!!!!!! 5 stars.
Doctor Alan Thicke;-;If you want to hate your friends, play this game.
ExecutorQ3;-;once you get used to new ui (wc3 dota -> steam dota) you'll find this game at least as good as the original dota (which is awesome)
zarustica;-;Best game i ever played, so addicted. cant stop.
JustJosh;-;B.O.R.I.N.G. Best Online Really Interesting Nice Game
Standin.Natsu12;-;Its Good :D
ODRANOEL;-;I liked this Dota 2 the way it is.
<font face="Magneto">wuJu;-;It's a wonderful game
Fredda;-;This game taught me about the diversity of cultures that our small little corner of the universe offers. Then it taught me to hate them all.
Chrome;-;Side effects include: -Hatred of other humans -Lack of trust in others -Carpal Tunnel -Improved hand eye coordination -A large ego -Weight gain -Weight loss -Confidence -Despression -Extreme Racism -EXTREME RACISM -Increased strategic thinking capabilities -Mushy-brain syndrome -Subconsciously learning a new language -Subconsciously learning to hate the culture of said language -Literally every ailment that is not a transmitable disease 9/10 Doctors accepted this game on their recommendation list, but the tenth was afk
Grizzt;-;It's like roulette; fun until it turns into Russian.
psych0tic;-;Causes anxiety problems, low self esteem, Tourette's syndrome, mood swings, Bipolar disorder, breakdown of relationships, raging erections, racism. Would definitely recommend.
Sentimental Oriental;-;In Dota 2, Not many people speak your language. Not many people play well. Not many people talk nicely. Not many people work as a team. But if you find people that do... You'll have the most fun you've ever had.
Kyubashi;-;And you thought real life was a struggle.
ephir;-;I only played a little but it was fun.
Captain Obvious;-;Things I gave to DotA: 1. Money 2. Time 3. Love Things DotA gave me: 1. Arthritis 2. Carpal tunnel syndrome 3, Hatred of Russians, Mexicans, Spanish, Finnish, and Russians 4. Broken keyboard 5. Broken mouse 6. 9/10 ready 7. Server crashes 8. 4 stacks of Russians in EUW servers on English prefrence settings 9. Ranked matches 10. Free to play but Pay to win games (I.E. - Foreseer's contract, New Bloom 2015) 11. "It's in the bag" spam (especially Skywrath) 12. Multilingual cursing - I guess this is a good thing? 13. Split second math - Reliable/Unreliable gold and gold loss on death vs. Buyback availability - This is good too Essentially - DotA is a greedy woman, but I love her all the same. 11 / 10 would play again
HekaDooM;-;"THE PUB SUPPORT" "Where are wards?" The pub Carry demanded. "I placed them and they were countered" the Support began, "I am trying to juggle giving you complete lane farm, protecting you and harrassing the enemy while saving to buy more, also possibly sentries to remove their-" "UP COUR PLS" the mid hero politely added. "Give Savle" The Carry demanded. "Certainly." replies the support, using the salve on the Carry who subsequently ran headlong into an enemy creepwave. "So where is mek?" the Carry said, after he was ganked due to overextending. The Support died saving him and was treated to a rather enthusiastic series of map pings on his corpse. "Again, having not even enough to buy boots as well as wards, I don't think a 7 minute Mek is viable." The Support replies. "Haha look your level, so low, noob" the Carry retorted. "U have no item xaxa". "Well, jungle gold and experience through stacking and pulling with blocked camps is nowhere near as much as on lane which I attempted to give you, the carry, the priority over." The Carry is subsequently ganked again at the enemy tower, oblivious to the enemy tp that the Support moved away from. "Report Support, usless" The carry cried in allchat, in between mentioning various aspects of the Support's Mother's anatomy. "Instead of reporting and acting like that, why don't you try supporting for randoms sometime instead of instapicking a carry?" the Support asked, as he watched the Carry return to afk-lasthitting lane creeps. "HAH, support is for noskill noobs like you!"
flanadlivv;-;One day, a wise man intoduce me into this game. "it shall protect your virginity, my lad" he said.
ykn';-;Back in '05, this game always reminds my friends and I when choosing between dota vs. woman (good times). Good alternative for RTS gaming. exhibit-a: http://25.media.tumblr.com/tumblr_kw4xkj8ijJ1qa92yro1_500.jpg
- B A L A N C E -;-;This ..game is so . . very amazing . .aside for . .that .. 3D graphics..!
xXWolfStyleGamingXx;-;Its Laggy And Gay So Screw It
Dragon Tits;-;Get this
Flewh;-;ITS A ING GREAT GAME, make me spend 1.200 hours in game just in 4month
Ms.KongKam;-;A good strategic game which would need 5 players to cooperate.
AHOY !;-;A new and improved version of Dota 1.
Wastedmind;-;Good Game. its come very far since it was a Warcraft 3 Mod.
XMC;-;TCU DotA2
Ring;-;Awesome game, but not for the faint of heart. The amount of trashers in this game is too high.
xXx-_pEruSLaYeR_-xXx;-;Game's awesome
Reeey;-;dota 2 is better than dota if you're not remember any items
YAWAR ITS REAL!!;-;Nice game ever
The Unlucky One;-;The best teamgame/strategy game.
Millia;-;I used to suffer from chronic low blood pressure, until I started playing Dota 2. Nowadays... well, let me just say that 'low blood pressure' is the least of my various concerns. An amazing game, and an amazing cure - all for the low, low price of $0, and possibly your sanity. Yes, that's right - you don't have to pay a single cent to play! So, what are you waiting for? Give this game a go, and change yourself today - both physiologically and psychologically.
Asimi;-;+good games for everyone :) must play!
DareDevil;-;I like this game very much because it is very challenging in anyone. I dont like when the game is super revile the foreigner in the pinoy player.
decifer0826;-;liked the gameplay and the animation. what i didn't like about is the rules on steam guard.
JERRYSEINFELD;-;dota is a piece of . every  that plays this ing piece of  game is a ed up nerd . the game is flawed as . and every  is a .  yourselves .  you to hell and  your parents for being
256.DosEggies;-;This game has to be one of the most techinical games i have ever played. Dota 2 is emersive and with a good team of 5 players you can enjoy hours of domination, but with a team that lacks the bit of communication and players that are selfish, it will sink your team just like the titanic.
Nature chose her guardian well.;-;A very fun and good to play with friends.
Black^&White^;-;This is truly an amazing Game. Join now! =))
The Doctor;-;I used to play League of Legends but i found this to be a less repetitive and overall funner game, and the learning curve is very steep but its easy to get over the hump if you play wih people who know how to play and it becomes very fun indeed!
Hiro Gokua;-;Fun. But i rather play one were you have a complete view. ya know like a 3rd person. Not an overhead view.
Peach;-;don't play this game unless you speak russian.
Ep.;-;play a billion times before you get bored
[QHG]Kemosabe;-;i love this game, so many new feature compared to LOL and other RPG games out there
Valeria;-;recommended game
Castalasam;-;This is one of those games that will consume your life. No matter what you do once you start playing you will always see things that remind you of this game. It is a curse. You have been warned. 11/10
Lizzah;-;A game where teamwork is nonexistant and everyone is Russian. 10/Crimea
Mad scientist;-;It totally ruined my life.
Deself;-;Thanks Russians for good gameplay!
Zebra;-;Too much fun. Bat Rider the movie. Coming to a theater near you.
.ramaskrig;-;Tough and unforgiving. Oceans of knowledge must be acquired to "master" this game. You need thick skin to survive the community but if you play with friends or find a good group of ppl its all worth it! I highly recommend this game (!) but it is not for the feint hearted.
Red Hood;-;this game sucks
KC&PD;-;Keep calm and play Dota
Fanter;-;Great game
Timber Sellick;-;HARK, MINE NAME IS BROOKLYN KURTZ SEE MINE FACE, THY EYE AVERTZ LIFE CURSED OF FIRE, IN' HURTZ
Djosh;-;DotA is like a game of Chess, but better.
<font face="Chiller"> B O G Z;-;Check this out ! :D
Sikret.Cium Kiyoe :*;-;Best game ever on the world never being replaced. Furthermore, this next version has a lot of better features! I'm ready to spent my life playing this game!
Peg - Leg Pete;-;Best game ever <3 Gogogo Dota 2 bring it on.
Ciube - Sieg;-;Nice game for losing your social life.
MechiPlat;-;I have tried Rosetta Stone, I have tried RocketLanguages, I have even tried Tell Me More, but all have been proven to be naught but a midsummer nightmare. None of those programs have helped my progression like Dota 2. Dota 2 has proven time and time again to have by far the most powder in it's shot when it comes to russian language proficiency. With it's massive array of russian tutors, who have taught me many useful words such as '' and 'xaxaxaxaxax', I can not comprehend how anyone would find anything better. I have a face now. 10/10 would gg ez again.
L0N3W0LF;-;Awesome game,will never stop playing!!!
-Myth- Blazing Knight;-;Awesome game ever! Teamwork is a must! if no teamwork, your team lose.
Chassis;-;really2 nice game. i'm so having fun play this game
ArtOfWar;-;Good game. Helped me meet new people and make some friends.
Cookin;-;most awesome game i play.. thanks for this game
Periphery;-;Great game, really fun and i love it style of doing MOBAs, with 4 friends this game is a blast.
HueHueHue;-;The best MOBA game in the century!
Evil;-;Best E-sports ever. It literally never gets boring.
Snovvy;-;This game will kick your pansy .
Myst;-;I like friendly players especially those who helps out and play good. I hate trashtalkers and I always report every player who trashtalks.
Heidegger;-;My Grandfather smoked his whole life. I was about 10 years old when my mother said to him, 'If you ever want to see your grandchildren graduate, you have to stop immediately.'. Tears welled up in his eyes when he realized what exactly was at stake. He gave it up immediately. Three years later he died of lung cancer. It was really sad and destroyed me. My mother said to me- 'Don't ever smoke. Please don't put your family through what your Grandfather put us through." I agreed. At 28, I have never touched a cigarette. I must say, I feel a very slight sense of regret for never having done it, because this game gave me cancer anyway.
J L A B Z;-;I LOVE THIS GAME !
Haylo;-;The game itself is something wonderful. I who have only started by playing Dota 2 and not any of the other forebears such as LoL, HoN or the original Dota, must say that i love this type of strategy game. The heroes are rather amazing to play with the vast variety and the dynamic gameplay is brilliant. Granted there are some problems with the amount of updates required that do screw up the gameplay at times, Dota 2 is by far one of the best games in my opinion.
Lost;-;This MOBA game is really good to play with friends
MangKanor;-;I've played Dota for years now and it keeps getting nice. It is also Free To Play.
tsoks;-;There are some bugs I didnt like. But I really enjoy this game.
monkeygirl.abbs;-;love the graphics
Cycles 4 Days Process Heavy[SG];-;Do you have free time? Do you hate yourself? If the answer to both of these questions is yes, I'd like to introduce you to Dota 2.
GamingNaro;-;I have a freind that just moved from Russia he says that people who speak english are invading their servers...
SaLaDiN;-;best  game ever made in the planet called Earth
FakePred;-;Awesome game hard at first but amazingly fun once you get the hang of it.
Gucci2x;-;Winter is coming.. but DotA 2 is already here.
.....;-;DO NOT MISS THIS ONE OUT!
Standin.Marque;-;a very well planned game...
OBINA;-;this is a game where everyone losses their minds
KhrushPrush;-;The Best MOBA Steam has to offer. This is how all F2P games should be like. No compromise on gaming experience
();-;its good
---K---;-;VERY SEXY I TELL YOU! DOTA 2 is probably the most widely played multiplayer game online due to a reason. And that reason is that DOTA 2 is SEXY. Fullstop.
Heichou;-;This game is awesome, not just a game but use intellegence. Smart people must play this game!
DISCO STICK;-;If you never want to get anything acomplished again this is the game for you!
BenitezZz;-;in my opinion worst moba ever unless you watch alot of videos and get how it works just dumb game
Beaver sKiller;-;Good game, but it needs much time. It is free to play so why not try it ? :D
Haris;-;Experience is the best thing and u need to play better and also to be care dont get killed to many times and farming is the essence to level up heros and look around and stuff. In the first i lose alot then i started to play on new account and play better i was not geting beat up by no one expect two times. i was dominating the game. Good Luck :-) u gona need it
Gamestothemaxx;-;it takes a while to get in to, but the while is worth it!
tataw;-;Learn how to speak russian language !  !
Fraxinus;-;My parents hate me, my grades are horrid, and my girlfriend left me. 10/10 would play again.
HannesMontaigne;-;multiplayer online battle arena video game and the stand-alone sequel to the Defense of the Ancients Warcraft III: Reign of Chaos and Warcraft III: The Frozen Throne mod
321;-;Awesome game,i recommend everyone to play it.
The Bolero of Basnath;-;Don't play this game
Valentino(GOMS);-;best free game ever .Try it!!!
R.;-;The Best OF game forever.
Learc;-;Addicting when you learn the ropes and actually a lot of fun if you get into the right teams.
Rildom;-;This game made me .
[AJSA] Ningen;-;if you haven't tried this game yet , THEN DON'T DO IT , YOU DON'T NEED THIS IN YOUR LIFE , TRUST ME ! . TOO MUCH STRESS TOO MUCH DRAMA . YOU'RE WELCOME -___- NOW FOR THE BRAVE SOULS WHO ARE STILL PLANNING ON PLAYING THIS GAME DESPITE MY WARNING (IDIOTS ) : buy a cheap keyboard , will ya . you won't feel as bad when you smash it into the wall ! . that being said , gl hf
Mhuox;-;best game of them all! :)
EZ PZ;-;I like This game :D
Catdog;-;23 days ingame time and it's free. Need I say more?
Who Cares?;-;awesome game , i playing this game everyday
Sleepy;-;I wish i could be professional player :/
endril-;-;RPG football
=SherlockK=;-;The Best Game! EVER! nuff said! :3
Nature's Janio.;-;i love this game
ScubaLlama;-;This game is the Best!
Transcending Kiba;-;Almost 2,000 hours on this game. Full of laughter, hatred and my faceblood on this desk before me. I regret nothing. This game will make you hate the world and everything in it at some times, at other times it will make you jump for joy and get a bulge in your pants. To put it simply, this game is worth the hype, it can keep you entertained for hours at a time and over very long periods of time. Be it days, weeks, months. . . lifetimes. Also Robin Williams died yesterday, take a momment of silence for him.
VnC Noobtard Bryan;-;This game is a very good game. I highly recommend this game, it is perfect when you want to play with friends or family. There is nothing I dislike from this game. It's fun and I enjoy it. So if you ever get to play with me, feel free to add me on team.
King;-;More Fun Gaming. Much Enjoyable Team Fights and Challenging events
Ransom - Satisfaction;-;Like > very interesting make me want more to play Dislike > what about if updates file make be lower, less than 50MB per updates
Eric;-;Future dead gaem, play it while you can. Kappa
Savage;-;140 % of Russian recommend this game rage guaranteed
Paxxow;-;Are you old league of legends player so I recommend Dota 2 for more advanced players, and if you want to take the next step in dota games, so is dota 2 game for you. Really fun sometimes ..........
Snowman;-;Great game! must have moba
mogu mogu;-;this is awesome
I_ShalL_ReturN!;-;yes its good game
Leon - Guinness Pint Master.;-;play it it's awesome
SM.GuAutDragony;-;if you want to exchange 10 commons with HUD Skins Furnace add me to trade
[Divine]Uniro;-;Best mode to become a nolifer ...try it now!
Pu-Q'May;-;I love the collaboration in this game .. but often I see the folder users hacked
angryspook;-;i love this game, i remember how i used to play DotA on warcraft 3 and that was fantastic but with these new graphics and its standalone engine it is 100x better, just hope they release more items for heroes like shadow fiend. i would recommend it to every one.
SuperSexy_Kawaii :D;-;Bad towers are so dum
LiSzT;-;i like pawning noobs..lol.. i like dota because you can do many things even though you play in the same map all the time, still you can do many things, experiment new meta.. and specially, i realy like pawning noobs
LiSzT;-;i like pawning noobs..lol.. i like dota because you can do many things even though you play in the same map all the time, still you can do many things, experiment new meta.. and specially, i realy like pawning noobs
Chil'Lax;-;yes because it was a amazing game and annoying game
`t|nG*;-;Dota? No. Dota 2. It's different. Game On. Learn basics from reading guides, then try to make use of them to personalise your item and/or skill builds to make your game more enjoyable everytime. Never fails. Good luck! P.S. - Wasn't a fan of Dota/Dota 2 before, but after trying, it's awesome.
Einsatzkommando;-;This game should be renamed "Dota: 2 Easy Steps to Hate Peruvians". In case you're wondering what those steps are let me break it down for you: Step 1: Queue on North America West or East with English only enabled. Step 2: Enjoy your gaming experience with Peruvians who can't speak English past a preschool educational level. I'd rate this game 5 out of 5 bananas.
Ms.Cheryl;-;DOTA great game. What more can you say?
Terminus;-;Dota 2 has ruined my life in the most majestic and beautiful way. 10/10
Bjarn;-;Wanted to break my computer while playing 10/10
Ricky;-;Don't understand the hype.
Supreme Being;-;this game is so awesome i would rather play this game al night than playing with my girlfriend
JehovahKiin;-;Ever wanted to commit social suicide ? want to learn russian as you do it ? well dota is the game for you here are the four easy steps to losing your life and getting free language lessons. Step 1 select Europe west as your search region. Step 2 select All Pick. Step 3 Set the language to English (I know it sounds strange but you find more russians this way). Step 4 Press Find Match and you're there watch as your team mates feed and and curse you in russian and scream down their mics in anger and feel the learning experience that is angry russians and their gutteral language, Enjoy.
CAZBON;-;this game really cool you must try it
I AM AWESOME;-;I ILKE RAMPAGE ... YOU KNOW GG ? YEAHHH FUNYY
SipRaLLem_VenUm;-;i like this game.. much better than dota 1 because of its graphics but some heroes are not yet in game
RivaL;-;this is game is for smart people that go to school not for stupid ing peruvian/beaners that join US East servers instead of there own ing servers if you have a brain and like Strategy games this is for you if your a stupid Peruvian/Beaner this isnt a place for you. Yes i recommend 10/10
.::DouBLeDecKer::.;-;LOVE IT ~ !
ON;-;The best MOBA game i ever played
JLaw <3;-;I love Dota since the day i meet a computer and its even more awesome to play with Valve innovating it .
!<3BaNtOoSoOo<3!;-;This is so Cool and awesome game ! :D
Hop3;-;the best way how you learn about teamwork
XxJkxX;-;Game's pretty damn good specially that it contains big tournaments wich new players can watch Pro players
Computer(Easy);-;Sniper! Reloaded!
Penny;-;Very interesting.
[F.G] yyang;-;This is awesome, I'm addicted to Dota 2
Innocently Devilish;-;Awesome strategy game.
[DD] A Bearded Specialist;-;Not for the weak-hearted. This game is about russians or wanabee russians. You control one hero, with four other feeders on your team. You mostly get stomped, because you don't know how to play. After 3000 hours you become an average player. Average player in dota sucks hard. Everyone trolls you, laughs at you and flames you all the time. But you still play this game, because: every 156 games you get a nice team that talks english and cooperates. And all the other games you see a pudge in mid with a nick written like: or something like this. You will see   every other game! If you want to ruin your life and to develop a new trait called: no regard for other people, you MUST play this game.
Rawhide Kobiyashi;-;An amazing clone of the superior game league of legends. I enjoy the fact you cannot buy an entire skin but pay more money (like in tf2) to get the cool hats.
overdose142;-;Totally recommended. Has a steep learning curve but what the hell. D2 is Fun!
901;-;Best woa..
Sorrow;-;If you ever want to succesfully attend University stay away from this game!
//\/`\// /;-;wow this game is asome and its for worldwide....just for lvl1 requirments..
#ManokTales;-;Good for me :)
Little Ass Kicker;-;Better than Dota
Compoundz;-;Very very very a good game
Joe  SophiaCute;-;Dota 2 is a fanstatic game!!!
No no no -- slag him first!;-;Dota 2 is a BEAST of a game! The players you get paired up with can either be fun, challanging or difficult to play with. This game is all about communication, which is why it is an awesome game to play with friends! 10/10
XXYYXX;-;10/10 If I could go back in time, I would've said no.
John Weak;-;Dota 2 is a nice game to play with and so far the most successful and supported game in event (TI1, TI2, T13 and the overwhelming TI4), but the recent change punishment for those who failed to ready up in a game is absurd. I failed to ready up a game recently and I was prevented from match making for 24hrs (OMG). 24hrs is just absurd for unable to ready up in a game, how much more if abandoning a game? 2days? 1week? 1month? I'm just hoping punishments will be reasonable if ever I failed to ready up in a game (Not an abandon).
Noob;-;This Game is TOO COOL..... But item too high to buy
Judas the Saviour;-;Addictive
daydream in red;-;CUT CUT CUT CUT CUT CUT CUT CUT CUT CUT CUT CUT CUT CUT CUT CUT CUT CUT CUT CUT CUT CUT CUT CUT CUT CUT CUT CUT CUT CUT CUT CUT CUT CUT CUT CUT CUT CUT CUT CUT CUT CUT CUT CUT CUT CUT CUT CUT CUT CUT CUT CUT CUT CUT CUT CUT CUT CUT CUT CUT CUT CUT CUT CUT CUT CUT CUT CUT CUT CUT CUT CUT CUT CUT CUT CUT CUT CUT CUT CUT CUT CUT CUT CUT CUT CUT CUT CUT CUT CUT CUT CUT CUT CUT CUT CUT CUT CUT CUT CUT CUT CUT CUT CUT CUT CUT CUT CUT CUT CUT CUT CUT CUT CUT CUT CUT CUT CUT CUT CUT CUT CUT CUT CUT CUT CUT CUT CUT CUT CUT CUT CUT CUT CUT CUT CUT CUT CUT CUT CUT CUT CUT CUT CUT CUT CUT CUT CUT CUT CUT CUT CUT CUT CUT CUT CUT CUT CUT CUT CUT CUT CUT
??????;-;good quality and hero balance, definetely 10/10 for me
Sgt JaZz;-;Easilly the best game around! Fast paced tower/base defense with enough challenges to keep me playing for years to come :)
TVComrade;-;this is a really good game, comrades, it makes you calm, strengthens the nerves, makes you more positive, you learn to work in a team, writing "gg ez lalki" after 70 minutes of the game, praising his comrades, even if they score 0 15 0, buy carrier 20 minute and play without wards ... yes, it's a really good game.
<i><font face="magneto">l-oul;-;dota 2 its just <3 <3 <3 guys prepare urself to battle......
Get Ready to Play Barbie;-;Much Russians in American servers. Such scrubs in games. Quite fun. What a great learning tool for new language. 10/10 recommend it if you love to be a pro player like me, ggwp ez scrubs I win commend me.
kAi;-;Very exciting game
yuyechka;-;Totes recommend this MOBA fans. Amazing. Spent so many hours.
SEaB0y |.[[S]].ranger;-;love it so much
lovespacedreams;-;I started playing dota long ago and my life became progressively worse. I gained weight rapidly, I began isolating myself from social interactions and the little interactions I did participate in - I was very rude and racist towards anyone who even looked at me. Then I quit because reasons. Then my life started improving. I lost most of the weight I gained, I was dating, I got a nice job and I excelled in all my university classes. Then Dota2 came out. I was given a beta key and it sat in my steam inventory for many months taunting me. It's red glow symbolizing some deep-seated temptation that made me think of nefarious djinns of stories long forgotten. So inviting and so beautiful. But I knew it's secrets and I knew what those secrets did to me. But sadly even the strongest and tallest mountain will eventually fall and crumble to the gentle peppering of rain. After the five-hundreth (im lying, it was like 3 probs) demand that I start playing, my willpower gave in and fell into the blackness once again. I could feel some etheral blackness grasp its fingers around my still-recovering mind. As the game finished installed and I pressed that 'Play Now' button, I realized that I just jumped off the bridge that I was so very carefully constructing ever since quitting the first DOTA. Everything came rushing back to me. One game became ten and ten games became one-thousand. My girlfriend when I began again has left me already and I feel nothing but pity for her because she only wants me to leave the one I trulty love. I'm gaining weight again but whatever, I dont even care . i remember liek when my friend was like, "wanna come party after exams?" and i was like no  that lol i have an ih to do i skipped some exams tho cuz i didnt rly have much time to study cuz ti3 was hapepning and i wanted to watch enough games so i wuldnt be mad that i msised it. but i had to quit cuz im failing university and its gettin 2 expensive 2 live in campus. otherwise 10/10 good game i have 700 hours logged into dota2 and im still casual as
Kirito Enal (Peppy Player);-;dota 2 is so awesome can i have a dragonclaw hook!
Balance Breaker;-;Very Nice
Vixen;-;can dota 2 be played on the mac osx without crashing and the right click problem?
themostcolm;-;I love the strategy and crazy amount of customization. Very fun alone or with friends.
Spider.Power;-;Addictive! :D
CHUCK;-;best game ever 10 out of 10
Terrible: At CSGO;-;Terrible game. The tutorial was so boring that I didn't even bother finishing it. Though, I wasn't too excited at what await me after the tutorial either, as i've heard this is one of the most unforgiving and anti-noob communities out there. I don't understand how that yields people 1000s of hours.
Justin Bieber;-;Alot of haters in the game, they're all jealous!
PANDA;-;good game and addictive. when techies will be realese?
Arxzo (NOOB);-;It's ruining my life right now. 10/10
[SH] 24zxr;-;It's awesome
dim;-;Dota2 is Great! <3
Standin.RoruniKenshin;-;Thanks
Paul's;-;I like this game because of the graphics. It so fun i love playing dota because when im playing dota im so happy =)
riddler;-;This Game is so ing tokhmi . League of Legends is Far better than this
an0nym0us__p3ngu1n;-;Huge learning curve.
_sH;-;Don't play this game. It's a BIG waste of time.
C#;-;Greatest MOBA game ever made!
SecretShop;-;Dota 2 best game ever.. disliked the new meta
Kalisth;-;Very well done gameplay and graphics.
<b>Dear eLsa;-;this game is awesome
Pepsiman;-;haHa LoL (LeAgu3 of Leg4nDz)
Mystical Slumber God;-;I, for one, dislike the Chinese more than I do the Russkies. But seeing as how I capitalize their names, I suppose I don't dislike them that much. Also, DOTA2 needs to be revamped in a dangerous, paradigm breaking way. That's the only way it can compete with da new crazuh Blizzard MOBA with all that ghost ships and battle trolls.
Seymour Bot;-;It is a good real time strategy game and worth of playing.
||Denied;-;Aewsome game!
Rastoz<3.Unlius-.;-;Best Game In The World , DotA 2 Is My Life
Vianong;-;One of the most addicting games i have ever played...
jun.;-;10/10 . This game ruined my life :D
Hellion;-;Okay I must admit I liked this call of duty, but its very unbalanced because theres capt bloodseeker being a  to everyone including his own team, Overall i like this call of duty and battlefield: league of legends is for casual babies
Rees;-;Awesome updates workshops and more way much better than the orginal Dota.. and its easy to buy stuff..
gh;-;not recommended for noob :D !! LOL
Dafuq;-;this is a very nice strategy game but some of this players are not polite so request to ban all impolite players of DOTA 2
Dont GivE uP;-;i like this game ... but its so hard to win hahaha !!!
Ndiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiii;-;a good game in the world
Cpt.Hazard;-;What does hero truly need? That's for you to decide! ^^
R;-;Really great game ! Cool ! Fun to play with friends
BLACKodds;-;best Game ever much bettel than LOL
SGL.Charizard;-;Dota 2 is even far more better than his elder brother - Dota 1 with great game play and services, along with a big market for you to trade and earn benefit. However, since the day it became free to play, more and more  players has been joining the community and spoil it. I lost some love with it, but still, Dota 2 is the best game with the best community i have ever played
kobikik;-;The game you will never get bored.
Laikux;-;A very good game with good graphics. It is also very tactical and fun. I enjoy playing this game and I would recommend it to any gamer in the world.
S@yMyN@M3;-;one of the best GAMES ever Played !!!!
EA . pocket;-;yes, its awesome
Patrik;-;Good community
KAK TVOJA MAMA?;-;cool
K4REZK4;-;Me:Hey team im support. Teammate:Shut ye  up noob. Kiss my . Another teammate:bobo 11/10 Very friendly community
p.o.r.o.r.o.t.s;-;ultra epic... .XD volvo is the best
slightly useful;-;I AM SO BAD AT THIS GAME.
Diabolus;-;Best DotA since DotA 1
McFlail;-;never have I formed such violent/racist opinions toward foreigners. 10/10
Clitosaurus;-;if you wanna meet hot single babes from kazikstan you should play this game.
EnragedGorilla CSGOFAST.COM;-;Ive learned how much i hate other nationalitys from this game, it is amazing.
Gadnq3a;-;If you want to learn russian fast and easy this is your game!
Ke/\/T;-;The game is free to play. It is similar to Dota 1 but have better graphics and it enables you to customize you heroes, wards, courriers and other items. You need teamwork and cooperation in order to win the game.This is a great game and it is a must to have it.
Rafaxlive;-;The best MoBA game i have ever played, i highly recommend this game for everyone who like to play in a good comunity .
Froxxy~;-;My wife bought me this game, so I wouldn't cheat on her. It worked.
R;-;This is one of the game that I will always have on my pc. I like to play it whenever I have time. Very cool game.
WOWIE ZOWIE;-;Leagues is better
The Holy Spirit;-;This game can be super fun; however, it can also be the worst experience of a lifetime as well. I usually only play it if I have four other friends to queue with. That said, if you want to have a life, don't download this game. It's so time consuming and will require you to devote so much time and effort. Also, it's way better than League of Legends.
Chayb X GodLke;-;So challenging when there are no stupid players in game. But still, thumbs up!
Sicky4z;-;Great tactical game, makes me think what item would suit my situation best.
{Desshota47};-;Best Game Ever 100 000 000 peoples play that game :D
Bluerderk;-;Nice game
Osamas sidekick;-;L.O.L has nothing against this uprising in Dota 2 not hating on League but Dota has this feel mobas just wont be able to improve on or make similar to. I stopped playing this game recently but my interests to it have drwan me back. With the game becoming bigger and bigger its setting a new margain for the guys behind dota 2 but i feel what the community wants incorporated in the game willl be seen even though i feel the game is spot on for a moba( even though i havent played hero of the storms yet :p), but in other words nothing is better then F2P so go and try this game you will not regret it!
Potato;-;Don't play this game if you want to have a life. 500% recommended
Brainless Subject #1;-;it's like the first Dota, but it's TWOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOO
Colonelsmoke;-;better than league
GetLauCheeTeamIsJinSian;-;Loads of fun during the weekends, at almost zero cost!
BOOV;-;Love dis game so much :)
Chester Bennington;-;awesome , very nice game... stress relieving game!!!
Raleigh Becket;-;ENG: Dota 2 is one of the most amazing games currently avaiable for Steam users! Don't miss it! It'll surely be worth your while! xD - - - - - BRA: Dota 2  um dos jogos mais legais que esto atualmente disponveis para os usurios do Steam! No perca! Certamente valer muito a pena! xD
Spooky Scary Squig;-;This game is the perfect game to  you off and put you in a very  mood for the rest of the day, and I still love it.
Boris the Misbehavioralist;-;Dis gaem. It gode. I spend many tiem die from Ru$$an  temm8. but when not plai wit de  faks who not spik Inglish, is gud gaem. 9/11
<font face="RAVIE"> WakWao;-;World best game ever
RumPull4Skin;-;Great game, fun to play
substance abuser;-;this game will ruin ur entire life 11/10
pikOooy;-;Valve Software  2014 Valve Corporation. All rights reserved. All trademarks are property of their respective owners in the US and other countries. VAT included in all prices where applicable. Privacy Policy | Legal | Steam Subscriber Agreement
murderbits;-;I thought I enjoyed this game. I played public pick-ups for quite a bit. Having never played a MOBA before, I spent a lot of time reading up and watching videos before even playing, so that I knew some basic terminology and callouts and general strategy for two characters that I could get started with. Based on my pub experience, I would have said I felt like an average player after a few dozen hours. Nothing special, but enjoying myself and seeing that I could grow over time. Unfortunately, experiences with other players generally sucked. Almost never got a full game going. People always dropped out within the first few minutes. Nobody ever communicated (because despite being on AMER server, more than half of the players tend to be Russian, Brazilian, etc. I'm sure it wasn't enjoyable for them to be grouped with people that they couldn't communicate with, either. The one real positive aspect, I felt, was that I didn't experience much of the absolute hate and bile that MOBAs and DOTA are known for and that I was warned about before trying to play. That was, when I was playing in pubs. Then, I was invited into a group to play. I guess everyone I played with was much more experienced than me, because the game was nothing like I had experienced in pubs. I made them aware that I had no clue what I was doing and was completely new to the whole genre. Having a little experience and done some reading/video watching, I started the match off with high hopes. By the end of the match, I had experienced a bunch of yelling, and angry correction by teammates. Most frustratingly, I found myself being chastised by teammates for not doing one thing -- and then when I did as instructed, being chastised again for doing that . I don't mind being corrected. I'm open to guidance and learning how to play . . . but this experience was so frustrating. I learned nothing, as a result of being told to do one thing and then chastised for it when doing it, instead of something else. Not to mention people being audibly frustrated by my not being aware of complex combinations between characters and equipment and strategy. Something I don't see how I could be expected to know so early in my experience. As a result, that was the only grouped game I ever played. The only higher ranking non-pub game I ever played. It was also the last game of DOTA, period, that I played. I logged off and after a few days, I uninstalled the game. I have not been back in almost two years. I should clarify that I'm not easily dissuaded for games and I don't have a problem with abrasive communities (racist, hateful, etc is a different thing - but I can handle fair criticism and enjoy trash talking). This was just more than I could take. Especially combined with the incredible learning curve that ramped way up between "pub" (seeming to be worthless to play as everyone told me you don't learn anything in a pub) and actual games (way more advanced almost immediately and difficult to be of value in as a newbie). Anyway, I envy those people who have made it over that curve and somehow reached a point where they're a successful, knowledgeable, experienced player who can hold their own in serious competition and don't constantly feel like the heel dragging everyone down that everyone wants to disconnect. I just, somehow, couldn't get there. As a result, I ultimately despise this game, but can't help but recommend that someone give it a try. There are very few flaws that seem to be inherent to the game itself and the complexity and variety truly offers endless play.
Seaman;-;Great game, steep learning curve though.
.eGp [];-;BEst Game never get TireD of playing it :D
tachyonic antitelephone;-;Tiny is very happy rock 10/10
Creepy Little Beast;-;i liked this game
Calibrono;-;Such skill, very hard, much teamwork, amaze.
<font face="Broadway">TRAP4U;-;Awesome game. One will be addicted so easily. Love to play it :D If size of the update will reduced it will be more fun. Enjoy it.
Lemaxdemolished;-;Good game Well Played!! I'm enjoy with it!
Drudnik;-;TOTALLY FUN!!! WARNING: NOT SUITABLE FOR CHILDREN
D-RX;-;This is the best strategy games
LetMePlay;-;This game improved so much since it was released on the beta. There are over 90 heroes to choose from currently and the gamplay is as intence and as rewarding as DOTA 1. I know alot of people will be hesitant to try it at first but there has been a new tutorial system implemented in DOTA 2 and I think it will help new comers. I know some people who play LOL might bash in this game, but both games are compleatly different. Its like comparing COD and Battlefield, they are so different that connot be compared. (no preference on either game, I think bot of them are good) Give this game a try, the learning curve is very steep but it is rewarding when you learn. I think this is the best gave valve has ever developed and has been the most played game on steam ever since the second year of beta development. Try it out, its free and badass!
Chrisnovkaya;-;Great game!
Test;-;Great game!
TGIF(ThanksGODimFat);-;THIS GAME IS AWESOME
MoscowEL.Maxwell g2a.com;-;Cool game,nice team playing,more hero!
PHP V Python;-;IT CHANGED MY WHOLE CONCEPT OF ONLINE GAMING>>>
^(.KingdomHearts.)^;-;I love this game
Maverick;-;A very tough game to master, yet with experience and sheer patience you will spend many an hour enjoying this game. The beauty lies with the how every new Dota 2 game you undertake will be competely unique from the last.
Bot - Passive;-;LOVE 4 EVER THIS GAME :)
james;-;great game
Annaliza Pauline  <3 :*;-;I like dota 2 because it so fun and my dislike is there so many trashtalk and newbee player
AkoSiPaBebeGurl<3;-;So challenging and a great exercise for our brain on how faster our brain process in any situation
Walter Jan Hirang;-;My girlfriend broke up with me. 10/10 worth it though.
EcstasY;-;Good game, a bit overrated in my opinion.
Computer (easy);-;Guys try this game its more fun like no other. Just try it and experience extrerme fun and enjoyment. Goodluck have fun.
ImiN;-;highly recommend this game
Lelouch vi Brittania;-;great multiplayer game
DreadNought;-;Very entertaining! Takes a while to learn but keeps you hooked up for a long time.
T-Bone Biggins;-;Had a friend who played this game a lot. Got along with him well for a few years. I played this for a few hours and it's a total troll-fest. Nerve-wracking how terrible the community is in this game. It is not worth the price of free. One mistake early and you lose the whole game, but it takes about an hour for that loss to happen. So during that time you are forced to play a losing game or get penalties for quitting. Anyhow, my friend played this non-stop for a few years. Turned him into a totally rude nutbar to the point that I unfriended the prick. I think the community of this game rotted him out, luckily I never met him in real life. That would be sad, to see a real life friend get degraded into an animal before you. This game is toxic, I played enough online games to see this right away. Stay away, this is a money-making machine for Valve with psychological side-effects not worth the 'free' price-tag on the game.
<^BraddayudhA^>;-;Very nice game i think.. i very like it
moon;-;stop fooling around, play this game already!
Mimiiing-rie;-;I hope that all the heroes will be soon released :)
xNawai;-;Its alright ish
Mass Starvation;-;the mechanics are easy to understand good graphics entertaining sound effects user friendly
Genius;-;350+ Hours Later I have no friends Thanks
speedracer;-;Yo, It's extremely amazing, magnificent, brilliant, incredible, stunning, astounding, breathtaking, confounding, awesome, remarkable and spectacular. The way the game launches is just soooooooooooooooooo amazing, magnificent, brilliant, incredible, stunning, astounding, breathtaking, confounding, awesome, remarkable and spectacular. I love the champions, especially Master yi, Jax, Wukong, Lee sin, Olaf and the latest champion Azir. This game has motivated me to start smoking weed and sniff cocaine. It has shown me the right path in life. I am completely out of breath because I am in my death bed. I am currently dying. But I managed to survive up until now and hopefully will become a zombie after death. This is the best game. It is Game, IT IS LOVE, IT IS LIFE. BARNEY SINGS SONGS OF THIS GAME.
|-| JOSEPH |-|;-;good nice and cool game
Hank;-;Great game
h;-;Moba of the year
Bear Brand;-;Sir plsssss back my item from the hackers of my account... 10 Nov You traded with gnhqtcx32. 2:39pm Inscribed Heir's Glance, ''ang pako ni drow'', Grampa Sharpie's Shin Shooter, Hat of The Howling Wolf, Ahm'Hedoq the Maw, Pudgling, Glaive of the Lucent Rider, Announcer: Axe, Scorching Wings of Incantation
scott;-;the game my favourite
RussianSlayer;-;Really "FUN" and competitve game.Play if you want to be a racisist and/or you love russia. Here's an example: ME:Stun now!! The russian:  ME:ing russians.
Eltanin;-;If you're a gamer, you would probably have heard of the term MOBA which stands for Multiplayer Online Battle Arena and one of the games leading the way in that genre is DotA since that's where it basically all began. DotA 2 is a direct sequel to the original bringing us updated graphics and easier controls making the already difficult game a bit more accessible to newer people for the genre. This game is very much like a sport in which it requires lots of strategies and team-coordination in order to win. However, much like a sport, it requires time and patience to hone your skills in order to be good at it so if you're willing to put the effort into it, DotA 2 can be an extremely enjoyable and satisfying experience for you. Just be wary that there are a considerable number of players in the community who can be considered 'toxic' and can be very unfriendly. If you can somehow try to avoid them as much as possible (e.g. only playing with friends you know), you're going to have a blast with this game. Good luck and Have fun :)
Sadar;-;So good and exciting game, u must try it!
DDT-;-;cool
Ninja in Banana;-;I love this game. Because improve my team work ability. And improve strategy thinking base on many situation in game. Enjoy with your friend or solo by your self!
Frebik^;-;i used to play soccer but now dota allll dddddaaaaaay thanks any way
yourmom;-;This game is for anyone who feels that they have gaming skills
WilltheBig;-;This game is a RMOBA Russian Multiplayer Online Battle Arena 10/10
sid;-;Gonna take over your life. Even if you had none to begin with. 10/10 #totallyworthit
SneakyAdolf;-;It's a complex game with lots of champions you can play and it's a lot of fun.
Sui;-;Amazing game if you hate yourself.
Space SLoth!;-;Best game on Steam, requires alot of skill and tactics, best with friends. Most popular game on steam definetly recomend.
[PSVC] TheOddFellow;-;Sometimes a headache, always training noobs, getting ganked when it's least expected, those cheap characters (you know which ones I am talking about,) and half of your team quiting most of the time when they get pwned for acting crazy. 10/10 game. Would recommend to anyone... Welcome to the end of your life, and say goodbye to the sun.
A N T;-;Best Game For make a newfriend make a laugh and Make me happy everytime i playing this game
Lily Xeraser;-;after 6 years of DotA, here are my thoughts on Dota 2 mmr is broken as  skill gap between players is as big as valve's profits made from TF2 hats matchmaking is horrible even in rankeds. (got matched up with someone with ~100 hours, fed 3/17 as riki) at least two russians guaranteed on your team on EUW. "eu" pubs are even worse, don't get me started on them. uninstalled. also 6.82. ew. ew. ew. ewwww.
Is this real life?;-;full of s
Schutzstaffel;-;its aight
miko;-;I moved from LOL to dota2, and i do have to say. it changed my life! i am now a fully fledged russian, who arm-wrestles bears naked while drinking vodka. GLORY TO MOTHER RUSSIA
HyoeYun |;-;i love ths game. make me rich
488 GTB.;-;Been playing for so long, it still doesn't make me sick.
Dota 2 Philippine Market;-;best gamed played ever
[FaZe]Dedboys_;-;I can kill midgets with a sword if i please 11/10
Laser_bitches;-;You lose faith in humanity. Opens your eyes to the sub par intelligence of the world. Makes you feel like life isn't worthy half the time.
[AnTi]^AXEL BLAZE;-;its a nice game so no problems is present in dota2
FUCKING SHIT STING!!;-;all i can say is the game is awesome
DopePotatoe;-;The moba that started it all just got better. The original MOBA has been redesigned and tweaked to be even better. Now usually sequils are S#!% but this one ... well it's that good. Multiple servers and a rich online presence makes for a greate online experience. And the social aspect of this game keeps you coming back for more. Online cursing, Russian experts, noob name-calling has made itself a home here, so if you're starting out be prepared to get $#!5% on once again. The game has a flat match system so whether you've been playing for years or just started last week each and every person starts each match on the same level, with the same heroes and same gold. All items and purchased content are asthetic. In short FIFA for nerds. But BE WARNED this game will take over your life and ruin any chance of you having a career, true story
SUPREME-CONSPIRACY;-;addicting
eXceeD;-;Pros: Requires strategy Obviously needs teamwork to win Makes you think for others rather than yourself Awesome Hero Customizations and Skins Easy UI and Hotkeys for your convenience Requires technique and precision of skill execution (unlike similar games) Cons: Not for the greedy player Lacks old and new heroes from DotA Soloists will have a hard time playing around the map Gives you the habit of overspending because of awesome items Public pairings are very random, you either pair up with noobs or quitters or maybe Dendi or SingSing themselves. Overall, its a great game. A chip o' the old block from DotA 1(duhhh) They need to add more awesome items and customization for heroes. Same goes with the selection; no Frost Wyvern, Arc Warden, and other upcoming heroes who-knows IceFrog and the others will put.
ERG.MANGO;-;this GAME IS SUPERB not only in the sense that it have a good graphics but also you can change the heroes outfits
FistBleed;-;ruined my life cant stop play
$kull.ftw;-;1 word to say awesome
DrGreenBit;-;i really like this game ive been playing dota since when i was on year 4 and im really look forward using more new characters
<font face="Magneto">SS;-;nice game tactic and strategy !
Uncle Drew;-;Addicting.
Nobodyknows;-;BEST GAME EVER. U CAN ENTER EASY but CANT EXIT
ZipZap;-;This game is awesome and just want to recommend to all players in the world instead of becoming a drug addict.
denkA+;-;Awesome Games!!
iFk.Cheese;-;Dota 2 is like a drugs. So addictive hehehehe
Stifmaister.;-;Cool game , download it ;D
Meeto;-;Adicting game, fun to play with or without friends, takes ages to master it in every way, complex enough to have a pro scene with a bunch of money in it. Better than LoL, better than HoN, or any other MOBA game out there. Russians flooding western servers is the only problem there is. Nice one indeed
tonghop;-;Incredibly steep learning curve, incredibly insane community - but also incredibly rewarding, if you just choose to give it a chance! You will definitely not regret it!
George Potampkin;-;This is the best story driven shooter of all time!!!
MarJuk;-;Really Good
-[d0p3]-B0N3r;-;Once you DotA!! You never go Back! (Y)
Werog;-;I think DOTA 2 is the best MOBA game :)
Standin.DanQX;-;THIS GAME IS AMAZING! I've been playing for a while now and I honestly have to say it has the best community ever. I was playing in a Low Priorty match and got a full team of Russians. They are amazing players! I never knew Crystal Maiden can play mid againt an Outworld Devourer until I saw the Russians do it. When I started out; the community welcomed me by calling me their "" (i think it means brother). This was an amazing game and I'm glad I left Leauge of Lesbians for it.
Alodia Gosiengfiao;-;yes I am,this game is so annoying than others and also its a free to play game...Many can play this game because of the liscence and also many love it because of the graphic game.. Hope this can be the most number one game in steam..
ShadowHunter;-;I love playing this game! Favorite character is Night Stalker!
Blank;-;Very nice game
PlutiaIris Hearto( )o;-;Awesome game,,,,,,!!!! let play together
Grevil76;-;Friggin amazing. Cant describe with words. Definetly recommend
yanGrrS;-;Outstanding game. I Love it
YOU HAVE ASS CANCER;-;Play this game and risk your soul 11/10 play it now.
Loko ka pala eh??!!;-;Its one of the best GAME i have played!!!!
Th!s !sN0tFA!r;-;nothing more just for fun
Lukerfer;-;When your new to Dota, you feel as though everyone else overpowers you. But then, after ages of hitting that random button, you find that one hero that just suits your play style in everyway. Dota's selection of heros pretty much covers all play styles, from a tanky support, to a stealthy nuker. Though your first few games can be painful, just hang in there, baby steps, ect.
Hikikomori;-;Very frustrating game.Public matchmacking is made to test your patience.In half the games people dont speak english and in half of them they play as if they are on drugs.Definitely recommended.
Be kind, be awesome :);-;If you need a challenge in a team based game, if you want to play a game without running out of things to learn, if you're one of those having fun battleing and beating an equal opponent by outsmarting and communicating better, this is the game. Warcraft 3 Dota in better graphics, you need it.
kk;-;It will waste your life but it is so worth it! 10/10
MrFranz;-;Addicted ! :) game on !
NightWish;-;This game is just what I need..
Merlin;-;So much trolls in this game...
Duz;-;i love this game !
@===]kurama>>>>>;-;i like this dota2 games than other online games
Mc.J;-;cool
Yamans;-;Try your best, never give up and see how this game makes u happy. Best moba ever!
Grumps;-;Really fun and intense, it is quite hard so for people that are new at MOBAs may have trouble. One problem I have with the game is how painful the loses are but the wins are so glorious I want to play more. I get pretty cocky then when I lose horribly I rage a lot :P
Heisenberg;-;This is the best MOBA game ever! :) and pls, all LoL players gtfo with your  cuz nothing in that game can't compare with this beast game :)
KrayZiee;-;Keep calmits only a game
FX.fuck off;-;best shooting game ever
Eikeyo.Trades;-;i like this game so good and more fun with other player <3
Insidiousday;-;A great strategy game highly reccomendend for anyone looking for a fully interactive and customizable war game.
Kylr;-;The Game Is so great i couldnt even fap
The sweeter the cheese;-;Andrew says it 9/10. But not as good as Fallout New Vegas. RISK factions still number 1
Coskee;-;Russians everywhere
Jamal Malik;-;this game is a pile of horse shiopt
7 Heavenly Feels;-;The most friendliest community I have been, great teamworks, great teammates giving advice on what you will build you're lost on what to make, gives free russian language lessons while in doing team fights. Better gameplay you can play like you don't lag even though your ping is already over 9000 and most of all thai players gaving you advice which thais are real girls I learn from them them as well that 5 is supposed to be written as "555555555555" great community 10/10 will recommend and play
GOD OF BEARD;-;DOTA 2 oh what can i say , i had never played dota ever dota 2 was recommended to me by a friend of mine claming that its just like diablo but with PVP elements only. I always loved diablo and thought well why not. So i downloaded it the game got froze on loading screen and i was stuck. i never played it ever after that only when i saw a friend total playtime 4000 hours i was swept from feets. i reinstalled it looked for cure for that freezing bug. found it. applied it. they game ran trust me for starting 20 hours i had no clue what the  was happening. i was seeing a lot  and NOOB it was all disastrous then happened miracle. I started understaning terms like feed feeder last hit kill steal stuffs.. and from then on i have lost my job lost my gf didnt even went to my parents funeral my dog died in the same room i lived thank you DOTA 2 u have given me heavenly pleasures
Infinit3PI;-;Worst game ever. Of all time. 0/10 would play again.
henry;-;don't play this game, it will eat your soul!
ImbaQ;-;Verz tacticaly game! I like it
Harry Here<<<;-;Play Eat Repeat
Azzure [ACC];-;The best game ever. never bored with this one, awesome (y)
PAPPOY.Xenorth;-;good game ever
beaver knight;-;Wonderful game with lots of startegical turns, with skills and with team spirit. Most popular game on the planet. Play hard, go pro.
Yukiii <;-;I like dota ever i hope more rares especially tinker will post to store :)
B 4 U;-;love this game even im watching other players
buttsex.info;-;I cry when teammates are bad. Game wastes my time and money. My keybinds are weird. Help 10/10 would reccomend
Can't hold us;-;DotA 2 is one of the best games that I played. Good and bad wherever you are in the game, it all depends on your own there, not by others. you are the one who determines how you will play.
Vladimir Putin;-;When I first played the game, I was confused and didnt understand the strategy behind MOBAs. Frustrated, I quit the game for a year. But I came back to try again, I learned from my mistakes and took in some advice, along with watching a few videos on the basics of the game. Once I had a grasp of it and knew what I was doing I began to enjoy the game MUCH MUCH more. The game has great Lore, simple controls, and an easy-to-use shop. This game is also truly F2P, yes, you can buy items from the market that use actual real-world money, but these items are PURELY cosmetic, and do not give you an advantage whatsoever. Most of these cosmetic items can be earned by simply playing the game, which in my opinion makes it truly F2P. This game also has excellent Steam integration, with free guides to help you learn the game. In short, this is a fantastic game that I intend to spend many more hours playing. I fully recommend this title to gamers of all skill levels.
2Fish;-;u have to play it! thats all
Kensan.D.Whitebeard;-;the only game that teaches you the correct spelling of russian curse words.
judger90;-;Multiplayer strategy based fps game :) The best thing in game everybody is equal and a game takes 30-60 mins. You cant buy anything makes you advantageous. Its great but takes some time to learn it you can watch tournaments firstly.
Ma|D|Fat;-;everyone must play this game, because this game is amazing. is not about win the game, but this game very full of teamwork with your teammates. everyday i play this game. this is thing what i love so much
Trust Me Chicken;-;great game
wingky;-;The first, i played Dota 1 in warcalf, however, Dota 1 got very very hack map, and cheated, so I'm denied play dota, about 2012, i knew DOTA 2 but i'm no key dota 2, i cant play it, but, the end i got key, i feeling Dota 2, it my game, i can play every time i have free time. Thank for DoTa 2, it's gives relax time and passion play game.
Yoguix.R;-;Nice game
Yuka;-;best ARTS i've ever played compared to other on the same genre allthough not all of the heroes from DotA are fully ported yet.
Keisha Grey;-;i like this game it is fun to play
MaG!c M@giC;-;very good game.
Eubie,Wayne,Twinkle,Kip,andFran;-;Pls Release pitlord pls ASAP I need to RAT
:C;-;They keep telling me to unistall Dota 2 I dont undestand how they all want me too
Zero Gravity;-;Very Addictive and Wonderful Game
TWERKINGYOURFACE;-;Play for you or play for team .
qwerty;-;This Game is the Best Game i ever Played... COntinue to inspire as @Valve...! :)
Kappa;-;This game is lagging me so bad :[ cuz i have low computer.. i wish they could add settings which i can lower the quality .. etc. That can make my game smooth.. PLEASE VOLVO :C IM A DOTA player since 5 yrs old.. im only 13 so i can't afford to buy gaming equipments Q.Q please read this . A true fan, Nathaniel R. Escarez
tis CYKA is dangerous;-;Gonna ruin your life, warning dont start unless you wanna lose yourself. You will never see sunlight again.
Ghost989;-;One of the most addictive game ive ever played n intense
asdf;-;Nice game
I.C. #17FAIRPLAYz : ) D;-;aaa A.A, I >ON seECoND'2nd ?ND thouGth ''WAS AlWaYS BUG oN ITMs' EQqiPMENtssz '' [& ] AND Was DeletED< .it > IT Is Needed To Bee refre 'shd FROM: Mr ICEPLAY
HanseBOOM;-;Time that I had FUN wasting is not wasted time at all :D
Tomoko Kuroki;-;Dota 2 Is The Best Free game I've Ever Playes In Steam ^_^
<font face="Segoe Script">Yummy;-;Nice game ^_^
Bait Starkynt;-;A must play
Cea Rosetti;-;This game does it's job. So far I have only encountered one bug and it was probably because of my graphics card, so it is pretty much bug free. If you like games that have the same format as WOW, LOL or Diablo, this game is for you.
[iv.snf] Autism 101;-;This game made me stop playing CS GO 10/10
*Death*Babe*;-;great game :)
ISPATUTI;-;cool
ISPATUTI;-;cool
Joshua.;-;A very exciting and intelligent game
Try-I-I;-;I recommend this game to everyone that ever played dota 1 in Warcraft 3 or played HoN/LoL. I'm looking foward to seeing you in Dota 2.
Clover;-;Dota 2 has a competitive feel to it so if you're a MOBA player who want's to win and dominate the opposition then Dota 2 is the game for you.
<>TANDOJIS7[TH];-;All time good game
Which is nice;-;i like that dota 2 is easier to play than dota 1 and how you can play with your friends from far places
Gatsby;-;Fun game and challenging.
Hollie Schit;-;awesome game .epic
Just. [MG] 151.80.108.51:27015;-;This Thing Stole My ing Life :D
Linx;-;Awesome game. IF YOU DONT HAVE IT... GET IT!
OnlySilverMoon;-;That is a very cool!
binal;-;nice game btw but little bit low grafik
Dominant Chris;-;Russians use Dota 2 as a simulator on which country to invade next. no matter what region you pick you are always with Russians. ALWAYS! Fk can a scotsman no play a round of dota with other scotsman! Not for the noob minded
lactacyd;-;fun and strategic and most of all nid team work and patience etc. all i can say is if play this game you will be sitting all day long
softcore;-;Dota2 The Best !
what up;-;Just Think!
Nemesis;-;this game is fantastic and more animated..
Newbie;-;Nice game< I loke dota Keep Calm and Play Dota 2
IllegalToast;-;freaking awesome
Demapia;-;EPIC, but takes some time commitment if you want to be good.
Redbananaboy;-;I just tarted playibg this game and i already know my favorite hero is dragonknight
Flamee^_^;-;Interesting Game(+)
_;-;Dota 2 is <3
Krusty The Motherfucking Crab;-;It Has A Tough Learning Curve But When You Overcome It, It Offers One Of The Best Experience Out There
Brooklyn babe;-;great game :D
hAuNtEd;-;ITS AWESOMEEE!!!
simple;-;Dota 2 is the best team strategy game. you need a well coordination and understanding to win every match.
<font face="papyrus">The Boss;-;If we play together we must play at our best. . . .
<font face='IMPACT'>[Imba]Fish;-;nice game ever!!!
S A D B O Y S;-;Rat Doto, best Doto
DIN DIN;-;i really recommend this game cause its very nice
ilonenn;-;Learning Russian in Fun and Intuitive way!
Andrea;-;Hello guys <3 I really like this game!
K N ][ F E;-;The game can be played at any skill level but the beauty is that at higher levels there is so much depth that no two games are ever alike. The only issue is that it is difficult to improve without having someone (friendly) better than you who will actively call out your mistakes; in Dota 2, ignorance is not bliss.
DILDO LORD;-;love this game just play it now dude!!
Sins of Mazaltje;-;This game will frustrate you at first. Then once you get your first ultra kill, you will forget you have other games.
-yulnae(34);-;It's ruining my life .. not even my life , my future , my girlfreind and etc . GLHF
pesal228;-;nice game and its all about math...thumbs up..
a8monster;-;Great Game!
Snt V  D  L;-;i play DoTA 1.. Then DoTa 2 incoming.. I like this ghrafic but when i saw Anti-Mage hero,, he like idiot people xD Steam do u know Teror Blade & Anti-Mage is 2 brother?
Dell is so F*ckin S***;-;Very addictive game! Straight to play with ALL CHARACTERS! Gain battle points, ranks and NEW ITEMS for the characters. And its free!
crazy_revenge :D(LV);-;dota 2 trailer is so awsome and this game is so cool i dont know why stupid lol gamers hate this game
Mr. Bojangles;-;Met some russians. They fed. 10/10 would play again.
Egregious;-;well played
ThisIsHowWeeDo_it;-;cool
Slim;-;An awesome game. And im into racing and cars. A bit of a learning curve, but highly rewarding once you get into even the average skilled matches. I suggest to read Guides and practice last hitting and denying for a while in passive difficulty in a custom game. You can't get too good at last hitting.
SJ Sharkie;-;such hard game. very worth it. much pleasure. can be any caharacter you want on your side. regular moba game. but very in depth. play bots! then friedns! then make enemies >:) hehehe.
OccamaChainsaW;-;With dota i've spent almost half of my life. When i was 14 i started with warcraft 3, it was amazing :) Then few years later, friends dragged me to dota. Since that time i never really stoped playing. Few years ago Valve announced its own dota game in cooperation with icefrog. A lot of my mates were sceptical (because of previous attempts for "new dota" - LoL and HoN - were ultimate failure to them). I wasn't, because of icefrog. Since the very beginning i believed in icefrog and in valve and just few weeks after first international i got my own betakey and started to play it. From the very beggining i was so excited about this. Icefrog kept EVERYTHING same, just upgraded things that needed upgrade (graphics, some key mechanics which were limited by warcraft). Ive spent over 10 000 hours in dota2 (dont get confused by hours count on this account ive got a lot of "smurfs") and countless hours in dota overall. Ive met hundreds of amazing people on offline tournaments just because of dota. Countless of amazing people online. For almost decade this game was part of my life and i gotta say THANK YOU ICEFROG AND VALVE AND EVERYONE INVOLVED IN THIS. Dota 4ever <3
<font face="symbol">Vaal;-;I like the game so much! i am addicted to the game! but i dont like the idea when someone is noob to play, reported by other player for playing noob! Maybe he is a beginner, why blame it to him when the team is lossing.
123!@#321;-;i want more team work to win the Game Support must always buy WArd Hitter must be hit Tanker must be Tank Farmer must be fast farm
mich;-;this game is awesome. i love killed someone and being pro lol
cuMi;-;show us ur team skill n try it.. LOOOL
R.A.M.B.O;-;real addictive , and fun to play if you have a nice team or else you are DOOMED for 40 mins of your life
Origin;-;Awesome game~ Very addictive :)
Ren Chon;-;a addictive game 9/10
Scrabu;-;10/10 would cm again
Ashtal'Doralan;-;this game is supremely addictive lol,obviously it's more awesome than the previous version :D TOTALLY recommended towards girls who are also trying to find a good game!
jae;-;it's fun until some  steals your last-hits
fere_ta_lek;-;Fak LoL,the king is back.Pick kotol asap, and giff mana to your russian teamates!
NBsible;-;This game has given me sleepless nights. I tend to play a hero and learn about its skills and practice on how to master the appropriate strategy. Sometimes I fail because I let my guard down but it is still part of the game. The online concept of Dota 2 is better since I get a chance to play with everybody. The All Hero Challenge is the best feature I think since I have to play all characters to complete the cycle. Please fix all bugs on this challenge so we may be able to proceed and enjoy the game.
admin;-;i have more than 500+ hours of playing in my previous account and now I current have 100+ hours playing in this account. Definitely a great game. The community is one of the best, if not the best. :)
Game Over Kids;-;install this and your life will never be the same
team secret;-;this is the best game i played till now.
JUGGERNAUT^;-;awesome very addictive
Kunkka;-;This game is ing awesome
WrathOfZombies;-;Amazing Game :) Addictive
Ekko;-;I guess it's alright, played only 3k hours but, meh.
(BDPS)Betone;-;I'ts so awesome , Dota 2 increases your thinking and your speed .
Splicer;-;dont heff 2 b med, is only game
MACACO BRISA;-;Every time I play I yell and people and become slightly racist 10/10.
7/9/15;-;IT's F*CKI'N Great
SoundCLOUD11;-;the best strategy game
el cinto;-;If you truly want to abuse and punish yourself then this game is for you.
Coke Sakto;-;that good :)
Margo Roth Spiegelman;-;Addictive game! Just play moderately
Ambrose;-;Quite possibly the best game I have ever played. Definitely a must. Also, so much better than League of Legeds.This is for the OG's. Original Gamers. ;D
junex;-;this game is so cool ^_______^
! Add New ID : 197612844;-;The Best Game In world . i can only say it . Dota 2 Is Best Game :X
DayFree;-;this is really a great game.
Element X;-;It's overall a good game. There are some issues though, but overall i recomend people to try it. :D
{PDGR}stavgiannis;-;Very nice game
MasterOfCard;-;i like this game , because this game so make me fun :)
143;-;It's beautiful and good game, I recomended this game your :)
[Fungilord];-;Play dota they said. It would be fun, they said. They were right.
CAPT. B;-;Its so Beautfiul :D
mad2beher3;-;sounds good
Amr Nasser;-;Just Epic Game !
Violinist!;-;this game will make u fun and happy
eiberskeiber;-;Most people on steam have probably heard the name of this game countless times now. So let me give you a short and simple review on it. Get it. Now that that's out of the way try and use the tips I am about to give you so you can get he best possible experience that this game has to offer. Dota 2 has a steep learning curve meaning you can't just jump in there and expect to know what you are doing. When you first launch the game as of recently you are taught how to play through the tutorial the game has to offer. Actually pay attention to this or it will bite you in the  when you are actually playing. Once you get that over with you're probably going to say to yourself "Ok I think I get what I am doing, let me play online matchmaking" Here's one simple answer for you; NO. Dota 2 requires a team effort, and what I mean by a team effort is that if 1 person does something it will affect the team. If 1 person does bad, the team will take the toll of that 1 person. So if you are going straight into matchmaking with almost no experience, you are most likely going to die a lot, get yelled at, close the game, and never come back. Trust me I should know because that was my first experience with Dota 2. Now what I do recommend you do is either practice by yourself or with friends in an offline bot match. That way if you do bad you don't feel bad for perhaps costing the team the game. Not only is this better, as you keep playing you will learn more and more about the game. Try and find someone that is experienced to help you understand the game and help you progress in skill for it. Once you feel that you are more knowledgeable about the game you can go ahead and do perhaps coop bot and then onto the traditional matchmaking where it is 5v5 team fights. Dota 2 is one my favorite games to date. The fact that I have this gem another chance makes me lucky. Try to follow the tips I provided in this recommendation and I guarantee you that you will not be dissappointed with Dota 2.
Cartman;-;AWesome Moba GAme
<font face="impact">Meliodas;-;Good game Ever
[F - Bone] Skies1985;-;so nice game and enjoyable....
() YUKI ();-;Abusive community, Laggy servers, Buggy has hell. 10/10 would recommend to friends
BreTooooT;-;I liked this game because it was really balanced .. it was very tight till the very end.
Terms And Conditions;-;really fun, i recommend getting this game, takes a while to learn the mechanics but its all worth it!
zypreLL;-;cool :)
EDITHA C. IGNACIO;-;This game is awesome you can forget your problems by playing this game, so I recommend you guys to try this awesome stuff of steam! :))
Ivy;-;I like this game you can buy sell and trade item's. It has a good effects and balance character.
hoo;-;Dota is the most populer game
SkaDi;-;Nice and fair game for all
xD.Jung;-;Wow you're Nice :D
Cheng <3 <3 \m/;-;cool. :)
Xlord Fazar;-;An evolution of the Defense of the Ancients (a spin off from Warcraft 3). It has the signiture and feel of its predicesor with a much added kick in graphics and almost everything else. The game tries its best to branch out from its older version and I must say, it is succeding with every step it makes. The biggest thing though which separates it greatly from the the old DOTA is the market place and the punishment system, which punishes players for leaving the game unfinished and for being rude to other players. It is this system which separates and cements this game into something of a higher level. The only downside is that you need a gaming computer with high end specs in order to enjoy the game 100 percent. While most first world country won't have any problems with this, players living in third world countries might have an unfair disadvantage when playing online. Overall, the game raises the bar for other games out there in this genre.
New'Epic;-;why always crash in macbook air? need solution
janjan;-;Awesome-sauce game is awesome. It's one of those games that even though you suck at it, you still come back for more. xD PYRION FLAX IS AWESOME!
UTENLAMY;-;This is a nice game.
CN.Ikhsan;-;its not how good you play .. its how good your teamwork !! You play good + Team very noob = lose You play noob + Team play good = lose You play good + Team play good =win/lose depend on the other team strategy ! So , if you wanna win this game you need play smart,fast and support other player on your team :)
Deviljin;-;ya it sucks...bt its good
gamewizzardd;-;Great game. I'm addicted to it!
sheet*;-;One of the best games ive played in a while.
Fendy;-;This is a good game. You can challange your friend for a 1 by 1 clash or play with public against public.
Fan of Values;-;This game was so amazing , it has almost changed my life ! I drop school ! addicted to the game . My family was very upset ! Thanks valve for being so good in this game !
Anonymous;-;The best RPG game existed today, with the largest e-sports winning prize money ever!!!
hachii;-;I recommend this game to people that used to play warcraft III a.k.a Frozen throne . this is the best
Pramadito;-;IF YOU ARE NEW TO DOTA, BEFORE YOU WANT TO TRY THIS GAME. PLEASE SAID TO YOURSELF." I WILL SACRIFE MY VIRGINITY, MY TIME, MY FRIENDSHIP, MY HOPE AND MY LIFE FOR LORD GABEN, ICEFROG AND THIS GAME'. BEWARE ONCE YOU KNOW THE MECHANIC OF THIS GAME YOU WILL NEVER COME BACK TO YOUR PREVIOUS LIFE. MORE ADDICTIVE THAN DRUG AND TOBBACO!. would definely recommend to play game 10/10. and also
<blank>K;-;Love this game forever
Tuomari Turmio;-;By playing this game you can learn a new stage of rage.
Don Savage;-;Virtual chess where the team is as good as its weakest player. 10/10.
mcbalut;-;Good game for idiots
RR;-;its so fun
Dragon I, the Wicked;-;Best Game EVER!!!!!!!!!! More strategy than chess.
MiShKAt0R;-;AMAZING/TACTICAL GAME 10/10.
Fredda;-;This game taught me about the diversity of cultures that our small little corner of the universe offers. Then it taught me to hate them all.
Chrome;-;Side effects include: -Hatred of other humans -Lack of trust in others -Carpal Tunnel -Improved hand eye coordination -A large ego -Weight gain -Weight loss -Confidence -Despression -Extreme Racism -EXTREME RACISM -Increased strategic thinking capabilities -Mushy-brain syndrome -Subconsciously learning a new language -Subconsciously learning to hate the culture of said language -Literally every ailment that is not a transmitable disease 9/10 Doctors accepted this game on their recommendation list, but the tenth was afk
Grizzt;-;It's like roulette; fun until it turns into Russian.
psych0tic;-;Causes anxiety problems, low self esteem, Tourette's syndrome, mood swings, Bipolar disorder, breakdown of relationships, raging erections, racism. Would definitely recommend.
Sentimental Oriental;-;In Dota 2, Not many people speak your language. Not many people play well. Not many people talk nicely. Not many people work as a team. But if you find people that do... You'll have the most fun you've ever had.
Kyubashi;-;And you thought real life was a struggle.
ephir;-;I only played a little but it was fun.
Captain Obvious;-;Things I gave to DotA: 1. Money 2. Time 3. Love Things DotA gave me: 1. Arthritis 2. Carpal tunnel syndrome 3, Hatred of Russians, Mexicans, Spanish, Finnish, and Russians 4. Broken keyboard 5. Broken mouse 6. 9/10 ready 7. Server crashes 8. 4 stacks of Russians in EUW servers on English prefrence settings 9. Ranked matches 10. Free to play but Pay to win games (I.E. - Foreseer's contract, New Bloom 2015) 11. "It's in the bag" spam (especially Skywrath) 12. Multilingual cursing - I guess this is a good thing? 13. Split second math - Reliable/Unreliable gold and gold loss on death vs. Buyback availability - This is good too Essentially - DotA is a greedy woman, but I love her all the same. 11 / 10 would play again
HekaDooM;-;"THE PUB SUPPORT" "Where are wards?" The pub Carry demanded. "I placed them and they were countered" the Support began, "I am trying to juggle giving you complete lane farm, protecting you and harrassing the enemy while saving to buy more, also possibly sentries to remove their-" "UP COUR PLS" the mid hero politely added. "Give Savle" The Carry demanded. "Certainly." replies the support, using the salve on the Carry who subsequently ran headlong into an enemy creepwave. "So where is mek?" the Carry said, after he was ganked due to overextending. The Support died saving him and was treated to a rather enthusiastic series of map pings on his corpse. "Again, having not even enough to buy boots as well as wards, I don't think a 7 minute Mek is viable." The Support replies. "Haha look your level, so low, noob" the Carry retorted. "U have no item xaxa". "Well, jungle gold and experience through stacking and pulling with blocked camps is nowhere near as much as on lane which I attempted to give you, the carry, the priority over." The Carry is subsequently ganked again at the enemy tower, oblivious to the enemy tp that the Support moved away from. "Report Support, usless" The carry cried in allchat, in between mentioning various aspects of the Support's Mother's anatomy. "Instead of reporting and acting like that, why don't you try supporting for randoms sometime instead of instapicking a carry?" the Support asked, as he watched the Carry return to afk-lasthitting lane creeps. "HAH, support is for noskill noobs like you!"
flanadlivv;-;One day, a wise man intoduce me into this game. "it shall protect your virginity, my lad" he said.
iRemedy;-;After hours and hours of torture you will finally wake up and realize you were wasting your time. You will never be a pro, never be a star, so give up now. Don't play this soul sucking game. Get out while you still can. Just go buy destiny or something. Please save yourself you go damn feeding .
Iolaz^_^;-;i like this game very much.. disliked about this is everyday updatinng^_^
Drunk Bruce;-;It's free. What the hell are you doing?
________________________________;-;Very punishing yet very rewarding. Not for the faint hearted LOL
@>Jm <3;-;This Game Is Verry Good Many people WAnt this 2 play..
VRyanF;-;Addicted game.. You must try this,,
Gid:;-;Dota 2 is a great MOBA game for all to play, and is highly reccomended is you are familiar with Smite or League of Legends, which are also other great MOBA games. The Steam version is especially useful because of cross-platform support and big community to help you along the way. All in all, the game Dota 2 is a great free-to-play game that all should get. Submitted by Gid. funnygid123 on YouTube.
BmT;-;must play ess mr chow saying it ess
afnir;-;It's ok
PrettyGirlDuecey;-;Consumes your life, 10/10 would play again
SND BMW M5;-;Great game. Just attracts you. It is basically a weird game that people play coz they just want to compete with frndz or over XP them. But after te4chies update :3. The game is lagging. and steam community takes time to show its msg in game
mocker;-;Awesome game. Thanks to halflife valve. Ps: This game can change you life.
JFK;-;Words actually don't describe the adrenaline I get when I drive by 5 people and 4 I hit in-game.
kokocrunch;-;I love this game!
BN;-;i like this game because of the special and unique program graphics
Kentang;-;Good game and Competitive. I Like this game so much
UlTiMaTe_DaRkSlAyEr;-;The game is so cool
JONKY <3;-;Very Nice
666;-;this game is for all who want thrill and action.
coOl Kid \m/;-;this is so fun
***Manigga***;-;Hi Everyone :D
veeeeeeeeeeeeen;-;game is hard. life is easy.
SIX-SIX;-;amazing game ever ! i cant stop to playing dota 2
HANCUR;-;The best of the years game
+edidge~;-;its an awesome copatative game
CoolDev;-;This game can make your mind to practice multi tasking ....
GMG [MZW;-;The extent of the game is just enormous! Every game even with exactly same 10 heroes is different every time. Ofcourse community judging by in-game experience of 4000h is quite discouraging and offensive but which games' isn't? Over the years of evolution and growth of players in Dota 2 i've noticed that even people from all around a world can work together as a team, sometimes even without any marks, pings or words. Ofcourse there will be dissagreenment with players cause it's competetivity that keeps hatred directing to anyone alse but yourself. I can say that people should pay ABIT more attention to people in your team or at least watch a replay of your own game when you lost or won with quite a bad score. Examine your mistakes rather then blame others and you'll find the interest and pleasure that i found n this game. Best regards to Valve, don't promise something you're planing to make on exact date. Better notify us with a word AROUND on updates' and changes' dates ;) 9/10
Morag The Dread;-;As you might know DOTA 2 is a MOBA game, but despite the others games I think DOTA is better. You may ask ''why ?'' , the answer is simple : you can customise Heroes for free and as you want, you can choose your favourite HUD and Announcer.Now about graphics,they are really good even in low quality and imagine if in low quality are that good think how good they can be at high quality.Dota has a darker concept for the Heroes.And at last the gameplay,well,most of MOBA players are saying that is harder.I found it really easy once you learn the items and how that Hero is supposed to go.Maybe I found it easier because is a more strategic game than the other games.I can say only this except Dota 2 I've played 4 other Mobas and the most I've enjoyed is Dota 2. I don't force you to play and like this game ,but I hope you will try at least to play a while and enjoy your play. Good luck & have fun !
<u>stephen curry;-;this game is really something lots of adventures and tactics it was superb awesome
FantasyFreak_UK;-;This game has not got much to it on paper; 2 teams with a base each with 3 ways in defended by evenly placed towers. However, it is still playable and addictive with loads of characters and item combinations across teams each game is different and lasts about 30-40 mins. It started as a Warcraft 3 mod so expect some familiar concepts. It is going to be free to play at some point so when it is I would at least give it a go You can also buy cosmetic items but nothing to give an advantage over the moaning cheapskates ;-)
Gumi;-;Endless addiction, the possible outcome from every game is different. Play till you drop
Rocker_lvl100;-;exiting
[#TWN]Snaxington;-;I waited so long for this... Twas worth the wait.
JEDI;-;it's really good!!!
Penultimo;-;come to play,,
Freezerburn;-;Very nice game. It's my chance to training my gaming skills
HaskieS;-;This game is not just about kill or be killed, but also about how you can save your friend. accordance with selogannya "free to play" I think this game is very comfortable and not boring when played every day. This is a new world in which a person between countries met and fantasize in the same game
TheeMust;-;addicted game :v
k h o i `;-;i love this game it really helps me killing time lol. and its so much fun too play, but i dont like the players who is racist. :D
Happy-Go-Lucky;-;Try to play this more often...for more trades,items & xp!
Kramned;-;Play hard this game
DamnSohai;-;Really Good Game :>
NuclearDestro;-;This game is very addicting and also very fun. I have to say i enjoyed playing every single bit of this game with a variety of heroes you can use. The servers are really near to where you live and I can play at around 20-50 Ping and with no lag. Although the game is fun, it has a learning curve and it also takes a while to get used to. My final verdict for this game overall is a 9/10, Simply Outstanding. Edit: Game also develops racism towards people. Best exclusive feature a game can have
M.I.;-;If you have hours upon hours of uninterruptable spare time then by all means passive-aggressively breathe into a microphone from anywhere from 5 minutes to over 90 minutes. P.S thanks for taking my money. . . fgtcunts
Rocky;-;Owesome game No one beat this game in my life..!! :) :D
Psychopath_;-;EVERYONE CANT STOP FROM PLAYING DOTA 2 RIGHT? :) .. I WULD AGREE WITH THAT.. LOVE THE GAME
DoctorSmoke;-;I ate a tree and my medical condition improved 11/10
Monkey Trouble;-;You have to play with other people, who are always bad. But other than than that I rate it a 10/10 would play again.
PowerOfLove;-;please i want oracle :3
BnB;-;A great PvP game that offers some of the most intriguing and nuanced team combat around.
Natan;-;Ruined my life. 10/10 stars :D
Dragan-chan;-;It's a very fun team based game, in fact one of the best in the world.
gR4ndm45t3R;-;the best game ever.... i played many many games like cod cs nfs gta crysis max payne and what not nothing matches this game
Heart a Tag;-;nice :) DOTA2 is Great Game (y)
Generation 9;-;Valve Corporation is a nice corporation and All rights reserved. I enjoy playing your games
catdash;-;I cannot tell you how much I love this game. one of the best thing s about it is its versitility: wanna play a casual game for 5 mins? sure play 1v1 mid lane practice, or a limited heros match. wanna play and extreamly complicated and intense game with 9 other players for 30-60 mins? go play a 5v5 all pick ranked match, or a random death match. If you are willing to study the inerworkings of the game it can be even more fun. you'll also meet lots of new freinds! ^_^ and on top of ALL THAT it's FREE. F-R-E-E, how could you turn such a great game down?
P-I-B|Zephyr;-;One of the most in depth and fun games to hit the web, a daunting character pool with new additions keeps the game alive and fresh. It has a steep learning curve that you never can escape, but that keeps the fun flowing!
The Katmandoes!;-;Dota 2 is one of the best games i've ever played. I played warcraft 3 a bunch and dota 1 from that. I fell in love with the game mechanics and the amazing humor of it all.
Lianella;-;Great game, very addicting. So many hours.
Jamiman [The Engirthed];-;One of the best, if most complicated games i have ever played.
Doublehelix2k;-;Hard to get the hang of but after the game opens up for every thing! Its a 10/10 will not stop playing!
Reality;-;Good game to play
Evolve.Valentine;-;great game! awesome!
Minato Arisato;-;Frustration, deep-seated anger and then joyous release. Masturbation Simulator 2014.
Uknown_this;-;Dota is a competitive game of action and strategy, played both professionally and casually
Vergil;-;An awesome game for people who are tired of games that rely mostly on grinding and farming for hours to become the best player. This game introduces you to a new perspective where skill and team play is what the game needs to win matches. It never gets boring and alot of heroes to choose from. 10/10
Shard Tygar;-;Good as ghee. ing sick. Thumbs up. 10/10 would do gen.
+18 Profile;-;Won this game with 4 russians in my team... Im pretty sure i can nail Dark Souls, though i never played it before.
Commissar Sayle;-;9/10. I got sick of playing it too much! It's very addicting, even though it's almost exactly like LOL. :3
take it easy, just a game;-;This game is a drug
F.E.A.R;-;very nice game
[A]dmiralKappa;-;One of the games that don't need to be reviewed.
!C0n_Me;-;good in playing
[ ];-;nice game.... and good graphics
[Evol^Si^Live]^|JukeBox;-;Nice game
htn_evilS;-;Better than everything
3;-;his graphics is very good and i love this game :P
A V E V A;-;SKYWRATH MAGE sing a song for rainy day, Even the sniper hunt to get food everyday, What hope can ZEUS summons nowaday, To bring back the humanity happiness yesteday?, Because the world are broken without dota all day. The answer is MID OR FEED today
zerg.(_);-;Superior graphics compared to other ARTS games. Gameplay almost the same as in DotA with improved comunication between players, key configurations, disconnect protection, etc.. Always fun to play!
Fuckin' Cookie Monster;-;I downloaded this game for the kicks. I thought it would make me cool. Everyone said it was dangorus. I keep telling myself i would only do it once. Now all my money goes to dota 2. I must have all the hats. All the swords. all the ing immortals. I keep saying i need help. But i just buy more curiers.....and........All the time in my brain I hear........... cyka report noob.
BaRbQUe;-;10/10 in my book. Great gameplay, very competitive, and hugely populated. Understanding heros can be harder than other games, but the victories feel more rewarding. Plus the game is free!
`Chuck;-;Awesome game got addicted <3
Naughty Senpai;-;After I played this game my cancer was cured. Thank you, IceFrog!
ID-IE-IN;-;The No. 1 Game Ever!
Stank and Dank;-;Dude,I used to have such a rough time with this game unitl I beat the final boss and finally beat it. Now it's super easy, I can't wait for Dota 3 to hurry up and come out.
NiGhtHallOw;-;The Best Game Ever!!!... Lolz...haha #Dota2Player...
Mitchydoge;-;If you like playing with russians then this is the game for you - putin/10
Mr.Boombastic;-;Must play This Game . (MUST)
EZT;-;this game +1 good
Zirvhirex;-;My favorite game to play. Its free to play and very fun for being free to play. It's a competitive game though and is not suited for the casual gamer. I recommend this game to anybody who has had experience with RTS or other MOBA's.
Namn;-;qwerty
burgatory;-;good games from valve !
karryS` 2Pac with b;-;This game is so awesome :D
*Mystic*;-;Recomended game plz
Ahok (Frederic Chopin);-;Simply irresistible and addictive as hell.
Frvr;-;Play Hard
Tole;-;better than dota1
NerO;-;nice,but the updates can make the game slow to improve..
#ello;-;This game is awesome! One of 'THE' best strategy games I've ever played.
Alienator391;-;I love this game , simply the best
TonTon;-;Fun to play :D
Neicon the Patriot;-;Only need 6 words to describe Dota 2.... IT'S THE BEST FREAKING GAME EVER
Simple.Swagg;-;I like everything about this game. I recommend this game to all. :3
<~`Keep Calm And Use Omnislash`~;-;dota2 is my favourite games...
HEISENBERG;-;DO YOU PLAYED THIS GAME?BEST GAME EVER!!!
UnborN ._.;-;not as cool as league of legends but this is FREE TO PLAY guys :| Those who choose to commit to Dota 2 will find many happy hours ! be sure ! trust me . 10/10
M60;-;It's a great leap from DOTA 1 and it has a lot of visual enhancements and the interface is great where it allows one to get everything without having to jump around from site to site.
Panic! At The Disco;-;This game ROCKS!!
Samskor;-;Dota is a game that can not be described in a few words, nor can it be mastered in a few hours. You will find yourself playing dota to learn it in the first 200hrs and then you will keep playing it because you just cant get enough. One would think that 200 hours is crazy but trust me and try this game out and you will find yourself over 1k hours on it just like me, who in all honesty started out as the biggest noob in dota, maybe I still am but you just can't stop playing this game. I give it a 9/10. 9 because sometimes the community will get you mad and make you not wanting t play for a while... just a while. :)
E X I A;-;Still the best RTS game ever! thanks to IceFrog for making "DOTA"!
Look dad you go;-;Perfect game
Yellow Star;-;good game actually
Gazbag;-;Without doubt the best moba out there. But I got to be honest, it's hard to master, it's ruthless, and the community is generally awful but if you can endure these things you will have an awesome experience playing it.
acakhan;-;Although much easier than Dota1, Dota 2 is a circuit of sophistication and classic that brings MOBA games! I recommend you to download it and enjoy every minute "spent" on it. GL HF :D
Yimo;-;Addictive. But should have seperated into more servers for different country, too much ununderstandable languages.
Smile;-;you'll play it a bunch
YOGIE NAINGGOLAN (.Y.);-;and?
Nedulator;-;Get this game, I hate it<3
akastus;-;Dota 2 tell my a history about the best guy in the world peruvian pick pudge and go mid.. And the russian carry on SA server. So Dota 2 is a terrible cancer in stupid  cyka  and tell history about jajajajajjajajajajjaja
Fanta;-;Nice and competitive game
A'C'T;-;The Best game i ever Played
`Kricr;-;A standard match of Dota 2 features the strongholds of two opposing factions, the Radiant and the Dire, containing critical structures called "Ancients", which are surrounded by a number of lesser buildings. The bases of these two factions are connected by three main paths, referred to as "lanes", which are guarded by defensive towers, as well as autonomous units called "creeps", which periodically spawn in groups and traverse the lanes, attacking enemy units or structures they encounter. The Dota 2 map is functionally symmetrical, despite having a number of critical differences conferring a variety of advantages and disadvantages to each side. The Radiant is based at the southwest corner of the map, while the Dire is based at the northeast corner; the two sides are divided by a river that runs perpendicular to the central lane. The two teams, typically composed of five players each, are pitted against one another to compete as the defenders for their respective Ancients.[6] Featured across the map are hostile units referred to as "neutrals", which are not aligned to either faction and are primarily located in the forests. Located on the northeast side of the river is a "boss" called "Roshan", who typically requires multiple team members to kill and drops strategically powerful items.
Daily Daily Temper;-;THE MOST AWESOME GAME EVER
Well;-;Great Game but too much toxic players
Phoenix;-;12/10 you cant teabag people but if you could it would be a 666/10
jokur;-;Best MOBA Game Ever... I'm addicted to this... HFGL all
BevAlen;-;I love this game...
Booyah;-;Dota is life.
Fluffyfrogs;-;This game will make you use all the words in the world. Aka - Abuse, Swearing and Racism
Senpai Yuri-sama;-;Great game! 10/10
ALAXAN_FR.;-;NICE GAME>> EVER
Minions ft. TurtleNet;-;adjusting to the game
[Legend]: Radjelzy85;-;i like this game but many players are bullying!
BackToTheFuhrer;-;great game
Twerk It Like Miley;-;Great Game It's Very Awsome
Wat Da Pak;-;This game is truly awsome. made my day... good game keep it up
Gustav;-;Great game for making both friends and enemies! 10/10
Om Nom;-;Just the game i wanted...
oxyuranus;-;The Greatest Game of All Time
snotboemjunior;-;Great game
rapu;-;Best competitive game i've ever played.
[[====Black|Star.....S2;-;nice game you should try this
PreyingMantis;-;It will slowly eat you from inside until you feel nothing but a cold stone in place of your heart. 11/10.
[D.F] 95% Taco Bell;-;Many people suffer from not hating Russians or Brazilians enough. I should know, I had this problem for 10 years, but thanks to Dota 2 now I don't. With this game you'll end up reporting every Brazilian and Russian player you come across and enjoying it each and every time.
Leftyy;-;Love this game, can be a bit difficult to gwt used to but is really fun!!!
be Ice, my friend;-;The best, not only a game, a life style! Better than chess. The future of the games
NotLegit1337;-;Riot Pls Nerf : riki techies dota 2 icefrog dendi dota 1 obsever wards ty
Jouel Miranda;-;this game is awesome :yay: ^_^
Dreamworks;-;Dota 2! Best MOBA game in the world!
[FUCKSHIPTARI] Kiko;-;If you love russian stacks this is the game for you 11/10
Thirty-;-;Nice Graphics, Nice GamePlay, you must try it ! now!
Se7;-;A very good game, ++++
Zel N/R;-;I love dota 2 because it challanges me using ma brain powaaa
Tamake^Fujin;-;i love this game this make me mad all the time... :D
The Grudge;-;Nice And Shine
Armotorn(music);-;Great game, easy to loose track of time while playing.
A BAG A MYSTERY MEAT;-;Gabe I'm coming for your sweet
Scrooge McDuck;-;Best in the genre hands down
DotaPie;-;why i would recommend this game is once u get your first item you will want them all love it when new things come out because ill want them and when u first get into the game you'll have no idea what your doing but as you play more and more you will learn that the game is really fun the only downside is when the spanish and russian people are on us servers so thats why i think you should play dota i give it a 10/10 best free 2 play game ever
<b><font face="papyrus">BEAST;-;This is a sport!
OHBOYATRIPLE;-;Pretty good game.
OHBOYATRIPLE;-;Pretty good game.
Nirrti X;-;Awesome game! What beats running around with a hero fighting other heroes while leveling up? If you have not played the DOTA mod for Warcraft III or DemiGod give this a try. Why not? After all it is free, and no it is not pay to win kinda free. The community is sometimes kinda rough for newer players, so I would not let it discourage you from playing. You could jsut do what I do and ignore them.
Sterling Archer;-;why would you play any other MOBA? thats right, you shouldn't. GG
Lefteris;-;Opposite of Loser Legends 2gud game
Existential Nihilism;-;The best MOBA game out there. LoL will never be as good as Dota 2. Only the EuEast and EuWest community isn't the best.
SultanyZ;-;This game is AWESOME ....
Truck;-;Great game but needs a better way to enforce teamwork.
Monkey Man;-;Over 300 Hours logged into this MOBA. Thats all the review you need
Derpniel;-;Forget paying money for a language learning software like Rosetta Stone. No teacher, program, or audio book will help you as much as DotA 2 will. Follow these simple steps; 1.) Download DotA 2 2.) Play the game mode "All Pick" 3.) Leave and abandon the game. 4.) Continue to do this until you're into low priority. 5.) ??????? 6.) BRBRBRBR HUEHUEHUEHUE GIB MUNE PLS As you can see, I now speak fluent Brazilian. The only thing I don't like is that the program teaches you to curse before teaching you actual words. 8/10 Innovation 7/10 User interface 1/10 Community 10/10 Would recommend if you BR your HUE and you GIB mune plz.
BHURTEL;-;must play game for everyone!
GraveRune;-;This game is worse than cancer. 10/10
Sb.AMR;-;I'm meat hooked to this game its amazing in other words fuq league
ponidis;-;Nice for competitive play. Need some patience, matches are long.
weaboo;-;The remake of a popular mod that Valve eventually bought.... like CS or TF2. But that doesn't matter. What matters is that it's a full game of that map that you loved to play on WC3. Better graphics, smoother gameplay, easier matchmaking and items that customize your hero appearance, potrait even spell animations(that actually require money but you can get it by playing). As for gameplay it's much smoother that WC3 and has gorgeos graphics because it runs on a modified source engine. Easier to play, even easier to pick up for new players. And you'll play with people of your skill level. Items are easier to build. Heroes are very well balanced. There is no hero that excells in every area. And no single match is the same. Every match different strategy different heroes and different enemies. Only downside that i really care about is the community. People does not know how to put their language preferences on their native language or the language that they actually speak. Every game you have that 1 or 2 guys that doesn't understand anything you say. Or a bunch of russians that'll rage over every single small mistake you make. SEA NA EUwest EUeast servers are all full of Russians. Russians are everywhere except for the Russian server. And while i'll admit that there are some good Russians who speak english and actually communicates with their team and not yell  BLYAT through their mic, but they're not that common. Overall good game, very well balanced. I give Dota 2 9/10. Recommended game but beware of the russians..........or pinoys.........or brazillians(or so i've heard).
Blasphemy;-;The classic WC3 map from IceFrog totally revamped and upgraded to fit in the e-sports scene.One of the best games I ever played and continue to play without getting even a little bored.It is getting better and better by the time as updates keep coming.This year every team member of the team that wins the main event of Dota 2 will be a millionaire.That's astounding for 4 years of existence in the MOBA genre which changed after the arrival of this game.
Krig;-;I've finished this game in about 40min, it's pretty cool tough. There are some events like every 6months or so, so every 6months you have +40min of gametime pretty good The best Aeon of Strife Styled Fortress Assault Game Going On Two Sides created until now.
kraken;-;this is awesome
[R]hyMeeEeeEeeE;-;I LOVE THIS GAME
Xweapon;-;This is a good game, it is not dumbed down and it sticks to its core more then any other in the genre. The meta may change a bit every now and then and heroes rise and fall but it never feels too bad, play it.
BramEazy;-;this game is very great and teach u many things like teamwork, emotion and try to help others need your help so I recommend this game to all people
[P]ikachu;-;This game is Awsome...
ITStukumberts:);-;Im so ADDICTED to this game ! :))
Crash;-;Its nice, a must try.
WQEWQEQWEQWE;-;BATAK!
Dandy, On holiday for 2 weeks.;-;Very fun its hard in the beginning but if you played some games its really fun to play for all the new players i shall recommend to first play versus bots or else if you go online you get hate and maybe get reported also you need time for this game 1 game is about 30-45 minutes if you dont have that time and leave the game you come in low priority that means you wont get any items or experience and first need to do 6 games in low priority to get out of it. Goodluck!
KILL ALL YOU FUCKS SOON;-;It was the best of times, it was the worst of times, it was the age of wisdom, it was the age of foolishness, it was the epoch of belief, it was the epoch of incredulity, it was the season of Light, it was the season of Darkness, it was the spring of hope, it was the winter of despair, we had everything before us, we had nothing before us, we were all going direct to heaven, we were all going direct the other way - in short, the period was so far like the present period, that some of its noisiest authorities insisted on its being received, for good or for evil, in the superlative degree of comparison only.
Dung Dung;-;this game is awesome
-blank-;-;I recommend this game !
<sup_port>;-;it a game for all
-LaZy-;-;#Good Trader #Man #Addme #:)
JAW78;-;Great fun when you get a well matched game, although that might be only 1 in 5 games due to the matchmaking system! Despite this DOTA2 is a hihly polished game and I would highly recommend it, and of course it's completely FREE! Thank you Valve! :-)
Breaks;-;Its a challenging game, 100% recommended
Dagorh;-;To anyone actually bothering to read the review section for the most played game on Steam I would like to say this is a wonderful game with tons of replay and the possiblity to be both the best and worst game you have ever played. Now while the game is fun and (despite what many say) mostly balanced, as in any hero can be beaten through some means that aren't throwing you're entire team at them it also houses some of the worst interactions between players in any game period. Constant hate from anyone who has the ability (or lack there of) to type is common for many games when you commit even the slightest mistake in a game with a notorious learning curve. This will not stop you from playing if you can survive the horrible learning process as when you finally win a game after getting a double rampage you will never be able to stop regardless of how many slurs and racist comments are throw your way when you miss one stun. Overall this is a wonderful game provided you have the self confidence to survive your first few weeks but, remeber learn from the horrible comments you hear don't repeat them some may acutally have some good advice... emphasis on some.
PULIS;-;i love this game , i love playing dota 2 ... but sometimes my dota 2 always crash and server time out and sometimes when i reconnect i cant connect back ... what should i do to fix this error? plzz help me! :) ty!
D.B.B.;-;An extremely addictive game with surprising depth. This is pretty much the only game you need.
Lagoona Blaze It;-;Of the half-dozen people I started learning Dota 2 with, three still play regularly. Though there are hundreds of thousands of players of our approximate skill level populating the matchmaking queues, the four of us are more like each other than we are like anyone else playing Valves isometric wizard-em-up. Spending a year learning to shuffle a gaggle of fantasy heroes up Dotas teetering stack of rules and game mechanics will do that to you: weve developed a secret language of our own, one that runs parallel to the talk of creeps and lanes and farm and rax common to everyone who plays the game. Whack a ward on the donkletron Im going to stick one up their jungle is a sentence I can say out loud and be completely understood by at least those three people. For some reason, theres also a lot of singing involved. Its a lot like being a sailor.
MrsChu;-;this my game
(/._.)/ !DasButt! kimi ni todoke;-;Play it at your own risk, but heed my warning... This game will ruin your life, it's a black hole of agony, suffering, and whatever Almost Everyone is your enemy, whether or not he is in your team Side effects: mental disorders (or rather, your family will think you have one), rage, head migraines from facepalms, etc. Plz do not make the mistake many of us made ;_; Iz still gud game tho 10/10 another perfect black hole from gaben Welcome to doto boi
Lonely Banana;-;I used to be adventure like you until i took an arrow to the knee
Let's Get LOSE;-;like this game
[KNS]Edwin;-;everyday Dota 2 ^^
ZheTan;-;This game is awesome
Bellatrix Lestrange;-;yes because you can play with your friend to defeat enemy. teamwork is realy needed in this game
TwinkleStar;-;This game really enjoyable, dont need money to make you strong, its only skill that matter, i recommend this game to everyone to play, Great Gaming!
Jujj1;-;Learning russian has never been easier.  !
Sand King;-;Hey everyone! Yes, i REALLY love this game, its epic, with all the heroes and special effects and stuff, but. I have a bit of a problem - when i accept any match, the loading screen appears, then or the game crashes just then, or the display of the computer gets half-black and half-river image. then it laggs out first in the audio, then in the whole game, and the game still crashes. HELP!!! I REALLY WANNA PLAY DOTA 2 BUT I CANT!!!!!! Btw: Dudes! Try this game! ITS FREAKING EPIC!!!
[-ADBA-];-;idk how to describe this game bec. is very awesome :D (Y)
Tampaoster;-;This game needs teamwork and agood amount of fingers. Use it wisely
Davion;-;Its really a fun game..you guys should try it!!!
beny;-;Good game. I have a job when i was not playing dota 2. Now it ruined my life. 3 years of playing and still no arcana or good item loots
Tomee;-;The Best Game ever !!! No game can surpass Dota 2.
lalalala;-;dota 2 is the best...
Zatulini;-;This is My Game !
demderon;-;I played for bit, it looked beutiful and everyting. This game just wasn't my style but would definely play if I gotten into it before I got into LoL
Reem;-;Great MOBA, much better than any others out there, just need to dedicate some time and learn the basics! Feel free to ask me any questions or for tips!
Lambo;-;This game is awesome. Enjoy more by playing it with your friends.
Breaking Breakfast;-;This game will simultaneously improve and ruin your life, don't get but actually do get it
7H.-ZTR`;-;what i like about this game is we have multiple options in building items and the graphics are so real. i also recommend others to try and play
You're Mine >>------->;-;flight of the valkyrieflight of the valkyrieflight of the valkyrieflight of the valkyrieflight of the valkyrieflight of the valkyrieflight of the valkyrieflight of the valkyrieflight of the valkyrieflight of the valkyrieflight of the valkyrieflight of the valkyrieflight of the valkyrieflight of the valkyrieflight of the valkyrieflight of the valkyrieflight of the valkyrieflight of the valkyrieflight of the valkyrie
Ariana;-;Best strategy game and team game ever.
.blank;-;This MOBA game is awesome.. allows users to make their own ideas and make profit from them..
Rod Stewart;-;great game as always .
TeRR0fyiNG TeRRoRisT;-;the
Juvia;-;recommended game
<font face="Vivaldi">Bill Cypher;-;where is pitloard ?
89;-;that greet game ever i see in
Sexy Vexy;-;SO ING FUN! NEVER GET BORED OF THIS, NOT IN IT FOR THE MONEY GAME. Thx Valve
i[A]n;-;review :)
wRenZ,., :);-;This an awesome game!!!
[EXT] Fanta;-;Stress, Amnesia, Sleep loss, money loss (In-gane items nearless object etc, will be damaged) might be some of the side effect but the thrill of killing winning Rampaging makes up for it 10/10 boiiiii
the 0.5 + 0.5;-;Turkey chicken nuggets for free in this game. You win free money by giving me mythical. Go play your fps shooters somewhere else.
Vuela alto Iwata-chan;-;doto is the best doto
SmokeyTheBear(ComeBackKing);-;Definately a game for casuals.
45 | rphz;-;I was just sitting at home having some dots, the police came up and knocked on my door, told me that I have to evacuate, just cause they reckon its a bomb threat around the place
BeBe;-;Valve!!!!! Please GIVE US ARCANA!!!! WHEN CHRISTMAS DAY STARTS!!! AS OUR GIFT!! :)
Z_Man_115;-;Dota 2... You can love it, hate it, or both at the same time. Dota 2 is the re-boot of the original Dota game made in 2005 and is owned by the company Valve. Dota 2 is a MMOBA (or Massive Multilayer Online Battle Arena) and the objective of the game is to be able to destroy the enemy's ancient. You do this by picking from the 112 unique heroes that are available for you for free for ever. The game itself is similar to its predecessor as well as other MMOBA's but adds new mechanics as well as customization items for most of the heroes. The game play is smooth and well refined, all the heroes have there own unique play style, and it fits well with the game. Dota 2 although it may not have mind blowing effects still manages to look astonishing as well as not stressing your computer too hard, and if you don't like the way something looks you can change it. Valve introduces a cosmetic system that adds no benefits or hindrances to the game but it allows you to make the game the way you want, whether you like cruel dire tide or crystallized manna there are cosmetics and other customization items for everyone. The game also has a ranked system for more serious players who want to make it to a team. Replayability is a huge part of a game and Dota 2 has it there are multiple game modes ranging from a random hero to drafting a whole team with this system it will take a while to be able to get board of Dota 2. For a ranking all around i would have to give it a 9.5/10 due to some minor flaws. This is shown in ranked, they need a way to measure the single person and not just the team as a whole this can lead to being trapped in low brackets.
Let's all be friends!;-;This game has ruined my social life and career. Why is this game so addicting?!
HERO;-;This will be the best moba in the world forever. Stick to the classics.
the doctor;-;2 GIRLEs or DOTA 2... I answer: DOTA 2
Gaylord_Focker;-;This game is really awesome ITEMS LEVELING COMMUNITY great indeed
Leaver;-;Great game
Samurai Kitty;-;in my oppinion, this game is combination from football and chess...... nice game. We need teamwork to play it.
Waffles;-;Game won't let me 360, there's no perks, and you can't even noscope. 0/10
ProTube / Gryphoon;-;This is about how long it took to get through the horrible unskippable tutorial and random crashes. I've heard League of Legends is pretty much a good version of this game, although you might wanna avoid this "EUW"-thing since it seems to be hated more than the black plague and Hitler together.
Palindrome;-;This game has destroyed my faith in other human beings. 10/10 Side note:
For Sale;-;Cool!
Syron;-;A great, free reliable language learner for all !!
Clutch Commander;-;Definately, this game is great especially with friends. It has a great community.
Xsoscalibur;-;9.45/10 would play, considering 0.55 had connection problem
Duck Hunt;-;As soon as I clicked install, I grew a massive erection. It still hasn't gone down.
1/10 chance of being online;-;I suck at THIS!!!!
Ekko the Dolphin;-;I play this game more in 2 weeks than some people go to their jobs, I have 117 hours in these past 2 weeks on this game and it feels worth it with the entertainment.
Reddish22;-;This is truly the greatest game ever made.
Standin.Jaehyun;-;Very great game and take note ITS FREE! Waiting for other heros to be released. Very Much Excited!
Jordypye;-;Seriously, I've gone from paying Heroes of Newrth to League of Legends to Dota and the only game I've stuck to playing constantly out of the three is Dota. I find it easier than HoN but more challenging than League. I have no major glitches like I did when I played League and I love all the heroes that can be played. I've gotten quite a few of my friends to either pick Dota 2 back up or to start playing it. Like any other game you run into a few rude players but otherwise the community is great. I highy recommend this to anyone looking for a game to play like League or HoN!
Tour|Jarasak7';-;i want more keys to invite my friends :P
Just!!!;-;as
Silvermane77;-;This is tons of fun and very challenging
Pussy;-;Nice Game I had ever played> WEW WEW Ahehe
My_Name's_Luigi;-;Well made game. Do you have 4 other friends to consistantly play with? no? dont bother with this one then.
Huer of Hues;-;DOTA this some nasty  MOBA i hate u so much but the  game ridiculous
friendly and kind teammate;-;very good game
MilF;-;this is nice game
BOTSER1;-;"leroy sucks at this"
SusuSuamKurangManis;-;This is AWESOMEEE :D
Ariez;-;best strategy game ever, try this n u will never regret it. this game is free to play,
Ariez;-;best strategy game ever, try this n u will never regret it. this game is free to play,
Davoin Shower-Handle;-;Great game. addicting , with some stratagy with it.
Mo;-;So much of fun!!! :D
Standin;-;Lets roll the dice
SCHIZO PHRENIA;-;This game will update like every DAY ! Would definitely recommend ! :D
TearsOfHope;-;Good game! You get bash and flame by others if you did something wrong. MID or FEED is a trend in the game. You will also learn new language like Russia (  DAVAI BLYAT SOOKA), Phillipines ( PUTANG INAMO BOBO MO TANGINA ) and more! If you wanna play with hardcore flamers, play rank matchmaking. Alot of over tryhards players will flame every action you do. Remember no matter what kind of game situation you had, just say EZ GAME EZ LIFE. These players that type that word in all chat makes me inspired due to their IMPRESSIVE BRAVENESS! So what are you waiting for?? Sold your soul to Valve and enter to the realm of DOTA2!!! 69/10 DAVAI DAVAI PLAY!
Goddamn Pansy;-;This game has taught me that eating trees are very important for a balanced and healthy life.
Skills > MMr;-;Best Game In the World :)
QWERTYUIOP;-;-----The Good----- -The Graphics looks aweasome. -The Heroes Are Great. -Free To Play! -Strategic Game. -----The Bad---- -Some Players Are No Cooperation there team -Some other players are getting a low-priority because they just quick DC(Disconected) -Some players are quiting because they losing are should i say Rage Quit. So I Will Reccomend This Game. Its Your Choose If You Want To Download this game. :)
Frostbyte;-;Horrible
Standin.X4-[PriMo];-;it's fun to play
[MNI]Punisher;-;Awesome game, very fun (BETTER THAN LOL)
F1ghter;-;Never before have I hated people who don't have a mic so much. This game has made vocal communication the only way to communicate during a game. Also, I am now racist against anyone who doesn't speak english. 10 of 10
LOL NOOB;-;dont play dota 2 , why ?????????
[E.Z]^L.i.F.E;-;why is it not opening the game dota 2 plz help plz fix it :(
Kun;-;Best realtime strategic MOBA game! Endless posibilities and the only limitation is the player. 10/10
thatechiesisaspy;-;cool best game ever
Beer;-;Looking for fun game, good community, finite awesome items, tactical and teamwork communication, and business with the others. Try this awesome Multiplayer Online Battle Arena [MOBA]!
ShadowSpike94;-;It is a fun game if you can handle the community. Just like most MOBA games Best played with friends however
Rastafari Messiah;-;Do you already have anger problems? Well, you will have, after 5 games of Dota 2.
Minty;-;Great Game.
r o x y;-;Im exhausted from all this studying I haven't done.
SanSanSan;-;this good game i like this game
Shrek the President;-;Its dota 2. Play it dumbow lelele
King Jellyjam;-;One of the best team based games you can play today. Strong learning curve, but, that's pretty much the norm for all games that have spawned from the genre the original DOTA pioneered, as a mod for Warcraft 3. Best played with friends, with a microphone, after some decent practice games. Cannot beat the price of FREE, either.
Somethin' BaNaNaS!!!;-;Very Addicting!!
Koala-chan;-;The best!
.i3Ky;-;Recommended for team play, play with ur mates for extreme satisfaction xD
HeaL;-;I like the game so much because i learned that no matter how hard the situatuion is, if you believe in yourself, you will win. The game have many skilled players as well as new players. I'm a typical player with an average MMR and I've played this game for almost a year so I can say there are different types of players. Some say that this game sucks because of noobs or noisy or annoying players that will make you play bad and look bad as well. I cant deny that fact because I myself have experienced it but you guys know what I do? I ignore them and play well. For me, the most difficult ally to have in a game is ourselves. Because if have short amount of patience or if we're so boastful, we might ruin the game of others. Remember, any proffesional gamer in the world can lose if the team doesn't have a teamplay. DOTA is a team competitive game. If you can't help yourself being boastful and have a short patience, don't play DOTA. Play solitaire or pinball would be better for you.
Riful;-;Before playing this game I never rage or flamed anyone. Prepare your mental before playing this game, because most of the time you would get Russian/Peruvian/Pinoy as your teammate, and they will make you flame the  out of them. After 1.8k hours of playing this game, I am now calm and collected. I just give up and play the game, because whatever I say they won't understand anyway.
A10;-;This game is gonna start the 3rd World War, against Russia
Gotcha;-;full of strategy , recommended for you guys
Touch me;-;The best team game experience / strategy game you can find in the industry ... Dota simply combines all the great ideas into one competitive match . Many games try to copy dota 2's mechanism and playstyle but they fail by a long shot..
`PWNED;-;Intrested in a fight ?
NotNinjaMeAnymore;-;Great
Minion | JongHyun;-;if you have basic from dota 1, you should explore here.. quite different from dota 1.. atleast you have more friend to play with..
HARSH;-;11/10 where teamwork is  and u dnt knw what you are doing
FTD.Slinkeh;-;Short review Pros +Absolutely no pay to win +Really depends on your skills, teamwork (and connection) +huge variety on 1 map (100+ heroes, many items build to combine) +Its fun if you have good team (and own the match) +Many game modes which is fun but some of them requires great experience +Doesn't really need high PC spec, but need good connection but still got good graphich and gameplay +Customizing hero with the store item is fun, the items are cool but some of them can cost like $400 for a piece of item (i will be much fun if you are rich  kid) +you can practice with bot offline +Many more -Can get IMBA (imbalance, your enemies is too strong because of tricks and builds, you have to be clever to counter) -Usually, players from *********** can get annoying (rude behaviour, noisy voice chat, and sometimes they suck (no offense)) -Can really2 cause you slamming your keyboard for many reasons (meaning : stress) -Even if you are really good, 1 trashy teammate / 1 trashy action from your teammate and boom. uninstall this game. -Feeder (someone who dont kill, but killed by enemy a lot/ Stupid noobsh*t) everywhere -The community isn't bad, but not the best at all (trash talkers, trade scammers) -I'll tell you one more time, if you are not the patient type at all, i suggest avoid this game. -Low prior system (leaving an active game penalty for more than 5 minutes which is called abandon) sometimes is annoying Conclusion: A really2 fun game, Literally its only 1 map but its just never makes me boring (except there's a feeder) But sometimes it's really annoying because...... human make mistakes Its really a fair game but can be really unfair 1 player can lose or win the game its all about balance... I fuc***g love this game
Mallows :D;-;Nice and cool game
GGGGGGGGGG;-;This is not a game. This is life. o.O This is very addictive and life goes around it. You just think only of DOTA.....DOTA.....DOTA.....DOTA...................
ssrfs;-;Great game
ThugLife;-;DotA 2 is the best game ever.
Qarren;-;When I hear the phrase "Dota 2 is good, just look at how many people play it," I can't help but make myself blue from facepalming so hard. Call of Duty has millions of players. The thing is they're all 12 year olds with tourrettes and particularly ignorant mothers. The gaming society is so fanatic about numbers that they forget that criticism and praise are reflections of an individual's formed beliefs. That being said, Dota 2 is a terrible game, and that's not an opinion; it's the truth. Valve's fear of the number 3 has thrown them afar by pushing number 2's (yes, I did just say that, laugh it up) of all their other series. Portal 2, Left 4 Dead 2 and Half Life 2 as well as Half Life 2: Episode 2. But now they are doing it to games they don't originally own! Repetition is useful in debates and extremely rarely in games. A lesson Valve is eagerly forgetting to the point where Dota 2 doesn't even have multiple maps to change things up. I see it's up to the players to pose new situations; how inadvertently lethargic. I cannot comprehend how players can have over 3000 hours doing the same thing; let alone 5. To put this in today's terms; Dota 2 is so stupid your mum asked me what I was doing and when I replied "I'm playing Defense of the Ancients" she freaked out believing that I was attempting to prevent her murder. I weep for future generations that, when asked to list 10 goods things about the 21st century, can only find numerous references to swag, Justin Bieber and the mindset that a large amount of players in a game means everyone in the whole world should enjoy it. And before you ask, yes I did just put a 'your mum is so old' joke in an analysis, thanks for noticing.
iPawn;-;This game is awesome
Kissy Tits;-;This game.............. Is why I'm Dota_heaD. From the depths of 2002's Warcraft III: Reign of Chaos and later 2003's The Frozen Throne expansion released two different versions of Defense Of The Ancients in Use Map Settings custom game mode. The game was a wild success. The Frozen Throne version is the truest to Dota 2's gameplay, items, heroes, and spells. RoC DotA was arguably more fun for hardcore players but TFT soared in popularity. This remake, unlike HoN (which is honestly the better game in several aspects), takes all the old skills, revamps them, gives them new Aghanim's Scepter buffs, and makes warding a nightmare (seriously though, warding in HoN is a pleasure compared to Dota 2). Dota 2 is my most-played go-to game. It elicits the greatest feelings of disappointment and triumph alike! The community in Dota 2 is abysmal but that includes ME! The untrollable troll! So if you're well prepared for pointless criticisms of item-builds, know-it-all noobs who've played under 500 games and presume to think they've already seen everything this game has to offer.... you're in luck! Honestly though, this game is like a religion. If you're not deeply invested into it, you'll never be particularly good and you'll NEVER enjoy the game, not even once. This game commands your attention like no other. This game challenges your patience for other human beings like no other. This game will drive you insane. And you will thank yourself for it.
[PDC] LasagnaFeed;-;All right, same as everyone here: hard game, very nob unfriendly, highly addicting, full of russians. Did I mention that is hard to master and that people are going to kill you for every mistake? On the other hand you have a free to play game that rewards the efforts put in learning everything. Starting with the jargon ("carry, creep, pusher, warding, ganking, bot, solo lane, going rosh, ,..."). Try it, dive in it, forget life.
Ariana Grande <3;-;i'm sexy and i know it :3
SacredAlchemist;-;Tough to learn, but well worth the time.
GRAB ME;-;This game is good.
SONS OF ANARCHY;-;i love this game! :D
Lars.;-;This game requires time. It requires your effort. It requires your blood. Tears are optional. If these requirements are met, Dota 2 is truly one of the best, if not the best game out there. It definitely provides long-term motivation, if started properly. Once you get into this game you will not just leave it anymore. Additionally, it is a decent russian teacher. All in all, after having played over 1300 hours, I can say that Dota 2 has so far given me the best experience out of all games I have played and it is highly likely the game I have played the most regarding time and effort. Even if you do play other games from time to time you will always get back to this one. Dota 2 - 100% Lifesteal. 11/10 would recommend.
Mom says i'm special;-;Due to DOTA's servers,whole world will be named RUSSIA soon enough.
Schmiergeld;-;It's a trap D:
H-weapons guy;-;Colorful and interesting game, it has a plenty of heroes to explore and same with gear for them, it will ge a good time taker for few days, but then You will get to tacticks and if you enjoy this genre games You will go for scores, if not most likely You will play something else.
.l Jamaica l.;-;so nice to play this.
Onbion;-;Its is a very good game with good balancing and intersting abilities, but as you probaly read before, you can compare the communitie with a waste bin. People will just scream at you when you do someting wrong and leave the game after that and don't forget the famous mid or feed strategy. Communication in this game is hard, the game does it good at that point, but then the russians and arabians or whatever show up when you clearly clicked EU-WEST and that you want to meet up with ENGLISH people instead of other language. So yeah, game is perfectly with regulary updates and interesting events, but the communitie really needs to get better (I mean a LOT better) or valve should just link english people with real english people and auto search for the best server instead of choosing the server. i would say 9.5/10 for the game (nothing is perfect) and 2/10 for the communitie (sometimes you meet a nice person)
hgclhziy,rza,zi;-;Good game with high quality definition
Zeldexas;-;OH C'MON WHO DOESN'T PLAY DOTA2??
Blanky_;-;Best Game to play when u want stress or distress. So all of you gay people out there who want a game to boost knowledge play Dota 2 S!
HeXaBlast | Razer;-;Indeed one of the best MOBA in the world
Panpan Panda;-;Interesting
Hold my beer i got this;-;It's a fun game that, even thought its sorta hard it's a good game.
RamenKing;-;Gtfo lol is more fun ( i am ready 4 the hate) And Dota Is 2Spooky4me
Chivalry;-;THIS GAME IS AWESOME, IT'S FREE TO PLAY !
KittyHawk;-;My absolute favorite game of all time.Recommended to everybody.
A$AP. N00B;-;Mannaan is the worst dota player ever. he is a   a, he will marry a fat hairy FOB. a still trippin on cookies.  that punk   uh
asdasfsasafa;-;You get to communicate with highly intelligent russian people and learn all their swear words in less than an hour. 11/10
bathory;-;Outstanding game that addicting it's player. Like my own brand of heroin.
PunkBoy991;-;Normally I would reccomend this game as I have played it for a long time. However it is now simply unplayable. Screen constantly freezes and crashes even when using a high end pc and updated drivers. I have researched how to fix this problem and I have literally tried everything and nothing helps. A lot of people experience this problem online and the Valve tech support is nonexistent and useless. For more than a year I tried to give this game a chance as I used to love playing it, but with lack of consideration towards a great number players including myself I feel it is a waste of money and time until it is fixed. Here is a link to my thread and another related to this issue on the developer page. Please Valve pay attention to your players and actually fix your product. http://dev.dota2.com/showthread.php?t=144013 http://dev.dota2.com/showthread.php?t=141150
Mamo;-;7/10 - Game and community are great. If you are a newbie, play against bots. Commmunity isn't noob friendly :( It became a huge turn off for me. The learning curve, compared to LoL, is steep and you'll be spending a lot of time learning the many champions in the game as well as game dynamics. Give it a shot, you may end up enjoying it!
xxxanimeweedlord420xxx;-;me I never knew there were these many Russians in the world.
Jory_fruitcake;-;This game is fantastic, I mean I play this game almost everyday I have had this game for a month and already have 274 hours in it. and my friends have even more. I liked how this isn't a pay to win game, you can get items to make your person look better or cooler. But the items don't have any benifet so everyone can play the same people at anytime, and dota 2 is a fair fight. In short I love Dota 2
ninjagish;-;Amazing RTS, but needs character customization really badly, though new single or double lane maps would be kewl too.
Galadriel;-;cool game b*tchez
<font face="Wide Latin"> Sherry;-;Doto is the best
Carlton Lassiter;-;This is the best game made in some time. It will take you a lot of time to get good, and it's difficult, but damnit, is it good.
kkk;-;Cancer game. ruined my life. best way to learn tagalog and russians. mit or feet, noob mid no gank, zero ward  you noob support,  ina mo gago, ako mid, . This game has made me racist towards those who speak any language other than english. 10/10
Killer Bees;-;This game is good because of what happens.
Meba;-;Dota is my life
Berserk13;-;yes its nice and fun to play... amazing graphics :-D
onxkie;-;Nice Graphics and Gameplay
Chubblezap;-;You can battle Satan as an Australian-accented porcupine. 10/10 would even
vladutz;-;The best MOBA game on market right now.
V12;-;Write a Review To complete my Badges :D
Souperman;-;Only good if you enjoy third person view games like me, others think it sucks. Watch the trailer if you are not sure what think about it. I recommend it for only the best gamers
ruth_less;-;best game ever played.
Deni;-;You'll be good at anything :3
cutiewinks.angel;-;haha i just find it funny and enjoy game :)
Femrito | trade.tf;-;Will make you develop an Extreme prejudice towards the majority of non english speaking countries. 11/10 would be racist again
SDWA117;-;Man~~i just love this game :)
Badass;-;Amazing! It challenges your skill in thinking what to do, what to build. Simply saying its awesome!
BLACKOUTgaming>_<;-;Nice game.. love it
Master Of Dark Arts ^-^;-;awsome game
Rshi~i htofiria;-;dota 2 is the Bessstt..!!!
SterBen;-;i really love this game and it makes me think every time i play by its game play
Zentity;-;awesome game. but theres one problem.. i wish steam would make dota 2 system make local lobby mode available even when theres no internet access.. T.T please they should make this update.. TT.TT
Music from a cold land;-;its really good for me thats all !!
o_oHojoo_o;-;absolutely best moba game ever
Lord Knight Seyren;-;This game is Life nothing beats this game even the time of dota 1 , this game is the best . running for so many years already and still gaining more players throughout the years ..
totoi;-;This game so addicted..
CAKEbuilder ^p;-;Just Awsome
Colors;-;The Good Game
TheAssHunter;-;The most addictive game I've ever played in my life. The infinite possibilities of every single game, depending on very minute decisions juxtaposes it so much to our real lives. Although the learning curve is too steep, once you give about a week for it, the mechanisms in the game are clear to you. Definitely recommended.
Rin Rn Rn;-;this is a best game i have played :)
Arteezy;-;The Best Game Ever!
I like Trains~;-;THIS TOTALLY ROCKS~! THIS GAME IS HIGHLY RECOMMENDED
bundum;-;I am a professional dota 2 player with 6000 MMR. I am the best Brewmaster in NA. In season 3 I was ranked as the best Teemo player in Brazil. I highly reccommend Dota 2 however do not play unless you main Brewmaster or Invoker. All the other heros suck! I dont even know why they are in the game! If you happen to main Urgot please uninstall.
@airsoftgunshop;-;this game is recommended for me. good job DOTA 2 :)
DC23Don.Suratos;-;My Rules My Game
MIORS;-;Lovely Game
Portal;-;This made me the arrogant and judgemental person I am today. 10/10 Would Definately Dota Again
GH0ST.Rastla;-;Best MOBA game on the market. Completely Free2Play and no signs for future pay2win plans. Very balanced with ~100 heroes. Still developing updates for the game. And now start the game.
Punsh;-;So, what can I say. I played original DotA just a few times, so, when Dota 2 was released as beta-version, I was't so agitated, as others. But soon i got an invite and began to play. So, what can I say about positive moments? + Time moves faster - yes, thats it. Too fast sometimes + A lot of matchups in each game + A good challenge for your reaction, analytics and tactics in aggregate + A lot of characters and you can take each one even at the begining + Donations do not affect gameplay And some negative moments... - You need a lot of practice to become really good player - Agressive community - It can eat all your free time
Herzog;-;I enjoyed most of the time playing the game, but most people play it for being competative, where as I just try to play it for fun. I would personaly recomend it. The only annoying part would be people from foriegn countries for some reason decide to connect to your area server. Ex: russian connecting to U.S. Server or a person who decides that they want to connect to a server halfway across the world. Though I like it when there is a coopertive team who are there just to have fun.
Kamen Rider Kiva;-;Very addictive game. But I would say this though, the Dota 2 community is getting worse from time to time. More abuse player on Dota 2. Talking trash, do trash, keep feeding and stuff like that. It's kinda annoying. But this game 10 out of 10 !! Best game ever !! :D
Laierzeart;-;I like it because it look classics
Cryo;-;Addictive
Grayson;-;Played it for 20 hours, I just got my first angry russian guy saying  11/10 would go io again
Keelock;-;I've normally never liked games of this style, but as a noob, this game is fun and challenging.
Card Hunt;-;red hot game
.HoLY.ChEezE.CaKE.;-;dota2 so far is the best game i ever played, highly recommended for gamers
boston;-;this game needs a team work and strutegy
GShark;-;Awsome game with nice team players and best action ever
Sanlumiere;-;I think people who gush over this game do so because it's not League of Legends. This often strikes me as being the same as the person who plays say The Secret World and bashes those that play World of Warcraft. Where World of Warcraft is accessible, easy and enjoyable for the masses, Secret world is deep, complex and very rewarding to those who really enjoy the minutae of figuring out how to get the most out of an MMO. DOTA 2 is the game you play when you don't want to the hand-holding, comfortable ease that League of Legends has brought to the MOBA world. I found DOTA 2 to be overly awkward, and not particularly rewarding. But for those in the mood for the more "hardcore" experience, this is where to be, I just won't be there with you.
MRVN;-;It changed how Gaming is what we know today thanks icefrog and thanks valve.
Sugeng Gendut;-;This game is good for kill the time when you were in a boring day, but it can be an addicted. So please be careful and spend your time wisely
NEET. Jc Knowledge;-;Game is very good, next to .
Beh;-;Very good game.
-ginjineko-;-;Dota2 its so entertaining, very a nice game
ApocaLypse;-;Awesome strategy game .. easily one of my favourites no doubt about that :)
EFFICIENT;-;Spending a year learning to shuffle a gaggle of fantasy heroes up Dotas teetering stack of rules and game mechanics will do that to you: weve developed a secret language of our own, one that runs parallel to the talk of creeps and lanes and farm and rax common to everyone who plays the game. Whack a ward on the donkletron Im going to stick one up their jungle is a sentence I can say out loud and be completely understood by at least those three people. For some reason, theres also a lot of singing involved. Its a lot like being a sailor.
Gaara-Kunt;-;Good free MMO probably best MMO out there,fun action packed and lots of laughs
mog84kupo;-;Great game, in the genre, altough the comunity can be a little "childish" sometimes
Deaths Hand;-;This game is gonna make history forever..................
Happy Fhrer;-;Rosetta Stone ain't  on this game, learn russian in just a few matches
Forsaken Gods;-;i dont know why i own this
ShushieBushie;-;Very awesome game! Its worth it to play it!!!!!! So just get it ;)
HBW.Jozi_Town91;-;Love it! Give it the time it deserves. #NobodyLikesQuittersAnyway
hypnos;-;I'm basically writing this review only to get a steam badge. Good game. Such fun. Wow.
Ang Lakas Ng Mama MO!;-;cool
vG.Venediction;-;A truly fantastic game.
<font face="Forte">MaCute;-;I like dota 2 cause the item will make the hero change appearance . Thats why i like dota 2 . And I like to build a team and play with the pro team like NEWBEE . I'd like to play with them if somebody give me a chance to play with them and thats my biggest part of my life to play with NEWBEE .
Insania;-;nice game and u can meet cool guyz
Zoeno;-;i recommend this game! two tumbs up!
Park Min;-;this game is so cool!! XD
JEFF_KULANGOT;-;I like this game where u can find an unexpected friend from other county and its give fun for all ages
Jimin;-;Good Game. Have a feeling that I will still be playing this game when I'm in the nursing home.
Palm;-;A great PvP game that offers some of the most intriguing and nuanced team combat around.
@Leeroy_Foster;-;The money sound is very satisfying. literally the only reason I play this game I swear.
ET^KazukiOrochi^;-;Must be played and dota2 is very unique. Totally Worth it
<font face="impact">Dark Shadow;-;this game is the best in the world!!!!
sutsag;-;DOtA 2 Teamwork play.
Pares;-;Valve  Add This   Please!   And Give   Me One
Alpha the Almighty;-;10/10 report brazil, Russia and South east Asia for feeding.
Franky;-;play and taste the power!
One13;-;I have played a lot of Dota 2 and i think its the best game. From all the games I played i can say that its better than LoL
Milkovich;-;fun to play with your team... :3
Lich2477;-;Every gamers know this game! 11/10
Evil;-;hell yeah
lutsiano;-;the best free to play game in Steam
SamuraiZheng;-;Possibly one of the most interesting games in my Steam Library, Dota 2 is an enjoyable game to play with friends online and meet new people in the online matches. After the recent success of the Internations 2014 by raising a whopping prize pool of over ten million dollars. This serves as an incentive for new players at the possibility to winning a share of the prize pool if they're good at the game. One will require the ability to quickly respond to the situation as the actions of your teammates and enemies are completely random. I suggest this game to anyone who wants an enjoyable experience thats more complicated than the similar game League of Legends. I find both games equally fun and enjoyable however Dota is ultimately the more superior game between the two. ~SamuraiZheng
cr0ll;-;Great game !
kNiGhT;-;The best game of recent times...... Im looking forward to go for Dream League Season 3 ..... i hope i will ________........ (^^^) Best wishes for me :D
Drink Vodka Win Dotka;-;Fun and competitive game
Run or DIE!!!;-;ing insane game. Just watch out for those Russians spamming our network. Bunch of noobs
Run or DIE!!!;-;ing insane game. Just watch out for those Russians spamming our network. Bunch of noobs
hashirama senju;-;great game gotta try atleast once but really hardto play one of the best games i have ever played also my personal favourite
CaptainBreezyYeezyDeezy;-;1 tip for DOTA 2 It's not LoL
The Illusive Man;-;NOT RECOMMENDED This game literally ruins your life. Once you start, there is no going back. Hardcore addiction.
Kitzoconazole HCl;-;This game is a MUST PLAY..ACTION, STRATEGY, FUN? ITS ALL HERE AT DotA 2
Actimel;-;Amazing game. but sadly there is many suckers there who ruin the game
.|Rapuzel|.disney;-;Just Addict to it :D xD (y)
Yayo Sev;-;This game has made me racist towards those who speak any language other than english. 11/10
duduk-swan;-;Most fun and good looking moba ever! :..
KimBoO;-;love this game
daNtjie_kat;-;Totally hooked!
Dark;-;Report a guy for being better than you, get mailed by Valve saying " Weve recently taken action against one or more players youve previously reported for bad conduct. You have received an additional report submission to use. Thanks for your help in making the Dota 2 community a friendlier " 11/10
Order of Zakarum;-;More addictive than cocaine or any drugs, recommend not to play this game, it will ruin your social life and you cannot get away from it since your first play One more thing, beware of racial discrimination, there are plenty of them in the game For the beginner or avoid to be a noob or feeder in the public game, you are strongly advised to play with computers in the first place. ( to be an expert of that certain hero)
Swaganomic;-;Top MOBA :)
pzalgado;-;Taught me Russian. 10/10
shiA.lAbeouF;-;Once you love this game, you never go back <3
Wookiee;-;I got a hole in the wall for each friend i got... 10/10 would pay to play again
Meaty M8 Blaze It;-;Best MOBA on the market, and 100% free. Get flamed by a diverse group of players, while breaking long-standing friendships over teamfights. 10/10
Sido;-;I like it becasue I can play with noobs TY:).
yeezy;-;the game is amazing keep it up
Shake It Off;-;a very good and enjoyment game
ar1se;-;fascinating.only for maniac
LoL;-;sometimes i like playing dota2 sometimes when i trade they pick unfair items to their low item
Fullbuster24;-;Recommend for this game. This game can make your brain smart in strategy
L!v!ng^^Pain_MM;-;NC Game!!!
<u><font face="forte">Isac. JR;-;best game but i want dc hook
AMAZING BEN - 10;-;Dota is a competitive game of action and strategy, played both professionally and casually by millions of passionate fans worldwide. Players pick from a pool of over a hundred heroes, forming two teams of five players.
Animosity;-;Best game I have played in the last 5 years!
FAPTAIN JokeR;-;this is a great and the most fun game i have ever played...the main thing you need is skills to play this game
[GIGA]BYTE;-;DotA2 is the only MOBO game indaworld!!!!!!
B L A C K I C E;-;ban feeders or racist player
nosey.bastard #Roadto4k;-;Don't ever download and play this game. It'll ruin your life!
S/C/A/R/E/C/R/O/W;-;Play this  and u can never leae this!
Boss.Oddy;-;so good.. very cool dota 2. ^_^
Kuroky;-;Nice game. :)
Caziel;-;the best there is. highly recommended!
Forget How To Win;-;Nice game,Still choose new heroo thanks
NashKickingYourAss;-;Great Game ! Recommended To Everyone Who Wants To Have A Good Time !
Welcome to Dota 3 Folks;-;EPIC GAME OF ALL TIME!
Albert Einstein;-;I have problem about the game graphics sir ! The whole map becames blue i cant see anything , this happens after the latest update this august 16 , 2014 . But the game runs well before the update i can still play but now its all  blue like heaven pleaseeeeeeeee fix on the next update sir
Hi! Cactus Boy;-;So nc to play w/ my friends or other players :)) 10/10
outsourced.DCE;-;Nice game. It's really fun and interesting. Just made my day or everyday.
cc;-;add dota 2 item to paypal trading system within player to player. Add Trade History of every trade made of the account on friends or not. Its a nice game with good gameplay algorithms, although i use to change the mouse due to breakage from over playing this game.
Bubbles;-;Reported.
pOrOrO;-;graphics is far better than Dota I, great game..the great games in life are FREE..lol!
[1st];-;anything could be happened
Mokushi;-;lethal injections cost the state too much money. write to your senators today and demand legislation that enforces the death penalty with matches of DotA 2.
HoldYourColour;-;The kind of game that caresses you lovingly in the morning, and beats you mercilessly in the afternoon.
JDGoodGuy;-;Really awesome. I really feel like am improving in the game. The only problem is the community-.
i'm dead;-;i've played this
pubjuanochile;-;Played the game since closed beta almost 4 years(3 months from posting)and still doesn't disappoint. 10/10 thanks icefrog and valve
Ricky.LWL;-;Never out of date!!
brudi;-;Pretty Insane Game. Come and feed with us :D
ynvaser;-;Best free Russian language course this side of the internet.
Panda_Man;-;I love this game but ONE HUGE PROBLEM is the word noob how many people i hear saying that my/ there team is a retared or noobs or s if see one more of thouse words i will kick a cat >;D not really great game but i really hate the people who play it they give no support to the new players all they do is critersize them or just write this word "noob" OMG I HATE THIS WORD NOW :( yes play it if you are ok with a bit of online rude language :3
Shadow/Crowzz;-;Most lifesteal game I have ever played...<3
Iai SHI;-;Awesome addicting game. The best game i've ever seen.
[FeeD] ACEGMR;-;One last match then I'll go [Insert obligations here]...
Ice Bits;-;Dota 2 is one of the best games played. You can play as hundreds of different heroes. Not many other games give out this chance! :P Play it! Its free. :D
Gold Dust;-;tadaa stupid people don't play this game
Kirito;-;i love this game
Fredda;-;This game taught me about the diversity of cultures that our small little corner of the universe offers. Then it taught me to hate them all.
Chrome;-;Side effects include: -Hatred of other humans -Lack of trust in others -Carpal Tunnel -Improved hand eye coordination -A large ego -Weight gain -Weight loss -Confidence -Despression -Extreme Racism -EXTREME RACISM -Increased strategic thinking capabilities -Mushy-brain syndrome -Subconsciously learning a new language -Subconsciously learning to hate the culture of said language -Literally every ailment that is not a transmitable disease 9/10 Doctors accepted this game on their recommendation list, but the tenth was afk
Grizzt;-;It's like roulette; fun until it turns into Russian.
psych0tic;-;Causes anxiety problems, low self esteem, Tourette's syndrome, mood swings, Bipolar disorder, breakdown of relationships, raging erections, racism. Would definitely recommend.
Sentimental Oriental;-;In Dota 2, Not many people speak your language. Not many people play well. Not many people talk nicely. Not many people work as a team. But if you find people that do... You'll have the most fun you've ever had.
Kyubashi;-;And you thought real life was a struggle.
ephir;-;I only played a little but it was fun.
Captain Obvious;-;Things I gave to DotA: 1. Money 2. Time 3. Love Things DotA gave me: 1. Arthritis 2. Carpal tunnel syndrome 3, Hatred of Russians, Mexicans, Spanish, Finnish, and Russians 4. Broken keyboard 5. Broken mouse 6. 9/10 ready 7. Server crashes 8. 4 stacks of Russians in EUW servers on English prefrence settings 9. Ranked matches 10. Free to play but Pay to win games (I.E. - Foreseer's contract, New Bloom 2015) 11. "It's in the bag" spam (especially Skywrath) 12. Multilingual cursing - I guess this is a good thing? 13. Split second math - Reliable/Unreliable gold and gold loss on death vs. Buyback availability - This is good too Essentially - DotA is a greedy woman, but I love her all the same. 11 / 10 would play again
HekaDooM;-;"THE PUB SUPPORT" "Where are wards?" The pub Carry demanded. "I placed them and they were countered" the Support began, "I am trying to juggle giving you complete lane farm, protecting you and harrassing the enemy while saving to buy more, also possibly sentries to remove their-" "UP COUR PLS" the mid hero politely added. "Give Savle" The Carry demanded. "Certainly." replies the support, using the salve on the Carry who subsequently ran headlong into an enemy creepwave. "So where is mek?" the Carry said, after he was ganked due to overextending. The Support died saving him and was treated to a rather enthusiastic series of map pings on his corpse. "Again, having not even enough to buy boots as well as wards, I don't think a 7 minute Mek is viable." The Support replies. "Haha look your level, so low, noob" the Carry retorted. "U have no item xaxa". "Well, jungle gold and experience through stacking and pulling with blocked camps is nowhere near as much as on lane which I attempted to give you, the carry, the priority over." The Carry is subsequently ganked again at the enemy tower, oblivious to the enemy tp that the Support moved away from. "Report Support, usless" The carry cried in allchat, in between mentioning various aspects of the Support's Mother's anatomy. "Instead of reporting and acting like that, why don't you try supporting for randoms sometime instead of instapicking a carry?" the Support asked, as he watched the Carry return to afk-lasthitting lane creeps. "HAH, support is for noskill noobs like you!"
flanadlivv;-;One day, a wise man intoduce me into this game. "it shall protect your virginity, my lad" he said.
asprin;-;It's definitely exciting. The beta phase has really matched up to it's hype. I foresee Dota 2 to go a long way when it releases as a finished product. If you love DotA, then this is a must for you.
Sir Dong Dangle Taint;-;This game is without a doubt the freest free to game out there. Everything is free right off the bat and that makes a huge difference in gameplay. There are no buffs that you can buy before the game that would have even the slightest impact on the match. The only thing you pay for is cosmetic items, which again, have no effect on gameplay. Heroes are fun to play and range in difficutly, so other charcters take more time and paicientce to master. There is also a wide range of charcters types to play as so you never get bored. From the ranged characters, to the melee characters, to the nukers, to the tanks there will always be a fun and interesting character that fits your playstyle. Though Dota 2 plays out similar to other MOBA's, it is very diverse in its playstyles. Do not treat it like games like League of Ledgends. It's a completly different game entireley and should be treated as such. That being said the learning curve is very difficult, and other players on Dota are extremely unforgiving. Your first few games will be rough, but after one good game or your first win it's hard to step away from the computer. And once you learned your prefered playstyle and find a character you enjoy, Dota 2 can be one of the most addicting games you've ever played. Dota 2 is one of the best games in the MOBA genre and for good reason. Gameplay is fun and challenging, and there is a hero for everybody. Though it will take awhile for you to start getting the hang of things, the rewards are well worth the time and effort.
Mithrandir;-;Great game at all time... Death prophet is my best hero...
TheIceCubeGuy;-;Its a very nice Good Job Valve for making out of this wonderful game not like the other...which has worst graphics this one...is well... average...
M+;-;recommended. great.
Prepare For Anything :);-;I like this game . :yay:
MUGIWARA;-;it's cool
Legolas.;-;i found a new world!
Kwlski;-;not recomended for Pinoys!!!
Pensi;-;The game that will never be replaced with another game. Play with your friends, the more friends you play with, the more fun you'll get.
MOLESTERDUCK;-;really  when you get put in a team with . each game feels like a waste of an hour. would recommend
Chargi;-;If you want to take a peek into Russian Scumbags ruining the experience for everyone, play DOTA! The game is still great.
Leo B!@ck ~!;-;Awsome Game in my Life
Hunter;-;awsome game !!!!!!!!!!!
Themail;-;This game is quite fun, indeed. Yet the time it waists is impecable to any other game you will play. I tell everyone who plays this game to take moderatly long breaks (10-15 minute) in between games. For what this game has in store will make you a slave to it's raw glory. It is fun, I will admit that, but nothing more. On the weekends I sit at my computer endlessly until about 2am then I go to sleep, the entire weekend please have a life don't play dota. -themail AKA the mail man
Variant 3;-;One time I sold an item worth $40 in order to afford the Xcom expansion. Biggest mistake I've ever made.
TENECIOUS TIGER;-;excellent game.....liked it more than any other games........very addictive
_Cherr;-;lots of leavers in low level games and 3k mmr. wtf. still, i love to play
AmanatPenderitaanRakyat;-;defending towers with strategies, fun to be played with friends, 5v5,, once all of your 9 towers down the only thing to defend is the ancient, oh btw the enemy can destroy your ancient just by destroying 4 towers straight, so don't play it if you think defending towers and ancient sucks
Arkem;-;Playing it for years, still get joy and never get bored!
WeEw!!;-;i love this game!!!!
1v9;-;Its an awesome game. Just Awesome..
Harunachan;-;This Game Make Me Have A Lot Of Positive Thinking About All People And Be Teamwork With Them All
________________________________;-;Nice game.... come play
Blunt Potato;-;Well for starters, take a look at my total hours played. That should tell you how much I like this game. I honestly find the idea of a MOBA very appealing. Although there might be other games out there in the genre that (dare I say it) are better than DOTA 2, I still find DOTA 2 to be the one game I always go back too. The game mechanics are solid, the character balancing is always changing, adding new depths to the gameplay, and many of the players in DOTA are relatively laid back. Is DOTA 2 the best game in the world? Probably not. Is DOTA 2 the game I have spent 1000+ hours on and will probably spend another thousand on? Absolutely.
Brendan \(=w=)/;-;This game will take your soul..you'll be friendless,lifeless,money-less and above all else loveless if you start playing this game..you'll be matched with toxic people of the community..trash talkers,ragers,people who won't turn off their f**king mics even when they have nothing to say..SEA dota?Pure toxic boys..SEA dota MMR?Pudge first pick..you're better off playing another game..for this game will grab you,chew you up and spit you back.. if you want to even dream of becoming one of the pros,good focken luck mate..it ain't easy survivin' this toxic game.. 10/10 keeps me wanting for more.. 1/10 no item drops since  patch came..
Green Tea;-;Went through 5 keyboards, 20 viruses from trading and have lost money from the market and sleep from playing. 10/10 :^)
BARNS;-;this game is so ing good.
LR0cK;-;A game that challenge your mental, patience and teamwork. It can be addictive game and satisfying game.
Piewrath;-;Dota 2 is a great game of strategy, personal skill and above all TEAMWORK.
Colonel Gaddafi;-;has the same transition noise from day to night as the one in Warcraft 3 10/10.
::::RaMZi::::)-_-);-;The game is awesome :D except the russian players ruin the game sometimes and cant cumunicate. Other than that the game is ing awesome :) 10/10 Valve good job and keep making awesome games.
r h;-;awsm game play, nice graphics, cool items....and a must play game for all.
Ace;-;I like Dota 2 beacause so many item and all heroes are awesome
=zZz=;-;the best ever i played
Denial;-;best game ever created!
Feeder-Eater;-;This is very good game~
Jean Careerstein;-;I had spaghetti for dinner, how about you?
Kentucky Fried Chicken;-;10/10, would feed
Kosingas;-;From 7 to 77!!!
Superrome77;-;Best Game Ever.Just be wary of how this can eat up ALL OF YOUR TIME!!
Poker Face;-;Best game ever in the world.
Beedeebee;-;best of the best
Nympho;-;Why the hell is this game so hard
-luffy1231-;-;it's very good
friend@GG.ev0lut1on;-;All the noobs who come from LoL rate this game as pointless and confusing. However DoTA2 is a great MOBA full of strategy and an ever evolving metagame which is part of why it is fun, it also has reat tutorials for newer players to get used to last-hittings and denys.
Why so SERIOUS!?;-;Awsome online game for guys/gals out there... Just have fun!!! =D
Cisco;-;this is an awesome game, and it's > LoL
Entropy;-;Literally, a bad game. 2/10. 4 years since first released? Still beta, 2014. You selected english? Better learn 3 new languages. Team game? Farm it out. Updates? Only to release more hats. New heroes? Half-life 2 Ep 3. Metascore 90? Money, Cash. 18+? Children only. Free to play? Average IQ drops below 100. Gave first blood? Leave game. MMR? Clearly Balanced. Suggest legitimate opinion that would result in a win? Muted. Play better than most? Reported. Reported the person that fed on purpose? Have them on your team next game. Low Priority? For life. Only game to get legitimate reviews. You think the reviews are a joking? Play the game.
S.;-;Good games but too many scammer
Nae Nae Nae;-;:) hell yeah
Zombie_Dragon33;-;this game is really hard to play with a erection
Boromir;-;Dota 2 , one of the best free games out there on the net. It's really fun once you get to play it better. It's also really fustrating when you're the worst player of your team, oh the pressure they put on you is unfathomable. Really good game + it's free, so why not try it right? Ruined my life , so why not ruin yours ? Makes perfect sense !
Cocoa;-;This is a great game, the graphics are good, the sound atmospheric, the game play is clean and fun, and the heros are enjoyable and at some moments funny. However the game lacks in some area, some heros are far better then others when you play on a public server, i.e. (Sniper, Riki, and Bloodseeker) just to name a few, all these heros can be countered easily, but with an incompetant team they'll become gods on the battlefield, also the tutorial teaches bad habits i.e. (Only teaching you how to fight in the middle lane, poor hero selection, and no team building tutorial). Altogether this game is great, it is outstanding how open ended the battles can be, every game is different, and you're never left unsatisfied. I give this game a 9/10
Cjaemon;-;11/10 LOL :D This game is so great! Thumbs up!
RC.GG;-;Great
cowleysemple;-;Dota 2 is probly one of the games of all time but if your don't have a team this game can really be frustrating because you might need have a comeback but with pubes everone will just fight with each other or people will speak a different language and you can not work together. if you can deal with these probles you will find a very compex moba and fun game. (don,t play meepo)
RTD53;-;Best game ever but the hardest to get started at. Requires months to even be decent... Ive lost years to DotA...
Moe^_^eoM;-;Going almost full support ;3 almost forget how to carry.......
ETP.ChaCha.XMG;-;NICE GAME I LOVE IT SO MUCH :*
R3bel;-;yeah because it makes me enjoy whenever im bored <3 and i love playing dota 2 with my friends ^.^
HeHeJiJi@USwest;-;DOTA2 is a great game. Play it, love it.
dedamausi;-;1000 hours on track - still a noob
Nightshade;-;Nice game with few exceptions.
S  D B O Y;-;I think the Dota 2 is very good game. Nice design and a lot of heroes to play.
Sleepless;-;Awesome, but very addicting
Fever 105;-;PLS NERF DAT  JUGGERNAUT.only with aganim can kill easy 2 person.
._.;-;My FRV Game
ZA WORUDO;-;REVIEWS FOR DOTA 2:ROSETTA STONE FOR GAMERS - "If you hate Russia, think League of Legends is too mainstream, and have a lot of time to waste, this is THE GAME for you." - "Best language learning tool EVER especially for the following languages: Portugese, Russian, and every language in the entire EU!" - "I didn't know Valve made language games...." - "Before DotA 2, my friends called me a wannabe hipster, but now I'm a genuine hipster, unlike all of those LoL playing imbeciles"
ja;-;commended!!
bringweed;-;DotA 2 best game ever... If you can get past the fact that all the servers are Russian.
Rainbow Rabbit;-;Verry good game spent 4000 hours of my life for this
Melderv;-;The perfect bundle of fun and frustration.
HammerDeathMY;-;Rato Doto !! best games
Fredda;-;This game taught me about the diversity of cultures that our small little corner of the universe offers. Then it taught me to hate them all.
Chrome;-;Side effects include: -Hatred of other humans -Lack of trust in others -Carpal Tunnel -Improved hand eye coordination -A large ego -Weight gain -Weight loss -Confidence -Despression -Extreme Racism -EXTREME RACISM -Increased strategic thinking capabilities -Mushy-brain syndrome -Subconsciously learning a new language -Subconsciously learning to hate the culture of said language -Literally every ailment that is not a transmitable disease 9/10 Doctors accepted this game on their recommendation list, but the tenth was afk
Grizzt;-;It's like roulette; fun until it turns into Russian.
psych0tic;-;Causes anxiety problems, low self esteem, Tourette's syndrome, mood swings, Bipolar disorder, breakdown of relationships, raging erections, racism. Would definitely recommend.
Sentimental Oriental;-;In Dota 2, Not many people speak your language. Not many people play well. Not many people talk nicely. Not many people work as a team. But if you find people that do... You'll have the most fun you've ever had.
Kyubashi;-;And you thought real life was a struggle.
ephir;-;I only played a little but it was fun.
Captain Obvious;-;Things I gave to DotA: 1. Money 2. Time 3. Love Things DotA gave me: 1. Arthritis 2. Carpal tunnel syndrome 3, Hatred of Russians, Mexicans, Spanish, Finnish, and Russians 4. Broken keyboard 5. Broken mouse 6. 9/10 ready 7. Server crashes 8. 4 stacks of Russians in EUW servers on English prefrence settings 9. Ranked matches 10. Free to play but Pay to win games (I.E. - Foreseer's contract, New Bloom 2015) 11. "It's in the bag" spam (especially Skywrath) 12. Multilingual cursing - I guess this is a good thing? 13. Split second math - Reliable/Unreliable gold and gold loss on death vs. Buyback availability - This is good too Essentially - DotA is a greedy woman, but I love her all the same. 11 / 10 would play again
HekaDooM;-;"THE PUB SUPPORT" "Where are wards?" The pub Carry demanded. "I placed them and they were countered" the Support began, "I am trying to juggle giving you complete lane farm, protecting you and harrassing the enemy while saving to buy more, also possibly sentries to remove their-" "UP COUR PLS" the mid hero politely added. "Give Savle" The Carry demanded. "Certainly." replies the support, using the salve on the Carry who subsequently ran headlong into an enemy creepwave. "So where is mek?" the Carry said, after he was ganked due to overextending. The Support died saving him and was treated to a rather enthusiastic series of map pings on his corpse. "Again, having not even enough to buy boots as well as wards, I don't think a 7 minute Mek is viable." The Support replies. "Haha look your level, so low, noob" the Carry retorted. "U have no item xaxa". "Well, jungle gold and experience through stacking and pulling with blocked camps is nowhere near as much as on lane which I attempted to give you, the carry, the priority over." The Carry is subsequently ganked again at the enemy tower, oblivious to the enemy tp that the Support moved away from. "Report Support, usless" The carry cried in allchat, in between mentioning various aspects of the Support's Mother's anatomy. "Instead of reporting and acting like that, why don't you try supporting for randoms sometime instead of instapicking a carry?" the Support asked, as he watched the Carry return to afk-lasthitting lane creeps. "HAH, support is for noskill noobs like you!"
flanadlivv;-;One day, a wise man intoduce me into this game. "it shall protect your virginity, my lad" he said.
Ping;-;The best game ever in steam..thumbs up for valve and steam to their efforts for the game..and thank you too..
s;-;Dota is a teamwork game, and you must support each other. Throw your ego, discard your stupidity, put up some courage and concentrate. You must read a situation when playing this game, so don't be an airhead. Every minutes is counted, so you must thing smart to overcame all situations. Overall, this is fantastic game ever I played in my life
Hero833.You;-;Dota 2 is an awesome game,, play with your friend and get more fun :)
El Gato Penumbra;-;great game. just don't mind the rude players
Valen #RoadToDistinguished;-;-Great game Great variety of characters that you do not get bored Try it only at the beginning Strive to understand the mechanics of the game -Grandioso juego Gran variedad de personajes que no te aburriran pruebenlo solo al principio esfuerzate para entender la mecanica del juego
ao;-;recommend! :)
Makise Kurisu #CD100DAY;-;you can meet mother russian
MyMyMy;-;You may be strong but you not 5 ..
Phoo;-;Let's Play This Game, Be A Pro
Hi army, goodbuy world;-;2000 hours of sex with teammate's moms. The best way to waste my useless time like in garena's W3. T Y valve 4 saving of endangered species of frogs (Ice frog i mean) .
chin;-;You will hate this game. You will love this game. You will become an  to your friends (if you have any). Your bonds with them will strengthen. May make you racist. These are facts.
bennyben;-;Recommended for Russians. Best game ever, could destroy your life and LoL players.
Ittyn Balasy;-;Cool game!
10 y/o virgin no bf girl gamer;-;I can sucessfully make a living off selling my nude photos for pudge hooks!
Blue_Prime;-;If there is a F2P that I would encourage people to play pick up on steam, it would have to be Dota 2. The amount of time that you have to into this game is 100% worth. You might think that League of Legends would be a better option because it's easier to pick up and it's true. But, if you really want to be tested a MOBA game this would be it.
Dominos Dev;-;The best things in life are free.
BossMan!;-;It was great
-Rara:3-;-;I LIKE BECAUSE IT WILL HELP YOU TO CARRY OUT YOUR PROBLEMS . SOMETIMES ALWAYS UPDATE .
hi;-;This game is good.
-KaNDe;-;pls play
BunnY;-;i love this game \m/
k4rL;-;The most addictive game I've ever played... Cheers!!!
)==}X{;;;;;;;;;;;;;;;;;;;>;-;I Like This Games
aptain Kazahstain;-;Dota 2 is great team game but not for the rakals. Please nevr pick Pudge Riki Sniper Phantom Asassin.
1stBomb;-;post review
Doraemon;-;Any hero can equip/change items and skills and etc...! <3
Yolosaurus McSwag;-;Fast paced, really gets you into the game. If you're looking for a challenge this is your MOBA :p
FTAB;-;if your reading this, pls go to my profile and there you will see a steam offer link,. pls steam offer me some items :D
Medusa;-;This is a very good game!
1C3 KoN;-;Well Played
iCame;-;Ruins my college life, steals all my savings to buy some fancy pixels, and a great protection from losing my virginity, Recommended game 11/10
Bo Kang Thau;-;I recommend this game
Sixty - 9;-;One of the most fantastic games.. so can you give us a chance to get a free items ?? :D
TastyBrown;-;A great game to play with or without your friends, depending on how much you tolerate the "randoms". You will eventually lose your cool and go bananas. 10/10 Have fun :D
Hwan;-;Nice game to kill 1 hour of free time per game
Hobowiththesock;-;This game unites humanity in a way I have never seen before. I you have ever wanted to hate South America, Central America Russia, and Europe. This is the game for you 12/10.
Titan. ReiD;-;addcting and nice game
Trolnator;-;once you start there is almost no way you can stop playing
K13.Lazarus;-;good and nice
dbickel;-;Best game I have ever played by far! Switching over from LoL
JAY-G;-;+ rep to this game
HarleyQuinn;-;Amazing and fun.. instead of playing the game alone, i can play it with friends..
Sager Lord;-;A Really good and a Fantastic Strategy-Based Game!!!
Mai;-;Human Revolution is a bit slow to start but gets really good after a few hours of play I'm a big fan of the futuristic theme, and the music is really good.
Braden;-;This is a nice game that's action packed. Very fun and their is strategy involved. Alot of characters to choose from and learn each with their own individual powers.
Hiro;-;Much More Possibilities to Explore
CaptainGibs #9gaggersUnite;-;INSANELY GOOD!!! For the people that doesnt have this game you SHOULD have it. It takes skills to play this game for the ones that like a challenge i recommend this game so much. I love it so much. PLAY IT NOW!!!!!!!!!! 1000/1
Beastie Boys;-;Just another  moba to be honest, games so boring and dull i spent over half my hours afk or alt tabbed or when the computer is on. I wouldnt bother with it.
Swift;-;BEST GAME EVER CREATED IN THE WORLD :D
Barry Allen;-;the best game i ever play, meet other player from worldwide, different team, different skills. Very good !
SH0wXayN3;-;Simply awesome game ! :D
Saggy Ass Sad Girl Pants;-;Don't buy Rosetta Stone, you'll quickly learn Russian by playing this game.
J.R.D.M.S;-;10/10 awesome game ^_^. When you play and selected a hero, It has a recommend item which is good for new players.
| Rafaela |;-;These game is very good!
[E]xaByte;-;Very addicting game.
Stylin;-;Free to play game working with the original MOBA game and improving all the time. Try it and you may just fall in love.
QQQ;-;My rule is so hard. Because i am carry.
Blakt;-;One of the best MOBA you can find out there :)
G.Gamers;-;HIGH END BEST FREE GAME AND COLLECTABLE ITEMS ...
Dota101;-;great skill's game and teamwork can give u alot of fun in dota!!
AGM;-;This is a good games for everybody
Kozi;-;This is Awesome wicked Cool!! (y) :)
Mozarella;-;DotA is a game of "Community" and not Tragedy of "foul-lips" anarchy. Smile :)
Prostagma;-;Just play League of Legions instead...
Tigerboy;-;Great gameplay!
Fuck russians;-;Showed me russians are  ,impolite,trolls. 10/10 Would bang again.
Hello;-;I am hero!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
Sakidadondeng;-;dota is the best
standin.CookieSpookie;-;Totally the best and addictive game ever
sober;-;must play for rts game lover
F H A N I E ^;-;Nice Game :) (Y)
CaCeCiCoCu FaFeFiFoFu *<3;-;nothing dont watch it ! :P
Wolfy;-;Really nice game hope u try it
MikiTheNerd;-;love this game , enjoying every minute of it :D
reckless;-;i hate this game.
DOTA2.RS TV;-;Dota 2 is my favorite game <3
NotAfraid;-;Such fun game,,, and a very competitive game !! :DD
Sica;-;Good Perfectly Made
DuDu;-;Very good game with tons of  and smurfs at 5 lvl. Still better than league of fagts (y)
Safir;-;A fun but tactical team game. Please add more items from the workshop Valve! ;)
Banana Flavoured Cumswap;-;''I spent all game ganking lanes, stacking camps, buying wards, buying tp's and gems for the team, secured runes, let carry take kills. The game was good. Then I accidently misclicked and right clicked a creep... Got 9 reports and got called a 'noob' 'idiot' ' blyt' 'you shouldn't be allowed in dota'' -The life of every support EU 10/10 Would get called a  again
Kill Me Sofly;-;Cool and awesome
KS.Ari;-;Nice graphic and in game item !
Lmon;-;Everyone is playing it :D
Virginix;-;Harder than league of legends. (and more challenging for me)
Bleh!;-;Great, but addictive.
xRoNNy MaKaRoNNy;-;Yeah , best game , i cant imagine if this game if rlly closed :))
X4.Gitz;-;This gg game .. With Great action and great heroes !! Use your own tactic to owning this game !!
S0E;-;Very Cool
Saboon;-;One of the most efficient, innovative, and fun FPS/Brazilian Pre-teen Simulators I've ever had the pleasure of experiencing. 9/10 -National Abortion Federation
Ray Finkle;-;cool beans
Gare-bear;-;yeah i pretty much won this game, see you at whatever that stupid nerd convention is called 2k15 i'll be on the podium standing taller than hitler  u nerds i am the next gaben
Slayy;-;My one goal in the game is to get a Godlike killstreak: 9 kills without dying. The voice for it is awesome, and someday it will be dedicated to me. I went into a game thinking I'd get it, then someone who already had some kills appeared out of nowhere and killed me. Then, to my terrible surprise, I heard the one word: "Godlike!" I immediately quit the game. Dota 2 is an amazing game. Now if you'll excuse me, I'm trying to get into a lobby where I'll get a Godlike streak.
-1000 pt mmr;-;Nice Game Ever existed on entire universe
